
<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68505 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94041" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   29 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Vladivostok Introduces Compulsory Licensing </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Vladivostok Introduces Compulsory Licensing </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0646A Vladivostok NOVOSTI in Russian 29 Apr 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0646A </F>
<F P=104>  Vladivostok NOVOSTI </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by Aleksey Chernychev: "New Source of Replenishing </F>
the City Budget Is Found in the Business Sector"] 
  [Text] Beginning 1 May of this year, mandatory 
licensing of activities of all economic entities in the sphere 
of trade, public catering, and consumer services for the 
population, regardless of their form of ownership and 
departmental affiliation, goes into effect in the kray center. 
According to the city administration press center, a 
corresponding decree was signed recently by acting Mayor of 
Vladivostok Konstantin Tolstoshein. 
  These actions by the city authorities were undertaken in 
carrying out the decree of the head of kray administration dated 
24 February 1994 "On Introducing Mandatory Licensing of 
Activities in the Sphere of Trade, Public Catering, and Consumer 
Services for the Population." 
  In accordance with the decree at the city level, the 
aforementioned licensing will be carried out by the Committee 
for Entrepreneurship, Trade, and Consumer Services of the 
Vladivostok Mayoralty; the right to sign licenses has been 
delegated to its chairman, Yuriy Terskiy. 
  As Mr. Terskiy told NOVOSTI correspondent, his committee is 
currently preparing to begin issuing licenses. It is known that 
all enterprises conducting economic activities in four spheres 
of entrepreneurial activities--liquor sales, retail trade, 
public catering, and consumer services for the population--are 
to undergo the "licensing purgatory." 
  Beginning 1 May the price of a license for each point of 
sale 
(kiosk, stand, store, cafe, etc.) engaged in one of these four 
activities will be R30,460. Entrepreneurs of all forms of 
ownership will have to pay separately for their right to conduct 
business in each of the four listed categories. In the event a 
certain point of sale is intended both for retail sales and 
consumer services for the population, the proper license will 
cost R60,920. 
  According to Yuriy Terskiy, by introducing new rules for 
licensing activities in the sphere of trade and so on, the city 
will get a reliable source of additional budget revenue. The 
actual scale of this additional revenue will be clear after 1 
May. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68506 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94042" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Internal' Impediments to Foreign Investment </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Internal' Impediments to Foreign Investment </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0332A Moscow FINANSOVYYE IZVESTIYA in Russian 14-20 Apr 
94 pp 1, 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944Q0332A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow FINANSOVYYE IZVESTIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Mikhail Delyagin, chief of the applied analysis </F>
service under the Institute of Economic Problems of the 
Transition Period: "Foreign Investment Goes Into Inefficient 
Sectors"] 
  [Text] The flow of foreign capital into Russia is limited 
today not only by the presence of high political and economic 
risks, but also to a considerable extent by the opposition of 
forces striving to prevent competition in the domestic market. 
  According to the Russian Federation Goskomstat [State 
Committee on Statistics], in 1993 foreign investment in the 
Russian economy amounted to $2.9 billion (including $2.6 billion 
in direct investment, which includes the right to participate in 
managing the enterprise). The regions that have been most 
attractive for foreign investors are Moscow, where 26.2 percent 
of all money has been invested; Krasnoyarsk Kray--14.2 percent; 
Omsk Oblast--8.1 percent; Arkhangelsk Oblast--7.9 percent; 
Yevreyskaya Autonomous Oblast--5.9 percent; the Republic of Mari 
El--5.0 percent; Belgorod Oblast--4.1 percent; and the Komi 
Republic--3.6 percent. No official statistical data has been 
reported on the placement of the remaining 25 percent of 
investment in 69 regions of Russia. 
  Looking at the territorial aspect of placement, one notices 
the absence among the leaders of such seemingly attractive 
territories as Tyumen Oblast, as well as the industrial part of 
the Urals and Volga economic regions. 
  A high degree of development in these regions is combined 
with an urgent need for a flow of capital into the modernization 
and reorientation of production. However, foreign capital is in 
no hurry to meet this need, and the only reasonable explanation 
for this phenomenon is the existence of restrictions of a 
noneconomic nature caused by the desire of some local producers 
to preserve a monopoly on management and not allow competition 
on the part of the world market. 
  Aspirations of this kind are not always unjustified from the 
standpoint of the interests of the state. Suffice it to point 
out the high ranking of Yevreyskaya Autonomous Oblast, which is 
poorly developed in every respect. A considerable part of 
foreign investment in this territory is a graphic example of 
Chinese capital making inroads in the Russian border zone. 
  The structure of foreign investment by sector is much more 
interesting than by region. According to Goskomstat, of the 
total volume, the following has been invested in: 
  --machine building and metalworking--23.2 percent; 
  --fuel industry--16.3 percent; 
  --trade and public catering--15.2 percent; 
  --construction--5.3 percent; 
  --woodworking and pulp and paper industry--4.5 percent; 
  --construction material industry--3.8 percent. 
  Goskomstat does not report on the distribution of the 
remaining 31 percent of investment; indirect sources indicate a 
rather considerable investment of foreign capital in the 
production of various consumer goods. 
  A comparison of the structure of attracted foreign 
investment 
with available data on the structural restructuring of the 
Russian economy leads to certain conclusions. 
  The most promising sector today is the fuel industry. As a 
result of lesser price disproportions as compared to those that 
existed in the centrally planned economy, we now can judge the 
significance of some or other sector by industrial 
statistics--the share of its production in the total volume of 
industrial production expressed in current prices. For the fuel 
industry this indicator reached 17.5 percent in 1993, but this 
is an understatement since it is an export-oriented sector and 
world prices for its output are considerably higher than 
domestic ones. 
  Meanwhile, in the volume of foreign investment the fuel 
industry ranks only second, while first--and with a considerable 
lead at that--is machine building and metalworking. The 
inefficiency of this group of sectors has led to a situation 
whereby they were damaged most by the development of market 
relations. The proportional share of machine building and 
metalworking has dropped over the period of reform by five 
percentage points, but because of considerable state support and 
thanks to an insignificant--for Russia--gap between domestic and 
world prices, still remains very high (20.3 percent of 
industrial production in 1993). 
  Currently it is precisely machine-building and metalworking 
enterprises that are hurting most from the distribution crisis 
and are the least competitive. Nevertheless, this particular 
sphere, which overall does not have favorable prospects, is 
attracting the greatest attention of foreign investors. 
  A similar situation exists in another pair of sectors. The 
woodworking and pulp and paper industry, whose presence in the 
economy has dropped by 1.7 percentage points (which is quite a 
lot considering that its share in industrial production in 1993 
comprised 3.9 percent), has attracted considerably greater 
attention on the part of foreign investors than the construction 
materials industry, which has increased its share in production 
by 0.2 points--to 3.3 percent. 
  There is one single visible cause: The sectors that are 
increasing their significance in the Russian economy (which in 
an environment of overall production decline does not preclude a 
drop in their output), are strong enough not to let foreign 
capital in, so they do not have to share control over their 
enterprises. Those sectors, however, where the situation is 
becoming critical, and where their very survival is already at 
issue, are relinquishing control for the sake of 
self-preservation. 
  As a result, the sectors that are accessible to foreign 
investors are those undergoing serious difficulties. 
  This has its positive side, since foreign capital provides 
nourishment for those who need it most. 
  The problem is that, as the development of oil production 
shows, our monopolists have a tendency to keep out potential 
competition even in circumstances where they are unable on their 
own to sustain not only development but even mere maintenance of 
the sector at a normal level. They prefer to count on state 
support, the probability (let alone expediency) of which is in 
serious doubt, but which does not hold the threat of either 
competition or of losing sole control over production for the 
current monopolists. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68507 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94043" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   19 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Oil Export Policies Threaten Future Economic Development </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Oil Export Policies Threaten Future Economic Development </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0329A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 19 Apr 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0329A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Viktor Petrov, doctor of geological and </F>
mineralogical sciences, under the rubric "Fuel": "There Will Not 
Be Another Tyumen. A New Approach to Resource Use Should Sustain 
the Probable Economic Growth With Oil"] 
  [Text] The development of the world economy has been 
accompanied by the continuous growth of production and 
consumption of mineral resources. Oil consumption has been 
growing at the fastest rate. At the beginning of the century, in 
1900, oil production in the world came to 20.1 million tonnes. 
Subsequently, it doubled every 10 years for 70 years, coming to 
2.248 billion tonnes in 1970. The rate of growth of production 
and consumption later diminished to 1-1.7 percent; in 1991, the 
volume of consumption came to 3.150 billion tonnes. World 
production and consumption of gas have grown by 2.5-2.7 percent 
annually in recent decades, coming to 1.9 trillion cubic meters 
in 1991. 
  The former USSR would have been unable to attain superpower 
status without creating its own mighty mineral and raw-material 
base and the oil-and-gas complex. After development of the 
unique West Siberian Oil and Gas Province, oil production 
doubled between 1971 and 1990, and that of natural gas increased 
by a factor of more than 7.5. The USSR came to rank first in the 
world on these indicators, attaining in 1988 the levels of 624 
million tonnes (including gas condensate) and more than 800 
billion cubic meters, respectively, which accounted for about 20 
percent of the world production of oil and more than 40 percent 
of the world production of gas (Russia accounted for 570 million 
tonnes and 640 billion cubic meters of the above). The inland 
consumption of oil and gas, including exports, was at the level 
of 13-14 percent and 35-38 percent of their consumption in the 
world. 
  An economic crisis (including that in the oil industry), a 
drop in industrial production by a factor of two, the severance 
of relations between CIS countries, the loss of the regulatory 
role of the state in the economy, and the decay of the 
geological service--all of these caused a sharp decline in the 
production and consumption of oil and virtually all other types 
of mineral raw materials after the disintegration of the USSR. 
In 1993, oil production in Russia fell to 340 million tonnes, 
and in the CIS as a whole, to 380 million tonnes (estimated). In 
terms of the level of oil production, Russia was set back to the 
early 1970's. The further declining trend persists. 
  Opportunities for the exportation of oil from Russia and 
some 
CIS countries to foreign states have expanded considerably now 
that foreign-economic activities that had traditionally been 
oriented toward raw materials have been liberalized. Oil exports 
had become sizable as a proportion of the worldwide volume (up 
to 13-14 percent in certain years) earlier, in the 1980's. We 
cannot say that such extensive exports were justified from the 
economic standpoint or that of resource conservation for 
self-supply in the long run. They largely hinged on the policy 
of so-called internationalist duty of the USSR to other 
fraternal states. In addition to "traditional" exports, the 
exportation of oil by enterprises formed with the participation 
of foreign investors is also developing at present in the 
free-market environment. In Russia, more than 40 such 
enterprises are already known in the most significant oil and 
gas-bearing regions of Western Siberia, the Northwest, Urals, 
and the Volga area, and on the shelf of Sakhalin. Joint ventures 
with foreign companies have also been established in Kazakhstan 
at the unique Tengiz fields and on the shelf of the Caspian Sea 
which has good oil prospects. The picture of the development of 
oil fields in the Caspian Sea basin of Azerbaijan is similar, 
despite the fact that the development of marine fields was 
started for the first time in the world precisely here, and that 
local geologists and oilmen have accumulated a wealth of their 
own experience. 
  One would think that this orientation in foreign economic 
activities toward considerable exports to foreign states, whose 
development will get an additional impetus as foreign investment 
increases, proceeds mainly from the completely unsubstantiated 
but widespread notion of the supposedly inexhaustible mineral 
wealth of the former USSR. In the process, the large size of the 
domestic economy, the likely overcoming of the crisis by it, and 
its subsequent development are not taken into account, as well 
as the consequent domestic need for oil, great at present and 
growing in the long term, as the complex world situation in this 
area becomes ever more aggravated. 
  Actually, oil reserves, although large, are not so large as 
to allay serious concern about meeting our own need for oil in 
the immediate future. In Western Siberia which holds about 
one-half of all potential resources and about 70 percent of the 
explored reserves of oil in Russia, and provides 70 percent of 
production, the normal stage of decline in the effectiveness of 
geological prospecting and volumes of output has virtually set 
in. In other old petroliferous regions, the realization of their 
initial potential and the depletion of explored reserves are so 
high (65-85 percent) that a drop in production is objectively 
unavoidable. The technical and economic performance of wells has 
deteriorated sharply in all regions. Declining output is 
characteristic of about 60 percent of explored reserves. The 
size of the discovered fields and the yields of wells have 
diminished sharply. 
  The probability of the discovery of a new Tyumen, or at 
least 
a significant segment of it, on the extensive land mass of 
Russia is theoretically and practically nil. Certain hopes were 
attached to creating a substantial new raw-material base in 
Eastern Siberia (Krasnoyarsk Kray, Irkutsk Oblast, and Yakutia) 
whose hypothetical resources of oil were estimated to be 10 
billion tonnes. However, the quite significant total volume of 
exploration in the area over more than two decades has been 
crowned with modest success, and for now has not confirmed these 
projections. The discovered reserves (about 500 million tonnes) 
are dispersed at several fields with very poor technical and 
economic characteristics. It is now absolutely obvious that 
these fields and probably those to be discovered in the future 
in this region will not influence the prospects for oil supply 
to Russia significantly. It is becoming necessary to reevaluate 
the hypothetical resources of oil in Western and Eastern Siberia 
and a number of other oil and gas-bearing regions taking into 
account the accumulated new factual data on their geology and 
prospects. 
  The continental shelf, mainly that above the polar circle, 
remains the last large oil and gas-bearing reserve. However, for 
now we can speak with confidence about large gas resources that 
have been confirmed by the discovery of unique fields in the 
Barents and Kara Seas. The large hypothetical resources of oil 
may also be proven after exploratory drilling is performed. This 
is why the exploration and study of the occurrence of oil and 
gas on the shelf is already one of the strategic tasks of the 
geological service and science. 
  In addition to the indicated, actually existing problems 
associated with the oil raw-material base, which appear 
particularly acute in the long run, it is necessary to take into 
account in our foreign economic activities the fact that the 
forthcoming stabilization of the economy of Russia and the CIS 
as a whole and its probable subsequent development will 
unavoidably entail the growth of oil consumption. Russia and 
other CIS countries trail well behind the developed countries on 
this indicator. Thus, at the level of 1991, the per capita 
consumption of oil in the CIS as a whole, including Russia, came 
to 1.5 and 1.6 tonnes whereas it came to 2.6 tonnes in states 
with developed economies, including 3.2 tonnes in the United 
States. 
  Nor can the policy of the use of domestic oil resources be 
determined in isolation from the present and, in particular, 
long-term worldwide condition of the oil supply. 
  The growth of consumption of fuel, energy, and other mineral 
resources will remain significant as an objective factor in the 
development of the world economy in the long run. According to 
available estimates, the production and consumption of oil and 
gas--given the indicated rates of their growth in recent 
years--may reach 3.4-3.5 billion tonnes and 2.3-2.4 trillion 
cubic meters as early as the beginning of the 21st Century 
providing, just as it does now, more than one-half of the energy 
used in the world. The currently known estimates of explored and 
hypothetical world resources of oil and gas make it possible to 
say quite definitively that their significance as the principal 
energy resources will persist for at least the next 70 years. At 
the same time, in the long term we should expect the circle of 
oil and gas-producing countries to narrow (mainly on account of 
the industrially developed countries), the trend toward keener 
competition for the sources of this raw material to strengthen, 
and prices for it to increase. This conclusion follows from the 
data on the ratio of the amount of explored reserves to the 
volumes of oil production and consumption for various groups of 
states (as percentages of world volumes as of 1991, without the 
CIS) which are given in the table. 


Level of economic     Reserves          Production          Consumption 
development of 
states 

Developed             6.5               28.0                65.2 

Developing            90.7              65.7                26.7 

With planned and      2.8               6.3                 8.1 
transitional 
economies 


  The economically developed countries meet almost 40 percent 
of their needs for oil out of domestic production and 60 percent 
through other, mainly developing countries. Oil production in 
the developed countries fell five to six percent between 1986 
and 1991, and increased in the developing countries by 23-25 
percent, the overall growth (without the CIS) being more than 12 
percent. 
  Deliveries from the oil-producing developing countries to 
the 
industrially developed countries account for 70-75 percent of 
the worldwide exports-imports of oil which come to 1.4-1.45 
billion tonnes a year (except for the CIS); of this, the United 
States and Japan account for about 35 percent. The United States 
imports from more than 50 countries, but predominantly from the 
OPEC countries (about 60 percent of imports). The latter also 
provide about 75 percent of the entire import of Japan and up to 
60 percent of the import of West European countries. 
  The degree of self-sufficiency of the economically developed 
countries in oil will unavoidably continue to decline in the 
future, whereas the dependence of these countries on outside 
deliveries will increase. Under the circumstances, the developed 
countries that are large oil consumers strive to expand contacts 
involving oil production and delivery with the largest possible 
number of oil-producing countries with a view to increasing the 
reliability of their oil supply in the long term and getting 
leeway for greater maneuvers. For example, legislative and state 
sanctions in the United States are aimed at conserving the 
domestic resources of oil. Thus, the United States has suspended 
exploration and prospecting in the Alaska region and in some 
sections of the waters of the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic 
and Pacific shelf. By 1991, oil production had been reduced by 
15 percent compared to the 1986 level. The foreign policy of the 
United States in some vital regions is also largely associated 
with its current and long-term oil interests. The United States, 
Mexico, and a number of other countries do not allow foreign 
companies to participate in prospecting for oil and producing it 
in their territories. 
  In recent years, the developing countries have been 
producing 
an amount of oil that is almost 2.5 times greater than their own 
consumption. From among them, the OPEC countries hold about 80 
percent of world reserves and turn out about 47 percent of the 
world's production (except for the CIS), including the states 
adjacent to the Persian Gulf (Saudi Arabia, Kuwait, the United 
Arab Emirates, Iraq, Iran) with 75 and 30 percent, respectively. 
  The potential of explored and expected resources of oil in 
the developing countries, especially those belonging to the oil 
and gas province of the Persian Gulf which is unique on our 
planet, is immense. Their role as the main suppliers of oil will 
be enhanced in the long term, all the more so because, unlike 
the CIS, a majority of oil-producing developing countries will 
have favorable opportunities for the export of oil on a large 
scale in the future, too, in view of the relatively small scale 
of their economies and size of their populations, and 
consequently, the low volume of domestic needs. In turn, the 
economically developed countries with a high level of 
scientific-technical progress, which possess an extensive 
foreign-trade potential by virtue of this will, unlike the CIS, 
have a great opportunity to meet their growing needs through the 
imports of oil and other mineral resources in the future, too. 
  At present and in the future, the problem of resource supply 
will unavoidably remain a common problem for the CIS countries 
that are closely tied by an entire set of geopolitical, 
historical, economic, and many other interests. Pooling the 
efforts of these states on the basis of mutually advantageous 
interstate relations could, to a considerable degree, preempt 
the participation of companies from faraway foreign countries in 
the development of oil resources in Russia, Kazakhstan, and 
Azerbaijan. In turn, the accepted agreements with foreign 
investors (based on concessions or production sharing), unlike 
regular exports, result not only in long-term debt obligations 
to export oil but also the loss of a proportion of profits from 
the operation of the fields. These contracts, which are signed 
under pressure from the economic difficulties of the period of 
transition, are short-sighted and run counter to the strategic 
interests of our own oil supply. They also undermine economic 
relations among the countries of the Commonwealth. Instead of 
using the pooled industrial potential, in particular, that of 
defense enterprises, for the retooling of the oil industry, 
foreign companies are being brought in. The need for the 
creation of an economically close union within the framework of 
the still ephemeral Commonwealth is being dictated not only by 
the last three years of the experience of its sovereign member 
states, but also by the processes of economic and political 
unification of many countries which have been underway in the 
world in recent years. The world mineral and raw-material 
situation and the problems of energy supply, primarily oil 
supply, influence these processes considerably. 
  Entering in a headlong manner the world energy market that 
advantageously serves the industrially developed countries 
calls, in the case of the CIS, for a profound analysis and a 
balanced approach. Many specific peculiarities are 
characteristic of Russia and the Commonwealth as a whole, and 
all of them testify to the fact that in the long term, it is 
feasible to rely on their own energy resources. 
  A reasonable and far-sighted approach to the use of 
nonrenewable mineral and raw-material resources, especially oil, 
on the basis of a long-term, profoundly and comprehensively 
substantiated concept proceeding from the optimal combination of 
current and long-range interests, is the most significant 
regulatory function of the state. If such a mineral and 
raw-material policy is absent Russia will not have a clearly 
defined system for its implementation and coordination with 
regard to the CIS countries. The current and future interests of 
Russia and the countries of the Commonwealth require that such a 
state concept be developed in the area of foreign economic 
activities involving mineral resources, and that it be 
thoroughly supported by legislation. Miscalculation and 
shortcomings in the use of our own mineral resources are 
irreparable in nature and are therefore fraught with major 
unfavorable consequences for the history and economy of Russia. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68508 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94044" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   19 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   International Credit Card Firms Vie for Share in Russian </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    International Credit Card Firms Vie for Share in Russian </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Market 

<F P=102>   944Q0324A Moscow KOMMERSANT in Russian No 14, 19 Apr 94 pp 
20-26 </F>

<F P=103> 944Q0324A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Nikita Kirichenko: "Do You Hear It? The Rumble </F>
of Boots: Vivid Episodes From Market Competition"] 
  [Text] Although the Russian market in plastic money will be 
25 years old this year, the stormiest events in it did not 
unfold until 1992-1993, when real competition among payment 
systems and numerous commercial structures emerged here. And in 
literally the past few months the competition in the Russian 
electronic-payments market has developed into an open conflict 
in which both sides have conducted themselves fairly toughly and 
the plot of the conflict has taken on the qualities of a 
detective story. 
<H8>  The Story of Plastic Money in Russia: Pain Over Rights </H8>
  "My wife's credit card was stolen." 
  "Did you put a stop on the account?" 
  "No, I'm pleased: the thief is spending much less!" 
  (A bourgeois joke) 
  The pioneers in developing the Russian consumer-payments 
market were Diners Club International (which, incidentally, in 
1950 put out the world's first international credit card) and 
American Express. In 1969 they signed an agency agreement with 
the State Committee for Foreign Tourism in the person of its 
commercial arm, the Inturist All-Union Joint-Stock Company, for 
servicing those payment systems' credit cards; that is, the 
joint-stock company became those systems servicing agent. 
  In 1974 an analogous agreement was concluded with VISA 
International, in 1975 one was signed with Eurocard/Mastercard, 
and in 1986 one was signed with JCB International. 
  During the entire time that agency rights to the servicing 
of 
credit cards belonged to the Inturist All-Union Joint-Stock 
Company, the entire technical side of the work was handled by a 
credit-card group operating under the State Committee for 
Foreign Tourism, and commercial settlements were carried out on 
behalf of Inturist through the USSR Bank for Foreign Economic 
Activity. 
  At the end of 1987, in accordance with new legislation, the 
Inturservis All-Union (naturally!) Economic-Accountability 
(absolutely essential!) VTO [Foreign Trade Association] 
(subsequently All-Union Joint-Stock Company] was founded, and 
Inturist's agency rights with respect to all payment systems 
were transferred to it. A special subsidiary company, 
Inturkreditkart, was set up for the technical servicing of 
payments. Igor Fedorov became head of the main company, and 
Aleksandr Kapustin started working in the subsidiary (we will 
encounter their names again more than once). 
  And this is when the first intrigues in the Russian 
"plastic" 
market began, intrigues which illuminate by reflected light many 
years of competition among international payment systems on the 
remaining five-sixths (or approximately that much) of the globe. 
  In January 1988 VISA International elected the Inturist 
All-Union Joint-Stock Company as a member possessing basic 
rights (including the right of emission), despite the fact that 
the joint-stock company was not a banking institution. When this 
was done, Inturservis was recognized as a managing agent of 
Inturist. 
  In response, Eurocard (subsequently Europay) elected the 
USSR 
Bank for Foreign Economic Activity as its member. 
  Beginning in November 1988, Inturservis started exercising 
Inturist's membership rights, concluding direct contracts with 
trade enterprises dealing in foreign exchange (and this was just 
the time when they were undergoing a development boom). At the 
same time, the servicing of all payments continued to be carried 
out exclusively through the Inturservis processing center, which 
at that time was the only agency in Russia that had the 
requisite software, hardware and personnel to handle the 
complete cycle of servicing "plastic" payments: the processing 
of credit cards, the confirmation of purchases and verification 
of account balances, the conversion of the payment into 
electronic form and computer connections with the payment 
system, the handling of the payment disbursal, and the 
offsetting of client's payments between banks. 
  The present stage in the development of the Russian "plastic 
money" market began in September 1991, when Kredo Bank, which 
was accepted as a VISA International member in 1990, started 
offering VISA cards in Russia. Later Most [Bridge] Bank, 
Inkombank and Mosbiznesbank started carrying out programs to 
issue VISA cards, while the Inturservis processing center 
continued to service payments made with their cards. 
  In 1992, after the sole Russian member of Europay 
International, the USSR Bank for Foreign Economic Activity, 
ceased its banking activity in November 1991, Europay 
International started to accept other Russian banks as members, 
among which the most active became Most-bank (to which the 
personnel that had been working with credit cards in the USSR 
Bank for Foreign Economic Activity transferred) and Dialog Bank. 
  In the meantime, Kredo Bank, Most Bank and Dialog Bank--the 
first three banks to become members of both VISA International 
and Europay International--proposed to Inturservis that it 
divide its business in servicing VISA and Europay credit cards 
into two parts. However, the negotiations proved unsuccessful, 
since it is possible to transfer agency rights, but rather 
difficult to divide a processing center and its personnel. 
  Then the banks decided to found another processing center, 
Kardtsentr [Card Center], which was to be only for the Europay 
system. Naturally, that undertaking received the active support 
of Europay international, since Inturservis had historically 
received the support of VISA International. 
  Then Kredo Bank, however, decided (we do not rule out the 
possibility that it did so under the influence of the fairly 
jealous VISA International) not to take part in Kardtsentr, and, 
joining with Inturservis, on 11 November 1992 it founded the 
United Card Service Joint-Stock Company (UCS), the Russian 
version of whose name was United Credit Card Company--KOKK (for 
more detail, see the following section of the article). 
Aleksandr Kapustin became the president of UCS, and Yuriy Agapov 
became chairman of the board. In January 1993 authority to carry 
out Inturservis's activities in the area of "plastic" payments 
was transferred to UCS (for $900,000). 
  That is how two processing centers emerged in the market, 
while UCS has so far retained an exclusive position with respect 
to the processing of VISA, Diners Club and JCB cards. At the 
same time, payments with Europay cards can be serviced by both 
UCS and Kardtsentr. 
  To give a more complete picture, it should be added that in 
1993 many national card-payment programs started to be 
implemented--STB, Olbi, Ortcard, Most-card and Union Card. 
However, because these cards are mainly connected with ruble 
accounts, and no connection with external payment systems is 
required for servicing them, the processing of these cards is 
usually carried out by their issuers' own processing centers 
(for more detail, see KOMMERSANT No. 33, 23 August 1993). 
  Once again, to give a more complete picture, let us also 
mention the American Express company, which has not taken any 
part in the conflicts that we are going to relate: at the 
beginning of 1992 American Express began to terminate, de facto, 
the fulfillment of its existing agency agreement with 
Inturservis, and by the end of the year all of Inturservis's 
contracts with enterprises for the servicing of payments made 
with the American Express card were transferred to American 
Express (Russia) Ltd., which assumed functions related to the 
technical servicing of payments. 
<H8>  A Classic Capitalist Conflict: Kredo and Most Divide Their </H8>
Property But Do Not Divide Their Market and Management 
  "Filled with agitation, 
  I undid your corset-- 
  You ran away laughing, 
  While I stood there pondering...." 
  Count Aleksey Tolstoy 
  And so, by the fall of 1993 the UCS company was a 
joint-stock 
company with authorized capital of $1 million, in which 49 
percent of the shares belonged to the Inturservis All-Russian 
Joint Stock Company--the owner of agency rights for all payment 
systems--while 39 percent belonged to Kredo Bank (through which 
all payments serviced through UCS passed), and 12 percent 
belonged to the joint Finnish-British company Inpass Ltd. In the 
latter, 50 percent each of the shares belonged to the Finnish 
Okobank, through which VISA payments passed after going through 
Kredo, and to the British company CardTec Ltd, which develops 
hardware for the credit card business. 
  In our view, a fateful role in the subsequent development of 
events was played by the public disclosure of plans for the 
reorganization of UCS, plans which had been jointly developed by 
the joint-stock companies. (The presentation of UCS 
stockholders' new policy took place on 28 September--see 
KOMMERSANT No. 39, 4 October 1993). 
  According to the strategy that had been developed, the 
Inturservis All-Russian Joint-Stock Company was supposed to 
transfer its exclusive contracts with enterprises for VISA and 
Europay cards to the Russian banking sector, leaving UCS (or its 
successor) only rights and contracts to service Diners Club and 
JCB cards. 
  For this purpose, Russian banks that were VISA members were 
supposed to establish, on the basis of equal rights, a new Viza 
Rossiya Servis (VRS) company, to which the Inturservis 
All-Russian Joint-Stock Company's contracts--but only contracts 
pertaining to VISA cards--were supposed to be transferred. (It 
must be noted that in most countries national bank associations 
that are members of international payments systems have long 
since been established.) At the same time, according to the 
plan, all technical operations related to the servicing of 
credit cards would continue to be carried out by UCS (on the 
basis of a service agreement with VRS). 
  On the other hand, the Inturservis All-Russian Joint-Stock 
Company was supposed to transfer contracts for Europay cards to 
Kredo Bank--either permanently or until such time as an 
agreement was concluded to establish for Europay cards an 
organization analogous to Viza Rossiya Servis (that is, a 
national association), to which all rights for the servicing of 
cards would be transferred. 
  In and of itself, this latter circumstance gave Kredo 
certain 
potential advantages in the "plastic money" market, at least 
until such time as a Europay national association was 
established. However, what was key in the new strategy was not 
even that, but the point according to which, until Russian 
Europay member-banks had been granted the right to utilize the 
technical services of UCS along with the services of Kardtsentr, 
VRS members would not be allowed to seek the services of 
Kardtsentr for servicing the cards of Europay and other systems 
(in the event that Kardtsentr started working with systems other 
than Europay). 
  There are grounds for assuming that this point was included 
in the UCS program as a countermove after it became known that 
Europay International was pressuring the Russian Europay 
member-banks to obtain a provision whereby Kardtsentr for three 
years would not provide services to trade enterprises that had 
agreements with VISA. We learned of the existence of such 
pressure and of attempts on the part of Europay to "use force to 
impose exclusivity" from [Piter Derbi], the president of Dialog 
Bank, which is one of the founders of Kardtsentr (See CARDS 
INTERNATIONAL, No. 93, 6 September 1993). 
  In this connection, it is indisputable that the UCS 
technical 
exclusivity proposed for the members of Viza Rossiya Servis 
would have substantially graver consequences for the affairs of 
Kardtsentr than Kardtsentr's technical exclusivity would have 
for the future of UCS. Faced with the necessity of choosing, 
both processing centers' clients would more likely choose 
UCS--by virtue of the greater work experience contributed to UCS 
by Inturservis. 
  Naturally, diametrically opposite opinions exist with 
respect 
to the quality and efficiency of Kardtsentr's work. They range 
from the opinion set forth in an open letter from Kardtsentr's 
founders to the officers of UCS (see KOMMERSANT-DAILY for 14 
August 1993), to that expressed by Fedor Naumov, the head of 
Inkombank's credit card department, who left Kardtsentr: "They 
have existed for 13 months now and have not yet done anything. 
Conducting affairs that way is a mockery of banks (see EAST 
EUROPEAN BANKER, No. 35, September 1993). 
  However, even Dmitriy Alekhin, Kardtsentr's managing 
director, has said the following: "We started with nothing, and 
in order to provide high-class services and compete with UCS, we 
need not only technology but experience ... at present we are 
not yet ready" (see EAST EUROPEAN BANKER, No. 35, September 
1993). 
  In other words, after the presentation of the UCS's 
stockholders's agreement, the situation required decisive 
actions from the active members of Kardtsentr, if only to 
preserve the status quo in the credit-card servicing market, 
especially for the servicing of the deeply kindred Europay cards. 
<H8>  Open Letter From Bankers (August 1993) on the Utility of </H8>
Honest Competition 
  To Mr A. V. Kapustin, General Director of KOKK 
  Mr I. A. Fedorov, Chairman of the Board of the Inturservis 
All-Russian Joint-Stock Company 
  Mr Yu. V. Agapov, President of Kredo Bank 
  Mr I. V. Lipanov, Vice-President of Kredo Bank 
  Lately the mass media have carried invalid reports aimed at 
discrediting the activities of the Kardtsentr Joint-Stock 
Company, whose founders are a group of Russian banks. 
  We regard these publications as the manifestation of 
unscrupulous competition and profoundly regret that such methods 
are becoming common in Russian banking practice. 
  As founders of Kardtsentr who have an interest in the 
successful development in our country of a civilized system of 
settlements employing plastic cards, we propose to you in the 
future to wage competition in the financial services market by 
other means, namely: by means of the quality of services 
provided to clients, the speed with which settlements are made, 
and attractive prices for services provided. 
  We sincerely desire interaction and cooperation and hope 
that 
such unseemly occurrences will not happen in the future. 
  [Signed] President of the National Credit Bank 
  O. Boyko 
  President of the Stolichnyy Bank 
  A. Smolenskiy 
  President of Most Bank 
  V. Gusinskiy 
  President of Elbim Bank 
  S. Morozov 
  President of Yugorskiy Bank 
  O. Kantor 
  The first round of the counterintrigue developed according 
to 
a perfectly capitalist scenario: in October-November of last 
year, Most Bank entered into negotiations with Inturservis for 
the purchase of its block of 49 percent of UCS stock. The ground 
for negotiations had been prepared by the expression of a 
willingness (within the framework of the UCS stockholders' 
strategic agreement) to give up the rights to servicing credit 
cards. Inturservis seemingly let it be known that it was 
prepared to quit the "plastic market." Indeed, in the past few 
years the alignment of forces has changed substantially, and the 
Inturist system has ceased to be the principal source of 
"plastic" payments in Russia. 
  However, Igor Fedorov, president of the Inturservis 
All-Russian Joint-Stock Company, naturally wanted to get a good 
"indemnity." To do so he wanted, first of all, to sell the 
entire block of stock as a whole (without breaking it up), and 
second, to do so on a competitive basis. 
  Consequently, Inkombank, which is active in issuing VISA 
cards, entered into a fight with Mosbank for the Inturservis 
bloc of UCS stock. Because of purely technical circumstances, 
Inkombank dropped out of the competition, but in the course of 
bidding it raised the acquisition price to $2.3 million, that is 
to nearly 4.7 times the nominal value. 
  Toward the beginning of December Igor Fedorov concluded a 
contract with Most Bank, received money for the bloc of UCS 
stock, and seemingly offhandedly informed the UCS board about it 
(directly int he course of a board meeting). 
  The Gogolian tableau vivant was unexpectedly interrupted by 
Mr [Pekka Khonkanen], president of Inpass Ltd. With purely 
Scandinavian imperturbability he announced that Most Bank had 
also offered to buy his 12 percent of UCS shares--for good money. 
  The reaction of Kredo Bank's representatives on the UCS 
board 
was instantaneous--they immediately (at the board meeting) made 
Mr [Khonkanen] an offer that he couldn't refuse. Realizing that 
haggling was inappropriate in this case, he took about $560,000 
for his 12 percent, that is, the same 4.7 times the nominal 
value. 
  Consequently, as of 3 December UCS became the joint property 
of Kredo Bank, whose 51 percent had cost it less than $1 
million, and Most Bank, which had paid $2.3 million for 49 
percent of the stock. And Igor Fedorov and [Pekka Khonkanen] 
evidently remained extremely pleased with themselves--the 
securities in which they had invested had brought their 
companies each 370 percent annual earnings in foreign exchange, 
which is close to the result recorded in the Guinnes Book 
of World Records, and that is without counting 
dividends--based on the results of 1993, UCS's net profit for 
distribution came to $600,000, or 60 percent per share. And it 
cannot be said that Inturservis and Inpass Ltd. sold everything 
that they could--the former firm left itself all agency rights 
with regard to the technical servicing of credit cards (UCS 
continued to lease certain rights from Inturservis), and the 
latter left itself the status of the first nonresident bank 
hooked up to the chain of VISA credit card payments serviced by 
UCS. 
  And this is when the second round began, which now took 
place 
in the spirit of a "Red Guard attack." The officers of Most 
Bank, deciding to exercise their rights as a stockholder, 
submitted a proposal to the management of UCS to put all 
payments for the Europay system in the Russian stage of the 
banking chain through Most Bank, rather than Kredo Bank. 
  Here, in our view, commentary is needed. The bank through 
which the processing center carries out the "plastic" payments 
for at least one of the credit card systems receives 
considerable advantages. They are the following: 
  First of all, UCS is an extremely large client. In 1993 UCS 
turnover for servicing credit-card payments came to nearly $170 
million, approximately one-fifth of which was for the Europay 
system. Naturally, balances of funds in the UCS account would 
become a good backup in the short-term money market for any 
bank. Moreover, since cash foreign exchange is now out of favor, 
one can predict a substantial increase in electronic turnover to 
show up in the 1994 results. 
  Second, from every transaction the servicing bank takes a 
commission, which in this case could come to several hundred 
thousands of dollars a year. 
  Third, the servicing bank also gains the opportunity to 
acquire for itself extremely large settlement accounts of UCS 
clients that accept "plastic" payments directly. For enterprises 
accepting credit cards, it is advantageous to have an account in 
the servicing bank because in that case their payments are made 
a day or two faster. At least, all clients serviced for the 
Europay system at Kardtsentr have accounts in Kardtsentr's 
founding banks. 
  Fourth, the servicing bank can also offer new clients 
services related to the collection of cash proceeds, getting 
additional commissions and a considerable influx of cash from 
that. 
  Fifth, by acquiring clients, the bank gains the additional 
opportunity to place corporate and personal credit cards issued 
by the bank among clients and their personnel, and to eventually 
provide those firms with its automatic teller machines. 
  UCS president Aleksandr Kapustin responded to the proposal 
by 
Most Bank's officers in accordance with his charter: if the 
owner of the controlling block (Kredo) gave approval for a 
contract to be transferred "from itself" to Most Bank, Mr 
Kapustin would not object. 
  Kredo, naturally, graphically demonstrated the elementary 
truth of capitalism, namely, the difference between a block of 
shares and a controlling block. As a result of which, an 
unpleasant truth was revealed to Most Bank: having paid $2.3 
million, it had not acquired any rights with respect to the 
management of UCS and had not acquired any additional market or 
income. The possible dividend on UCS stock is poor consolation, 
since on the basis of 1994 results it will (in terms of the real 
capital spent by Most Bank) amount to no more than 30 percent in 
foreign exchange, and that is in the event that the principal 
UCS stockholder does not adopt a plan for large-scale 
reinvestments. 
  Consequently, accomplishment of the main "political" 
objective--to save Kardtsentr and its clientele by influencing 
the process of the reorganization of UCS and establishment of 
Viza Rossiya Servis--remained just as remote as it had in 
September 1993. Under these circumstances, Most Bank decided to 
resort to "the continuation of politics by other means," by 
carrying out a revolution in UCS's management staff. 
<H8>  Practically a Detective-Story Plot: Most Bank versus Toby </H8>
Mitchell 
  "Many will revile me 
  And now will probably ask 
  Why do I joke so stupidly? 
  What's it to them? I want to!" 
  Aleksandr Pushkin 
  KOMMERSANT Toby Mitchell citizen of Great 
Britain, 36 years old. Worked for the VISA International company 
starting in 1985; in 1990 was appointed director of the Central 
and Eastern Europe Department; in 1992 became vice-president of 
VISA International. In January 1993, with the consent of VISA 
International, Mr Mitchell founded the Payment Systems 
Partnership company, in which he named himself senior partner. 
The company's principal job is consultations regarding the 
development of consumer payment systems in Eastern Europe. 
  According to Mr Kapustin, after relations between the 
management of UCS and the junior stockholding firm (Most Bank) 
grew strained, Most Bank's representatives expressed a desire to 
see the firm's accounting reports. The company's officers 
accommodated the junior stockholder's desire and gave Most 
Bank's specialists access to their financial documents. It must 
be noted that the group sent to UCS was not an auditing 
commission of the joint-stock company in the full sense of the 
word (and could not have been one, according to UCS's charter), 
since it represented the interests of only one of the 
stockholders. Nonetheless, the UCS officers decided not to hide 
"their cards." Aleksandr Kapustin regarded the audit with 
Olympian calm, since in 1993 UCS's financial documents had 
repeatedly been audited by Centrobank, the Anti-Trust Committee, 
the tax inspectorate, and several auditing firms (including 
Ernst &amp; Young specialists), and even by the Ministry of State 
Security. 
  In the course of their work, the Most group's specialists 
called attention to documents confirming a payment for the 
amount of $95,000 from the firm's account to the personal 
account of Mr Mitchell for the performance of a set of work 
under contract with UCS. 
  Let us note that in conversation with a KOMMERSANT 
correspondent, Kredo Bank's vice-president Igor Lipanov, a 
member of the UCS board, said that the decision to conclude a 
contract with Mr Mitchell was approved by UCS's Council of 
Directors and board, and made in accordance with the UCS's 
charter, and that the results of its fulfillment were detailed 
in an appropriate report dated 29 May 1993 and deemed highly 
satisfactory by the board. Subsequently, this fact was certified 
in an official letter signed by Yuriy Agapov (Kredo's president 
and chairman of the UCS board) and Igor Fedorov (president of 
the VISA International and member of the UCS board). 
  However, as Mr Kapustin reported, immediately after the 
group 
of Most Bank specialists had called attention to the documents 
pertaining to the contract with Mr Mitchell, those documents 
were confiscated according to established procedures by a 
representative of the okrug tax police, which coincidentally 
(let's call it a coincidence) showed up at UCS literally "on the 
heels" of the group of Most Bank staff members (the UCS 
bookkeeping department has an official record of the 
confiscation). 
  KOMMERSANT Subsequently KOMMERSANT's 
editorial staff decided to clarify the question of why a payment 
by UCS was made to Mr Mitchell's personal account (although that 
is not contrary to Russian law), rather than to the account of 
Payment Systems Partnership, which would be more typical for 
standard Russian practice. We asked that question to Mr Mitchell 
himself and also sought the opinion of Mr Antony Berendt, a 
specialist in British business and banking law from the London 
School of Business. It turned out that the Payment Systems 
Partnership firm, in principle, has no account other than Mr 
Mitchell's personal account. The point is that British law 
allows the formation of a legal entity as the commercial name 
(trade name) of an individual, with the use of the individual's 
personal accounts for business purposes. In other words, whereas 
Russian law contemplates the possibility of engaging in 
entrepreneurial activity without the formation of a legal 
entity, British law contemplates the possibility of engaging in 
entrepreneurial activity with the formation (for purposes of 
taxation and the creation of a subject of commercial and 
international law) of a legal entity in the form of a trade 
name. 
  Nonetheless, on 9 February (two days after the completion of 
the audit and a day after the confiscation of documents 
pertaining to the contract with Mr Mitchell, a letter from Mr 
Polyakov, a vice president of Most Bank, was received by the 
Moscow City Internal Affairs Administration's Administration for 
Combating Economic Crimes. The letter stated that the transfer 
of the money to Mr Mitchell had caused harm to Most Bank's 
interests, and it also contained a request to "resolve the 
question" of bringing criminal charges against Mr Kapustin on 
the basis of this fact (the editorial office has the text of the 
complaint, as it does the texts of the other documents 
mentioned). Naturally, the removal of the "criminal" from the 
office of UCS president would be decided automatically. 
Evidently, in that case even the main stockholder would lose the 
possibility of influencing the situation, since the decision to 
remove a "criminal" from the management of the main processing 
center in Russia would most likely be supported by the 
management of VISA International and Europay International. 
  It is interesting that, according to Mr Kapustin himself, 
whom staff members of the Economic Crimes Administration invited 
for a conversation, confidential documents confiscated on the 
day before by the representative of the okrug tax police were 
appended to Mr Polyakov's letter (incidentally, a sentence to 
the effect that documents pertaining to the transfer of money to 
Mr Mitchell are attached to Mr Polyakov's letter exists in the 
text of the letter itself). Moreover, according to unofficial 
information obtained by UCS's representative in the City 
Internal Affairs Administration's Economic Crimes 
Administration, Most Bank's complaint had been brought to the 
Economic Crimes Administration by Col Papakhin, the deputy 
director of the Moscow City Internal Affairs Administration's 
Investigative Administration, who at that moment was on a 
regular leave; while on leave, Mr Papakhin was awaiting an order 
dismissing him from the internal affairs agencies, after which 
he was supposed to begin work at Most Bank (as KOMMERSANT's 
staff has learned, starting this March Aleksandr Papakhin began 
performing official duties at Most Bank). 
  Not finding any indications of a crime in the UCS 
president's 
actions, on 17 February the Moscow City Internal Affairs 
Administration's Administration for Combating Economic Crimes 
issued a order declining to initiate a criminal case. 
  Nonetheless, on 17 February staff members of the Moscow City 
Internal Affairs Administration's Investigative Administration 
issued an order on the initiation of criminal case No. 003209 
with regard to the fact of the transfer of money to Mr Mitchell 
"by an unknown criminal." 
  Mr Gusinskiy, Most Bank's president, sent a letter to the 
Moscow Procuracy (initial No. 561, dated 23 February 1994) 
expressing the opinion that staff members of the City Internal 
Affairs Administration's Economic Crimes Administration had a 
"prejudiced attitude" toward the case. But the Moscow 
Procuracy's Administration for Oversight Over the Execution of 
the Law in Internal Affairs Agencies issued an order revoking 
the order of the City Internal Affairs Administration's 
Investigative Administration to initiate a criminal case on the 
grounds that the latter order was "illegal" and "issued on a 
contrived pretext." 
  This last circumstance requires separate commentary. The 
point is that the order to initiate a criminal case indicated 
that it had been initiated on the basis of an audit conducted by 
the Seventh Department (for combating organized crime) of the 
Moscow City Internal Affairs Administration's RUOP [Regional 
Administration for Fighting Organized Crime]. However, staff 
members of the Moscow Procuracy (and this fact is officially 
confirmed in the procuracy's order revoking the order initiating 
the criminal case) established that, with respect to UCS, an 
"audit by the Seventh Department of the Moscow City Internal 
Affairs Administration's RUOP was not conducted," and 
consequently, no materials from the "audit" had been received by 
the City Internal Affairs Administration's Investigative 
Administration. 
  In reality, the City Internal Affairs Administration's 
Investigative Administration had initiated the criminal case 
after receiving a 17 February 1994 letter from Most Bank, which 
was registered there under number 387 (the fact of the receipt 
of the letter from Most Bank is mentioned by Vladimir Gusinskiy 
in his letter to the Moscow Procuracy that is referred to above). 
  In addition, the Investigative Administration's order 
initiating the criminal case states that "an unknown criminal 
unjustifiably transferred $95,000 from an account at Most Bank 
to Account No. 070614623 at the Republic National Bank (New 
York)." In reality, UCS had no settlement account in Most Bank. 
Moreover, as UCS's financial documents indicate, money was not 
transferred to Republic National Bank, either. Mr Mitchell's 
money was transferred from the International Moscow Bank (from 
the UCS account) to Kredo Bank (to Mr Mitchell's account). 
However, since International Moscow and Kredo do not have direct 
correspondent relations, the money, in accordance with 
established procedure, was transferred through Republic National 
Bank, which has correspondent relations with both banks and is 
Kredo's principal correspondent bank for settlements in U.S. 
dollars. 
  Nonetheless, after the Moscow Procuracy's decision, the case 
was transferred further along official lines to the RF Procuracy 
General. At this stage, the company's principal stockholder, 
Kredo Bank, was involved in the process of examining the case. 
On 17 March the Bank's vice-president Igor Lipanov sent a letter 
to the Moscow Procuracy and the director of the Investigative 
Administration of the RF Procuracy that noted that, in the 
opinion of Kredo Bank's officers, Most Bank "is attempting to 
provoke a criminal investigation of the UCS president on a 
contrived pretext for the purposes of gaining competitive 
advantages in the market." 
  In sum, as KOMMERSANT's editorial staff has learned, on 6 
April the UCS officers received an official letter (initial No. 
16-574-94) confirming the official agreement of the RF Procuracy 
General with the order of the Moscow Procuracy not to initiate 
the criminal case against Mr Kapustin. 
  With this decision by the Procuracy General, the detective 
aspect of the plot was exhausted, for Mr Mitchell, in an 
interview with a KOMMERSANT correspondent, stated that he would 
decline to bring suit against Most Bank and its officers, whose 
actions, according to him, had damaged his reputation. 
  Thus, suspicion was lifted from the UCS management, the 
company's activities continued, and Mr Kapustin ceased to be 
associated in business circles with Article 93-1 of the RSFSR 
Criminal Code (from eight years to the "top," and invariably 
with confiscation of property). 
  It would seem that the time had come to engage in 
implementing the UCS strategy in full. But everything worked out 
somewhat differently. 

<H8>    VISA and Europe: Their Shadows Swayed on the Threshold </H8>
  "They're dissatisfied with my reply, 
  `Resolve our dispute as fast as possible!' 
  They repeated with ardor 
  And with the same rattling of spurs. 
  "I cast a glance around the room 
  And it was as though I were charmed by the design 
  `I like BOTH very much!' 
  I told them and ran out.--Count Aleksey Tolstoy 
  For a final clarification of the situation in the "plastic" 
market and of the prospects for its development, we turned to 
the officers of the international "plastic" associations 
themselves, whose interests the leading Russian banks in the 
internecine guarded (along with their own), appealing to them in 
the course of the matter for support. 
  Last week Alan Goslar, first vice-president of VISA 
International, told us the following: "My attitude toward the 
existing situation is this: it's a purely Russian problem. 
Russia's banking community should sort out this whole thing on 
its own. After hearing both sides, I said that they themselves 
should find a solution. We cannot act as a jury. They are their 
affairs, and I will do everything possible to keep from being 
drawn into the conflict. 
  "Granted, Russian banks are inclined to create squabbles out 
of nothing and to deal with one another harshly," continued Mr 
Goslar. "The methods employed in business are very different 
from ours. They very much like to push each other toward the 
abyss. Taking some one to the point of collapse is practiced 
very widely here. It's a market where the competition is very 
strong, and the banks have a weapon that we never dreamed of. 
According to my observations, Mr Gusinskiy believes that there 
are battles ahead that he is capable of winning. I'm sure that 
he will take very decisive actions. But I am prepared to argue 
that Kredo, too, is prepared for decisive actions. I'm sure that 
Mr Gusinskiy is pursuing certain goals, but will he be able to 
achieve them using such methods?" 
  Something was achieved all the same--Western businessmen 
recalled the plots of Jack London and Brett Harte, and maybe 
even those of Mario Puzo and Ian Fleming. As a result, we 
developed the sense that the conflict among Russian banks had 
forced international associations to think seriously about 
politics in Russia. They, carefully counting all the stars that 
had fallen from the eyes of Russian bankers and illuminated 
their way to the Russian market, decided to change their policy 
of clearly defined preferences for any specific Russian 
structures and, it appears, started to actively assist all at 
once. If it does not prove possible to unambiguously defeat 
their historically ubiquitous competitor, whom they have 
encountered in a new market, then it is better not to lose what 
they already have. 
  Evidently, having noticed the certainty that emerged in 
Western associations that it was extremely risky in Russia to 
bet everything on one horse (be it UCS or Kardtsentr), Most Bank 
appears to have decided to play that situation to its own 
maximum benefit. According to the latest information, Most Bank 
has taken decisive steps toward individual self-definition in 
the credit card market. One can say that it has made an 
asymmetrical response. 
  As Mr Geoffrey de Schrevel, chief manager of Europay 
International for Central and Eastern Europe, informed us, Most 
Bank's representatives informed him that, while not planning to 
quit Kardtsentr, they nonetheless want to build their own 
Europay processing center parallel to Kardtsentr's machine. 
Since any Europay member-bank may in principle do such a thing, 
the association will not object. 
  In addition, according to Mr Jan Doskar, VISA 
International's 
manager for Eastern Europe, Most Bank, which is a member of the 
VISA system, intends by the end of the year (following UCS) to 
install a terminal for satellite communications with their 
system. 
  Despite the fact that Most Bank is losing out to its 
competitors in the "plastic" market in time, it has a chance for 
success. 
  After all, in the course of the conflict Most Bank evidently 
succeeded in burying the idea of UCS stockholders for 
establishing a Viza Rossiya Servis and an analogous entity for 
Europay with a common processing center in the form of UCS or 
its successor. Now, it appears, Kredo Bank has been doomed 
forever to "climb down" from its controlling block in any 
organizations dealing with credit cards. On the other hand, even 
if Kredo Bank should try to establish a national association on 
the basis of UCS (for example, through the additional issuance 
of UCS stock), other banks will hardly join it--if 49 percent is 
not enough to redistribute the market, smaller shares are even 
more pointless. Thus, Kardtsentr's existing clientele, on which 
Most Bank might count in its independent actions in the market, 
will be retained in the Europay system (and, in the future, in 
the VISA system too). 
  However, Kredo has not abandoned realization of part of its 
original strategic design, either. As KOMMERSANT editors have 
learned, back on 15 March Igor Fedorov, on behalf of the 
Inturservis All-Russian Joint-Stock Company, officially gave up 
to Kredo agency rights and contracts (gave up exclusive 
authorization) not only for the VISA and Europay systems, but 
for the Diners Club and JCB systems, too. Last week Kredo began 
transferring contracts with enterprises (former clients first of 
Inturservis and then of UCS) directly to itself and strengthened 
its position as the bank that exclusively services the UCS 
turnover. 
  Moreover, according to information possessed by the editors, 
last week the Union Card company (founded by a consortium of 
Russian banks, including Inkombank, Avtobank, TOKO Bank, 
Mosbiznesbank, Delovaya Rossiya [Business Russia], the VBB and 
others) concluded a processing contract with UCS (Union Card 
payments were previously serviced by Avtobank's center). 
Consequently, the network of enterprises accepting Union Card 
cards has expanded by at least 2,000 outlets (the number of 
UCS's clients for the servicing of payments with the cards of 
other payment systems), and the turnover serviced by UCS will 
increase by another 10-15 percent, according to our estimates. 
  In addition, we do not rule out the possibility that the 
positions of Kredo Bank, Inkombank and certain bank founders of 
Kardtsentr (Dialog, Moscow Savings Bank and others) on the 
market may draw closer after the Most Bank's processing center 
becomes a competitor not only of UCS but of Kardtsentr itself. 
  Thus, as a result of the clash that occurred in the credit 
card market, the situation of oligopoly (in which experts, 
recalling the words of Kardtsentr's director, might assess the 
positions of Kredo Bank and UCS as preferable for the time 
being) has been preserved. 
  This situation's plus for clients consists in the fact that, 
when UCS and Kardtsentr and Most Bank's new processing center 
all start to simultaneously service both the VISA system and the 
Europay system, they will inevitably begin to compete among 
themselves in terms of rates and services. Moreover, the party 
that is losing in terms of service capabilities will most likely 
resort to offering dumping rates. Specialists judge the lowest 
limit of rates to be 1.9-2.0 percent, as opposed to the current 
3.5-4.0 percent. Under these conditions, the servicing of 
payments will for all practical purposes become an unprofitable 
business, and the development of it will become exclusively a 
money-losing proposition, for 2 percent is the amount of the 
external commission that foreign banks take. 
  In addition, each of the sides will place its reliance even 
more emphatically on strong points in its business technology: 
Kardtsentr and the banks belonging to it will evidently place it 
on the development of automatic teller machines, and UCS--on the 
installation of universal devices for processing the cards (at 
the so-called POS--point of sale) of all the systems represented 
in the market, including national ones (STB, Union Card, etc.). 
  On the other hand, the minus for clients will be that it 
will 
hardly be likely that Russian banks, having numerous processing 
centers, will ever reach any agreement on organizing the 
national mutual offsetting of credit card payments made within 
Russia (and that idea was seemingly the second level of the 
strategy of Kredo Bank and UCS), as happens in other countries, 
including those with a substantially smaller "plastic" turnover. 
Accordingly, the money in settlements will continue to race 
overseas--with an inevitable loss of pace and of external 
commission (2 percent of the amount). 
  By withdrawing, for all practical purposes, from creating 
the 
possibility for the Russian banking sector to organize the 
internal mutual offsetting of payments on the basis of a single 
processing center, international associations have not helped 
the Russian "plastic" market to rise to a new stage. It cannot 
be said that they have come off as losers: they have been left 
with respectable insurance deposits (according to the 
associations' rules, the Russian servicing banks and processing 
centers keep them in foreign banks), almost $4 million in 
external commissions (based on the forecast for 1994), and also 
the possibility of "sitting" for two or three days on Russian 
money involved in settlements. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68509 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94045" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   U.S. Firm To Cooperate With Ilyushin Plant </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    U.S. Firm To Cooperate With Ilyushin Plant </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0317A Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 14 Apr 94 p 9 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0317A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yevgeniy Ostapov, correspondent: "(!) American </F>
Engines Will Lift Russian ILs Into the Air: Plans of the 
Ilyushin Aviation Complex"] 
  [Text] During yesterday's 
press conference, dedicated to the 60th anniversary of the S.V. 
Iliushin Aviation Complex and the 100th anniversary of the birth 
of the founder of this design bureau, it was announced that the 
firm's primary task today is to return Ilyushin products to the 
world market. In order to accomplish this, the aviation complex 
intends to cooperate with the American firm of Pratt &amp; 
Whitney. 
Yevgeniy Ostapov, correspondent, tells about the Ilyushin plans, 
as they were announced at the press conference. 
  The S.M. Ilyushin Aviation Complex today has the OKB (Bureau 
of Experimental Design), production experience, and a flight 
testing base in Zhukovskiy, where around 5,000 persons are 
employed. The Voronezh and Tashkent aircraft plants are occupied 
with the serial production of IL aircraft. Without halting work 
on military projects (seven percent of total work), the aviation 
complex considers as its main task the design of passenger and 
transport aircraft needed by Russian aviation. A great deal of 
attention is being devoted to implementing an international 
program based on cooperation with Pratt &amp; Whitney, the 
American 
engine construction firm, and the Collins Company, manufacturer 
of aviation equipment. On April 6, 1993, flight testing was 
begun on a wide-fuselage, long-range airliner, the Il-96M, 
equipped with Pratt &amp; Whitney engines--the first achievement 
of 
this cooperation. Comparing the Il-96M with the Boeing 777, 
Genrikh Novozhilov, general designer of the aviation complex, 
noted that they are very similar in their characteristics, but 
the four-engined Ilyushin aircraft requires a great outlay for 
operational expenses. 
  At yesterday's press conference it was noted that during a 
meeting between representatives of Russian air and space 
companies and Viktor Chernomyrdin on April 6th, the Prime 
Minister promised state support and loans for manufacturing the 
Il-96M at the Voronezh aircraft plant. The production plan calls 
for constructing 24 airliners per year. The Prime Minister also 
gave his support to the Pratt &amp; Whitney program for improving 
the Russian aircraft engine PS-90A, produced by the Perm Motors 
association. The new engines will be used in the Il-96-300, 
Il-96M/T, TU-204, and Il-76 aircraft, as well as in gas-pumping 
stations and electric generator plants. In addition, Viktor 
Chernomyrdin also approved a program for creating a unified 
aircraft construction complex at the site of the S.V. Ilyushin 
complex and the Voronezh Aircraft Plant. The question of 
including the Tashkent Aviation Association in one complex will 
be decided during negotiations with the government of Uzbekistan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68510 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94046" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   13 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Elements of Contract Negotiations With De Beers Viewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Elements of Contract Negotiations With De Beers Viewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0317B Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 13 Apr 94 p 10 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0317B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Teslenko: Russia and De Beers Have </F>
Begun Negotiations on a New Contract: A New De Beers 
Representative Has Arrived in Russia"] 
  [Text] The 
current contract between Russia and the international diamond 
monopoly of De Beers (1990-1995) brings our country over one 
billion dollars per year. The contract expires next year, and 
both parties have started preparing a new contract for exporting 
uncut diamonds. At the very onset, they agreed to maintain 
strict confidentiality while the contract is being worked on. 
Raymond Clark, the new director of the Moscow office of the 
firm, in his first interview in Russia, told about some of the 
circumstances surrounding these negotiations. 
  [Boxed item] 
  Important Parameters of the Current Contract Between 
Russia and De Beers on Export of Uncut, Gem Quality, Natural 
Diamonds: 
  --Russia's quota, based on De Beers' annual 
sales--26%; 
  --Direct export of diamonds through De Beers--95% 
  --Conditions for competitive sales of control lots 
(5% of 
total export volume): At least eight foreign buyers are invited 
to the competitive sales, which take place in Moscow; the price 
of a basic lot is calculated on the basis of total sales; 
  --Russia is free to export industrial diamonds only after De 
Beers declines to acquire them; 
  --Correction of the current purchase price takes place once 
a 
year. 
  [End box] 
<H5>  New Acquaintanceships With Old Partners </H5>
  Ray Clark announced that De Beers does not yet have a 
working 
copy of the agreement, the proposed duration of which would be 
from 1996 to 2000. He let it be understod that the first stage 
(spring and summer of this year) will consist of collecting 
information and establishing contacts; the second stage (autumn 
and winter) will have consultations on general principles and 
the outline of the future contract; and the third stage (spring 
1995) will consist of exchanges of the first drafts of the 
contract. 
  In the very near future Mr. Clark intends to familiarize 
himself with the general position held by three parties involved 
in the Russian diamond business: First, the Russia-Sakha Company 
(ARS), many directors of which are well-known to De Beers 
because of many years of cooperation between the company and the 
Yakutalmaz NPO; second, the government of the Republic of Sakha 
that De Beers is acquainted with through the drafting of the 
1992 agreement; and third, Roskomdragmet, which in 1993 received 
supplementary authority. "In addition, I would like to go into 
detail on personal positions held by important people such as 
Mssrs. Bychkov, Gurevich, Kotlyar, (Roskomdragmet), Golovatyy 
(Ministry of Finance), Kirillin, Ulin, Kovylin (ARS), Nikolayev, 
and Shtyrov (government of Yakutiya)," said Ray Clark, "because 
at present we have only a general idea about who really has 
power in the Russian diamond industry." All this indicates that 
the De Beers management has decided to get away from the 
practice of making individual contacts with the most important 
people in the country (as it did during the days of the USSR) 
and is diligently trying to figure out the positions of 
interested departments and the personal preferences of VIPs in 
the Russian diamond business. 
  Referring to the oral agreement with Yevgeniy Bychkov, 
chairman of Roskomdragmet, about maintaining strict 
confidentiality, Mr. Clark declined to discuss possible points 
being negotiated in the new agreement. Nonetheless, he mentioned 
two proposals that are absolutely unacceptable to De Beers: 
Increasing purchase prices by 30 percent and giving the Yakut 
government the express right to sell uncut, gem-quality diamonds 
abroad, amounting to 1-3 percent of the total Russian diamond 
export ($10-30 million per year). 
  [Boxed item] 
  Proposed Negotiation Issues for the Next Contract: 
  --To increase the share of free sales from 5% to 
20-25%; 
  --to conduct competitive sales in any world diamond center; 
  --to reexamine the "formula" used for recalculating prices; 
  --to increase the current purchase price by 10-30%; 
  --to give Yakutiya the right to export some of the diamonds 
independently; 
  --to develop a unified standard for gem-quality diamonds; 
  --to introduce limitations on diamond cutting by Russia for 
customer-supplied diamonds from abroad; 
  --to develop stringent measures for preventing the illegal 
export of diamonds through diamond processing enterprises; and 
  --to obtain permission to monitor De Beers' selling prices 
through inspectors' purchases of diamond lots at De Beers sites. 
  [End box] 
<H5>  Possibilities for Loan Operations With Diamonds as Security </H5>
  Turning to the subject of a possible addendum to the 
contract--loans, using diamonds as security--Mr. Clark at first 
expressed his satisfaction with how the current contract 
(1990-1995) has been carried out for the sum of $1 billion 
between Russia and De Beers. He explained that one of his tasks 
was to clarify Russia's needs for these kinds of loans. 
"However, this question can be discussed only if the 
government of the Russian Federation requests it from the 
management of De Beers." With regard to a proposal by the 
American firm of Lazares-Kaplan International ("X" wrote about 
this in detail on March 2nd), Ray Clark noted that banks would 
hardly give money for large deals with diamonds as security 
unless De Beers is a participant in these deals. 
<H5>  The Status of the Diamond-Cutting Industry in Russia </H5>
  De Beers experts, already working on the beginning stage of 
an analysis of the Russian market for decorative jewelry, have 
given a high assessment to its potential. In general, of course, 
De Beers constantly monitors the status of the world diamond 
market, because it is this market that is the determining factor 
for the sale of uncut natural diamonds. The Company did not 
ignore Russia either and is collecting information on production 
volume, various specializations of plants, and the status of 
diamond export. Ray Clark also announced De Beers' plans to 
build a small diamond-cutting enterprise in Yakutiya, possibly 
jointly with Sakhakomdragmet or the Tuymaada Diamond Company. 
  [Boxed item] 
  The new representative of De Beers in Russia is Raymond A. 
Clark, born on September 28, 1949 in London, England. He 
received his education at Farnham, Surrey. He began working at 
De Beers in 1969 as a diamond expert. Notwithstanding his 
appointment as Director of the Moscow Representative Office of 
his company, he remains a member of the De Beers London Group 
for Strategic Planning. Mr. Raymond Clark is married to Julia, a 
native Muscovite. He likes the Compaq laptop computer and the 
pocket Psion microcomputer. He is indifferent to expensive 
automobiles. He is interested in music, preferring classical and 
jazz, amateur photography, fishing, and tennis. 
  [End box] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68511 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94047" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Fund To Support Large Enterprises Registered in U.S. </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Fund To Support Large Enterprises Registered in U.S. </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0323A Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 15 Apr 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0323A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yelena Kotelnikova: "An American Fund Has </F>
Appeared in the Investment Market: The Presentation of an 
American Fund"] 
  [Text] Yesterday Austin Beutner, president of the 
Fund for Large Enterprises in Russia (FLER), and Michael 
Blumenthal, chairman of the Fund's Board of Directors, announced 
that the Fund had begun its operations. This means that the 
directors of FLER are ready to examine investment proposals that 
have to do with developing production in privatized 
enterprises. 
  The Fund was registered as a private corporation in the 
state of Delaware in March 1994. It is managed by a board of 
directors comprised of leading U.S. experts in investment and 
banking, as well as venture capital investment. The Chairman of 
the Board of Directors, former Secretary of the Treasury of the 
U.S., Michael Blumenthal, was appointed personally by U.S. 
President Bill Clinton. The Fund is financed by the U.S. 
Congress (a $100 million grant has been received), as well as by 
the Corporation for Private Investment Abroad, the Export-Import 
Bank, and the U.S. Agency for Trade and Development (for now, 
the money from these sources is limited to $150 million). 
  According to the management of FLER, the origin of FLER is 
directly tied to the decision of the "big seven" countries 
(adopted in Tokyo in July 1993) to support a program of 
privatization and organizational restructuring in Russia. In 
contrast to the already functioning Russian-American Fund for 
Entrepreneurship (with a financial reserve of $340 million for 
four years and area of interest in small and mid-sized 
businesses), the new investment organization will concentrate on 
mid-sized and large privatized enterprises. American investors, 
through accumulated "risk" capital, may be able to take a 
leading position in the Russian domestic investment market. 
Obviously, this will also be facilitated by the fact that the 
program for supporting privatization has been approved by the 
presidium of the government; FLER already has its own niche. The 
Fund will have to initiate commercial investments in capital 
stock of enterprises located in regions that the Fund considers 
as having the greatest potential. FLER experts firmly believe 
that official support of their activities by the Russian 
Government "will open all doors to them" in the most desirable 
regions and will "guarantee access to necessary information." 
Russian experts are assessing these possibilities more 
sceptically. Nevertheless, even though they are counting on 
protection by the Russian authorities, Americans are not 
planning to use their own "risk" capital in a struggle to 
purchase enough shares to control Russian enterprises. They 
intend to divide the risk of capital investments between both 
foreign and Russian investors and "will be open to any 
interesting proposals." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68512 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94048" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   First Russian Bank Opens in Netherlands </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    First Russian Bank Opens in Netherlands </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q323B Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 15 Apr 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q323B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yuriy Katsman: The First Russian Commercial Bank </F>
Has Made Its Appearance in Europe: The Stolichnyy Bank Is 
Opening a Branch in Holland"] 
  [Text] Unofficial but 
reliable sources in Holland announced yesterday that the central 
bank of the Netherlands, De Nederlandshe Bank N.V., has granted 
permission to the Stolichnyy Bank to open a branch in Holland. 
Although representatives of the Stolichnyy declined to either 
confirm or deny this information (saying that they had no 
official confirmation from the Netherlands Bank), there are no 
grounds for doubting its reliability. Thus, the Stolichnyy has 
become the first Russian commercial bank to receive permission 
to open a branch in Western Europe. 
  The history of founding a Stolichnyy bank branch in 
Amsterdam 
goes back over two years and was rife with unexpected twists and 
turns. At first, its opening had been projected for back in 
February 26th of last year. At the time, however, the Central 
Bank of the Netherlands refused to grant Stolichnyy the required 
permission, stating that it did not have a new license from the 
Bank of Russia (Stolichnyy had received its license in 1989 from 
the then still existing USSR Gosbank.). Despite turning in all 
the documents on time, the procedures for the bank's 
reregistration for a new license at the Central Bank (CB) took 
eight months instead of the usual three and were completed only 
in October of last year. Reasons for the delay are still not 
clear. According to the official version, the CB prolonged the 
reregistration because it conducted a supplementary verification 
of the Russian bank's activities. However, according to 
information given to KOMMERSANT-DAILY, the CB's decision for a 
necessary "supplementary verification" was preceded by a visit 
to the Bank of Russia by Ministry of Internal Affairs employees, 
who voiced their disinterest in a quick reregistration of the 
Stolichnyy bank, expressly because of the bank's desire to open 
a branch in Holland (attempts by controlling organs of the 
government to limit the possible flow of Russian capital abroad 
by every means is well known). To summarize, the Stolichnyy bank 
received permission from the CB of Russia to open a bank branch 
only in December of last year, but the Bank of the Netherlands 
provided the necessary permit only now. 
  In any case, in the Stolichnyy Bank itself, where 
correspondent for KOMMERSANT-DAILY obtained this information 
from unofficial sources, no one would comment on this issue, 
stating that in the absence of an official notice from De 
Nederlandshe Bank N.V., they could neither confirm nor deny the 
information. 
  Nevertheless, representatives of the bank announced that 
inasmuch as the Netherlands Bank has no formal reasons for 
further delaying the granting of permission to the Stolichnyy 
Bank, it is very plausible that this actually occurred. 
  Thus, it would be hardly premature to conclude that the 
first 
(not counting the former Soviet banks abroad) full-fledged 
branch of a Russian commercial bank in Western Europe will be 
the bank branch of the Stolichnyy in Amsterdam. The bank has 
already put in over one million dollars to create this branch, 
but these expenditures will have to pay for themselves very 
quickly. For example, the bank is counting on attracting clients 
by giving preferential rates for service in its Dutch branch, 
which in part will allow Russian capital to be returned to its 
own economy. In addition, the branch bank will be a Dutch 
juridical person. This means that the doors of unified Europe 
will be open to it, and more and more banks can spin off from it 
to other countries. 
  [Boxed item] 
  At present the network of full-fledged branches of Russian 
commercial banks abroad consists of a branch of the Inkombank on 
Cyprus, the Cyprus branch of the Vneshtorgbank, and the branch 
of the Russian Commercial Bank in Zurich, as well as former 
Soviet banks abroad. 
  With regard to foreign representatives, many Russian banks 
have them, for example, Tokobank and the Industriya-Servis (both 
on Cyprus), Inkombank (in Switzerland), the Eskado Bank (in 
Sweden), and the St. Petersburg Bank (in the USA). 
  [End box] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68513 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94049" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   16 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Results of International Contest for Omsk Oil Disputed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Results of International Contest for Omsk Oil Disputed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0323C Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 16 Apr 94 p 20 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0323C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Anatoliy Zakharov: "Results of the Competition </F>
Have Provoked Dissatisfaction on the Part of `Tomskneft': 
Scandal in Tomsk Oblast"] 
  [Text] Leonid Filimonov, 
general director of Tomskneft Joint Stock Company, held a press 
conference yesterday on the results of the international 
competition for the right to explore and develop oil and gas 
deposits in the Pudinsko-Parabelskiy District of Tomsk Oblast. 
Mr. Filimonov believes that "the competition was conducted to 
the detriment of Russian oil men" and that the Swiss IMEG 
Management S.A. consortium was announced as the winner of the 
competition on the basis of unwarranted advantageous rules. 
According to Mr. Filimonov, he found out about this competition 
only a month before the results were announced and, therefore, 
Tomskneft was not able to participate in it. Representatives of 
the Geointertek Joint Enterprise, the company that conducted the 
competition, told correspondent for KOMMERSANT-DAILY that the 
rules governing the competition did indeed change somewhat over 
a period of two years, but that the Joint Enterprise did not 
hide this fact. According to Geointertek representatives, this 
competition was, on the whole, not very attractive to investors, 
because the development of disputed deposits would probably be 
unprofitable. 
<H5>  The Strange History of the Competition </H5>
  The first international tender for the barely-explored 
Pudinsko-Parabelskiy deposits was presented in the city of 
Denver (USA) back in the summer of 1992. At the time, packets 
with geological information for tender applications were 
purchased by seven foreign companies, and the first results were 
to have been received in January 1993. Several companies, 
however, in anticipation of preferential tax rates from the 
Russian government, asked that the tenders be delayed until July 
1, 1993. Preferential rates were not received by that time, and 
the tenders--due to unprofitability of the project for foreign 
investors--were not offered. 
  In March 1994, however, after Boris Yeltsin's decree of 
December 24, 1993 ("On Issues of Agreements Regarding 
Allocations of Production in Using Mineral Resources"), which 
changed the tax policy in the oblast, this competition again 
became attractive to investors. For this reason, in March of 
this year the Tomsk Oblast administration announced an 
"extension" of the competition with all the former rules still 
in effect. 
  These rules were rather strict. The entire competitive 
territory was divided into 20 parcels--"blocks"--and 
applications for "a territory less than one block in size" were 
not accepted, but the amount of the bonus was calculated on the 
basis of each square kilometer of a block. It was also assumed 
that bonus payments would be made immediately after the results 
of the competition have been made known, but in the event a 
contract was not signed with the winner, the Russian side had 
the right to keep 20 percent of the bonus as a security payment. 
  Nevertheless, as a result of the competition, the 
winner--the 
IMEG Corporation--received only parts of the 9th, 10th, and 17th 
competitive blocks, the territory of which has known oilfields 
amounting to 23 million tonnes. According to data from experts, 
these are the most convenient "pieces" for which other 
companies--that had intended to participate in tenders back in 
1992--could have fully competed. 
  Requests to clarify what the bonus consists of were not 
fulfilled either; for example, that a part of the sum was 
definitely a security payment. According to the results of the 
competition, the consortium is obligated to pay $2.5 million out 
of its bonus only "when an agreement has been signed and 
implemented between the Russian and foreign parties," and 
another $6 million of the bonus to be paid to "the Tomsk Oblast 
fund for social support when a certain level of extraction of 
hydrocarbons has been achieved, which will constitute a subject 
for negotiations." According to experts, thanks to the 
afore-mentioned "negotiations," the payment of most of the bonus 
can be simply delayed for an indeterminate period of time. 
  [Boxed item] 
  The Pudinsko-Parabelskiy part of Tomsk Oblast is in the 
south 
and center of the oblast. It is divided into 20 sections--blocks 
that range from 2,000 to 6,000 sq meters each. Approximately 20 
deposits of oil and gas are found here. Oil reserves that can be 
extracted from them range from 0.4 to 4.0 million tonnes and 
more. It has been admitted that development of these oilfields 
is not profitable for the Tomsk Oblast oil refineries, but 
profits could be made if modern Western technology were to be 
used. The total amount of reserve oil that can be extracted for 
industrial purposes in the Pudinsko-Parabelskiy area is 28.6 
million tonnes; average reserves of oil in the oilfields is 1.6 
million tonnes; extractable reserves of gas condensates total 
13.1 million tonnes; and extractable reserves of gas total 
72,346 billion cubic meters. From a geological perspective, only 
30 percent of this section has been studied.] 
<H5>  The Oblast Administration Is Happy With the Results of the </H5>
Competition 
  Only two companies participated in the last competition. The 
second one, the Russian Konventsiya Joint Stock Company 
together, with its co-investor, the Norwegian firm Skaninvest 
(Scandinavian International &amp; Investment), did not provide 
information about its financial and technological capabilities. 
In addition, Konventsiya proposed $2.2 million in bonus payments 
and $10 million for conducting geological exploration work 
during 1994-95 in an area of 7,400 square kilometers. 
  Meanwhile, the IMEG consortium pledged to pay a bonus of 
$8.5 
million, as well as to spend a minimum of $46 million only on 
exploration of deposits in an area of 2,870 sq kms during the 
first five years. According to the IMEG proposal, the Russian 
share of the project's profits would be 64-66 percent. 
  According to Vladimir Ponomarenko, first deputy chief of the 
Tomsk Oblast Administration, IMEG's victory in the 
competition--one condition of which was participation in 
developing new deposits for the Tomskneft Joint Stock Company 
and the Tomskneftegazgeologiya State Enterprise--will result in 
creating new employment, saving the geological service, and 
implementing a program for supplying the oblast with gas. In 
addition, the Russian side is counting on receiving 25 percent 
of the extracted raw material and, moreover, around two thirds 
of all payments tied to exploration and development of deposits 
will remain in the oblast. The oblast administration estimates 
that capital expenditures alone by foreign investors to 
implement this project will amount to $300-400 million. A 
significant portion of this money will "settle" in the oblast. 
<H5>  Tomskneft Is Not Happy With the Results of the Competition </H5>
  Leonid Filimonov, general director of Tomskneft, announced 
at 
a press conference, that the day before he had had a "tough 
talk" about the results of the competition with Viktor Kress, 
head of the Tomsk Oblast Administration, who had signed off on 
the results of the competition. Mr. Filimonov declared that he 
found out about the competition only one month before the 
results were announced. So, even if Tomskneft had participated 
in the competition, it could not have prepared itself well 
enough to compete with the foreigners. More than anything else 
with regard to the results of the competition, Mr. Filimonov was 
indignant about the fact that a foreign concern became the owner 
of a license to develop the territory. Mr. Filimonov believes 
that the administration should have given "a priority to local 
forces, to the union of oil men, oil technicians, and 
geologists, and then we could have invited foreigners...". 
  The head of Tomskneft declared that he "thinks that the 
consortium will not invite me to work, but will invite its own 
foreign workers." In his words, Tomskneft "is the enterprise 
that we are establishing to supply the oblast with gas, and it 
should receive a priority license for exploring deposits." 
  [Boxed item] 
  Over the last two years this is already the second scandal 
revolving around Russian tenders, organized by the Geointertek 
Joint Enterprise. 
  On November 20, 1992, KOMMERSANT-DAILY wrote that a certain 
Commission for Financial and Legal Control and Struggle Against 
Corruption, under the then Premier Yegor Gaydar, had been 
checking the results of oil tenders in the Republic of Komi, 
organized by Geointertek. The competition was won by the 
American Occidental Oil Company, which pledged to pay a bonus of 
$10.5 million. A check was written for the first $2.02 million. 
However, as the Commission found out, in 1992 this money did not 
go to Russia. Edvard Gendelman, deputy chairman of the 
Geointertek board, deposited the entire amount of the bonus--in 
two parts--in the account of the Central Bank in Denver. Then, 
according to information from the Commission, "notwithstanding 
the demands of the Central Bank to transfer the given amount to 
Russia," it was transferred to the account of the Nafta/UK/LTD 
Company in the Indosuez Bank in London. But after five days, the 
entire sum was transferred to the account of 
Ukhtaneftegazgeologiya in Komi. 
  Members of the above Commission declared that this occurred 
thanks to their efforts and pressure on the directors of 
Geointertek. The results of the Commission's investigation were 
handed over to the prosecutor and the Directorate of Internal 
Affairs of Tomsk Oblast, but nothing came of the verification 
that took place there. 
  Meanwhile, the directors of the Joint Venture itself do not 
see anything illegal in any of these maneuvers with the $10.5 
million. According to Mr. Teplitskiy's explanation, the bonus 
was not supposed to be transferred to Russia prior to the 
signing of the documents testifying to the results of the 
competition. With regard to "throwing" the money to London, 
well, this was done so that the money could be sent directly 
from there to a bank in Komi. According to Mr. Teplitskiy, the 
Joint Venture has statements from banks in Denver and London to 
the effect that the money could not have been used in any way by 
Gendelman. Mr. Teplitskiy believes that the efforts of Gaydar's 
commission did not at all facilitate the transfer of the money 
to Russia: "It would have come without all that." Incidentally, 
by decision of the Komi Council of Ministers, for organizing 
this competition the Geointertek Joint Venture received about $2 
million that came out of the bonus payments.] 
<H5>  Organizers of the Competition Are Happy With Everything </H5>
  Vladimir Teplitskiy, acting head of the Geointertek Joint 
Enterprise, which conducted the competition, told the 
correspondent for KOMMERSANT-DAILY that "the scandal surrounding 
the results of the competition was caused by political motives 
and attempts by certain forces to compromise Governor Viktor 
Kress." 
  Mr. Teplitskiy insisted that the rules of the competition 
were not violated, but simply changed over these past two years 
and were related, in part, to conditions for paying out bonuses. 
According to him, even under these new conditions Geointertek 
had great difficulty in attracting the attention of foreign 
firms towards this competition because the Ministry of Economics 
had concluded that the development of these territories was 
unprofitable. In any case, Mr. Teplitskiy admitted that studies 
of this area were very weak and that it might be possible to 
find large oilfields at deeper and older strata, which--for all 
practical purposes--have not been studied here at all. Huge 
investments are needed for this. For this reason, Mr. Teplitskiy 
considers the results of the competition as a great victory, all 
the more because the IMEG project will provide work to the 
poverty-stricken Tomsk oil geologists. 
  Be that as it may, in addition to the term "a block of 
territory," the rules of the competition also had the term "a 
single block"--an area of 100 sq kms from which large blocks 
were formed. According to Mr. Teplitskiy, it was not allowed to 
subdivide precisely these single blocks, but any of the large 20 
blocks could be subdivided. At any rate, he admitted that it was 
possible to have a "double meaning" from reading this text. 
  In Mr. Teplitskiy's words, the announcement about renewing 
the competition was published well in advance in the bulletin of 
the Ministry of Fuel and Energy and the Russian Geology 
Committee, so anyone who was interested had time to participate 
in the competition. It is true, he admitted, that nothing was 
said about changes in the rules or conditions for the 
competition in this announcement. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68514 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94050" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   20 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bosnian Envoy, Commentary Discuss War in Former SFRY </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Bosnian Envoy, Commentary Discuss War in Former SFRY </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Envoy Calls for `More Balanced' Russian Policy </H4>

<F P=102> 944Q0336A Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 20 Apr 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0336A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Viktor Zamyatin and Sergey Tsekhmistrenko: </F>
"Sarajevo Asks Moscow To Reach Out to Muslims"] 
  [Text] In any interethnic conflict, it is hard to 
find out who is right and who is wrong. Sometimes one even gets 
the impression that everybody is right, and the arguments of one 
side are just as convincing and well-substantiated as those of 
the opposing side. This is not accidental: As a rule, such 
conflicts have their root in disputes over possession of 
territories, which the conflicting sides may consider their 
traditional domain with equal justification (including from the 
standpoint of historic rights). A KOMMERSANT-DAILY 
correspondents' conversation with Ibrahim Dzikic, 
Bosnia-Herzegovina representative in Moscow, is indicative in 
this respect. 
  In Mr. Dzikic's opinion, the war in Bosnia is not of 
religious or ethnic nature. What is happening there is a fight 
for territories, and a predatory one on the part of Serbs--they 
have dismantled and taken out to Serbia the entire industrial 
potential from the lands seized from the Muslims. Overall, in 
Mr. Dzikic's opinion, Serbia has been the initiator of both 
Yugoslavia's disintegration and all the wars on its territory. 
Belgrade is set to build a "Great Serbia," which would include 
most of former federative lands. Unfortunately, these actions 
had the blessing of the Orthodox churches--Russian and Serb. 
  Today the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia interferes directly 
in the Bosnian conflict, sending there tanks, equipment, and 
troops from its army's Uzice and Novi Sad corps. Heavy armaments 
taken by Serbs from Sarajevo environs was used in the latest 
battles near Gorazde. Describing the situation around this city, 
Mr. Dzikic emphasized that it shows that Bosnian Serbs do not 
want the war to end. The situation in Gorazde got exacerbated 
due to Serb aggression. The diplomat characterized all talk of 
"Muslim provocations" as Belgrade's conjectures, since the 
population of besieged Gorazde consisted mainly of women and 
children, who for two years have not had contacts with other 
parts of Bosnia. To accuse them now of provocations is madness 
that would be tantamount to accusing Leningrad inhabitants of 
similar things during the blockade. As to Bosnia's Serb 
leaders--Radovan Karadzic and General Ratko Mladic--they should 
be regarded as nothing more than war criminals, with whom it is 
no longer possible to conduct a constructive dialog. Especially 
considering that, in Mr. Dzikic's opinion, they do not represent 
the interests of all Bosnian Serbs: Only about 40 percent of 
Serbs live in the Serb Republic controlled by them. Most Bosnian 
Serbs, however, consider themselves its citizens and cooperate 
with the government. 
  As to Russian role in settling the conflict, in Mr. Dzikic's 
words, its position should be "more balanced" with respect to 
all republics of former Yugoslavia, including Bosnia. Today 
Moscow essentially defends great-power claims on the part of 
Serbs (although far from all Serbs share such ideas). Russia 
also is against lifting the embargo on arms shipments to the 
Bosnian army, but without it, in Mr. Dzikic's opinion, it is 
impossible to defend the state against aggression. At the same 
time, Sarajevo supports Moscow in that Bosnian borders cannot be 
changed through violence. Looking at the overall level of 
inter-state relations, however, much remains to be done. A good 
beginning, in the opinion of Bosnia's representative, would be 
to establish diplomatic relations. So far Russia is in no hurry 
to proceed with this, although it has recognized Bosnia a year 
ago. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68515 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94051" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   20 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bosnian Envoy, Commentary Discuss War in Former SFRY </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Bosnian Envoy, Commentary Discuss War in Former SFRY </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Commentary States `No Angels' in Balkans </H4>

<F P=102> 944Q0336B Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 20 Apr 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0336B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [International Affairs Department's commentary] </F>
  [Text] Undoubtedly, the bitterness of Mr. Dzikic's comments 
about Serbs results from the fact that for him they are enemies. 
Although from the standpoint of formal logic it is hard to 
disagree with much of what he said. It is true that the army, 
subordinated to Belgrade, had started the war in the former 
SFRY; it is true that Serbs plunder the territories they seize, 
and that Russia does not support the Muslims in the matter of 
lifting the embargo. But this is only one side of the coin. The 
other side is that there are no angels in the Balkans 
altogether: Muslim plunder, too, and the latest Serb actions 
near Gorazde (unquestionably aggressive) were in response to 
Muslim provocations (and this is an irrefutable fact). Neither 
can one overlook that the Serb aggression by itself (and this 
word is appropriate here) to a considerable extent had been 
prompted by the legal vulnerability of Serbs in different 
corners of the SFRY that disintegrated after Tito's death. At 
the same time, the West, in its hasty recognition of Bosnia and 
Croatia, only fanned the spark of great power designs in 
Belgrade. Neither is Russia without sin, having at first in a 
way played along with the anti-Serb policy of the West, but 
later taking a more balanced position. Today, however, the 
question is not who is more at fault, but how we can extinguish 
a war that threatens the security of entire Europe. To this, Mr. 
Dzikic does not have a positive answer. He is no exception, 
though. Nobody has this answer. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68516 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94052" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Middle East Peace Process, Russian Interests in Region </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Middle East Peace Process, Russian Interests in Region </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Assessed 

<F P=102>   944Q0331A Moscow MEZHDUNARODNAYA ZHIZN in Russian No 2, Feb 
94 [signed to press 18 Mar 94] pp 129-137 </F>

<F P=103> 944Q0331A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MEZHDUNARODNAYA ZHIZN </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aleksei Fedorovich Chistyakov, deputy director, </F>
Near East and North Africa Department, MFA Russia: "Changes in 
the Near East and the Outside World"] 
  [Excerpts] 
  [Passage omitted] 
<H5>  PROSPECTS OF THE PEACE PROCESS </H5>
  From the point of view of the interests of international and 
regional security, the variant of the peace process under which 
dynamic realization of the Palestinian-Israeli agreement would 
occur, preferably in a period--if not one which coincides with 
that envisaged by this agreement, then at least close to 
it--would appear to be the optimal one. Failure to implement 
this agreement would inevitably intensify domestic opposition 
both in Israel and in Palestinian society, while complicating 
the situation of those taking part in the negotiations on both 
sides. 
  And the year 1996 is approaching--the year of parliamentary 
elections in Israel, and the presidential election in the United 
States. In consideration of this factor, it would be well for 
the Palestinians and the Israelis to "stick to the schedule" for 
working out their agreement. In this respect, parallel progress 
in talks between Israel and Syria is seen as the optimal variant 
as well. Although, evidently, Palestinian-Israeli negotiations 
could indeed proceed to the implementation phase, while 
bypassing the others. 
  But in this instance it would inevitably experience the 
retarding influence of other trends. With such a "truncated" 
model of development of the peace process, the potential for 
regional cooperation laid down in multilateral negotiations 
would not be able to begin functioning seriously. And in the 
future there would inevitably be complications in the 
Palestinian-Israeli talks themselves, on the permanent status of 
their relations, which is to commence in the third year of the 
period of self-government. 
  One must say that the peace process in the Near East has 
already become an important factor in regional stability, and 
the rounds of negotiations (bilateral and multilateral) and 
measures taken between sessions--along with their direct 
purpose--are a kind of contact mechanism for the regional 
parties and for extra-regional participants in the peace 
process, which operate practically on a permanent basis. 
  At the same time this mechanism in and of itself cannot 
substitute for that system of regional security and stability 
which would result from settlement of the conflict between its 
participants themselves. 
<H5>  RUSSIA AND THE NEAR EAST </H5>
  In the second half of the 1980's, the diplomatic lexicon of 
Russia continually addressed the thesis that for us, the Near 
East is not only near, but is contiguous, and that everything 
that occurs there concerns us directly. It would seem that, as 
distinguished from the USSR, Russia is situated much farther 
from the Near East. However, this is not entirely true even 
geographically. The fact of the matter is, that changes are 
taking place in the very concept of the "Near East," and today 
the boundaries of the Near East are much broader than before; 
and, they are just as close to Russia as they were to the USSR 
in its time. 
  It would appear that the public has not yet formed a 
coherent 
attitude with respect to the fact that there is a Near East for 
Russia, and what kind of policy she should have toward it. A 
wide variety of opinions are expressed, some of which are polar 
opposites. On one extreme flank, there is the perception that 
the Near East is located beyond the "natural habitat" of 
interests of Russian national security; thus, Russia should not 
be drawn too closely into near-eastern affairs. 
  The idea presented in late 1992 by G. Mirskiy at an 
international scientific conference at Tel-Aviv University can 
serve as an example of the opposite pole of opinion: "The Near 
East at present is the only place in the world where Russia 
still can play a peace role. Other regions are practically 
inaccessible."[.sup]6[/] One may also encounter an 
"in-between" approach, which one could arbitrarily call, 
"drifting with the events." 
  Naturally, each of the aforementioned ideas has the right to 
exist, and each can and is being substantiated. I would merely 
like to note that in recent years the interest of the outside 
world to the Near East, and to taking part in its affairs, is 
growing sharply. The appearance of prospects for peace in the 
region has markedly stimulated this interest, and the diplomatic 
and business activities of many countries with respect to the 
Near East. 
  The fact of the matter is that one of the main peculiarities 
of the Near East, with determines one's attitude to it from 
abroad, is the fact that it represents a voluminous and growing 
market. For us it is most common to associate this market with 
the arms market. In 1991 and 92, the states of the Persian Gulf 
alone expended 40 billion dollars for arms 
purchases.[.sup]7[/] Military expenditures of near-eastern 
countries is estimated at 45 billion dollars per year, and 
taking into consideration the modernization of weapons being 
undertaken by the key states in the region, military outlays 
will remain at a high level for the foreseeable future as well. 
  It is precisely the vast market for weapons in the Near East 
that they cite "in defense" of the thesis of Russia's developing 
relations with this region. Although they are correct in saying 
that these markets are on the whole "saturated," and that Russia 
sold less than 3 billion dollars worth of weapons in 1992 and 
even less in 1993, by 2.1 billion dollars,[.sup]8[/] Russia 
in recent years has "crossed over" from the first-place position 
she held in the second half of the 1980's, to one that is barely 
on the margins. In addition, for weapons importers the nature of 
the political ties with the exporting states, stability, 
reliability and predictability of these ties, are very important. 
  Indeed, Russia has something to offer the Near East. This, 
of 
course, is not the fruits and vegetables, of which this region 
annually imports more than 30 billion dollar's worth. Primarily 
this interest represents the technical achievements of Russia. 
For instance, an enterprise for production of magnesium, using 
Russian technology, recently opened in Israel. Interest in 
cooperation with Russia is being displayed in many other areas 
as well. And for Russia, establishing peace in the region opens 
the prospects for significant increase in the potential of its 
business cooperation as well. 
  Previously the market expanse of the Near East was divided 
by 
a key border obstacle--non-recognition of Israel by the Arabs. 
The peace treaty of Israel and Egypt signed in 1979 opened a 
breach in these obstacles. The realization of the 
Palestinian-Israeli agreement is expanding this breach. Peaceful 
settlement between Israel and its other Arab neighbors would 
lead to a state in which the near-eastern market expanse would 
open up all around. World business is positioning itself for 
precisely such a prospect. 
  As arguments "against" Russia's developing an active 
partnership with the Near East they cite the indebtedness to her 
of a number of near-eastern states. Our principal debtors are 
Syria, Yemen, Iraq and Libya. At the same time the share of the 
near-eastern states with overdue debts to the former USSR 
(according to data of mid-1992) amounted to a little over 6 
billion dollars, or nearly 23 percent of the total sum (28.5 
billion dollars). 
  World economic practice has developed methods for settlement 
of foreign debts in such a manner that it is advantageous to the 
creditor and not overly burdening to the debtor; and there are 
firms who make this their profession. And, finally, at times 
they assert that in the current complex situation, especially 
the economic one, it is hard, they say, for Russia to keep in 
step in the Near East with those who are capable of stimulating 
their involvement in near-eastern affairs even by financial 
donorship, and gratuitous aid. However, one hears from certain 
competent persons in the Near East, that Russia does not have to 
be a donor in order to take part in the affairs of the region. 
  The advice to "wait it out" until everything in Russia 
"straightens itself out" also seems fallacious, since it is well 
known that any pause in a certain foreign sector inevitably 
weakens the ties, and in some instances even leads to their loss. 
  In the context of the present article one must also not 
avoid 
the question of whether the Near East is important to Russia 
from the point of view of the interests of her national 
security. If one understands their limitation only as the danger 
of direct armed aggression against Russia, then the answer is 
probably no--for the present no one is planning on attacking 
Russia from the Near East. However, there are also in the Near 
East possible variants of a developing situation in which damage 
may be done to broader Russian interests. 
  Some of these variants are connected with the non-settlement 
of the Arab-Israeli conflict; others with the continuing 
atmosphere of conflict in the Persian Gulf; still others with 
the conflict situations along the southern borders of Russia and 
the CIS, and the attitude toward them of the states of the Near 
East. This list could be continued. 
  One way or another, clearly, it is not in the interests of 
Russia to remain aloof from near-eastern affairs, nor from 
regular political and diplomatic participation in them, nor from 
intercourse both with the states of this region, and with those 
who are involved in these affairs. 
  Speaking at the 48th Session of the UN General Assembly, 
Russian Minister of Foreign Affairs A.V. Kozyrev, making a 
positive analysis of the completed political and psychological 
break-through for resolution of the key problem of a 
near-eastern settlement--the Palestinian problem--stated that 
Russia, as co-sponsor of the Conference on the Near East, will 
spare no efforts to move the peace process along in all sectors. 
  Actually, in the present situation the mechanism for the 
peace process was found to lie principally in the sphere of 
diplomacy, in which both regional and non-regional participants 
were interacting, and realizing their own national interests 
connected with the Near East and with relations with 
near-eastern states. The line for such interaction with the USA 
was confirmed by the Russo-American statement on the Near East, 
adopted 14 January of this year in the course of the Moscow 
summit as well. 
  It is evident that such active participation in the peace 
process is in favor of the national interests of Russia as well, 
and in the interests of her security--the settlement of the 
near-east conflict within the framework of this process, 
stabilization in the context of normalization of the situation 
in this region, and the establishment of a system of security in 
it. 
Footnotes 
  6. "The Arab-Israeli Negotiations", Tel-Aviv University, 
1993, p 112. 
  7. IZVESTIYA, 16 February 1993. 
  8. ARGUMENTY I FAKTY, 1993, No 51, "Segodnya," 28 January 
1994. 
  COPYRIGHT: MID RF. Mezhdunarodnaya assotsiatsiya "Znaniye". 
"Mezhdunarodnaya zhizn", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68517 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94053" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Trade With Turkey Increasing Rapidly </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Trade With Turkey Increasing Rapidly </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0312A Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 7 Apr 94 pp 1,4 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0312A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Svetlana Sukhova: "Turkey Wants To Catch Up With </F>
and Surpass the United States in Trade With Russia"] 
  [Text] The results of yesterday's meeting of the 
Russian-Turkish Intergovernmental Commission on Commercial and 
Economic Cooperation may become a breakthrough in relations 
between the two countries. Although Turkey in recent years has 
become one of Russia's leading partners, the protocol signed by 
the commission's cochairmen--Oleg Davydov, head of the Russian 
Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations, and Onur Kumbaracibasi, 
minister of Public Works and Housing--sets an increase in trade 
of up to $5 billion as a realistic objective. And then Turkey 
could catch up with and surpass America as Russia's partner. 
  In and of itself, a trade turnover that has increased by 
more 
than 400 percent over the past eight years--and that is without 
counting the activities of the army of many thousands of Russian 
"shuttles"--attests to the successful development of commercial 
relations. Of course, there are problems. And everyone who has 
kept track of Russia's negotiations in recent years readily 
guesses that they consist in debts (Russia's defaulted debt 
amounts to $320 million). Granted, in the case of Turkey one 
must speak of bilateral debt: Turkey owes for the construction 
of the Beskamberun Metallurgical Mill (about $35 million), which 
was built with Russia's assistance. 
  Yesterday Turkey proposed its option for getting out of the 
existing situation--to repay the Russian debt with deliveries of 
gas and military hardware. In particular, the proposal was to 
sell Ankara $60 million worth of military helicopters and $200 
million worth of small arms. The interest in the Russian 
armaments is so great that Onur Kumbaracibasi expressed the 
desire to increase purchases of military equipment and armaments 
by an amount of up to $600 million a year. As KOMMERSANT has 
learned, First Vice-Premier Oleg Soskovets has already given his 
consent to the export of the small arms, and this year $60 
million worth of deliveries will be made toward the repayment of 
Russia's debt. But by solving the debt problem this way, Russia 
risks acquiring a heap of unpleasantness far from Turkey's 
shores. The problem is that Turkey's enthusiasm for acquiring 
the aforementioned types of arms is directly proportionate to 
the intensity of Ankara's war with the Kurdish separatists, 
against whom the weapons are being used. The situation is a 
sensitive one: The FRG, under extremely strong pressure from 
other NATO members, recently refused Turkey precisely the types 
of arms in which it is interested (the pretext was that they are 
being used for fighting political opponents and for punitive 
actions against civilians). Moscow, on the other hand, while 
experiencing a need to increase the market for its arms, 
simultaneously fears NATO's negative reaction and is not 
especially rushing to accommodate Turkey's desires. 
  The Kurdish problem may, however, become an obstacle to the 
development of one of the most promising branches of bilateral 
cooperation--tourism. And the possibilities here are 
considerable: the mild Mediterranean climate and comparatively 
low prices (in comparison with the resorts of France or Spain), 
along with first-rate service, are making Antalya, the center of 
Turkish tourism, for example, increasingly attractive to 
Russians who are not spoiled in terms of resort service. 
However, their mass influx onto Turkish beaches could quite 
possibly be prevented by considerations of personal safety. At 
present, for example, many foreign groups are refusing tours and 
reservations in prestigious hotels on the coast in connection 
with the step-up in terrorist activities by the Kurdish Workers' 
Party (PKK), which recently declared war on tourism throughout 
Turkey's entire territory. Several explosions have already gone 
off in Istanbul (including in the famous St. Sophia's) and 
Antalya lately. 
  However, tourism does not hold the leading place within the 
total range of economic relations between Russia and Turkey. And 
therefore hopes for the future are more bound up with 
traditional forms of cooperation, rather than with tourism. 
Thus, in yesterday's negotiations it was decided to raise 
deliveries of Russian gas to Turkey to 8 billion cubic meters a 
year (and by another 2.5 billion over the next two 
years--current deliveries are 6 billion cubic meters). It was 
noted that the chief problem today is transit across Ukraine, 
which has been pumping gas from the gas pipeline without 
authorization. The Turks also voiced complaints to the 
representatives of Gazprom [Gas Industry Joint-Stock Company] 
who were taking part in the negotiations regarding the price of 
the gas, which in their opinion is too high. 
  The development of investment and technical cooperation also 
remains promising. Interest here is mutual: the Turks, who are 
already carrying out $2.5 billion worth of contracts in Russia, 
are prepared to take part in new projects (primarily in the 
power-engineering industries). The Russians are not lagging 
behind, either--the Tekhnostroyeksport Foreign Trade Association 
is carrying out a number of contracts in Turkey that were signed 
back during the time of the USSR and are connected with the 
electrification of a railroad and the construction of three 
highways near Ankara and a hydraulic engineering complex and 
dam. Tekhnostroyeksport views winning the Turkish market as a 
long-range strategy, which is especially important following 
Russia's loss of its former positions in Asia Minor and the 
Middle East. The main thing is that the Russians offer only 
first-class goods and services. The only problem is that, 
according the Viktor Velichko, chairman of the foreign trade 
association, the Turks are chronically late in their payments, 
which is interfering with the expansion of Russian firms' 
activities in Turkey. 
  In the course of negotiations, the question of the shipping 
regime in the Black Sea straits was also raised. The Russian 
side insists on strict adherence to the 1936 Montreux shipping 
convention. Lately Ankara has been trying to restrict it under 
the pretext of an "environmental threat to Istanbul"--most of 
the freight shipped through the straits is related to the export 
of energy sources. And the recent collision of two tankers in 
the Bosporus only intensified those fears. As an alternative, 
the Turks are proposing to Russia to extend the oil pipeline 
across the bottom of the Black Sea. Moscow is prepared to 
consider that project, according to Oleg Davydov, minister of 
foreign economic relations. 
<H8>  Some Figures on Economic Cooperation Between Russia and </H8>
Turkey (Based on the Information of the Russian Ministry of 
Foreign Economic Relations) 
  Trade turnover: 
  In 1993--$2 billion (with a positive Russian trade balance 
of 
more than $600 million). The increase in bilateral trade since 
1986 exceeded 400 percent. 
  Some Russian projects in Turkey: 

  -  Construction of the Pazarcik-[Karegli] gas pipeline (200 
km). Estimated cost--$4.5 million; 
  -  construction of the [Komkyurler]-[Osmanis] railroad section 
(78 
km). Estimated cost--$80 million; 
  -  modernization and expansion of the alumina and electrolysis 
production facilities at the Seydisehir Aluminum Mill. Estimated 
cost--$200 million. 

    Turkish business activity in Russia: 
  $2.5 billion worth of construction contracts alone have been 
concluded as of this time. They include a sugar refinery in 
Krasnodar Kray and chemical plants in Siberia, Tataria and 
Bashkiria. Designs are being worked up for the modernization of 
the petrochemical industry and airports in Tataria. 
  Military-technical cooperation: 
  In 1993 an agreement in principle was reached for the 
purchase in russia of MI-28, K-126 and K-226 helicopters and 
MiG-29 planes, the latest antiaircraft and armored weapons, and 
also small arms. $60 million worth of arms will be sold and 
credited toward the payment of debt to Ankara. 
  Russia's defaulted debt to Turkey: 
  For credits from the Turkish Export-Import Bank--$320 
million. Formed as the result of the granting of two credits for 
$150 million each to the former USSR in 1989, and two credits 
for $200 million each in 1990-1991 (only $300 million of the 
latter was used). 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68518 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94054" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Westinghouse Signs Atomic Energy, Air Traffic Agreements </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Westinghouse Signs Atomic Energy, Air Traffic Agreements </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0312B Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 7 Apr 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0312B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aleksandr Malyutin and Irina Matveyeva: </F>
"Americans Undertake to Outfit the Russian Skies"] 
  [Text] Among the largest American corporations whose 
activities in the Russian market have so far gone practically 
unnoticed is the Westinghouse electronics company. However, 
events this past week that became known just yesterday, since 
they were not advertised by the company, indicate that 
Westinghouse has revised its attitude toward Russia. The company 
took its first steps in the Russian market with truly American 
sweep, concluding two major agreements at once. The firm signed 
a memorandum on the principles of cooperation with the Russian 
Ministry of Atomic Energy and an agreement on its participation 
in an international consortium established to carry out a 
project for the modernization by 2005 of the unified air traffic 
control system in Russia. The project's approximate cost is $5 
billion. 
  Many foreign aircraft companies have not yet made up their 
minds to begin active business in Russia, since they consider 
flights on Russian airlines to be less than safe. According to 
official statistics, the level of safety on Russian airlines is 
three times lower than in the United States and two times lower 
than in West European countries. The level of training of air 
traffic controllers and the equipment with which they work do 
not meet world standards. In addition, international airlines 
are overloaded beyond permissible norms. Because of all these 
problems, not only do passengers suffer every possible 
inconvenience and discomfort, but the state budget loses foreign 
exchange that it might earn from foreign airlines whose planes 
flew over Russia's territory. 
  Last April the Russian government passed a decree "On the 
Modernization of the Unified Air Traffic Control System in 
Russia" (and that was when the first negotiations with 
Westinghouse began). The decree provides for the establishment 
of an international consortium with the participation of leading 
Western companies that have experience in organizing air traffic 
control. At that time the Russian-Italian Buran Joint Venture 
established by the State Scientific Research Institute for Air 
Navigation, the Proton Research and Production Association, the 
All-Russian Research Institute of Radio Automation Equipment and 
the Italian Aleniy company was working in a similar area, but on 
a smaller scale. 
  Buran's experience was taken advantage of, and an 
international consortium is presently being established (its 
name has not yet been determined) that will include, in addition 
to Aleniy, Westinghouse, The French Tomson-CSF company and the 
recently established Russian Scientific and Technical Center for 
Air Traffic Control--as the general contractor on the Russian 
side. Negotiations are continuing with a number of other large 
foreign companies. As the center's director Sergey Novikov 
indicated, "the road to the consortium has not been closed to 
new investors." According to Mr. Novak, the ultimate value of 
the project will be determined in April, after the pertinent 
federal program has been adopted. The Russian side's share in 
the consortium will be 51 percent. 
  Until the federal program is adopted, the amount of foreign 
investments in the large-scale project is not being made public. 
However, there is no doubt that it will come to hundreds of 
millions of dollars. When it makes its contribution, the 
Westinghouse corporation will immediately become one of the 
Western electronic companies--such as ABB or Siemens--that have 
invested sizeable funds in Russia. According to REUTERS, 
Westinghouse President Gary clark is also counting on the 
company's playing a substantial role in modernizing vitally 
important sectors of the Russian economy. Mr. Clark expressed 
the desire not only to help Russians realize their dreams for 
"normal flights," but also to take part in modernizing Russian 
nuclear-power enterprises. 
  As a KOMMERSANT correspondent was told at the Ministry of 
Atomic Energy, for a long time this agency was unable to find a 
common language with Westinghouse: "It seems that the company 
had little interest in Russia." However, in this area, too, 
things have started moving--at any rate, a memorandum on 
principles of cooperation has already been signed. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68519 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94055" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Almaty Polls on Elections Interpreted </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Almaty Polls on Elections Interpreted </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1143A Almaty EKSPRESS-K in Russian 27 Apr 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1143A </F>
<F P=104>  Almaty EKSPRESS-K </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Rustem Sartayev and Sergey Gmyrya, Information </F>
Center of the Republic of Kazakhstan Supreme Council: "Only Two 
Parties With a Solid Electorate--the Communists and People's 
Unity Alliance of Kazakhstan"] 
  [Text] Sociologists of the Information Center of the 
republic's Supreme Council conducted three public opinion 
surveys in February-March 1994 of Almaty residents on issues 
related to the elections of the Supreme Council and local 
representational organs of the Republic of Kazakhstan. The first 
survey (448 respondents) was conducted one month prior to the 
elections, the second (439 respondents)--three days prior, and 
the third (511 respondents)--immediately following the 
elections. 
  A comparative analysis of the results of the first and 
second 
surveys shows that election campaigning had virtually no effect 
on increasing the interest of voters in the elections of 
representational organs of authority. A certain reduction in the 
interest level was even seen. According to data from the poll 
conducted three days prior to the elections, only 17.8 percent 
of Almaty residents (one month prior to the elections this 
figure was 17.6 percent) were very interested in the coming 
elections, more than half of those surveyed--52.6 percent (55.1 
percent for the poll conducted one month prior) were interested 
in them to some degree, and 29.4 percent (27.2 percent) 
expressed complete indifference. 
  Nor was there any change in the number of respondents who 
had 
decided conclusively not to participate in the elections--26.9 
percent (26.3 percent one month prior to the elections). Three 
days before the elections, 24.6 percent still had not decided 
whether to take part (26.8 percent--one month prior to the 
elections). A certain increase was seen in the number of voters 
deciding to participate in the elections--48.1 percent (44.2 
percent--one month prior). 
  Results of the postelection survey showed that 64.6 percent 
of the Almaty residents polled took part in the elections (62.8 
percent of the electorate voted according to data of the Central 
Electoral Committee). The most energetic voting activity was 
observed with respect to pensioners, 89.5 percent of whom went 
to the polls. Also active on election day were military 
servicemen (75 percent), engineering-technical personnel (74.4 
percent), the creative and scientific intelligentsia (69 
percent), and workers (65.9 percent), who comprise 33.9 percent 
of the total number of those voting. 
  Less energetic were teachers and doctors (61.5 percent of 
their number voted), students (50.9 percent), entrepreneurs and 
businessmen (50 percent), and employees of law enforcement 
organs (41.2 percent). The low percentage of the latter group is 
perhaps related to the fact that militiamen predominate here (of 
mid-level and junior rank) who were actively engaged in 
maintaining order during the elections. 
  The degree of participation by age in the elections was 
directly proportional to the ages of voters. The greatest 
activity was observed in the category of middle-aged and elderly 
people: 87.5 percent--for those over 60, 73.1 percent--ages 50 
to 59, 74.8 percent--ages 40 to 49, and 59.4 percent--ages 30 to 
39. The least degree of election participation was observed in 
the electorate of the 25-29 age group--49.2 percent of them 
voted. At the same time, there was no substantive difference 
between election participants categorized by ethnicity--61.3 
percent of Kazakhs and 69 percent of Russians cast ballots. As 
one can see from these figures, the Russian population of Almaty 
was somewhat more active than the Kazakh population. 
  What were the reasons motivating almost two-thirds of Almaty 
residents to take part in the voting? Over half (55.8 percent) 
explained their decision by virtue of civic duty. Some 22.5 
percent of the politically active citizens explained their 
participation through a concern for the democratic development 
of society, and 19.7 percent of participating city-dwellers were 
influenced by the need to develop and perfect legislation. 
  Fourteen percent of those voting cited a need to protect the 
interests of their nationality as being among the motives for 
their decision (13.9 percent of Kazakhs and 17.2 percent of 
Russians were thus motivated to participate). The need to elect 
a professional parliament as a counterweight to the executive 
branch of power was cited by 13.3 percent of respondents in 
explaining their decision. Only 7.6 percent based their 
reasoning on enthusiasm for a certain candidate (6.2 
percent--one month prior to the elections). The low percentage 
seen here illustrates the obvious lack of political figures who 
are well known and enjoy the prestige of Almaty residents. Only 
1.2 percent of the city populace explained their reasoning by 
virtue of sympathies for a certain sociopolitical organization. 
  What is interesting is the motivation that led more than a 
third (35.4 percent) of Almaty residents to decide not to 
participate in the elections. The overwhelming majority of those 
deciding not to vote (70.3 percent) explained their 
nonparticipation through a belief that the election results 
would not change anything; 69.2 percent felt that those desirous 
of acceding to power would be elected all the same. Some 9.2 
percent of those not voting explained their decision citing 
indifference as the justification, while the same percentage 
cited lack of information as the reason. Another 9.1 percent 
believed their own personal problems were more important than 
the elections. 
  Responses to a question regarding political sympathies of 
respondents on the threshold of the elections showed the low 
popularity of sociopolitical associations of the republic. This 
is explained evidently by the fact that the process of formation 
of the multiparty system in the republic is in its early stages, 
and it is still too soon to be talking about the formation of 
party-political structures of any durability, or about a clear 
demarcation of political forces. 
  On the eve of the elections, 12.1 percent of respondents 
showed a preference for the People's Unity Alliance of 
Kazakhstan (one month prior to the elections--14.5 percent), the 
Communist Party--9.6 percent (9.8 percent), independent 
candidates--9.1 percent (3.1 percent), the Democratic Committee 
for Human Rights--8.9 percent (5.1 percent), Union of 
Veterans--8.9 percent (6.5 percent), the Slavic movement 
Lad--3.9 percent (11.6 percent), People's Congress of 
Kazakhstan--3.6 percent (4.5 percent), Socialist Party--2.1 
percent (1.1 percent), the party Zheltoksan--1.4 percent (0.5 
percent), Republican Party--0.9 percent (0.9 percent), the 
Kazakhstan civic movement Azag--0.7 percent (0.9 percent), 
Independent Center of Trade Unions--0.7 percent (0.9 percent), 
and the party Alash--0.5 percent (0.9 percent). Some 22.7 
percent of Almaty residents polled had not determined their 
political sympathies three days prior to the elections (one 
month prior to the elections this figure was 39.5 percent). 
  Results of the second survey showed that three days before 
the elections 39 percent of city residents were unfamiliar with 
the campaign programs of sociopolitical organizations (one month 
prior to the elections this figure was 45.1 percent), 22.8 
percent were insufficiently familiar with them (25.9 percent), 
22.6 percent were roughly familiar (21 percent), and just 13 
percent of city residents were familiar with them (6.7 percent). 
  Despite the increased percentage of voters who had 
familiarized themselves with the campaign programs of 
sociopolitical organizations towards the end of the campaign 
period, survey results revealed that political parties missed 
the good opportunity afforded by preelection activity to broadly 
advertise their programs. This can be seen in the third place 
finish achieved by independent candidates. Only the Democratic 
Committee for Human Rights and Union of Veterans increased their 
standings appreciably. The standings of the remainder either 
decreased or remained at their previous level. 
  Despite the fact that the Communist Party was not registered 
as of election day, the Communists have a fairly solid 
electorate--consisting mainly of people whose standard of living 
dropped sharply as a result of the reforms conducted. A 
significant reduction was seen by election day in the number of 
supporters of the Slavic movement Lad (one month prior to the 
elections, 11.6 percent of those polled supported Lad; three 
days prior--only 3.9 percent). 
  Analysis shows that the reduction was due chiefly to 
workers, 
who constituted more than half of the Lad electorate at the 
outset of the campaign. Whereas one month prior to the 
elections, 16.4 percent of all workers supported the movement, 
three days prior this figure was 4 percent. By ethnic category, 
an almost threefold reduction was seen in support for the 
movement on the part of Russians--who comprised the overwhelming 
majority of its electorate and apparently believed Lad would not 
stand up for their interests with sufficient decisiveness. 
Kazakhs, who constituted 11.5 percent of the Lad electorate 
prior to the elections, stopped supporting the movement 
entirely. As opposed to the Russians, Kazakhs obviously felt the 
reverse was true--that the Lad program proposed too radical a 
resolution of ethnic problems. 
  As to the question of criteria guiding the voters in making 
a 
determination of their representatives, the following results 
were seen from the third survey. Almaty residents focused their 
attention firstly on the competence of candidates for deputy 
(15.7 percent of those polled), 13.7 percent showed a preference 
for the independence of position of the candidates, 12.7 
percent--for their moral qualities (incorruptibility, 
trustworthiness of their word...), 8.6 percent were influenced 
by the attractiveness of candidates' campaign programs, 7.6 
percent--by the manner of communication, education, and 
intelligence of candidates, 7.2 percent found the patriotism of 
candidates important, 6.3 percent were influenced by a 
candidate's affiliation with a particular sociopolitical 
organization, and only 6.1 percent of survey respondents were 
guided by the ethnic affiliation of the candidates. 
  Preelection survey data on the degree to which Almaty 
residents were informed about candidates prior to the elections 
show that only one-fifth of city residents (20.8 percent) knew 
the candidates registered in their electoral districts, 23.3 
percent knew roughly who they were, and 44.6 percent knew 
nothing at all about the individuals campaigning in their own 
electoral districts. Some 29.4 percent of surveyed city-dwellers 
made their selection beforehand. More than a third of 
respondents (35.8 percent) decided at the polling station. 
  The following results were obtained for a question asking 
what influenced the respondent's choice if he had no previous 
knowledge regarding the candidates: type of work of a candidate 
was the deciding factor for 16.4 percent of city-dwellers 
surveyed; occupation--for 15.9 percent; information about a 
candidate's nomination--9.6 percent; party, movement, or union 
affiliation--7.1 percent; nationality of a candidate--5.9 
percent. Indicating a certain degree of tension in interethnic 
relations was the fact that 15.1 percent of respondents voted 
only for a candidate of his own nationality (17.3 percent of 
Kazakhs and 18.5 percent of Russians voted in this manner)--41.6 
percent of these made their selection beforehand, while 55.9 
percent determined their choice at the polling station. Thus, 
survey data show that the random element played a significant 
role in the elections of deputies. 
  What do Almaty residents expect from their new parliament? 
According to data from the third survey, more than half the 
voters--52.7 percent (one month prior to the elections the 
figure was 53.1 percent) nurture definite hopes in connection 
with the newly elected parliament. Some 29.6 percent of survey 
respondents expect professional work to be done on legislation 
(one month prior to the elections--28.1 percent), while 18.8 
percent (17.1 percent) believe the new parliament will change 
the existing situation in society. Only 4.3 percent (7.1 
percent) think the highest legislative organ will act as a 
counterweight to the executive branch. More than a fourth--28.2 
percent (26.8 percent) of surveyed voters expect nothing at all 
from their new parliament. A comparative analysis of results of 
the first and third surveys shows that the election campaign did 
not increase the prestige of the highest representational 
authority in the eyes of Almaty residents. 
  Proceeding from the data presented above, we may draw the 
following conclusions. 
  The study shows that preelection campaign 
activity--restricted within a rigid provisional framework, its 
inadequate financing, low activity level of the candidates for 
deputy themselves, weak support on the part of sociopolitical 
organizations for their own candidates, inadequate clarification 
of the election campaign in the mass media, and the absence of 
new, bright political figures all worked to produce virtually no 
increase in the interest of the electorate with respect to the 
elections. 
  Analysis of the data obtained during the course of the third 
survey shows that the element of randomness exerted a 
significant effect on the result of the elections in the city of 
Almaty, this being related to the absolute lack of information 
on the part of over half (53.7 percent) of the city population 
that went to the polls. 
  The elections show a growth of political passivity on the 
part of Almaty residents as reflected in the refusal of more 
than a third of the electorate to take part in the voting, 
explaining their nonparticipation by virtue of a belief that 
nothing will change for the better as a result of the elections 
and that those desirous of acceding to power will be elected all 
the same. 
  The election campaign exerted no significant influence on 
the 
process of establishment of a multiparty system in Kazakhstan 
since, as opposed to Russia, the republic's political parties 
failed to take advantage of the marvelous opportunity afforded 
by elections to the Supreme Council and local organs of power to 
make a statement about themselves and about their political 
programs. 
  Results of the three surveys show that only two parties at 
present--the People's Unity Alliance of Kazakhstan and the 
Communist Party--have established a fairly significant and solid 
electorate, on whose support they can today rely. 
  The results obtained during the course of the three surveys 
show that the social consciousness of Almaty residents is 
gradually crystallizing, and that it is becoming increasingly 
independent, freeing itself from precepts of political 
conformism, i.e., from the subconscious readiness to accept any 
and all decisions of the state authority. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68520 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94056" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   19 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> TAJIKISTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Opposition Leader on Talks in Moscow </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Opposition Leader on Talks in Moscow </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1155A Moscow NOVAYA YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA in Russian 19 
Apr 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1155A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NOVAYA YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Hajji Akbar Turadzhonzoda by Dododzhoni </F>
Atovullo: "Leader of the Tajik Opposition on an Official Visit"] 
  [Text] Hajji Akbar Turadzhonzoda, a leader of the 
Tajik opposition, arrived in Moscow from Pakistan on 17 April. 
He granted NOVAYA YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA an interview right at the 
airport. 
  [Atovullo] Esteemed Turadzhonzoda, you were elected head of 
the official Tajik opposition delegation at the negotiations 
with the Dushanbe leadership. The intensive negotiations are 
into their third week now, but you have only just arrived in 
Moscow.... 
  [Turadzhonzoda] I would have been the first in Moscow had it 
not been for the sly conduct of the Dushanbe leadership, which 
did everything possible to put off the negotiations or to stymie 
them altogether. And it was only thanks to the efforts of the 
United Nations and the Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs that 
the negotiations began. But even here Dushanbe thought up a 
dodge, sending to Moscow a representative of an inappropriate 
level. 
  [Atovullo] You mean the representative nature of the 
delegation? 
  [Turadzhonzoda] Of course. It is stupid negotiating with 
those who do not represent a real political force in the 
Dushanbe leadership. Or does the minister of labor, who is the 
head of the delegation, have influence on the republic's 
military formations? 
  [Atovullo] Nonetheless, the negotiations are under way. At 
an 
inappropriate level, but they are under way. You are undoubtedly 
informed as to what is happening in Moscow. How do you evaluate 
the progress of the negotiations. 
  [Turadzhonzoda] I would not want to evaluate the 
negotiations 
until they are completed: each day could produce both positive 
and negative results. But merely the fact that the negotiations 
have come about is an undoubted achievement. Hope, albeit 
fragile, has appeared for the Tajik people. I have to say that 
the opposition was insisting on negotiations for a year (NOVAYA 
YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA wrote about this repeatedly, incidentally). 
Fruitlessly. And now, when the negotiations have become a 
reality, I have to mention the fact that ALL the demands of the 
opposition, which were made at the end of last year even, are 
part of the agenda. I believe that this points to the 
constructive nature of our position. 
  [Atovullo] What does your visit signify? Will you take part 
in the negotiations? 
  [Turadzhonzoda] The main purpose of my coming here is to 
meet 
with politicians of Russia. It is very important for us to 
explain our positions and plans in a direct dialogue. I believe 
that we will succeed in personal discussions altering somewhat 
the "face of the opposition" which exists in the consciousness 
of Moscow. 
  A solution of the Tajik question is the key to a settlement 
of the conflict situation in Central Asia. This means the lives 
of hundreds of thousands of people. We recognize Russia's great 
role in a solution of this question and are sure that its 
geopolitical interests are directed at the restoration of peace 
and stability in the region. The opposition--and this means, it 
has to be said, a large part of the population of 
Tajikistan--wishes to have good-neighbor relations with Russia. 
  As far as the negotiations are concerned, one thing is 
clear: 
If the top persons of the government of Dushanbe come to Moscow, 
we will be prepared to take part in them. 
  [Atovullo] The conflicts on the Tajik-Afghan border have 
been 
incessant and the shelling of the Russian border posts have 
continued in the course of the negotiations. Dushanbe officials 
explain this by the fact that the opposition is endeavoring in 
this way to frustrate the negotiations. How do you see this 
situation? 
  [Turadzhonzoda] I will say at once that we have always been 
for not a single shot being heard on Tajik land. 
  Now about the clashes on the border. Yes, I have heard 
Dushanbe's version. I have heard also that some people are 
maliciously whispering: What's the point of negotiating with 
them if they cannot control their field commanders. 
  But, first, why are Dushanbe officials looking only at the 
border? Far more people are dying in the streets of the towns 
and villages. The official authorities not only do not control 
the armed forces but are even encouraging their punitive 
functions. 
  As far as the opposition is concerned, it fully controls all 
armed formations, which, you will agree, is very, very 
difficult. And it is not only a question of distances and the 
lack of dependable communications. The main thing is the 
hopelessness. People who have lost hope of returning to the 
homeland are uncontrollable. Hungry, sick, mourning dead 
brothers and fathers. 
  But give them just an ounce of hope! I am sure that after an 
agreement on national reconciliation and a mutual cease-fire 
agreement have been signed, not a single shot will be heard on 
the part of the opposition. 
  [Atovullo] In the opinion of many analysts, part of the 
leadership of Dushanbe is decidedly against any negotiations 
with the opposition. Could this matter be settled without 
negotiations, in your view? 
  [Turadzhonzoda] Negotiations are not a theatrical 
performance, in which the participants show off their costumes 
and subtlety of intellect or lack of it. 
  Negotiations are an exchange of thoughts, they are 
concessions and compromise, but, what is most important, all 
negotiations lead to a "change of seats." Understandably, if 
they are successful, many people will face a sad parting with 
their chairs. This is why these many people are attempting to 
stymie the negotiations and turn them into a theatrical 
performance. Only they are forgetting that the "spectators" of 
this performance are the hungry and sick, are being shot at and 
bombed.... 
  Dushanbe officials, of course, are presenting the 
negotiations as the result of their wise and peace-loving 
policy. With a single hope: The negotiations will pass, and the 
authorities will remain as they were before. They simply cannot 
understand that the negotiations are already a political 
reality. You cannot be a little bit pregnant, as the Dushanbe 
authorities are hoping. There will either be the child of peace, 
whom everyone is awaiting. Or surgical intervention will be 
necessary--and this will once again mean blood.... 
  I believe that difficult times have come for both parties. 
We 
have to fight against ourselves, our ambitions and illusions. 
For the sake of our people. For the sake of peace. 
  We have a chance. No one would ever forgive us were we to 
let 
it slip. There is no alternative to the negotiations. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68521 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94057" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> UZBEKISTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Misery of Uzbek Rural Life Described </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Misery of Uzbek Rural Life Described </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K0935A Moscow ERK in Uzbek 1 Feb 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0935A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ERK </F>
<F P=105>  Uzbek </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Namoz Normumin: "Labor Camps, or Pages From </F>
Village Life: Part 1"] 
  [Text] Normally, when one says labor camps, one thinks of 
prisons because the labor performed in labor camps is done by 
those who are not themselves free. It is clear that free labor 
is not done by free men... 
  If we are to use mankind's physical and mental attributes, 
i.e., allow him to work freely, his personality is fulfilled. 
Thus, the right to work is one of man's basic rights. 
  Man satisfies his material and spiritual needs instead of 
wasting his power and abilities. His life is spent amid work and 
these needs. These two forces form man and define his way of 
life: in brief, they define the human fate. 
  I have been giving some thought to working freely. Perhaps 
others have other ideas. 
  Well and good, what kind of work is used in today's 
Uzbekistan. Can one call the work of kolkhozniks in the village 
free labor? 
  The present villages of Uzbekistan came into existence as a 
result of kolkhozification. Three quarters of Uzbekistan's 
population live in them. Close to four million of this 
population have contracted infectious hepatitis in the last 
twenty years. The population in the village lives an average of 
sixty years. Some 50 out of every thousand children born in the 
villages does not live beyond the age of one year. We do not 
want to dwell on the level of education, health, or cultural 
work in the villages. These are well known to all. 
  Many, thinking of the fate of the nation, its health, 
education, and culture, do not think specifically of the 
village. Village people are living beings, but in chains. 
  In the interests of justice, we have to say that the 
majority 
of these people speak simply and are gullible. If someone were 
to come on television and say "we have to live in the Union", 
they would believe it. It is no complicated matter to make them 
believe the opposite. 
  This being said, our narrative is about the so-called 
village 
labor camps and the way of life of those who live there. 
<H5>  WHOSE IS THE LAND? </H5>
  We say that the word "kishlok [village]" comes from the verb 
"kishlamok [to overwinter]." Nomadic tribes spent the winter 
months in places known to them. The people, once having accepted 
the sedentary way of life, began to call the place a "village." 
Up to the October revolution 76 percent of Turkestan's 
population lived in villages. In the Soviet period, this number 
did not change significantly. Sometimes one finds tuman [rayon] 
centers instead of cities and the population living in these is 
counted as living in cities. This being the case, official 
figures of Uzbekistan today state that 60 percent of the 
population live in villages and 40 percent in the cities. 
Essentially, however, these tuman centers are not cities because 
these settlements are not industrialized and the way of life of 
those living in them does not differ significantly from that in 
the villages. In fact, a part of the population in the tuman 
centers, as in the big cities, consists of nomadic Russians. In 
Surkhondaryo, a southern viloyat, the population lives entirely 
in villages. It is simplistic to call the viloyat center, 
Termez, a city. 
  Until kolkhozification, the land of Uzbekistan was in the 
hands of landlords, and they leased this to peasants or 
exploited it through day-laborers. Produce harvested from the 
land was divided between the landlord and the day laborer by 
contract. One must also point out that a significant portion of 
the peasants owned their own land. As a result of 
kolkhozification, the land was completely taken away from the 
landlords and the peasants to whom it was leased. The feeling of 
respect for productive and meaningful labor -- the feeling of 
possession of the land -- was extinguished. 
  Who owns the land in Uzbekistan today? It is thought that 
most of the land belongs to the state. 
  The drop from year to year in production from farmed land, 
the fact that the harvested product does not meet world 
standards, the ecological harm done by organisms in the soil, 
its "rape" in order to extract a product from it, in other 
words, the use of chemical fertilizers, raises the question of 
who owns the land once again. 
  The present owner of Uzbekistan's lands is nonhuman and 
nonnatural -- the State. 
  The government has no intention of privatizing the land. As 
an excuse, it points out simple reasons such as the majority of 
the population live in villages, there is a shortage of land and 
water, and the people's tendency to work in groups. Its goal is 
to retain the old order by preserving the government in its 
hands by means of the land. 
  The population of the republic is now 22 million. A average 
of 6-7 people live in every family. That means that there are 
close to 3.5 million families in Uzbekistan. There is close to 
four million hectares of irrigated land. On the average, every 
family could receive slightly more than one hectare. 
  Twenty five sotikhs [a land measure] of land were given to 
every family in our Republic, similar to the amounts given away 
in the Peoples Republic of China. On this basis land reform was 
carried out; rice and other products are the fruits of this 
reform. 
  Now imagine: what if instead of twenty five sotikhs of land, 
what if one hectare was given! 
  We think it would work better if kolkhoz lands were leased, 
and then, after a definite period, privatized. Under existing 
circumstances, this is the only way the resolve the problem. It 
is difficult, but there is no other way! 
  Some simple people wonder why our government has not thought 
of this simple idea. They think that the government is as simple 
as themselves. But today's government is not so honest. If the 
government were honest, it would see into what state the rural 
population has fallen as a result of its policies, and it would 
have resigned. The reason that land reform has not been carried 
out in present-day Uzbekistan is that it is possible that as a 
result of such reforms people in the villages would become both 
materially and intellectually more independent. If kolkhoz lands 
were leased to the peasants, they would escape from the clutches 
of the present order. The peasants would make the transition 
from compulsory labor to free labor, and, finally, their 
understanding of their own government would increase. If this 
were to happen, who would they follow? And, if democratic 
elections were held, they certainly would not follow the 
representatives of today's neocommunist order. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68522 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94058" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> UZBEKISTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Editorial Commentary on Turkic Unity </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Editorial Commentary on Turkic Unity </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K0935B Moscow ERK in Uzbek 1 Feb 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0935B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ERK </F>
<F P=105>  Uzbek </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Editorial Committee: "Response to the Ideology </F>
of `Mankurtism'"] 
  [Text] The Soviet Empire wanted to create one "Soviet 
culture" from various cultures, one "Soviet mentality" from 
various national mentalities, and one "Soviet people" from 
various nationalities. 
  It is possible to call this concept of the Soviets 
"mankurtism" on a conditional basis. This concept was a basic 
weapon for making more than one hundred nations and peoples 
living in the Soviet Empire live in one barracks. This weapon 
was needed to uproot the nations from their historical roots, in 
order to make the nations feel themselves as a "Soviet people," 
and to chop out all their roots outside the empire. 
  The history of these nations was older than the history of 
the colonizer nation. It was difficult to create a "Soviet 
people" because it was difficult to eliminate a mentality which 
had a strong tradition. Thus the empire in the first phase 
decided to create new nations from these ancient nations. 
  In this manner Turkestan was divided into five nations and 
five "new" national names were given to these republics. 
  The most ancient of the nations, the Turks, lived in 
Turkestan. The Uzbeks, Kazakhs, Turkmens, and Kyrgyz -- these 
are descendants of one ancestor -- are Turks. 
  The unity of the Turkic peoples was always seen as dangerous 
to the neighboring nationalities. 
  In ancient history the Chinese followed a "divide and 
conquer" policy against us. After Turkestan became a Russian 
colony, tsarist Russia, and then Soviet Russia, also followed 
this policy. 
  Today we have become independent, thank God, and the flags 
of 
the Turkestan republics fly at the UN, not as one flag, but as 
five. No one believes in a single political Turkestan, but our 
neighbors still see themselves as living in danger. 
  As for some leaders of the republics of Turkestan, they are 
evidently thinking of eliminating this "danger." They are even 
prepared to repudiate the history of their own nation in order 
to ingratiate themselves to our former "lords." 
  The article "The History of the Origin of the Uzbek People" 
which appeared in the 20 January issue of UZBEKISTON OVOZI was 
written to comfort our former "lords" and, at the same time, in 
the spirit of toadying before them. 
  The authors of this article, written at the order of the 
leadership of Uzbekistan, are saying: "Lords, fear not, the 
peoples of Turkestan will never unite, we are Uzbeks, Kazakhs, 
Turkmens, and not Turks!" 
  In this article they view the opinion of writers and poets 
with sarcasm; in discussing their discussion of history and the 
nation, they stamp their opinions as "non-scientific." 
"Unfortunately," they say, "this situation (calling the Uzbeks 
Turks) manifested itself in the 1920s in Central Asian history, 
in the years of reconstruction...in the years when ideas were 
free." 
  In other words, the logic of "thank God, these years of 
free-thinking are over." 
  It does not matter, this logic pervades the consciences of 
the authors. There are things in the article more important than 
this. 
  Our scholars wrote the following: "The Uzbeks are not Turks, 
they are turkophones, in contradiction to the ideas advanced by 
a few people." 
  Not even our most terrible enemies have put forth a more 
mistaken idea. Even they have been compelled to say that the 
Uzbeks are of Turkic origin. 
  If the Uzbeks were not Turks, the Russians would not have 
begun their campaign against pan-Turkism in Uzbekistan. 
  Let us mention anti-scientists: even the chauvinist 
turkologist Zhirinovskiy who is well known for his nonsense 
knows Uzbek history better than our academicians. 
  In his interview Zhirinovskiy said: "There is no nation 
called Uzbek, there are tribes of Turks in Uzbekistan that have 
stopped fighting with each other, and now everything is in 
order." 
  Certainly, Zhirinovskiy meant to insult we Uzbeks with the 
word "Turkic tribe." But the word "Turk" is not an insult, but 
an honor. This certainly does not testify to the intelligence of 
the chauvinist-turkologist. 
  Does it testify to the intelligence of Uzbek intellectuals? 
  Thank God, it does. 
  Discussion of the identity of the Uzbeks did not begin today 
or yesterday but, perhaps as our academicians wrote, in the 
1920s. 
  But the academicians were afraid to mention the names of the 
intellectuals who discussed this in the 1920s because their 
names are names which are loved in our nation. 
  The fact that the Uzbeks are large branch of the Turkic tree 
was stated by our Jadids [jadidism was a modernization movement 
in Central Asia]. For this reason, Abdulhamid Sulaymon Cholpan, 
Mahmudkhoja Behbudi, Munavvar Kori, Mustafa Chokay, and 
Abdurrauf Fitrat were called "pan-Turkists" by the Russian 
colonialists and were punished accordingly. 
  But the discussion about whether the Uzbeks were Turks or 
not 
was not started by the Jadids, but by the Russian colonialists. 
In fact, for the Jadids the Uzbek identity was never a secret. 
  We have a nationalist intelligentsia that talked about the 
Uzbek identity both in the Soviet period and even today. 
  Turning the identity of the Uzbeks into a mystery was, as we 
stated above, an ideology of colonialists. 
  Academicians A. Askarov and B. Ahmedov, who are prisoners of 
this ideology, began their article in order to prove that the 
Uzbeks are not Turks with the opinion of the Russian scholar S. 
Tolstov: "Many of the Central Asian peoples not go back to 
ancient ethnic groups but have found their reflection in 
indigenous local people and other peoples nomadising through." 
  Fine, respected academicians, but do you mean to say that 
there is any other nation which has not mixed with other stock 
in the world? That today the nations called the English, French, 
and Germans have not mixed their blood with the blood of others? 
And what about the blood of the Turks of Turkey? 
  Find us a "pure-blooded" tribe. 
  You will not find it. 
  Even the Japanese nation which lives on an island was not 
devoid of external ethnic influences. 
  But racists define the nation with blood. 
  In our opinion, a nation is not defined by blood, but by 
other factors: nation means there is a unity of language, a 
unity of culture, a unity of customs and traditions, way of life 
and way of thought. 
  Five centuries ago our ancestor Navoi said it in this way: 
  If there is one tribe, there are a thousand, And the Turk 
tribe is mine. 
  Navoiy does not say, as do our academicians, that it is a 
"Turkic-language people," but that it is a Turkic people. 
  Because Navoiy was a poet, did that make him "sensitive?" 
  If "sensitivity is nonscientific," let us mention the words 
of a less sensitive historical personage: 
  "We, whose land is Turan, Our prince is Turkestan. We, who 
are the most ancient and largest of nations, We are the main 
flank of the Turks." 
  Our ancestor Prince Temur said these words. Our ancestors 
did 
not say we are "Turkic-speakers," they said we are Turks. 
  The academicians consider their readers to be so uneducated 
that when they say "Turk", they only wish them to understand it 
to mean the Turks of Turkey. 
  Finally, it does not mean that the Uzbeks descended from the 
Turks of Turkey; on the contrary, it means the Turks of Turkey 
came from Turkestan. 
  The academicians also make oversimplified statements about 
the Uzbek language: "Uzbek is not a pure Turkic language." 
  We give to following response to them in the words of 
Navoiy: 
  "I have pondered much in Turkic poetry, I have turned a 
fortress into a state." 
  The present Uzbek language constitutes the center of the 
great Turkic language. 
  Why? 
  The Kipchak dialect is at the foundation of the modern 
Kazakh 
and Kyrgyz languages, the Oghuz dialect is at the basis of 
modern Turkey Turkish, Azeri and Turkmen, the basis of modern 
Uighur is the Karluk dialect. 
  At the foundation of the modern Uzbek language are elements 
of the Kipchak, Oghuz and Karluk dialects. For this reason, our 
present-day Uzbek is at the center of the Turkic languages, 
respected by scholars. In other words, it is not as you said, a 
new language "shaped on the foundation of the Turkic languages," 
but the Turkic language itself. 
  One must recognize that after accepting the Cyrillic 
alphabet 
our language was damaged perceptibly and the laws of vowel 
harmony which are special to the Turkic languages were violated, 
but our language did stay secure. One does not have to be an 
academician to understand this, it suffices to read and write. 
  Abdulhamid Cholpan never traveled to Turkey, but he wrote 
dozens of poems in the Turkish of Turkey. Had our academicians 
read these poems, they would have known that the only difference 
between Turkish and Uzbek was in accent and certain 
newly-created neologisms. But they did not wish to read these 
poems, they studied instead the works of colonialist ideologists 
Tolstov and Yakubovskiy. 
  In addition to this, there are a number of strange things in 
the article by Askarov and Ahmedov. The historical sources they 
used, instead of proving that Uzbek is not Turkic, but use many 
documents to prove that it is Turkic. 
  Other than the utterly false statement that "Uzbeks are not 
Turkic, they are turkophonic" at the beginning of the article, 
they do a disservice to a number of authors. But one can shatter 
this false claim with a number of questions: 
  "You say that the Uzbeks are a tribe which came in with 
Sheybani Khan and they mixed with the indigenous population of 
Turkestan. Good, what was the name of the local population? Who 
say "turkophonic" but is there not such a nation in history?" 
  "You use the word "sart." But the sarts were not a nation, 
it 
is a title given to city-dwellers." 
  ""And another aspect: you connect the word "Uzbek" with 
Uzbek 
Khan, a khan of the Golden Horde. But where did the word "Uzbek" 
come from?" 
  "Some people think that "Uzbek" does not derive from a 
phrase 
meaning "masters of themselves," but from "Oghuzbek", or a late 
manifestation of it meaning "bek of the Oghuz." 
  This means that the history of "uzbek" is even older than 
the 
history you mention. 
  It is possible for us to go even deeper into this history: 
the Greek historian Herodotus used both "ancient Uz" and "Ughuz." 
  Finally, what name did the nomadic Uzbeks and the indigenous 
population (Turkestani Sarts) who later took their name use? 
  Soghdian, Massagetian, Saka, Farsi -- which do you prefer? 
  Give us a name so we do not dangle in the heavens! 
  Yes, it is possible that we have in our blood the blood of 
Soghdians, Massagetians, and Sakas. But the primary element in 
our blood is that of the ancient Turks, the blood of the Huns 
and Kok Turks. You know this well. 
  In order to prove their point, our academicians talk about 
the physical characteristics of the Uzbek. In the physical type 
of our people one finds both the Andronov and the Mongoloid 
type. But the nation is not defined by the shape of a man's 
head. The Andronov and Mongoloid types are a racial question. 
The concept of a nation is broader than that of race. 
  We have spoken in a national language called Turkic for two 
thousand years, we have lived with its national customs and 
traditions, we know ourselves to be Uzbek Turks and take pride 
in it. 
  We could bring up our ancestors who considered themselves to 
be Turks -- Alisher Navoiy, Emir Temur, Zahiriddin Boburshah, 
Mahmud Kasghari, and others -- and speak out against the 
ideology of mankurtism, but this is not an honorable business 
because to enter into such a discussion would be like comparing 
the sun to a candle. 
  If you want to conceal the fact that the Uzbeks are Turks, 
then you should demolish the statue of Emir Temur which stands 
in Tashkent because Emir Temur also thought he was a Turk. 
  If you would escape the Turkic family, do not call Ahmed 
Yassavi "our poet" because he thought he was a Turk; you must 
also destroy the works of Alisher Navoiy because Navoiy took 
pride in his turkdom. You have to ban our entire classical 
literature and all our ancient history because this classical 
literature and ancient history clearly talked about its own 
turkishness. 
  Create a new nation with only Tolstov and Yakubovskiy, write 
a "history of this new "nation," and call it "The History of the 
Mankurts," and you yourselves will be the heroes of this "new 
history." 
  Only, do not try to hang curtains on our windows to conceal 
the identity of the Uzbeks because our nation' history cannot be 
covered with a rotting curtain remaining from the Nikolays, or 
not even with an iron curtain. 
  That is how brilliant our history is. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68523 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94059" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> UZBEKISTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Government Seen To Manipulate Election Process </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Government Seen To Manipulate Election Process </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K0935C Moscow ERK in Uzbek 1 Feb 94 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0935C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ERK </F>
<F P=105>  Uzbek </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Akram Sirojiddin: "The `Art' of Elections"] </F>
  [Text] Elections in Uzbekistan found expression in the 
Constitution and numerous laws, and laws on freedom, 
multipartyism, opposition candidates, freedom of thought were 
published in the press. But, in fact, in order to evaluate how 
the election was held, one can divide it into three parts. The 
first was the election during perestroyka, the second was the 
presidential election, and the third, elections free of 
democrats. If we examine this electoral process in three parts, 
we may predict the results of the elections to parliament in 
1994. 
<H5>  `BLACK FORCES' </H5>
  When the democratization of elections in the former Soviet 
Union began, Uzbekistan did not like this road. But, under 
Moscow's influence, it was compelled to pass a law on democratic 
elections. 
  The months of February-April 1990 were designated for 
parliamentary elections in Uzbekistan. The Central Committee of 
the Communist Party viewed this seriously. The communist 
administration ordered that a list of candidates for obkoms be 
submitted well beforehand. By the time the list of candidates 
was scrutinized at the Central Committee, a special pattern had 
taken shape. According to this pattern the percentages of 
workers, kolkhozniks, intellectuals, and nonparty members were 
brought into correspondence. Then the list was turned over to 
the KGB administration and was examined once again. In this 
period the obkoms filled in the places of the changing 
candidates. It was thought necessary that questions such as age, 
sex, origin, and nationality fit into the pattern. After all 
this was arranged, the list was scrutinized at the Central 
Committee bureau. Then, meetings were set up, and candidates on 
the list began to be viewed. 
  Names on the list were broken down into three categories. A 
"red category" candidate means that he will be a candidate under 
any conditions. Electing a "blue category" candidate on an 
opposition basis could certainly be permissible. The possibility 
of a "black category" could be permitted on the basis of his 
age, nationality, or profession. Candidates within the red 
category have been ordered to back up Central Committee members 
and oblast leaders in their electoral districts and, as far as 
possible, do what they are told. The oblast party committees who 
have supported the blue category candidates on the list make 
them responsible to the oblast leadership. Black category 
candidates are responsible to the rayon leaders. 
  Fifty percent of the candidates are red category, 25 percent 
blue, and the rest black. Appearances in the press, propaganda 
and publicity for meetings, the demonstration of respect for the 
candidates are all permitted on the basis of these categories. 
This has mobilized a great deal of power. 
  At the time the minds of the people had begun to open 
because 
of glasnost and a degree of press freedom. In fact, the 
democratic movement in Russia was the trigger for this. Thus, 
although this was considered to be "arbitrariness" by the 
Central Committee, the people began to indicate their own 
candidates. The fact that the voters were not counted at 
pre-election meetings and a few mistakes were permitted on the 
documentation, these candidates were not put on the list. In 
some places where the voters met three or four times, their 
candidates were put on the list. 
  What is interesting is that the majority of the candidates 
designated by the people were communists. Only they were 
slightly more conscientious and closer to the people than the 
candidates selected from higher. 
  Now a second barrier was put in place. "Work" began with the 
"arbitrary" candidates first in the rayon, then the oblast, and 
finally in the Republic Communist Party administration. They 
demanded that their own candidates be taken because they had 
left their jobs, been arrested, or given a promise. A number of 
candidates were easily caught in this trap. 
  Those who had entered into the fight were on the list, 
despite the barriers mentioned above. First the KGB, then the 
Ministry of Internal Affairs studied them. Complaints about them 
were compiled at the workplace, negative articles about them 
began to appear in the press. Additional forces were mobilized 
in the districts where "arbitrary" candidates had declared 
themselves. To this "battalion" was given the role of spreading 
rumors among the people, and fighting with any kind of 
impermissible means. 
  Possible candidates for deputy positions were subjected to 
intense scrutiny again. Eight or nine candidates would come to 
the fore immediately. The goal was to eliminate the 
"arbitraries" from the "game." When election day arrived, close 
to two hundred of a few thousand "arbitrary" candidates 
remained. The question was what to do about them? As usual, 
names were compiled by electoral district and precinct. These 
lists were submitted, and then posted. Thus, commission members 
familiarized themselves with the names of the candidates on the 
list. The commission chairman was the representative of the 
executive branch of the government. In the villages teachers 
were mobilized for the elections. 
  For years the people showed no interest in the elections. As 
a result, 30 percent of the population did not cast a vote. 
Three or four persons in the electoral districts were moved 
"higher" on the ballots. This experience was frequent. Of the 
"arbitrary" candidates, who were under strong scrutiny and not 
permitted to do this, more than thirty won their elections and 
became candidates. 
  If you take a look at the composition of delegates to the 
12th session of the High Assembly, you would see that the 
majority were leading cadres and communists. They were 
essentially elected without competition or opposition; that is, 
they were "reds." There were representatives of all sectors in 
the group of those who never tired of voting to satisfy 
everything, namely, the "blues." The "arbitrary" delegates, 
primarily intellectuals, were added to the list of the "black" 
category. The majority did not know that the phrase "black 
forces" was applied to this group in Uzbekistan. 
<H5>  `ENEMY FORCE' </H5>
  In Uzbekistan the presidential elections are not a natural 
movement. At the first session of the Supreme Council the deputy 
Toiba Tolaganova, considered one of the "black forces," said: 
"Among us, those who want to hold a presidential election are 
advocates of one-man rule and dictatorship. We are still not 
done with being subservient to a leader. If we elect a 
president, he will certainly turn into a Shahinshah." 
  I. Karimov denigrated the deputy and said: "this is not 
Tolaganova's idea, but an idea of the black forces." Karimov, 
himself, had become president by decree from the Supreme 
Council. In the course of a year he took all the power of the 
government into his hands. By the time the Soviet empire had 
crumbled, presidential elections began to be held on a 
democratic basis in the republics which had become independent. 
Criticism in the foreign press and domestic relations worried I. 
Karimov significantly. He prepared a draft law on presidential 
elections. At the 7th session of the Supreme Council the "black 
forces" considered this draft to be anti-democratic, and did not 
allow it into the agenda. The president, "fully recognizing" the 
mistakes, made a few changes in the draft, allowed it to be 
presented again at the 8th session and announced presidential 
elections for 29 December 1991. According to the draft, 
individuals backed by parties, or who had collected 60,000 
signatures could become candidates for election. 
  There were two parties, the Erk Democratic Party, which had 
not yet been removed from the list, and the former Communist 
Party, renamed the People's Democratic Party. The Communist 
Party nominated Islom Karimov, and the Erk Democratic Party 
nominated Muhammed Solih. 
  They also collected 60 thousand signatures or made an effort 
to do so. The Central Electoral Commission did not allow these 
under various pretexts. 
  At first Islom Karimov did not take Muhammed Solih's 
candidacy seriously. Because of the nomination of opposition 
candidates, he silenced world public opinion. He had calculated 
that he could persuade the voters to vote for him. Thus, Islom 
Karimov did not prepare a pre-election plan for himself. But 
every morning officials of the KGB -- now called the National 
Security Committee -- began to bring him disturbing reports: 
"Muhammed Solih has prepared his presidential campaign. He 
intends to announce it," "From secret talks with intellectuals, 
it has become clear that they are moving to his side," "Interest 
in Muhammed Solih in the villages is great," "Youths, especially 
students, have openly gone over to his side," "The number of 
those joining Muhammed Solih's party in rayons and oblasts is 
climbing..." 
  This and similar information made the president cautious. He 
rapidly organized an "election staff." The staff was divided 
into three sections: those working in the open, those working 
from outside, and those controlling the election commissions. 
Those working openly included the faithful representatives of 
the president. Those working from outside included state 
advisors, members of the government, oblast and rayon leaders, 
the KGB and the MVD. 
  Control of the election commissions was turned over to I. 
Jorabekov, first deputy chairman of the Ministers' Court, M. 
Umrzokov, state advisor, Sh. Yoldoshev, chairman of the Supreme 
Council, K. Ahmedov, chairman of the election commission, and 
the oblast governors. T. Alimov, presidential advisor, prepared 
guidance with the Security Committee. As far as the form and 
content of this guidance was concerned: " it spread rumors, 
primarily among the Russian-speaking population, i.e, confusing 
Muhammed Solih's name with that of the Mufti of Central Asia 
Muhammed Sodik Muhammad Yusuf, it maintained that "he intends to 
veil the women and drive representatives of other ethnic groups 
out of Uzbekistan;" in the villages it claimed: "Muhammad Solih 
is russified and sold out the nation to Russia; among students 
and intellectuals it claimed that "Muhammad Solih is a poet and 
has never worked anywhere and does not understand leadership; 
famine and poverty will come to Uzbekistan." 
  Many such orders were handed down. Chief editors of 
newspapers and magazines, and television and radio heads were 
burdened with harassing Muhammad Solih because he was worrying 
President Karimov, and Karimov ordered that Solih's platform not 
be published. KHALK SOZI chief editor, Ahmadjon Mukhtorov, 
published Muhammad Solih's pre-election platform. From that day 
onward Ahmadjon Mukhtorov was persecuted. Finally, he was driven 
out of his job and has fallen on bad times. 
  Preventing voters from gathering at pre-election meetings in 
the oblasts was given special consideration. When Muhammad Solih 
arrived in an oblast, meetings were scheduled for a specific 
hour at four different locations. People would go to those 
gathered at the four different locations and say "the candidate 
did not arrive." Lights would be extinguished at the meeting 
places, repair work would begin, and similar peculiar actions 
would occur. Although television was devoted to Karimov for the 
entire day, Muhammad Solih was given the opportunity to appear 
only once. He was essentially "cut off" from expressing his 
opinions. 
  According to the law, the government had to allocate money 
for propaganda work to trusted representatives. At the time when 
unaccountable funds were dispersed for Karimov, none of the 
funds were allocated to the campaign of Muhammad Solih. 
  Instead of a platform, the president issued a massive appeal 
which began by praising him to the skies. His meetings were 
turned into a major occasion in every oblast. He made promises 
like "I will not raise the price of bread," "I will do 
everything for the state." Despite this, the people knew who was 
who. Karimov knew the nature of the people. Thus, the experience 
of balloting, i.e., the experience of parliamentary elections 
began to operate. 
  Ballots were stolen in some places, and in some places votes 
were counted ten times over. In places where Erk was under 
strong control, such "miracles" were not contrived. Oblast and 
rayon governors unable to falsify the election results were 
removed from their positions. For example, the Khorazm oblast 
and rayon leaders were removed for this. 
  The students were suddenly given a vacation during the 
presidential elections. They had voted a week before the 
election, and had gone house to house. "We locked the ballot 
boxes," they said, but they had been opened. Basically, the 
students had voted for Muhammad Solih. This put Islom Karimov's 
future in great jeopardy. He looked for a way to eliminate this 
force. Some 20 days after the election there was an uproar in 
the student town. The students were fired upon... 
  From this day on, the feeling that he had a major competitor 
in Uzbekistan did not leave him. Thus, he thought that the 
competitor had to be eliminated by any means. He concentrated 
all his strength and energy not on Uzbekistan's national 
development, but on implementing this intention. He knew that 
Muhammad Solih was his most dangerous enemy. 
<H5>  `THE FORCE OF SCANDAL' </H5>
  At the first session of the Supreme Council in 1990 Shovrukh 
Rozimuradov, a deputy from Kashkadaryo, said: "Why did we elect 
a president without an opponent at the Supreme Council? When 
Karimov worked in Kashkadaryo, I knew him well and I do not want 
him to become president." A short time later he was arrested. 
Sh. Rozimurodov, although he was a people's deputy, was 
imprisoned for several months. At the 7th session, after strong 
criticism of this illegality by the "black forces" deputies, Sh. 
Rozimurodov was released from prison. But he no longer performed 
as a deputy. 
  At this session national representative Inomjon Tursunov, 
who 
showed documents and said "Karimov covered up the Ferghona 
tragedy," and "when Karimov was first secretary of the 
Kashkadaryo Communist Party two million rubles were written 
off," was arrested by the militia shortly thereafter. At this 
point, changes were made in the laws on fraud by people's 
deputies; now a people's deputy is forbidden to speak against or 
criticize the government. As for these "changes," they made it 
possible to be free of the "black forces." On the basis of 
letters organized in the name of the "people," it was made known 
that Inomjon Tursunov was invited to step down as a deputy. 
Meetings with voters were not permitted, and he was kept under 
house arrest. On the day of his recall, cheaper prices were 
announced in his electoral districts. Articles were published 
with the intent to establish his malfeasance. His responses to 
intrigues such as this were not published anywhere. 
  Because the people had not voted, Inomjon's trusted 
representatives did not go into his electoral districts. While 
there was some talk about this in the world public opinion and 
in Uzbekistan, it was quickly forgotten. This was the easiest 
way for this government...Soon a campaign began calling for the 
resignation of Shukrullo Mirsaidov, Uzbekistan's former 
vice-president. Polat Abdurahmonov, the governor of Samarkand 
Oblast, and his deputy Alisher Mardiyev were ordered to fire 
Deputy Jahongir Muhammad. On the day that Muhammad was going to 
meet his voters, he was prevented from leaving Tashkent; 
subsequently, he was kept under house arrest in Samarkand. 
Ninety people who had voted for him got together saying "we are 
going to complain to the president" but they were imprisoned for 
several days. 
  On election day the ballots were counted under the 
leadership 
of responsible representatives of the president, and a document 
was prepared showing that 93 percent of the people had voted 
against him. Then it was Murod Jorayev's turn. Since he was a 
member of Erk, in other words, one of the "black forces," he had 
to sing the same song. The rooting out operation continued. The 
Supreme Council committee was ordered to fire Erk Party member 
Otajon Polvonov from his deputyship. This was done in the same 
way as the others. 
  Finally, it was the turn of Erk Party member Samandar 
Kokunov. Voters in his district did not go along with the 
government's "game." Thus, Samandar Kokunov was suddenly 
arrested. Pictures were taken of other people's houses, and it 
was announced that "the deputy has a number of houses." He is 
now being kept in jail without a trial. 
  Erk Party member and secretary of the Bukhara Oblast council 
Nasrullo Saidov was also put under house arrest and forced to 
step down from his deputyship. The documents responsible for his 
resigning the deputyship are so poorly done that everyone who 
has seen them think they are forgeries. 
  The fate of all the deputies who have been forced to or will 
be forced to resign is being resolved in this way. On one hand, 
new parliamentary elections have been announced. The fact that 
deputies who are members of Erk or the "black forces" will not 
participate in the new elections will not stop a frightened 
government from persecuting them. 
  Not only astrologers, but even you can predict the results 
of 
the 1994 elections. And you would not be wrong. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68524 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Russia's Choice' on Budget </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Russia's Choice' on Budget </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0624A Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian No 15, 15 Apr 
94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0624A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article prepared by "Russia's Choice" Duma faction: "The </F>
Apparatus Ruminates Beyond Its Means; Duma Faction `Russia's 
Choice' Has Prepared and Distributed the Following Document"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  On State Wastefulness and Means of Combatting It </H5>
  The financial situation in the Russian Federation continues 
to remain difficult. The federal budget deficit is increasing. 
State debts are not being repaid on time. Vital social programs 
have been frozen or are being only partially funded. Once again, 
the rate of growth of inflation is increasing. Under these 
conditions, as never before, our state needs a program of 
comprehensive economy of funds(...) 
  In 1994 the relative share of expenditures for state 
administration within the federal budget was increased by 1.5 
times as compared with the budget for 1993 (not taking into 
consideration the construction of new and reconstruction of old 
administration buildings). The expenditures for capital repair 
of the government residence and its relocation have not been 
reflected in the budget. Expenditures are growing in the central 
apparatus and in the local areas. The number of central organs 
of administration is increasing. The edicts of the president and 
the government calling for a 20 percent cutback in the apparatus 
of the president and the government are not being fulfilled. The 
apparata of the president and the government duplicate each 
other's efforts and the functions of the ministries. At the same 
time, new subdivisions are being created, which also duplicate 
each other's efforts. 
  The local administrative apparatus has totally gone out of 
control. In many cities, the number of local administrations has 
increased threefold. Re-equipment of administrative buildings is 
going on everywhere. Large purchases of imported computers, 
furniture, telephones and automobiles are being made. In the 
federal budget alone, the expenditures for buying equipment for 
various state and judicial institutions are to be increased by 
12.25 times, for their capital repair--by 30.3 times, and for 
the construction of new buildings--by 19.5 times. Aside from 
this, huge amounts of money are being spent through 
extra-budgetary funds and through utilization of credit 
resources for other than their intended purpose. 
  In 1993, thousands of foreign automobiles costing $20,000 - 
$40,000 each were purchased at the rayon administration level. 
There were many cases of buying "Mercedes Benz" automobiles at a 
cost of up to $130,000. 
  Individual ministries and departments, as well as state 
organizations, use buildings whose area is many times larger 
than that specified in the standards. The excess space is leased 
out, and the funds received are used for maintaining the 
organization. There are frequent cases of leasing at openly 
undervalued prices. 
  As a result, it takes the income tax from 500 workers to 
support only one bureaucrat. 
  We propose: 
  a) to declare a moratorium on the creation of new 
administrative structures; 
  b) to set limits on the number of state bureaucrats and 
limits on their wages at all levels of administration; 
  c) to limit the purchase of new service automobiles; 
  d) to urgently and comprehensively verify the utilization of 
administrative buildings; 
  e) to prohibit the purchase of imported automobiles, 
furniture and equipment if there are cheaper domestic analogs; 
  f) to spend only budget funds for the maintenance of the 
administrative apparatus; 
  g) to eliminate administrative structures which duplicate 
each other's efforts. 
  The struggle against excess expenditures must become one of 
the key directions of activity of the State Duma, along with 
that of the president, the government and the Federation Council. 
<H8>  * * * </H8>
  One of the members of the RF [Russian Federation] 
government, 
having read this note, joked: "One gets the feeling that Gaydar 
wrote it based on his own recollections." The hint is a 
transparent one: When the current leader of "Russia's Choice" 
was a member of the cabinet of ministers, he too drove around in 
a Mercedes, and not on the trolley. 
  OBSHCHAYA GAZETA has no other evidence at its disposal to 
show that the deputy's "announcement" made any impression on 
anyone. The fate of this note is ordinary, i.e., unenviable. Two 
weeks later they could not even remember in the State Duma what 
kind of paper the "Russia's Choice" representatives submitted 
for their attention. Naturally, it does not figure in the 
parliamentary budget discussions, and it even took a great deal 
of effort to find it. By some miracle, the only copy in the 
entire Duma had been saved in the technical section of the Duma 
apparatus. 
  To politely send the authors of the note back to their own 
past ("People who live in glass houses...")--that is a rather 
widespread means of reacting to unpleasant questions. The 
radical democrats who had been in power really had time to show 
that they too were not ascetics. However, the results of their 
personal practice do not eliminate and do not belittle the 
problem itself. One can hide the deputy's note, not let it get 
through, but how can one hide the fact that the state apparatus 
is becoming ever larger and more wasteful? Having endured the 
short-term test of democracy, the Russian bureaucracy has been 
able to preserve its main privilege--freedom from control of 
society. This has allowed the bureaucracy to quickly restore its 
moral forces, its capacity to multiply, and its taste for the 
comfortable life. Since notions of comfort are rapidly changing, 
the needs of the bureaucracy are growing so dynamically that 
soon there may not be enought taxpayers to satisfy them. If the 
authorities believe that this threat is not serious--so much the 
worse for the authorities. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68525 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   19 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Chances for Accord Viewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Chances for Accord Viewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0624B Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA in Russian 19 Apr 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0624B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Svetlana Shipunova: "Accord Is Not a Mushroom, </F>
You Will Not Find It in the Forest"] 
  [Text] A friend of mine often quotes the following saying: 
"It is too late to drink Borzhom water, doctor, when your 
kidneys have fallen off." For some reason, I always think of it 
when I hear the newly fashionable appeal for "civic accord." 
  In itself, the idea is, of course, a good one. It is the 
right idea. It should have been presented earlier--in about 1990 
or at least in 1991, or at the very least somewhere in mid-1993. 
Had this idea been brought to life then, it would have saved 
many human lives and fates. Perhaps it would have saved entire 
peoples and our once great state. But what now? Now the 
memorandum proposed by the president will perhaps only save the 
president himself. First of all, from early re-elections, 
secondly--from the responsibility for two state overthrows, and 
thirdly--from corrections to the new constitution (and primarily 
from the correction regarding those same re-elections). All else 
is more than problematic. And here is why. 
  The agreement is entitled, "On Achieving Civic Accord in 
Russia." Wonderful. No one opposes this. But how do you intend 
to realistically achieve it (and not just on paper)? Judging by 
the title, we are speaking not only about an agreement between 
the political elite, but about accord in society itself. Yet 
what is our society like today? It has been torn to bits, to 
pieces, which have grown farther and farther apart from each 
other. Who or what can force the poor and the rich, the 
criminals and their victims, the all-powerful bureaucracy and 
the citizens without rights to agree amongst themselves? What 
document can reconcile warring ethnic groups, rival mafia clans, 
and polarized social currents? First of all, the present-day 
contradictions in society, the opposition of its various strata 
and groups, the open enmity and hatred, have already gone too 
far. Secondly, they are objectively defined by the condition of 
life itself in Russia--and primarily by the economy. 
  No decree, memorandum or agreement can remove these 
objective 
contradictions or eliminate the very source of disagreement in 
society. And this source, no matter how you look at it, is the 
policy of reform. There will be no accord until reforms begin to 
yield a positive result. That means that in order to achieve 
true accord in society, what we need is not to compose 
memoranda, but to work toward this positive result. However, the 
people do not see such work. Up until the present, we have not 
been able to positively resolve a single acute and painful 
question: Neither the question of prices, nor of inflation, nor 
of non-payments--all those questions which reforms have given 
rise to and which millions of people suffer from. Without the 
resolution of these and many other vitally important questions, 
there is no use in waiting for accord and peacemaking at the 
lower levels. And without this, what is the value of accord 
reached at the top? 
  Let us assume the miners' trade unions sign a "social 
obligation" not to strike, while the miners, if their situation 
does not improve (and it will not improve, since there are as 
yet no prerequisites for this) will go on strike and will demand 
a change of the government and resignation of the president. And 
they would spit on any memoranda. The same is true also of the 
parties, as for example the Agrarian Party. What will its 
signature under an agreement be worth if the deception of the 
peasantry, which in our country has become a state policy, 
continues? 
  The tension in society is growing. Even the students (the 
harbingers of all Russian revolutions) have taken to the 
streets. One sector replaces another in the picket lines around 
the White House, and the news releases are full of announcements 
of the stoppage, one after the other, of the country's former 
industrial giants. Unemployment is at the door of millions of 
Russians. And what have the recent elections to the local organs 
of power demonstrated? They have demonstrated a mass distrust of 
the ruling political forces, the total alienation of the people 
from power (even the authors of the Agreement on Accord were 
forced to acknowledge this fact). And what is the crime 
situation in Moscow today, and throughout all of Russia? Every 
day there is a terrorist act. The level of banditism is almost 
the same as it was during the civil war, and there are probably 
as many firearms in the hands of the population as there were 
during wartime. Yet they tell us about "civic accord," as if we 
have just fallen from the Moon. 
  At first, the authorities did everything to see that society 
became splintered and destratified, that it fell apart into 
irreconcilable component parts. But now they want to bring 
everyone to accord with some document (even it if be three times 
as good and re-worked 100 times). Is this not naive? We get 
something like the introduction of communism by decree. As of 28 
April, civic accord is being proclaimed. But where is the 
material base for it? They have not built it yet. Another little 
anecdote comes to mind here: "Zhora, fry the fish." "But there 
is no fish!" "You just fry, and there will be fish." 
  The prospects of achieving accord at the top--between 
various 
political forces--are almost as unrealistic. This is 
specifically because of their differences, which bear a 
principle character. In fact, the draft agreement asks them to 
sign under a moratorium on waging political struggles, and 
primarily the struggle for power, which is basic to the activity 
of any party, even "Russia's Choice." It is for this, generally, 
that the entire business was cooked up. And from this standpoint 
the president's initiative is nothing other than a change of 
tactics. Up until now, the main political weapon of the 
presidential side has been disagreement (practically with 
everyone), confrontation and violence. However, these tactics 
have not brought success. The people have become angry, but have 
not been frightened and continue to offer resistance. The 
opposition has not scattered, but has become strengthened and 
has even legalized its activity. The president's authority and 
respect for the president (or even fear of him) have not 
increased. Rather, it has been the opposite. His rating in 
Russia and abroad has notably declined. 
  The policy of confrontation has become bankrupted. Now they 
want to try the policy of accord. On paper everything is pretty. 
Yet how does all this correlate with the actual reality? The 
very subject of political differences has not been coordinated 
or regulated: 
  What path should Russia follow? 
  What kind of society should we build? 
  Toward what ideal should we strive? 
  By what means and methods should we move toward our 
goal? 
  Yet they want to agree simply not to touch this subject, to 
avoid it. In other words, the problems over which all the 
discord has taken place in our society will not disappear, but 
it is as if everyone will agree to keep quiet about them. In 
that case, the Agreement on Accord is no more than an effort to 
hide our shame with the palm of our hand. I doubt that the 
parties and movements which have already gained sufficient 
influence will so easily and simply reject their political 
convictions. 
  There is one other side to the matter, which casts doubt 
upon 
the possibility of general agreement. Recent events in the State 
Duma and the Federation Council (amnesty, dismissal of the 
procurator general) have shown that even with the new parliament 
the president has a fleeting, unsteady accord, and that this 
organ--the closest in state hierarchy--certainly has not become 
his unconditional ally. And all because one thing is written in 
the agreement, while something else is done in real life. The 
tradition of violating the constitution and the laws, of 
exerting pressure on the legislative and law enforcement organs, 
is retained. The episode with Kazannik was a regular 
continuation of the episodes with Rutskoy, Stepankov, Zorkin, 
and Barannikov. Is it not strange that the leaders of the main 
law enforcement agencies in the country suddenly, one after 
another, find themselves in contradiction and open conflict with 
the head of state? Is this fact alone not proof that law is 
being scorned in the state, and not by just anyone, but by the 
supreme authorities. In everyday life they say the following 
about such situations: "It cannot be that everyone is bad and he 
alone is good." 
  With the attitude toward law and toward the laws and moral 
standards which still prevails in the Russian upper echelons, 
not to mention the lower levels, we need hardly speak of any 
accord. If only this accord is not with lawlessness, such an 
accord when some transgress the law while all others agree to 
pretend that nothing terrible is happening. 
  If only the agreement were preceded by the honest and noble 
confession: Yes, citizen Russians, there has been a sin. I did 
violate the constitution and the laws, I employed violence, I 
repent and promise never to do so again! Let us start all over, 
like human beings..." 
  Yet nothing of the sort is being said. They are calling upon 
someone--we do not know who--not to behave disgracefully any 
more. The list of potential signers, however, is not specified. 
If these are only the state agencies--the president, the 
government, and parliament--according to the constitution they 
are obligated to do all that is written in the draft, including 
to work for accord in society. 
  Will the opposition sign all this--that is the question. 
Some 
of those in the president's encirclement propose that its 
extreme flanks be excluded from the number of participants. But 
then the entire idea loses its meaning. You can cross them out 
on paper, but it is not in your will to exclude them from the 
political life of Russia. Then about what accord--of whom with 
whom--are we speaking? Of Yeltsin with Gaydar? They will come to 
an agreement without a memorandum. But is it possible for them 
to come to agreement with Zhirinovskiy, Zyuganov, and 
Rutskoy--the real figures on the political scene of Russia? And 
without the mutual accord of specifically the polar, extreme 
forces, once again, what would be the value of such an agreement? 
  Nevertheless, even understanding all this, realizing the 
unreality and utopian nature of another political manifesto, we 
would like to believe and hope. To believe that there will not 
be a civil war, and to hope for civic accord, and mainly--for 
the reason and conscience of the politicians. If, thanks to this 
"Agreement on Accord," they do not shoot down parliament once 
again, even that is good. Although, of course, it is shameful 
that the constitution and the laws are not enough for the 
politicians in our country. They must also give a signed 
statement promising not to throw pitchforks at one another. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68526 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   23 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Duma Takes Up Accord Document </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Duma Takes Up Accord Document </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0624F Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA in Russian 23 Apr 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0624F </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Nadezhda Garifullina: "They Have Hushed Up the </F>
Discussion; State Duma Discusses Agreement on Social Accord"] 
  [Text] On Thursday, at an extraordinary meeting of the 
State Duma, the deputies began discussing the draft of the 
Agreement on Social Accord. But, being true to himself and to 
his unpredictability, the president proposed "Variant 2" for 
discussion, which none of the deputies, obviously, had ever 
seen. It was passed out just before the meeting. 
  Informing her colleagues about the process of preparing the 
Agreement on Achieving Civil Accord in Russia, State Duma Deputy 
Chairman Alevtina Fedulova said that this is not a legal and not 
an ideological document, but a political one, which "must 
reflect the consolidating viewpoints of different 
socio-political forces and representatives of different branches 
of power on a definite circle of vital questions." She also 
announced that the agreement, as compared with its first 
variant, more clearly "defines the rules of behavior of the 
parties." However, even a passing acquaintance with the document 
shows that this is far from being so, and that "Variant 2," like 
the first one, is reminiscent of a one-way street. 
  "The parties promise to take all necessary measures for 
ensuring calm in the country," states the first section. 
Wonderful! Who would dare not to agree and to object against 
"calm in the country"? These "measures" are presented further: 
"The organizers of meetings, demonstrations and strikes assume 
not only legal, but also moral-political responsibility for the 
peaceful character of these actions and their implementation in 
strict accordance with the effective legislation." But what 
"obligations" do the president, the government and the power 
ministers assume? Or do they, as before, reserve the right to 
surround a peaceful demonstration staged on a state holiday with 
reinforced militia detachments--mounted and infantry militia 
troops, dogs, OMON [special purpose militia detachment], 
internal troops; to close off the streets with trucks which have 
been prepared ahead of time, and then to use water cannons, tear 
gas, and billy clubs against the demonstrators, as was the case 
in last year's May 1 demonstration on Leninskiy Prospect? Or to 
open fire on them from all types of weapons, including cannons 
and tanks, as in the days of the October tragedy? The document 
does not say a single word about the responsibility of the 
authorities. 
  Or else, it contains postulates which cannot help but make 
one blush: "The parties proceed from the fact that the entire 
political process must be implemented within the framework of 
the constitution;" "The parties believe that the highest 
officials must maintain an ongoing dialogue with society and 
public associations, explain the meaning of the implemented 
reforms and specific decisions"... But why not write that the 
"parties" must, for example, wash their hands before eating? 
  Yes, of course, as compared with "Variant 1," some 
"progress" 
is obvious. The threats of removing "those who do not agree" 
from the deputy mandate have disappeared, and certain 
"well-known public leaders and leaders of culture" are now 
excluded from the list of signatories since, as the deputy from 
the CPRF [Communist Party of the Russian Federation], Yuriy 
Ivanov, noted, for the opposition the appearance of some 
representative of the mercenary capital beau monde is entirely 
inadmissable in this conciliatory commission. But, despite 
certain "cosmetic" corrections, the document submitted for 
discussion did not bring accord to the deputy corps. Most of the 
factions believe that they cannot sign such an agreement. 
  Naturally, there were also speeches in support of the 
document which was being imposed on society--by representatives 
from the PRES [Party for Russian Unity and Accord], "Women of 
Russia" and "Russia's Choice." 
  Civil accord in present-day Russia is impossible. That is 
the 
conclusion drawn by the governing board of the Russian 
All-People's Union in its announcement on provision of civil 
peace in Russia. This document was distributed by Deputy Sergey 
Baburin in the lobby. It has dotted all the i's: "There can be 
no accord between those who have gotten rich by plundering their 
Homeland and those who, after many decades of honest labor, have 
become poverty stricken; between those who have destroyed a 
great world power, its economy, army, and spiritual strength, 
who for the first time in decades have brought the Russian 
people to the brink of extinction, and those who opposed these 
processes with all their might. There can be no accord between 
those who in the Fall of 1993 performed a state overthrow, 
trampling the law and human lives for the sake of their own 
egotistical interests, and those who have remained true to the 
ideals of Law, Justice and Honor, and who stood up in defense of 
the defamed Constitution..." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68527 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Duma Views Corruption Charges </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Duma Views Corruption Charges </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0624E Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA in Russian 21 Apr 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0624E </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Sergey Turchenko: "Revenge of the Embezzlers; </F>
The `Filippov Case' at the Parliamentary Hearings"] 
  [Text] On 19 April, the State Duma Committee on Security 
under the chairmanship of Viktor Ilyukhin held parliamentary 
hearings, "On Cases of Gross Violation of the Tax and Labor 
Legislation Allowed by Officials of St. Petersburg and Russia." 
The investigation was triggered by the appeal of the former 
chief of the state tax service in St. Petersburg, Dmitriy 
Filippov, to the chairman of the State Duma. 
  The Committee on Security performed a preliminary 
investigation of the questions raised in the appeal, and 
presented for review a packet of documents testifying to the 
fact that a number of state officials are inflicting tremendous 
loss upon the economic security of Russia, and counteracting the 
receipt of considerable ruble and currency revenues by the 
federal and state budgets. The St. Petersburg State Tax Service, 
which was headed by Dmitriy Filippov up until 9 October 1993, 
uncovered these facts. This seriously affected the interests of 
commercial structures, joint enterprises and the state property 
fund, which had been concealing huge profits from taxation, 
directing them not their intended purpose but in the interests 
of enriching private individuals and foreign states. Under their 
pressure, Filippov was dismissed from his duties on 9 October 
1993. 
  As evident from the report prepared for the hearings by the 
Committee on Security, Filippov's dismissal was facilitated by 
Mayor A. Sobchak, RF Goskomimushchestvo [Russian Federation 
Committee on State Property] Chairman A. Chubays, former Acting 
Prime Minister Ye. Gaydar, former RF Minister of Finance B. 
Fedorov, and the chief of the Russian State Tax Service, V. 
Gusev. 
  Members of the Committee on Security, Viktor Mironov, 
Aleksey 
Sarychev, Vladimir Baryshev (all representatives of "Russia's 
Choice") immediately made efforts to undermine the parliamentary 
hearings, citing various excuses. Their desire to narrow the 
problem to an elementary labor conflict whose review, they said, 
was not within the competency of the Committee on Security, did 
not find support among the overwhelming majority of the deputies. 
  Both sides of the so-called "labor conflict" were presented 
at the parliamentary hearings. Unfortunately, the 
representatives of the St. Petersburg procurator's office which, 
according to the facts uncovered by Filippov, had instituted the 
criminal case, were unable to be present at these hearings. 
  "It all began," Dmitriy Filippov told the deputies, "as soon 
as our service undertook a serious investigation of the joint 
enterprises. Our hair stood up on end! As it turns out, many of 
them are created primarily through Russian currency credits, 
using our cheap work force. But the products are shipped abroad, 
leaving the currency profits in foreign banks and not even 
paying tax to Russia. This is double and triple robbery of the 
state. The Russian-Swiss enterprise `Europa-Hotel' `bilked' our 
budget out of $24 million. The Russian-Finnish enterprise 
`Lenraumamebel' shipped 90 percent of its finished product for 
sale in Finland, where the money earned was used in the 
interests of the Finnish economy. And there are many such 
examples in the documents which were submitted. Our service was 
able to return part of the dollars. But then the pressure 
started from the mayorality and the government. They said we 
were hindering the investment of foreign capital. But tell us, 
please, where are the investments?!" 
  "There was even greater pressure exerted by the power 
structures when we undertook an investigation of the property 
fund. It became apparent that a large part of the money obtained 
from privatization does not go to the budget, but is used in the 
circulation of commercial banks for preferential 2-percent 
credit. In other words, here too there is a gigantic rip-off of 
the state and stuffing of the pockets of businessmen, who are 
protected by state bureaucrats. As soon as they sensed a threat 
to themselves, they dismissed me from my duties on 9 October of 
last year. In the words of the deputy chief of the State Tax 
Service, the reason for my dismissal was a letter from Sobchak 
and pressure from Gaydar. In his conversation with me, Sobchak 
did not hide the fact that he had sent such a letter because, he 
said, there had been great pressure exerted on him from the 
government of Russia, and Chubays played the most active role in 
this." 
  "The capital's Sverdlovsk Rayon Court reinstated me to my 
position. But then a directive from Chernomyrdin appeared, 
regarding the elevation of its status to the level of deputy 
chief of the RF State Tax Service. Appointed to this position 
was a specialist in... agriculture. I was once again dismissed 
due to staff cut-backs, even though there were no cut-backs. I 
again filed a claim with the Sverdlovsk Rayon Court, where a 
hearing will be held on this case on 26 April." 
  The chairman gave the floor to the chief of the RF State Tax 
Service, V. Gusev. He spoke at length about the general problems 
of the department, but did not have the courage to approach the 
question of the "Petersburg conflict." Only the specific 
questions of the deputies forced him to do so. 
  "On what grounds did you dismiss Filippov in October of 
1993?" 
  "The court reviewed this question and rescinded my order. I 
have nothing to add to the court's decision." 
  "Was there pressure exerted upon you?" 
  "I do not recall such a thing..." 
  "What was the reason for Filippov's second dismissal?" 
  "On 26 April there will be a trial on this matter. It will 
clarify everything." 
  "But can you explain the motive for your second order?" 
  "The trial will be held on 26 April, and this will be 
clarified at that time." 
  That is the level of explanations given by the official... 
  The members of the committee, who carefully studied tens of 
documents on the question under review, were for the most part 
synonymous in their opinion. Stanislav Govorukhin spoke bitterly 
of the fact that the Petersburg "Russia's Choice" reflected, 
like the world in a drop of water, the entire grave criminal 
situation in which Russia finds itself. Under the guise of 
investments and all kinds of privatizations, it is being 
plundered on an unprecedented scale. And, if there are not 
enough people in the Duma willing to oppose this, then the 
imminent collapse of the state is inevitable. 
  No less bitterness resounded in the words of Yuriy Vlasov as 
he spoke about that most outrageous situation which has arisen 
in the state mechanism of Russia: He who steals or helps to 
plunder the country gets respect and a position, while he who 
courageously stands up in defense of state interests is cast 
aside by the system. If the Duma is unable to defend Filippov, 
he stressed, then there can be no discussion of its capacity to 
stop the plunder of the country. 
  The previously mentioned representatives of "Russia's 
Choice" 
once again tried to obstruct the parliamentary hearings. They 
called for the committee not to make any decision, to wait for 
the trail, or at least to create a parliamentary commission. 
However, the decree was adopted by an overwhelming majority of 
votes. It contains a proposal to the head of the RF government 
for immediate reinstatement of Dmitriy Filippov to his duties. 
It recommends that, in the first half of 1994, the Russian State 
Tax Service conduct an investigation into the activities of 
Goskomimushchestvo. A packet of documents on cases of gross 
violation of the tax and labor legislation will be forwarded to 
the procurator general for resolution of the question of 
bringing the guilty parties to responsibility. It was decided 
that the problems raised at the parliamentary hearing should be 
brought to the plenary meeting of the State Duma. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68528 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Communist Deputy on Accord, Divisions in Party </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Communist Deputy on Accord, Divisions in Party </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0611C Moscow PRAVDA in Russian 21 Apr 94 pp 1, 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0611C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow PRAVDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Viktor Ilyich Zorkaltsev, deputy chairman of </F>
Central Executive Committee of Communist Party of Russian 
Federation and State Duma deputy, by Valentina Nikiforova; date 
and place not given: "Political Instructor Klochkov Would Spare 
the People"] 
  [Text] We could see the lights of Moscow through the window 
of the office on the 15th floor of the building occupied by the 
Duma. It was a breath-taking sight and...a disturbing one: 
Foreign words blazed audaciously in neon lights on Novyy Arbat. 
Viktor Ilyich sighed with regret: 
  "It is like a foreign city...." 
  It had been a hard day: The Duma had been discussing the 
draft budget, and during the breaks he had spoken with 
representatives of different religions, given statements to 
reporters, and worked on his speech for the upcoming party 
conference. He did not refuse the interview, however, because 
Viktor Ilyich had once seen a thick pile of letters from readers 
on the editor's desk and made this request after reading some of 
them: 
  "Give them to me, and I will answer them personally and 
through PRAVDA." 
  This man, a structural engineer by profession and a party 
worker by vocation, a people's deputy of the Supreme Soviet and 
a deputy of the State Duma by civic duty--what did he see in 
these letters? 
  "I wanted to communicate with the authors, to explain some 
things, and to argue about others. In the past there was not 
enough time to read letters, and this was not even part of our 
routine--we only responded to official requests from superior 
party and soviet organs regarding 'complaints filed by 
workers,'" he said with an ironic grin. 
  [Nikiforova] Viktor Ilyich, what was it about the letters 
that interested you? 
  [Zorkaltsev] In the letters and in conversations with 
people, 
I keep hearing the same question: "When you communists are back 
in charge of the government, will you put everything back the 
way it was?" I want to say frankly and sincerely that the 
communists will not be back in charge of the government. This is 
not our goal. The objective of the Communist Party is to put the 
workers in charge--the segment of the laboring public that 
shares the ideals of socialist construction. Furthermore, if we 
do establish government by the people (and not government by the 
party!), we will not put anything back the way it was. We will 
move ahead. 
  [Nikiforova] Then the readers--or, more precisely, some 
readers--want to know if it is true that the RF Communist Party 
is in favor of reform. 
  [Zorkaltsev] Yes, it is. The need for reform is 
self-evident. 
Here is what Mikhail Ivanovich Kozhin from Krasnodar Kray says 
in his letter: "Although I still support socialism and have 
retained my communist convictions, I will refrain from rejoining 
the RF Communist Party because I did not agree with the 
socialism we had even in the 1950s." That is the opinion of a 
man who does not deny the need for reform, but we cannot see any 
kind of reform in our country today! What we see is an 
artificial situation in which people are being forced to cross a 
river and are being promised that life is better over there. But 
the river is turbulent, the water is cold, the elderly are 
drowning, the children are sick, and the women are crying. 
Meanwhile, others are urging them on, forcing them to swim 
faster, to their death. 
  If we are going to cross a river, we have to begin by 
finding 
out how deep it is and how swift the current is, collecting life 
preservers, and then calmly starting the journey, all of us at 
the same time. Have you heard what kind of budget we are 
approving? It is the most anti-reform document possible! We have 
heard that the reformers want to build capitalism (an absurd 
idea in itself, because Russia was not destined to master it at 
once), but why then does the budget allocate only 17.5 billion 
rubles for the promotion of business and commercial enterprise, 
249 billion for the development of family farms, and 3.78 
trillion for the administrative bureaucracy? 
  [Nikiforova] It is probably no coincidence that the idea of 
the agreement on civic accord came up, and with such a close 
deadline--28 April. Anatoliy Ivanovich Shorokhov from 
Krasnoyarsk Kray is extremely critical of this idea: "Before the 
elections they tried to frighten us with the threat of civil war 
if we did not approve the draft constitution. Now there is 
suddenly a need for this agreement as well. Is the Constitution 
no longer enough? Could this be another trick: to prevent the 
opposition from voicing any objections and then calmly declare a 
state of emergency?" What would you tell him? 
  [Zorkaltsev] The accord is actually necessary for the 
avoidance of a state of emergency. It is true that this could be 
achieved by constitutional means, but the government and the 
president have to take some substantive steps now. 
  [Nikiforova] What kind of steps? 
  [Zorkaltsev] First they have to pay people their back wages. 
What kind of accord can we have when people are not getting 
enough money to cover their living expenses for four or five 
months at a time? The second thing is to make cost-of-living 
adjustments in pensions. The third is to return everything they 
seized in January 1992. Then they can perfect the tax system and 
leave it in place for the next 5 or 10 years. 
  After all of this has been done, we can begin to consider 
signing the document. And there will be no deadline of 28 April! 
  [Nikiforova] Is that your personal opinion? 
  [Zorkaltsev] Yes. I expressed it at a faction meeting, but 
the final decision on signing should be made by the 
administrative bodies of political forces. We can only sign the 
agreement after the decision has been made by the all-Russian 
conference. 
  [Nikiforova] On your own terms? 
  [Zorkaltsev] If a two-year moratorium on political stability 
is declared, the Mausoleum of Vladimir Ilyich Lenin will have to 
be reopened, and the memorials by the Kremlin wall and Vladimir 
Ilyich's office and home must be inviolate. The expenses of the 
Lenin Museum must be included in the budget and financed 
completely. The blacklist of deputies who defended the 
Constitution in the Palace of Soviets must be voided. 
  The economic conditions are set forth in the Premises of the 
Communist Party Program, "From Crisis to Stable Development, 
Sovereignty of the People, and Socialism." 
  [Nikiforova] The general response to the document was 
favorable. Here is what I. Gobozov from Moscow writes: "The 
'Premises' advocate national accord, which offers indisputable 
confirmation of the fact that the communists, contrary to the 
common views of their opponents, are not calling for class 
warfare. We must not forget, however, that 'people in palaces do 
not have the same views as people in huts.'" 
  [Zorkaltsev] And that the "hut-dwellers" will want to cross 
swords with the "palace-dwellers" at some point. That is why a 
political party hoping to lead the "hut-dwellers" must not 
forget Feuerbach's warning.... 
  Incidentally, the "Premises" were drafted by party workers, 
and not by elitist academicians from the party. I know that the 
document is being criticized by the Right and the Left, and this 
is a good thing: It means that we will be able to chart the 
right course. One thing that is disturbing, however, is that 
both sides are quoting V.I. Lenin! They criticized us for 
agreeing to the elections, for example, saying that this was not 
a Leninist move. Lenin, they say, would have been against this, 
but they have not even read Lenin's works! 
  Obviously, our party can be criticized for some things. My 
comrades in the leadership and I can see its flaws, but people 
are still joining it. I recently attended the Khoroshevskiy 
Rayon Conference in Moscow, where three people were issued 
membership cards. One was 46 years old, joining in the prime of 
his life, but the other two were quite young. This means they 
put their trust in the Communist Party! 
  [Nikiforova] While we are on the subject, here is something 
we were told by Arseniy Chanyshev, an instructor at Moscow State 
University. Twenty years ago he was not allowed to go into 
science because of some poems he had written against the 
communists (saying he would rather go to hell than live among 
them), but now he sees so many people who have "gone to hell." 
He writes with concern about the "lost generation of 
perestroyka." He is looking to the communists for solutions and 
salvation: "Only the communists have an accurate view of 
Russia's present tragic situation and can analyze it from the 
standpoint of science and class (and ours is now a 
class-antagonistic society), and only they can save Russia." But 
the Communist Party still has to analyze its own policies more 
thoroughly. Many communists feel that the tragic changes in the 
party were the result of the betrayal of the upper echelon and 
the leaders. Do you agree? 
  [Zorkaltsev] This is an obvious mistake, and when people say 
that we will revive the CPSU and that this will guarantee the 
restoration of the Soviet Union, this is an even bigger mistake. 
The CPSU caused the Soviet Union to collapse and then destroyed 
itself. The CPSU was unable to offer the society a new model of 
development. Strong productive forces came into conflict with 
production relations, and the party, which had already grown fat 
and lazy on materialistic gratification, did not notice this. It 
had lost its fighting strength and could not lead the society. 
  The CPSU got soft when there were no other parties competing 
with it, but now there are only 600,000 of us and we won the 
election. In 1989 there were 9 million communists in Russia and 
we lost. We now hold 10 percent of the seats in the Duma, and we 
can have the final say on some matters. We plan to implement the 
economic part of our program there. In the Supreme Soviet, 85 
percent of the deputies were communists, and what was the 
result? When they say that Yeltsin suspended the activities of 
the CPSU and banned the party, this is a lie. Deputies voted for 
the suspension at the USSR Congress of People's Deputies, 
attended by all of the former obkom first secretaries and 
members of the Central Committee. Dissident Roy Medvedev walked 
up to the microphone and was the only one to object. Why did the 
170 obkom first secretaries and Central Committee members remain 
silent? Why did the Central Committee itself remain silent? 
Yeltsin did not sign his edicts until after all of this. They 
were based on the decision of the USSR Congress of People's 
Deputies! 
  Here is another fact. When the Belovizh bargain was being 
concluded, the communists did not defend the results of the 17 
March 1991 referendum. In the auditorium where the treaty was 
ratified, a few of us felt as if we were sitting in a well. 
Communists all around us stood and applauded. There was still 
time to correct everything then. Just imagine this: Political 
instructor Klochkov rises to lead the people in battle, and at 
that time he is "suspended"! He is no longer a political 
instructor.... 
  [Nikiforova] The letters contain extremely vehement 
criticism 
of the bureaucratic party. Do you agree? 
  [Zorkaltsev] It hurts me when people say that about the 
CPSU. 
The party promoted and always will promote career personnel. It 
could not exist without them, and the present fight with the 
party bureaucracy is a carefully orchestrated performance. Few 
of the readers were in the party with us. At one time the most 
mature and politically knowledgeable promoters of the communist 
ideal had to leave the party. The new people, although there 
were many intelligent and outstanding organizers among them, 
were confronted by an experienced and insidious political 
opponent--and were defeated. 
  I have spent my whole adult life working for the party. I 
never knew (or was it just luck?) any hoarders, money-grubbers, 
or hypocrites. They were all people who were devoted to the 
ideal and the cause and they did the work in response to their 
conscience, and not for money. 
  [Nikiforova] Yes, but will you agree that the party has 
aged? 
  [Zorkaltsev] I often hear that only old people come to party 
meetings, and I reply that these are the most steadfast 
supporters of the communist ideal. As long as they are still 
here, there is a chance to prepare replacements for them. In 
Khoroshevskiy Rayon I was fascinated by Doctor of Philosophical 
Sciences Mikhail Pavlovich Shendrik. He is an elderly man with a 
great mind and a colossal memory. He is the true ideologist of 
that party organization. 
  [Nikiforova] Incidentally, I saw that organization's 
campaign 
leaflets. They were explicit, clear, and precise. Everyone 
should have a chance to read them.... 
  [Zorkaltsev] This is a vivid example of a job done by 
professionals. This means that the party is safe and is coming 
around the perilous bend. Each day it has to defend itself. 
First it is criticized by PRAVDA, then by LEVAYA GAZETA, and 
then even by the people attending a party conference. I once 
gave a speech in the Taman Division Officers Club. I was asked 
why I had never come before. Without thinking, I replied that 
they had their own deputy. When the meeting was over, a 
communist who had been in the party for 40 years came up to me 
and reprimanded me: 
  "Why did you say that you are not our deputy? We voted for 
the Communist Party ticket and I campaigned for you." 
  [Nikiforova] Do you have any complaints about PRAVDA? 
  [Zorkaltsev] I like PRAVDA, but there is something I have to 
say. I was offended to read two articles in a row that were 
essentially an indictment of the Russian Orthodox Church. One 
was written by Rutskoy's assistant, and the other was written by 
Rutskoy himself. The Orthodox Church and its hierarchy were 
blamed directly or indirectly in one of them for the events of 
3-4 October. I think this was a result of political 
nearsightedness rather than malice. 
  I am an atheist, but there are certain times in politics 
when 
everything that is genuinely Russian has to be protected. Our 
ancient traditional religions need support. In the years of 
Soviet power many church leaders were awarded the highest honors 
of their Motherland. Everyone knows how helpful the church was 
during the Great Patriotic War and the postwar years. 
  As far as the tragic events are concerned, it seems to me 
that Khasbulatov did not have enough staying power, and that a 
cursory reading of Ilyin and Berdyayev could not make Rutskoy a 
profound man.... 
  [Nikiforova] Viktor Ilyich, many communists are disturbed by 
the prospect of unification in the SCP-CPSU. The Moscow 
organization was actually split by different views on this 
matter. Some of the letters accuse the RF Communist Party 
leadership of not joining the SCP-CPSU because they have 
degenerated and are drifting toward social democracy. 
  [Zorkaltsev] I do not agree with the line of the SCP-CPSU 
leadership. Think back on what they have accomplished in a year 
and a half of existence. They held a congress of peoples of the 
USSR, but they turned the grand and difficult task of uniting 
the country into a slogan. What contributed to the quick 
establishment of the Soviet Union in 1922? Russia was like a 
beacon to the outlying regions. They were attracted by the 
revolution that had triumphed and was defending itself, by the 
grand-scale construction, by the progressive ideology, and by 
the strong intelligentsia. The backward outlying regions were 
drawn to Russia. Recently, however, when Russia relinquished all 
of those same regions and was in a state of poverty, they all 
turned away from it and the parade of sovereignties began. Can 
they live alone for long? Time will tell, and it has already 
told us in some cases.... But we cannot establish a new union 
until Russia recovers its appeal. We have to build a powerful 
Russia and build a strong Communist Party. Then it will be 
joined by other communist parties in our Fatherland, and we will 
all work together to build a single state. This is why the work 
against the RF Communist Party, which split the party, is work 
against the communist movement and the whole leftist movement. I 
cannot bear this. That is why I feel that we should join the 
SCP-CPSU soon. Then it will be easier to reach an agreement with 
other parties. In the first place, communists are collectivists 
and internationalists. In the second place, now that there are 
several communist parties, they should unite, because this is 
not the time for dissension. 
  The slow integration of the Fatherland is beginning. 
Regrettably, it was not initiated by leftist forces. Oddly 
enough, it is being promoted by the power structure. Everyone 
criticizes V. Chernomyrdin, but his integration on the basis of 
property exchanges has proved to be a sound process. Then there 
is the creation of the ruble zone, which also, to our regret, 
was initiated not by us, but by the premier. 
  You remember how the leaders of the six republics met in 
Tashkent and had already reached an agreement on the ruble zone 
when Christopher suddenly arrived, made his tour, and 
annihilated the plan in its infancy. It was a good thing that 
Belarus held out. If the communist parties had acted decisively 
and boldly, the republics might have held out. 
  Yes, it is true that the Communist Party does not agree with 
this government's reforms, and we do criticize it, but we do 
support this particular government move. We do not like Yeltsin, 
but we support his position on the creation of the ruble zone. 
Our voters and the supporters and allies of the RF Communist 
Party should know this. 
  [Nikiforova] Incidentally, how would political instructor 
Klochkov respond today to these comments by R. Kosourov, 
secretary of an RCWP [Russian Communist Workers' Party] rayon 
organization from Ryazan Oblast? 
  "The team in charge today and the whole bourgeois upper 
echelon will not give up their power to the workers without a 
fight. That is why the working class, as capitalism's 
grave-digger, and the peasantry, its loyal ally in the struggle 
for class interests, need a party armed with Marxist-Leninist 
theory and capable of leading them to victory, and not accord or 
a government of national accord. The slogan 'Proletarians of all 
nations, unite!' is not obsolete." 
  [Zorkaltsev] The working class.... It might be more accurate 
to say the labor collective. Today it is impossible to 
distinguish the worker from the engineer or the foreman. There 
is no question that the slogan "Proletarians of all nations, 
unite!" is right, but can we realize it today? Did the workers 
on the Ford assembly line, for instance, support the workers of 
the Lenin Vehicle Plant? I have not heard, but I know that this 
would not be convenient for the Ford workers. After all, they 
now earn a fairly high wage, and partly because of the low wages 
workers earn in other countries. The attempt to move too far 
ahead in ideology and the party's objectives led to the events 
of 3-4 October. I think political instructor Klochkov would 
spare the people for now. He would advise study and training. We 
must remember that the Great October Socialist Revolution 
triumphed because it was not a plot by a small group of people 
or a coup by members of the upper echelon, but a great popular 
movement. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68529 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   13 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Russians Polled on Accord </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Russians Polled on Accord </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0632C Moscow MOSKOVSKIY KOMSOMOLETS in Russian 13 Apr 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0632C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MOSKOVSKIY KOMSOMOLETS </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by VTsIOM sociologist Oleg Savelyev: "Russians on </F>
Civic Peace and Accord"] 
  [Text] At the end of March 1994 the All-Russia Center for 
Public Opinion Studies [VTsIOM] polled 1,600 Russian citizens; 
the sample selected was representative of the adult urban 
population of the Federation. Below is the distribution of 
answers to some questions of this poll on the subject of 
attitudes toward the problems of achieving civic peace and 
accord; given in percentages. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|"Many politicians are currently talking about the need for civic peace and a-| 
|ccord in our country. Would you or would you not support efforts aimed at ac-| 
|hieving such an accord, or do you think it is not achievable?"               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Would support                         |69                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Would not support                     |3                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Do not think it is achievable         |15                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No opinion                            |13                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|"In your opinion, what is the fastest way to achieve civic peace and accord  | 
|in the country?"                                                             | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|By dramatically improving the economi-|42                                    | 
|c situation in the country            |                                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|By all parties and movements rejectin-|20                                    | 
|g violence and armed struggle         |                                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|By all citizens and organizations obs-|14                                    | 
|erving the Russian Constitution adopt-|                                      | 
|ed in December 1993                   |                                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|By forming a government of national c-|10                                    | 
|onfidence                             |                                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No opinion                            |14                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68530 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Former Deputies Blacklisted </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Former Deputies Blacklisted </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0611A Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian No 15, 15-21 
Apr 94 p 8 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0611A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Nikolay Troitskiy: "The `Blacklists' as the </F>
Highest Form of Social Protection"] 
  [Text] After October 1993 there were "disfranchised" 
people in Russia once again, just as there were after October 
1917. In the 1920s this is what they called the members of the 
"exploitative classes" who had been deprived of the right to 
vote. At that time they numbered hundreds of thousands. Today 
the scales are not the same: The "sequential constitutional 
reform" has limited the rights of only around 150 people. 
  These people of different genders and ages are united by a 
common "social status": All of them were people's deputies of 
the Russian Federation of the 1990-1995 convocation. Their labor 
books now bear the following inscription: "Dismissed from work 
on a permanent basis in accordance with RF Presidential Edict No 
1400 without eligibility for the social guarantees specified in 
RF Presidential Edict No 1435." 
  This inscription, which was composed by experienced 
personnel 
from Old Square (members of the presidential administration, not 
the CPSU Central Committee), was required after several hundred 
people lost their jobs as a result of the forcible elimination 
of their place of employment--the Russian Federation Supreme 
Soviet. That was when our solicitous president issued Edict No 
1435--"for the purpose of providing people's deputies with state 
guarantees of social protection." The highest social guarantees 
were offered to the deputies: They could not be arrested without 
the president's consent; they would receive financial benefits 
in the amount of their annual salary (i.e., 3 million rubles all 
at once); they would have job placement and pension privileges; 
they could keep the living quarters they were assigned in 
connection with their office and could even privatize them; they 
could vacation in "official" resorts until 30 June 1995; and so 
on and so forth. 
  Aleksandr Pochinok, then the chairman of the RF Supreme 
Soviet's planning and budget commission, quickly calculated that 
the edict would cost the state budget 25 billion rubles (not 
counting adjustments for subsequent inflation and cost-of-living 
raises). Incidentally, the amount depended as much on the 
deputies as on the president. The fact is that Yeltsin was 
planning to offer this security not to all of the people's 
representatives, but only to those who acknowledged his Edict No 
1400. In other words, the chief of state decided to reward--at 
the treasury's expense--his supporters and possible turncoats. 
  The applicants were many in number, and a commission, headed 
by former Procurator and Deputy Aleksey Surkov, was set up as 
part of the presidential administration. This commission was 
authorized to "separate the sheep from the goats" and dispense 
the "social guarantees." It went to work with such zeal that 
even completely loyal democrats had difficulty passing its 
screening process. It stayed in session for a whole five months, 
verifying the allegiance of former comrades in the corps of 
deputies and making detailed reports to the Kremlin personnel 
division: recommending the specific entry for the labor book of 
each, either allowing or disallowing the social guarantees. 
  But this was long ago. Much has happened since then: The 
parliamentary elections were held, the country acquired a new 
Basic Law, a political amnesty was declared, and the president 
asked everyone to join the crusade for national reconciliation. 
It appeared that Surkov's commission was obsolete and that its 
reports could be deposited in the trash can of history. 
  But no, the commission survived all of the discord and still 
has not been dissolved. On 9 March the presidential 
administration issued Directive No 415 under Sergey Filatov's 
signature, summing up the results of the activities of the 
government screeners. A list of 151 people who were not eligible 
for the "guarantees" was attached to the directive. The contents 
of this document were to be brought to the attention of local 
representatives of the president and agencies of the executive 
branch of government. 
  The names on Filatov's list include those of 15 deputies of 
the present State Duma, including one speaker, one faction 
leader, one head of a Duma committee, and four members of the 
Federation Council. For these lucky few, all of the 
"deprivations" are in the past. It is true that they did not 
receive their severance benefits, but they did avoid the "career 
restrictions" and can even collect a regular pension. Things are 
more difficult for those who were unable to renew their deputy 
mandates or at least find a place on the parliamentary staff. 
Several former deputies (they asked the OBSHCHAYA GAZETA 
correspondent not to mention them by name) took the risk of 
going back home, filling out a new application for a residence 
permit, and trying to find a job. They learned right away that 
the orders of the top Russian leadership have a more direct 
effect than the constitutional declarations of human rights. 
Local officials who looked through their labor books and checked 
their own papers suddenly became impervious and refused to help 
the ex-deputies find jobs. Now the miserable wretches have to 
come to the capital periodically to seek forgiveness. 
  Filatov recently implied that the president might be 
charitable and that the notorious directive might be rescinded 
in connection with the impending civic accord, but this 
unexpected outpouring of clemency will not solve anything: These 
people will still have the ineradicable entry in their labor 
books and no severance benefits. 
  The OBSHCHAYA GAZETA correspondent asked many attorneys for 
a 
legal assessment, rather than a political one, of the present 
situation. This turned out to be an extremely complex matter. 
Boris Zolotukhin, now one of the leaders of the "Russia's 
Choice" faction in the Duma and formerly the lawyer of the civil 
rights advocates and a people's deputy of the Russian 
Federation, said that the legitimacy of the "blacklists" was 
difficult to assess because the legality of the "social 
guarantees" themselves is quite dubious (although this did not 
keep Zolotukhin and his associates from making use of all of 
these "guarantees"). 
  Independent attorneys confirmed that Presidential Edict No 
1435, Surkov's commission, and the proscribing lists are all 
links of the same chain and are beyond the legal fringe, but 
today no court has the power to overturn "Yeltsin's 
discriminatory legislation." After the president abolished the 
constitution and a whole branch of government, he set up his own 
patterns of legal relations with members of parliament, so he 
cannot be expected to correct the situation. During the 
conversations about the disfranchised, experienced attorneys 
spoke in strictly ethical terms: "They lost the 'social 
guarantees' because they could not be bought. Why then should 
they now receive these '30 pieces of silver'?" 
  The inscription in the labor book is a different matter. The 
notation "dismissed from work in accordance with Edict..." (the 
rest is unimportant) is, according to attorneys, "a definite 
violation of the labor rights of citizens." Labor legislation 
does not recognize a "presidential edict" as grounds for 
dismissal. This notation "discredits the worker" without giving 
him any chance for appeal, because no one knows exactly which 
official dismissed him. This is an obvious infringement of civil 
rights. 
  It may be obvious, but no one is trying to defend the 
violated rights of the disfranchised at this time. Members of 
the staff of Human Rights Commissioner Sergey Kovalev told the 
OBSHCHAYA GAZETA correspondent that they have not looked into 
the matter and would not know where to begin. The Duma has 
remained silent. Speaker Ivan Rybkin, whose own name is on the 
"blacklist," has dismissed the matter with the broadest 
generalizations. The disfranchised have no faith in the 
independence of the judiciary. During their years as deputies, 
they learned the ins and outs of Russian governmental power, and 
that is why they are now relying on the good graces of their 
leader, and not on the supremacy of the law. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68531 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   19 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Deputy on Kuzbass, Miners </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Deputy on Kuzbass, Miners </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0624C Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA in Russian 19 Apr 94 pp 
1,2 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0624C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Aman Tuleyev, Federation Council deputy, </F>
conducted by correspondent Nadezhda Garifullina: "At the Limit 
of Patience"] 
  [Text] The deputies of the Federal Assembly supreme 
chamber greeted the appearance of their colleague, Aman Tuleyev, 
in the Federation Council meeting hall with a bouquet of 
flowers, a hearty welcome by the speaker, and enthusiastic 
applause. And there was good reason for congratulations: At the 
elections to the local organ of power in the Kuzbass, Tuleyev's 
block had won a "crushing victory" over the candidates of 
pro-presidential "democratic" orientation. Out of 30 elected 
deputies, 23 are in Tuleyev's command. During the break, I 
sought out Aman Gumirovich and relayed to him the 
congratulations of SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA readers and journalists, 
and asked: 
  [Correspondent] What did the voters talk about at the 
meetings? What does the oblast population expect from the 
Legislative Assembly? 
  [Tuleyev] The meetings were very difficult. People have been 
driven to the brink of desperation. It is that way everywhere, 
and I met with all strata of the population, including the 
miners, of course. I will never forget the discussion which 
lasted for many hours at the "Fizkulturnik" mine, where the 
representative of the miners' trade union was also present. The 
attitude in the collective is already on the brink of breakdown. 
And what can it be like if the miners are demanding that what 
they earned in November be paid out to them at least in March or 
April?! I remember, some speakers said openly: "If they do not 
meet our demands, we will take our pick axes and begin breaking 
down the shop stalls, the commercial buildings, the 
mayoralities." I say: God forbid, of course, that this 
"merciless riot" should occur. Its echo would carry disaster 
throughout all of Great Russia, and then it would be the end of 
all. Can it be that they do not understand this here, in Moscow? 
  I visited the "Yuzhnaya" mine. My heart bled. The miners had 
begun to pass out from hunger. They are going to the coal mines 
hungry!... When has such a thing ever happened? Even during the 
war they cared for the people and found ways to support and help 
them. But here they are demanding their lifeblood, what they 
have earned! Cases of passing out from hunger have been recorded 
also in the city of Berezovskiy. The "Pervomayskaya" mine has 
been on strike in this city for a month now. Because the miners, 
and all the population in general, find themselves in most 
difficult, inhuman conditions. 
  [Correspondent] The fact that the Tuleyev block won the 
majority of the mandates in the local organ of self-government, 
it seems to me, is a rather indicative fact. As it turns out, 
most of the voters of the mining kray have gone over to the 
opposition against the ruling regime, and an active process of 
rejecting the policy of anti-popular reforms has begun? 
  [Tuleyev] Yes, the miners themselves are posing the question 
of trust in the president. And at the meetings they have often 
announced: "We have trust in no one!" Recently, at the request 
of the Association of Enterprises and Organizations of the city 
of Kemerovo and, naturally, the voters, I sent a deputy's 
request to the president, the chairman of the government, and 
the speakers of both chambers of the Federal Assembly. This, if 
you will, was the soulful cry of thousands and thousands of 
people. We studied the systematic reporting on the economy and 
the social sphere. We analyzed the meetings with labor 
collectives, with the people at their place of residence, and 
with managers of all forms of ownership which were held in the 
course of the pre-electoral campaign to the Legislative 
Assembly. And we came to the irrefutable conclusion: Processes 
of disintegration of industry, agriculture, construction and the 
social sphere are being consistently implemented in the Kuzbass. 
  [Correspondent] The conclusion is a difficult and bitter 
one, 
but are you not exaggerating a bit? 
  [Tuleyev] Judge by the figures: The decline in volumes of 
industrial production in the last three years has comprised over 
40 percent, and in construction--around 60 percent. The base 
coal industry of the Kuzbass has fallen to the level of the 
50's, the chemical industry--of the 60's, and the light and food 
industry--to the level of the 70's, to the times when these 
sectors were just emerging in our oblast. Hidden unemployment is 
reaching 40 percent, while at some enterprises up to half of the 
workers have been laid off. Highly skilled workers are becoming 
"shuttle runners," "stall-keepers" and second-hand dealers, as a 
result of which the threat of stoppage of complex types of 
production has arisen due to a shortage of workers. Labor 
productivity has fallen to one-third of what it used to be in 
industry, and on the whole the economy of the Kuzbass has been 
thrown back to the level of the 60's. And this is in peacetime, 
half a century after the most destructive war in history... This 
has led to ruin, desperation and hopelessness... 
  Mutual nonpayments have taken on the form of a mass epidemic 
disaster. I will say without exaggeration that they have cast 
the economy and the social sphere of the Kuzbass into a state of 
collapse. The total amount of mutual nonpayments between 
enterprises and organizations in Kemerovo Oblast--taking into 
consideration the enterprises of other regions and the CIS 
republics--reached over a trillion rubles by the end of March. 
  [Correspondent] But they say that supposedly all these 
nonpayments are almost provocation on the part of the "red 
directors?" 
  [Tuleyev] Rubbish! Everything has been destroyed--the 
country, the communist party, the soviets which supposedly 
hindered the implementation of "democratic transformations." Now 
a new image of the enemy is needed. And so they found one: The 
"red directors." In fact, however, the mass nonpayments are 
caused by the actions of the government, which has refused to 
finance, partially or fully, the enterprises of the TEK [not 
further expanded] and the budget organizations, and to pay for 
the agricultural production which has been taken from the 
peasantry. Why, this is a modern form of corvee [feudalism]! The 
nonpayments lead to a string of most acute conflicts in the 
economy and in the oblast. 
  In general, if we speak with complete frankness, we must say 
that the Yeltsin-Gaydar reforms have set us back not by 20-30 
years, but to the epoch of the feudal natural economy. From 
commodity-monetary relations, the economy of the Kuzbass has 
begun to change over to exchange in kind. Barter is flourishing. 
Wages here are paid in whatever you like--from irons, shoes, 
fabrics and tobacco goods and even meat to medical preparations 
and spare parts for automobiles. 
  I could go on forever citing examples of the destructive 
processes, examples which confirm that the course being 
implemented by the "reformers" is unpromising. I will say only 
that the government of Russia and the local authorities are ever 
more acting in the role of firemen; and in recent months they 
are not even able to handle this role, as confirmed by the 
results of the first quarter. A sad record has been set for rate 
of decline in production--25 percent! Well, it seems that now we 
should sound the alarm and urgently alter the course which is 
ruinous to Russia. Nothing of the sort! The government of Russia 
is not even thinking of correcting it. On the contrary, with 
maniacal consistency it rejects any management and regulation of 
the economic and social processes. 
  [Correspondent] Yes, it is certainly not in the best of 
situations that the Legislative Assembly of the Kuzbass is 
making its debut. Nevertheless, how did you begin? 
  [Tuleyev] At the first organizational meeting immediately 
after the elections, we elected a chairman first of all. I will 
not hide the fact that I am beholden to the deputies for their 
trust. They voted unanimously for my candidacy, and by secret 
ballot. Then we adopted the first document--the statement of the 
Legislative Assembly, in which we announced ourselves as the 
legal successors of the oblast Soviet of People's Deputies and 
thanked our predecessors for their honest fulfillment of their 
deputy obligations. 
  We will have to act under difficult conditions. We have a 
great responsibility to the people, while our rights under the 
constitution are laughable. Nevertheless, we must do everything 
possible for the people, even under these circumstances and with 
a poverty budget. I told the deputies: If we do not do anything 
specifically in this most difficult situation, these will be the 
last elections in the Kuzbass. The people will not go to vote 
any more. Therefore, the deputy corps bears a huge 
responsibility. 
  Currently, we are preparing our first resolutions. What have 
they done here? The departments have staged competitions--who 
will raise prices the most. Communications suppliers are raising 
the telephone rates, municipal managers are hiking up the rent. 
I might add that those who live in the center for some reason 
pay less than those who live on the outskirts. Moreover, 
expenditures for transport have risen sharply. Also, payment for 
land takes up the lion's share of the family budget: 15,000 for 
one sotok! Who can afford to plant a garden? Potatoes will be 
like gold. And so it turns out that in every family, 70-80 
percent of the income goes just for food. Of course, such a 
policy lays the groundwork for social upheaval. Therefore, we 
will solve these problems in first priority, and will think 
about how to protect the population. 
  The tragedy of the Kuzbass lies in the fact that it has been 
plied to death with drink. Last year, 1,9000 people were 
poisoned by vodka which had been brought in. Is the domestic 
variety not enough? They are even bringing it in from across the 
border. 1,900 families have been left without breadwinners for 
this reason alone. And the first request which I made to the 
procurator general: We must bring to responsibility those who 
are getting the people drunk. As it is, the Kuzbass is dying 
off. The mortality rate exceeds the birth rate by 20,000 people! 
You know, during my life I have passed through all imaginable 
and unimaginable choices, but the last ones were the most 
difficult: The people have already been beaten to the end. They 
no longer believe anything or anyone. 
  I wrote about all this in that letter which I mentioned at 
the beginning, the letter to the president, the prime minister 
and the leaders of the Federal Assembly chambers. At the end I 
added a note: I am sending this in order to clear my conscience. 
The people have asked, and I have fulfilled their request, 
although I know that these appeals will do no good. Therefore, I 
asked: Give the rights to the regions, do not hang on to power. 
As it is, you are doing nothing yourselves and not allowing us 
to do anything. 
  [Correspondent] This time at the meetings of the Federation 
Council you spoke twice on a most acute problem: The crime rate, 
corruption, the mafia, the role of the procurator's office, and 
the MVD [Ministry of Internal Affairs]. As I recall, you even 
said, addressing the deputies: "We all engage in self-deception 
and lead a double game." These are harsh evaluations. What is it 
that disturbs you in particular, if we speak of crime? 
  [Tuleyev] We are holding parliamentary hearings. Well, we 
will speak, we will listen, we will shout a bit, we will adopt 
laws. But what will change from all this? I have often appealed 
to the minister of internal affairs and the procurator general, 
citing blatant cases of corruption in the oblast. It is like 
talking to thin air. The air did not even move! Any head of 
administration knows that in every oblast they are aware of all 
the corrupt dealers, swindlers and bandits. They could take them 
all in one night, and the next day there would be order in 
Russia. Yet those who are supposed to do this--do nothing. And 
so we lie and lie, lie and lie. Why is the struggle not being 
waged? Why, because the roots of corruption have penetrated into 
the government itself, into the highest echelons. There has been 
a very strong merging together of the state apparatus, the 
administrations of all levels, the Ministry of Internal Affairs, 
the KGB [secret police] or the MB [Ministry of Security], the 
procurator's office, and so forth. 
  And so we, the deputies, are sounding the alarm: There is 
corruption and bribery, there are mafioso clans in Russia! Yet 
the president believes otherwise: Everything is normal in the 
country, we are waging a struggle against corruption, and he 
awards Russia's highest honor to the minister of internal 
affairs. Well, where is this done? I would understand if Yerin 
had become a Hero of Russia for a heroic struggle against the 
mafia. But he distinguished himself by shooting defenseless 
people in the House of Soviets! 
  Yeltsin, Shumeyko and Gaydar say that now we are creating a 
class of property owners in Russia. We are creating it. 
Moreover, by high-speed methods and on a criminal basis. I 
stated openly at the Federation Council: Yerin is forced to keep 
quiet, because if he springs up, he will be removed. 
  We are men of law, but our laws do not work, our edicts do 
not work. If a person wants to act in accordance with the law, 
he is killed. I will not recall the renowned Moscow terrorist 
actions of recent days, but all this is "flourishing" also in 
the provinces. Murder for hire is becoming the norm of our 
abnormal existence. The commercial director of the Kuznetsk 
Metallurgical Combine, carrying out the will of the government, 
shipped orders where they were supposed to be shipped--to the 
government. Well, and what happened? They shot him along with 
his wife, riddled him with bullet holes like a dog. The laws are 
not being carried out. Everything is dictated by the mafia. If 
you do not fulfill the order of the mafia, that is the end of 
you. And every manager, every head of administration, lives in 
fear. 
  For me this is a most basic question: The entire tragedy 
lies 
in the fact that the laws do not work, and the first violator is 
the President of Russia himself. If only he were to set the 
example of a respectful attitude toward the law and the 
constitution by saying: "Here is the law. It may not be perfect, 
but it must be fulfilled!" After all, why do you think I spoke 
out in support of Kazannik? To speak honestly, I must say that 
my attitude toward him has always been negative, but in the 
amnesty situation Kazannik acted courageously. He was the first 
person to stand up in defense of the law. The first person who 
said a firm "no" to telephone law. Enough of violating the law! 
That is why I supported him. 
  And to the acting procurator general, Aleksey Nikolayevich 
Ilyushenko, I said directly: You should not try to become 
procurator general. The people will not believe you anyway. 
Moreover, we must remove Minister Yerin for the lawlessness in 
the country, and announce early presidential elections. If we do 
not do this, nothing will change. We can adopt a hundred 
wonderful laws, but the first ones to violate them will be the 
president, the MVD, the procurator, and so forth... As long as 
these people are in power, we, unfortunately, will not be able 
to accomplish anything. 
  I am glad that all the deputies in our oblast Legislative 
Assembly are professionally trained people, some of whom are 
former chairmen of soviets, and that all have a fervent desire 
to work. Now we will begin to strike at corruption. We have made 
a number of inquiries, and based on the results we will publish 
a list of corrupt bureaucrats and will demand their resignation, 
especially in the upper echelons of Russian power. As for 
Moscow, I would like to emphasize once again: One way or the 
other, early presidential elections cannot be avoided. The 
sooner we re-elect the president and the government, the better 
it will be both for them, and for Russia, and for the cause. 
  [Correspondent] You said that the Kuzbass has reached its 
final limits. But do you realize what has to be done in order to 
stop the slippage into the abyss? 
  [Tuleyev] I would propose a minimum program of urgent 
measures in the economy and in the social sphere: To begin the 
management of the economy by methods which have been tested in 
world practice and in our country in past decades; to use 
indicative economic planning (instead of the directive form used 
in Soviet times), which is widely used in many countries of the 
world and in major corporations; to return validity to various 
forms of the state order, with precise adherence to 
responsibilities on the part of the state; to return to the 
compilation of national economic balances and economic balances 
by regions, with the application of market levers of their 
realization; to change over to the regulation of prices and 
incomes, and to immediately review the tax benefits granted to 
producers of goods and services... 
  These are but a few points. Altogether there are 14 of them, 
first priority and immediate tasks. I will not list all of them. 
I have insisted and will continue to insist on the immediate 
indexation of wages, pensions, stipends and subsidies, based on 
the rates of inflation. We must stop the continued 
impoverishment of the population. Having toured the entire 
oblast in recent weeks, I was simply appalled by the crying 
poverty of the people. In the Kuzbass today, one-third of the 
population is poverty-stricken. One in every four families 
either never sees meat, or can afford it only once a month. And 
all this is on the background of the furious rates of 
accumulation of wealth by 5-7 percent of the population of 
Kemerovo Oblast. I will never reconcile myself to this. At every 
meeting with the voters--in the mining and other collectives--I 
spoke about my social program, and everywhere they understood 
and supported me. This is dear to me. It is my faith in the 
people and their support that gives me the strength to live and 
to fight. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68532 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   19 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Trial of White House Defender Starts </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Trial of White House Defender Starts </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0624D Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA in Russian 19 Apr 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0624D </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Sergey Turchenko: "I Did Not Betray My Oath"] </F>
  [Text] On the day the trial began, Senior Lieutenant Igor 
Menshikov turned 25 years old. But how much more mature were his 
position and his judgement than those of the commanders and 
leaders who testified as witnesses at the proceedings! 
  "For what purpose did you go to the 'White House' on 26 
September 1993?", the military judge, justice Major S. Nechayev, 
asked the young officer. 
  "I was defending the constitution and carrying out the order 
of the lawful authorities there," was the answer. 
  There are not many officers and generals in the Russian 
Armed 
Forces today who have the right and honor to say such words, 
which are so simple and natural for a defender of the Homeland. 
Today, some even express condemnation addressed at those who did 
not betray their oath. 
  "I warned Menshikov that to go there was an expression of 
lack of discipline," the temporary acting commander of the 
sub-unit, Lieutenant-Colonel Medvedev, complained to the court. 
  The unit's assistant personnel commander, Lieutenant-Colonel 
Gerasimov, was no less "principled" in his court appraisal of 
Igor Menshikov's actions. 
  "What kind of evaluation can there be," mused the trainer of 
the military servicemen, "if Menshikov had to be on duty during 
one of the days when he was at the House of Soviets? Another 
officer had to take his place. Yet this officer had some 
personal plans, family responsibilities..." 
  Who is this Igor Menshikov, and what has he done? 
  We spoke with him at length during the recess between court 
sessions and, honestly speaking, I was filled with pride at the 
fact that there are such young officers in the army, who could 
set an example of civic courage and high moral character for 
many of their senior comrades. 
  By birth, Igor is from the Kazakh city of Aksay. His father 
is a senior lieutenant in the militia. His mother is a building 
engineer. In the summer of 1991, Menshikov graduated from the 
Leningrad Higher Military Engineering School of Communications 
and was assigned to the position of communications center 
engineer with the General Staff. Such an appointment without 
patronage means only one thing: Igor had distinguished himself 
as a model student. And the young officer had managed to show 
his best side also in his new assignment. In two years, there 
were four recommendations for exemplary fulfillment of his 
service responsibilities entered in his service record. 
  Despite Igor's youth, he had a large and strong family, by 
today's standards: His wife Olga, a real friend in combat, and 
his two daughters, whom their father doted upon. Perhaps his 
love for them and his concern for their future largely 
facilitated the fact that, in spite of the hypocritical appeals 
by Grachev to the officers to stay out of politics, Senior 
Lieutenant Menshikov could not be satisfied with the "kitchen" 
struggle against the destruction of the state and the pilferage 
of the country. 
  "For a long time, I sought my place in the ranks of the 
defenders of the Homeland," said Igor in his conversation with 
me. "I read about the Union of Officers in SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA 
and DEN. I went to the headquarters of this organization, 
familiarized myself with its program documents, and understood: 
This is for me, both in spirit and from a professional point of 
view." 
  "In September of 1993 you went to the House of Soviets as a 
member of this organization?" 
  "Yes. But not only that. Even if I had not been a member of 
it, I would have done the same thing. After all, only someone 
who really did not want to know could fail to realize that the 
fate of the constitution, the fate of Soviet statehood, and the 
future of the simple people were being decided there." 
  The unit in which Igor served was stationed in Podmoskovye. 
From an informational point of view it, as perhaps all the 
military sub-units, were blocked. Therefore, at first it was 
difficult to understand what was really going on in Moscow. On 
26 September, after being relieved from his watch, Igor left for 
the White House. He thought it would be for a day or two, but as 
it turned out, everything was immeasurably more complicated. 
Together with the members of the Union of Officers, he kept 
watch inside the House of Soviets and outside. 
  ...The officer was detained by a group of OMON [special 
purpose militia detachment] militiamen and, without presentation 
of any accusations, taken to the 11th Militia Section. 
  Then there were lengthy investigations. Finally, they came 
for Menshikov from his unit and took him back there. The 
leadership reported "to the top" about what happened and filed 
formal proceedings "for unwarranted absence from the garrison." 
Everything would have ended there, had it not been for the 
post-October purge in the Armed Forces. Menshikov, like the 
other officers who remained true to their oath, was dismissed 
from the Armed Forces by the Arbat generals. 
  The formulation of the order, signed by the chief of the 
General Headquarters, sounds cynically frank: "Dismissed... for 
incompatibility of moral-psychological qualities." Yeltsin's 
"striped uniforms" went and decided for the people that they do 
not need defenders of the Homeland who are faithful to their 
oath. 
  It is true that at the judicial proceedings on Igor 
Menshikov's claim against the Ministry of Defense for unlawful 
dismissal, the representatives of the defendant are trying to 
turn everything upside down. They are trying to present the 
young officer as a violator of discipline, and those who hid 
behind women's skirts in September-October of last year--as 
defenders of the Homeland who are true to their oath. 
  Without mentioning the moral aspect of the question, which 
is 
ultimately clear, the juridical aspect is also synonymous. The 
oath obligates the military serviceman to defend the 
constitution and the constitutional organs of power. Article 
121-6 of the Constitution in the edition adopted on 12 December 
1992 reads: "The powers and authorities of the President of the 
Russian Federation may not be used for changing the 
national-state arrangement of the Russian Federation, for 
disbanding or stopping the activity of any lawfully elected 
organs of state power of the Russian Federation, otherwise they 
are terminated immediately." 
  Senior Lieutenant Menshikov was able to understand all this 
back in September of last year. The representatives of the 
defendant pretend that they still do not understand this to the 
present day. The judicial process is not yet concluded. We hope 
that the court does not slip from the letter of the law onto the 
curve of anti-popular policy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68533 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Duma Reviews Corruption in St Petersburg </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Duma Reviews Corruption in St Petersburg </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0611B Moscow PRAVDA in Russian 21 Apr 94 pp 1, 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0611B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow PRAVDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aleksandr Golovenko: "Foreign Currency Etude, or </F>
How Foreign Consuls and Ambassadors Took Revenge Against Our 
Auditor With the Aid of Government Officials"] 
  [Text] Perhaps I am mistaken, but it seems to me that no 
event in the State Duma since the declaration of political 
amnesty has been as socially significant for Russia as Tuesday's 
parliamentary hearings before the Committee on Security. On the 
surface, the agenda looked more trivial than intriguing: 
"Incidents of the Flagrant Violation of Tax and Labor Laws by 
Officials of St. Petersburg and Russia." On the surface, it 
seemed as though this would lead to the same kind of banal 
arguments that were once heard in the USSR Committee of People's 
Control. Just imagine, the chief of the tax inspectorate was 
dismissed, reinstated by a court, and then driven out of office 
again. Is this kind of labor dispute a matter for discussion by 
the Committee on Security? 
  In fact, questions of this kind were the "warm-up exercises" 
of a group of committee members: Must we, they asked, become 
involved in this? Would it not be better to send the files to 
judicial agencies? And why did some of us receive the 
information late? Would it not be better to form a commission to 
review all of this? 
  Committee Chairman V. Ilyukhin, who also chaired the 
hearings, dismissed the unfounded complaints and called for 
constructive work. We journalists and the members of the 
committee were handed a thick pile of documents providing an 
excellent illustration of the criminal history of the discussion 
topic. Incidentally, PRAVDA reported it in an article entitled 
"Why Is Filippov in Charge?" on 14 December last year. Now some 
new facts of the case have come to light. 
  Dmitriy Nikolayevich Filippov is one of the administrators 
whom the so-called "democrats" described with what they 
perceived as the offensive term "party nomenklatura." Suffice it 
to say that he was sent by the Komsomol Central Committee to 
head the BAM [Baykal-Amur Trunk Line Project] staff and was 
serving as secretary of the Leningrad Party Obkom in charge of 
industrial affairs in August 1991 before the overthrow of the 
CPSU. During the years of "reform" he put together a tax 
inspectorate in Leningrad literally from scratch--an absolutely 
new and unfamiliar undertaking. He repeatedly said that this 
structure was completely depoliticized: All forms of ownership, 
he said, are the same to us. The important thing is the 
observance of the laws and the payment of taxes. The press has 
had enough to say about the concealment of income by cooperative 
managers--the former "saviors of the economy." They had planned 
to use the same little tricks when they turned their shops into 
small businesses, private enterprises, and joint ventures, but 
how were they to conceal dividends from Filippov and his people, 
who were well aware of the potential of each large and small 
plant in the city? Filippov also set up a tax police force to 
investigate cases of unreported income and went after the street 
vendors who had no intention of complying with all of the edicts 
and decrees mandating the use of control cash registers. Soon 
people from dozens of oblasts were coming to him for advice. 
After all, this was something absolutely new! Even Mayor A. 
Sobchak held him up as an example, once saying approximately the 
following when he addressed the team of inspectors: "The State 
Tax Inspectorate for St. Petersburg took shape quickly, and it 
is largely due to this that we do not have a budget deficit, and 
have even been able to do a great deal for people in the social 
sphere." 
  This "great deal" consisted in subsidies for bread, benefits 
for low-income households, free breakfasts for schoolchildren, 
free transportation for senior citizens, and so forth. This 
actually turned out to be the key: By going after the 
businessmen who did not report their income and did not pay 
taxes, Filippov's service had supplemented the municipal and 
republic budgets considerably, but it soon became apparent that 
he was serving not the regime, but the teachers, health care 
personnel, students, and staffers of scientific establishments 
whose wages had always been held up by the government, forcing 
them to go on strike. Filippov had put together a team of 
competent and experienced inspectors, some of whom were rumored 
to have come from the KGB. 
  All of the inspections, voluminous documents, fines, and 
penalties understandably irritated the schemers who had 
established so many enterprises, commercial structures, and 
private shops. The city's chief financial inspector began 
receiving calls from the mayor's office, advising him to "stop 
digging so deep." Here are just a few of the incidents he 
related to the committee: 
  "When we went after a sacred cow, the Property Fund, we were 
absolutely stunned by the scales of the fraud we uncovered. 
Inspections revealed undistributed (in other words, 
concealed--Ed.) resources in the amount of 6.623 billion rubles. 
Of course, we charged them a penalty of almost 400 million and a 
fine of 10 percent of the unpaid amount. You can understand why 
they were annoyed. We also learned that 44,000 vouchers were 
inexplicably missing in this privatized establishment and that 
Fund Deputy General Director Fishkov had been arrested for a 
discrepancy of 134 million rubles in privatization checks.... 
  "We also learned that the fund had privatized whole city 
blocks and port facilities in violation of the law, but the 
biggest surprise came later: The fund did not transfer all of 
its receipts to the proper account, but allowed commercial banks 
'to make use of its money' at a ridiculously low rate of 
interest--a whole 2 percent! 
  "We are not children, after all," Dmitriy Nikolayevich told 
the deputies, "and we have to understand that commercial agents 
are not being offered these unimaginable privileges just for 
their good looks." 
  A genuine storm broke out when D. Filippov formed a special 
group to inspect the joint ventures. After all, he managed to go 
where most inspectors would not venture. And just imagine, the 
very first audit of the Europa Hotel revealed an amazing 
panorama of theft. This joint venture preferred to keep its 
dividends in Stockholm, naturally without contributing a single 
cent to our budget. The financial inspector fined the Swedes 5 
million dollars, but as Dmitriy Nikolayevich put it, "it will 
take much more effort to force them to return the 25 million 
dollars that are working for the Swedish economy." 
  The auditors also ruffled the feathers of "Lenraumamebel," 
the joint venture so dear to A. Sobchak's heart. This respected 
establishment was manufacturing furniture with cheap energy and 
manpower, from raw materials that were so inexpensive they were 
almost free, and selling 90 percent of it for hard currency 
abroad. The currency was then put in circulation there, 
promoting the "rebirth of Finland." 
  "When we ordered the Finns to return the hard currency and 
pay the taxes," Filippov continued, "they sent a whole team of 
ambassadors and consuls after me. They accused me of trying to 
'sabotage Yeltsin's policy.' I replied that I was supporting his 
policy by forcing them to abide by his edicts and our laws." 
  I saw the journalists sitting around me exchange looks when 
the speaker added another detail to his account: The ambassadors 
and consuls insinuated that he had a choice of officials who 
would order him to leave their joint venture in peace. Did he 
want a call from Sobchak or from a member of the Russian 
Government? 
  The call came soon.... On 11 October, after the well-known 
tragic events (which were immediately recalled by the people 
gathered there), Russia's Chief State Tax Inspector V. Gusev 
dismissed D. Filippov from his job without any explanation. 
Filippov was not intimidated and was soon reinstated by the 
Sverdlovskiy Rayon People's Court in Moscow. This was followed 
by a bureaucratic ruse we used to hear about in the days of the 
reprisals against undesirable people's controllers and other 
auditors: On 3 November the position occupied by D. Filippov in 
St. Petersburg was eliminated by order of V. Chernomyrdin 
himself. His duties were reassigned to another individual, who 
was given the title of deputy chief of the Russian State Tax 
Service. Who was this individual? 
  We were told that he was a livestock breeder, a former 
sovkhoz director who later worked on the mayor's staff. Then the 
effusive Deputy A. Nevzorov addressed V. Gusev: 
  "You removed a first-rate specialist from office, saying he 
was remiss in his duties. He probably has no equal in all of 
Mother Russia, and you replaced him with a man with no 
experience in auditing tax records or catching swindlers." 
  The chief tax inspector turned red in the face and did not 
know how to respond to the subsequent barrage of questions. How 
had D. Filippov, whom he had praised earlier and held up as an 
example, suddenly become "unsatisfactory"? Who had made the 
phone call from the Council of Ministers to order his dismissal? 
If he was guilty of some kind of "negligence," then why did the 
order for his dismissal state "staff reduction" as the reason? 
  In a message to State Duma Chairman I. Rybkin, the dismissed 
financial inspector named some specific reasons for his 
expulsion: "According to Deputy Chief Yu.M. Ulyanov of the 
Russian State Tax Service, the reasons were a letter from Mayor 
A.A. Sobchak of St. Petersburg and the pressure exerted by First 
Vice Premier Ye.T. Gaydar".... 
  I could also cite an extremely intriguing excerpt from the 
report proposed by committee members and journalists. It says 
that A. Sobchak, A. Chubays, Ye. Gaydar, and former Minister of 
Finance V. Fedorov were involved in the "unwarranted" dismissal 
of V. Filippov from his job. 
  This is the kind of leverage the offended ambassadors and 
consuls used to get rid of a financial inspector who was too 
intractable and too incorruptible! Chubays, Gaydar, and Fedorov 
did not grace the committee session with their presence, 
although they were invited to attend, and could not explain the 
"grounds for the dismissal." 
  Representatives of the counterintelligence services, the 
Security Council, the tax police, and the RF Procuracy and 
deputies S. Govorukhin, Yu. Vlasov, A. Nevzorov, N. Krivelskaya, 
and other speakers discussed the widespread misappropriation of 
the country's natural resources and foreign currency and the 
colossal sums that have settled in foreign banks. Just as the 
chemical composition of the ocean can be judged from a single 
drop of water, speakers remarked, the plundering of Russia can 
be judged from this single case. And the most frightening aspect 
of the matter is that the incorruptible and highly professional 
specialist was objectionable to government officials. Then whom 
are they serving? This leads to the obvious conclusion that we 
are no longer the masters of our own country, now that a 
principled employee acting in the interest of his country can be 
dismissed from his job simply at the request of a foreign consul 
or ambassador. 
  Summing up the debate, Committee Chairman Viktor Ilyukhin 
had 
this to say: There is money in Russia. There is enough money for 
the miners, the students, and the teachers. But this money is 
being rerouted to commercial entities through artificial 
channels. What we are witnessing is the deliberate destruction 
of the state: Mutual nonpayments cause millions of people to 
suffer and stop the work of plants and factories. Much of the 
blame has to be accepted by the government, which, as we have 
seen, has little interest in supplementing the state treasury. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68534 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   8 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zorkin on Political `Myths' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Zorkin on Political `Myths' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0611E Moscow LITERATURNAYA ROSSIYA in Russian No 14, 8 
Apr 94 pp 4-5 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0611E </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow LITERATURNAYA ROSSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Valeriy Zorkin: "Farewell to Myths"] </F>
  [Text] This vast nation is suffocating in the grip of a 
severe crisis. Millions of people are living in an epidemic and 
humiliating state of poverty after being robbed so ruthlessly by 
the "radical reformers" for the sake of yet another "bright 
future." Science is dying, and centuries-old spiritual 
traditions are being stifled by the pressure of the vulgar mass 
culture. The Russian people, who spent a thousand years building 
the greatest state in the world, have been separated by absurd 
boundaries and have regressed 400 years in their geopolitical 
development. The democratic values that are essential to healthy 
and civilized development in today's world have been distorted 
and deliberately discredited in the public mind. Industry is 
being ruined, and the unique Russian national economic complex, 
which was built by the heroic labor of several generations, is 
deteriorating. The society is on the verge of a social eruption. 
These are the pitiful results of the irresponsible and 
undemocratic policy line the ruling regime was pursuing when it 
managed to ruin one of the wealthiest countries and destroy its 
powerful state in just two years. 
  "Our life has become unbelievably morbid, senseless, and 
false, all order has disappeared, there is no consistency in our 
development, and all of our mental, emotional, and moral 
discipline has grown weak. An immense set of lies, permeating 
all of our relationships, has accumulated in our society and has 
contaminated the very air that we breathe, the surroundings in 
which we move and act, the ideas directing our actions, and the 
words with which we express our thoughts. In the midst of all 
these lies, what can we expect but a puny existence and puny 
acts? Our very ideas about life and its purpose are false, our 
relationships are confused, and our life is devoid of the 
consistency that is necessary for peaceful development and 
normal activity." 
  These are the words of one of the most prominent 
conservative 
Russian thinkers of the 19th century, Chief Procurator of the 
Holy Synod Konstantin Petrovich Pobedonostsev. Although he said 
these words just before the terrible revolutionary outburst many 
decades ago, they are just as relevant today, which forces us to 
realize that the ulcers of hypocrisy, cynical deception, and 
malicious lies, the infinite egotism, greed, and thirst for 
power that are tormenting us have reached such a frightening 
point of crisis that the ominous question--"Is Russia to be or 
not to be?"--has become a terrifying reality of our daily 
social, governmental, and political life! 
<H5>  Between `Those' and `These' </H5>
  In the last few years, for several reasons, primarily my 
position as chairman of the Constitutional Court, I had the 
broadest opportunities to observe the development of events up 
close--or "from within," so to speak--because I received 
detailed reports on the state of the country and the processes 
occurring in the upper echelons of government. Because I was 
fully aware of the dangerous tendencies that were becoming more 
and more distinct on the Russian political stage with the 
passage of time, I tried--to the best of my ability--to keep our 
ship of state far from the whirlpools of the political 
adventurism that was threatening (and is still threatening) 
Russia with the chaos of turmoil and deterioration, the tragedy 
of governmental collapse, and the horrors of fratricide. 
  Whenever I could, I refrained from intervening in political 
arguments and the struggle for power by Moscow "court" groups 
and clans. No conscientious critic could accuse me of any 
affiliation with "those" or "these": I was equally repelled by 
the greedy corruption of the most odious members of the 
president's team and by the obsessive and maniacal efforts of 
some of the "people's representatives" to conquer Russia's 
political Olympus at any cost. No one wanted to call attention 
to the constantly growing wave of irreconcilable differences 
between the "branches" of government. The results are 
well-known: The massacre in the center of Moscow, which cost the 
lives of hundreds of people--a crime that was monstrously 
cynical and senseless, because it is absolutely clear today that 
this did not solve a single one of Russia's acute problems. On 
the contrary, the tight bloody knot of fatal confrontations in 
"Black October" compounded the already critical state of the 
country. 
  God knows that I did everything within my power to prevent 
the conflict and reconcile the opposing sides. This is probably 
why I was not trusted completely by either side, which was 
manifested in a particularly malicious and distinct manner when 
the "victors" decided in the hour of their triumph to get even 
with the "inconvenient" witness to their unprincipled and 
unethical actions. 
  Nevertheless, I did not betray my own convictions. I am 
still 
categorically opposed to political extremism in any form, 
regardless of its origin, regardless of the demagogic clothing 
it wears as a disguise, and regardless of the high ideals and 
noble goals it uses to conceal its own contempt for the law and 
the standards of common human decency. I still believe that 
unless we restrain the opportunists and political plotters who 
are willing to involve the public in fratricidal conflicts for 
the sake of their own excessive ambition, until we curb the 
excesses of arbitrary behavior within the strong confines of 
legality and legal stability, we will not move a single step 
forward in the revitalization of our long-suffering Motherland. 
I still believe that national reconciliation and civic accord 
are not topics for populist speculation, but absolutely 
essential conditions for Russia's survival. 
  Nevertheless, I do have some regrets, something to repent, 
and some serious lessons to learn. Sometimes I was too naive and 
indecisive, too trusting and too inclined to agree to 
compromises that had not been subjected to sufficient analysis 
and consideration. The burden of power is a heavy load to carry, 
and I frankly admit that, looking back, I cannot say that I was 
completely prepared to do this. Sometimes I overestimated my own 
ability to influence events, and sometimes I underestimated the 
danger of the situation and the growing strength of destructive 
processes in the country. I never, however, lost my conviction 
that we have a single motherland, that gambling with its future 
for the sake of personal advantage is criminal and base, that we 
are one people, one family with a common history and future, and 
that no one but us can revive Great Russia. 
  Today I feel sick and ashamed when I see what we have done 
to 
the country and to each other. It is immoral and impermissible 
to remain silent, hiding behind the official pretext of 
"nonintervention in political affairs," when you are watching 
your country die under the strain of hatred, enmity, political 
intrigues, and cynicism. 
<H5>  The Big Lie of Our Era </H5>
  Pablo Picasso once made the following remark in an attempt 
to 
underscore the value of art and his ability to create 
"autonomous" worlds, parallels to the real world: "I draw what I 
see with my mind, and not with my eyes." Today it appears that 
some politicians want to use this artistic method of creating 
"parallel realities" within the framework of social technology 
to turn our sick society into a "zombie." 
  Any independent and unbiased analyst can see that the 
current 
political regime is resting on a lie. Today, after its crushing 
defeat in the elections to the State Duma proved that people 
knew that its earlier policies were leading us into a blind 
alley, we are witnessing something amazing: The regime is 
changing like a chameleon, adapting itself to the changes in the 
society. This has been accompanied by its persistent, constant, 
and deliberate attempts to plant several myths in the public 
mind to help it keep the situation under its own control and 
continue its manipulation of public opinion. 
  Here are just a few of the most significant of these myths: 
  --The myth that the present leaders of the country endorse 
the values of the contemporary civilized society (democracy, the 
rule-of-law state, the market economy, the separation of powers, 
human rights, and so forth). 
  --The myth that the "totalitarian," "communist" past has 
been 
surmounted in the political, social, and governmental life of 
present-day Russia. 
  --The myth of the irreproachable legitimacy of existing 
government institutions based on the "nationwide" mandate of 
confidence in the president and the Constitution (which is 
directly related to the myth of the supra-class nature of the 
present regime, whose members come from all social strata). 
  --The myth of its contribution to the end of the "cold war" 
and ability to guarantee Russia a fitting place in the system of 
international relations on the basis of partnership with the 
leading nations of the world. 
  --The myth that the regime is devoted to the national-state 
interests of our country and that it is evolving in the 
direction of "enlightened patriotism" and "national 
construction." 
  Let us take a look at all of these in the proper sequence: 
  The myth of the "civilized," "democratic" nature of the 
present regime. This is probably the favorite offspring and 
main concern of the reptilian news media. It was precisely their 
ruthless exploitation of this myth, their shameless attempts to 
foist it on public opinion within the country and abroad, that 
created the "smoke screen" behind which the outrageous political 
cynicism and monstrous corruption of our ruling elite were 
safely concealed from outsiders for several years. 
  Every element of this myth is a shameless lie. When people 
who routed two parliaments in two years and put their leaders 
behind bars, first causing the collapse of a great world power 
and then driving the country to the verge of civil war, talk 
about democracy and the "separation of powers," it is difficult 
to see this as anything but a travesty. When the terms "law," 
"rule-of-law state," and "legitimacy" are used by politicians 
who literally wiped their feet on one Constitution and 
immediately composed another (which I am bound to uphold in the 
performance of my professional duties, just as I upheld the 
earlier one), enacting it with the approval of only one-fourth 
of the voters, it is frightening to contemplate what might 
happen in the future. 
  How can we listen seriously to the discussions of a genuine 
market economy in Russia when the behavior of officials is 
becoming more and more arbitrary, bribes are the only reliable 
way of solving any problem, domestic industry is dying, peasants 
will soon have trouble even feeding themselves, and a handful of 
nouveaux riches, bloated with fraudulent privatization and 
financial intrigues, are getting richer and richer in a 
destitute and almost starving nation? How can anyone talk about 
the preeminence of human rights when the pervasive turmoil has 
dramatically undermined such fundamental rights as the rights to 
education, health care, and security for the elderly? I will not 
even mention the fact that even the right to life in our 
"civilized" country is frequently meaningless because of the 
unprecedented rise in the rate of crime and racketeering. As far 
as political rights are concerned, the last year and a half 
clearly demonstrated the value of the widely publicized 
declarations of their immutability--the "Lefortovo inmates," the 
editors of opposition newspapers, and the relatives of those who 
died in defense of the "White House" are the best judges of 
their value.... 
  The myth of the victory over the totalitarian communist 
past. This myth and the preceding "democratic" myth are two 
sides of the same coin, and the anticommunist rhetoric serves 
two purposes in this case. First of all, it once served as a 
strong propaganda weapon, securing the rise of the present upper 
echelon to power on the wave of the constant and intrusive 
exposures of the horrors of Leninism, Stalinism, and the "era of 
stagnation." It may be difficult to imagine, but--Horrors!--this 
loud campaign had nothing in common with genuine concern about 
the future of the country and about the tragic decades that were 
full of infinite trials and grief and left indelible scars, 
which will keep them alive in our memory forever. Human 
suffering has become nothing more than a bargaining chip in the 
big political game of the governing bigwigs who were fighting 
for bureaucratic privileges and Kremlin offices. 
  Second, the fueling of anticommunist hysteria was supposed 
to 
send the West a signal of the new Russian leadership's 
uncompromising rejection of the expansionist geopolitical 
practices of the USSR and guarantee the regime strong 
international support and the sympathy of the foreign public. In 
the race for these cherished goals, no one cared that the "baby 
had been thrown out with the bath water"--that the thoughtless 
campaign denigrating our recent past had turned into a fiendish 
dance "on the graves of our fathers" and had hurt the feelings 
of millions of honest people, was crippling our youth, and was 
warping the already distorted historical memory of our people. 
  At the same time, it was clear that the political practices 
of the regime, in contrast to its propagandistic rhetoric, were 
still typically Bolshevik practices, distinguished by poorly 
concealed irritation with "inconvenient" legal standards, the 
cult of "political expediency," and the open reliance on 
confrontation and its resolution by force. Today's increasingly 
severe crisis is largely a direct result of this adventuristic 
Bolshevik mentality, in which class hatred has given way only to 
a hatred of political opponents, and legal nihilism is still 
easily justified by "special circumstances" and the "lack of an 
alternative"! 
  The myth of the irreproachable legitimacy of present 
government institutions. I must stipulate that because I am 
still a Constitutional Court justice, I am absolutely loyal to 
existing legislation in all areas in the performance of my 
duties, but I can still see the outrageously unsatisfactory 
state of affairs in this sphere of such great importance in the 
life of society and the state. 
  The Russian legal mind has traditionally had a keen and 
acute 
reaction to the moral and ethical aspects of an issue. The 
curious combination of the infinite Russian tolerance and 
respect for the law with the people's constant suspicion of the 
legal standards regulating the life of society, which was an 
enigma to foreign researchers in every century, is due precisely 
to the willingness to suffer deprivations and make sacrifices 
"for the sake of justice" on the one hand, and the rejection of 
legal scholasticism on the other. With a view to these features 
of our national identity, the Bolsheviks and their successors in 
the Kremlin today always obscured their political games with a 
smoke screen of demagogic slogans. The only difference is that 
the appeals for "the world brotherhood of workers" and "the 
bright future of social justice" have been replaced by 
incantations about the desire for the "triumph of freedom and 
democracy" and the ritualistic verbal offerings to the "ideals 
of democracy, civilization, and progress." 
  The problem now is that the confusing reality is so vastly 
different from the official rhetoric that the regime has lost 
all credibility and the last vestiges of its earlier authority. 
This means that not one of the existing institutions of 
government is legal in the public mind. The constant 
manipulation of the mechanisms of the democratic state with 
referendums, elections, parties, and the news media and the 
total contempt for any "rules of play" the authorities displayed 
during the October crisis did their job: The people understood 
that "the lords are fighting again, and the serfs are getting a 
splitting headache." No law professor or legal scholar can 
change the people's mind now, because the legal nihilism of the 
state hopelessly undermined the public belief in its own 
legitimate roots. Is there any need to discuss the possible 
implications, especially now that the "class" nature of the 
regime, as the chief patron of the comprador bourgeoisie, is 
becoming increasingly evident in a society experiencing rapid 
social stratification. 
  The myth of the end of the "cold war" and of friendship 
with the West. The socialist obsession of the Soviet Union, 
which made every effort to turn the whole world community into a 
single "socialist camp," was one of the main reasons for its 
overexertion and largely predetermined the sad results of 1991. 
The lower level of global armed confrontation and the end of the 
"cold war," the effort to move from confrontation and enmity to 
cooperation and partnership, constitute an indisputably positive 
development of recent years. All of this is true, but the main 
thing is that the present regime had nothing to do with 
these positive changes. 
  As a matter of fact, the most important advances in 
surmounting the confrontational legacy of the "cold war" were 
made within the framework of the USSR long before the levers of 
governmental power fell into the hands of the country's present 
leaders. The success of those first moves was guaranteed, 
incidentally, largely by the fact that the Soviet delegations at 
all of the talks were backed up by the colossal combined 
strength of the single union superpower. Now the notorious 
"partnership" is often secured by the submission of the Russian 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs and by unconcealed disregard for our 
national-state interests. In essence, a shameful trading session 
is going on in the sphere of foreign policy, during which the 
present regime is selling Russia's long-range strategic 
interests in exchange for immediate political support from 
abroad. 
  Furthermore, it is no secret that extremely influential 
groups in the West are openly striving for the maximum 
debilitation of Russia, seeing it as their perennial 
geopolitical rival. That is why it is probably premature to 
start shouting the news that the era of confrontation is 
"finally and completely" over, and that the era of boundless 
peace and exhilarating unanimity has arrived. There should be no 
doubt that we want to be good neighbors and to cooperate with 
the leading world powers, but we still have to face the facts: 
It will be a long and arduous journey to this goal. 
  Furthermore, the average Russian citizen finds himself 
wondering with increasing frequency whether we won or lost when 
we paid for the friendship with the West and the end of the 
"cold war" with the collapse of the USSR, and received in 
exchange a "hot" war along almost the whole perimeter of 
Russia's new borders. Will we be able to hold on to this 
friendship (which is quite necessary in itself) under the 
conditions of growing instability and the obvious threat to all 
Eurasia from the "hot spots" in the post-Soviet territory? Will 
the final result of the current regime's foreign policy 
"achievements" be a new escalation of international tension? 
  The myth of the "enlightened patriotism" of the Russian 
leadership. Like a rabbit from a magician's hat, it made 
its appearance and is growing before the eyes of the "esteemed 
public," watching in shock as the belligerent cosmopolitans turn 
into national patriots in the middle of a sentence, and as the 
political lexicon of the Kremlin's inhabitants acquires more and 
more exotic phrases like "national interest," "the national 
traditions of the centuries of Russian history," "the defense of 
fellow countrymen abroad," and so forth. There has even been a 
rumor that some members of the president's team are secretly 
learning how to make speeches about Russian patriotism in the 
tones of "Pamyat" and "Russian National Unity." 
  This sad sight looks even more pitiful when we can see 
clearly that the principal players in the quasi-patriotic 
performance are the politicians who played a decisive role in 
the collapse of the USSR, abandoning 25 million Russians to the 
mercy of fate when these were suddenly living "across the 
border" without their consent, and who scattered handfuls of 
"sovereignties" within Russia itself. But the most unpleasant 
thing is that all of this commotion actually has nothing to do 
with Russia's true and genuine interests. 
  These interests consist primarily in the complete and final 
cessation of the exhausting domestic political confrontations, 
which could lead to new outbreaks of violence, the restoration 
of the single integrated economy of the post-Soviet territory in 
accordance with actual conditions, the reconstitution of the 
dismembered body of the Russian people, and the reinstatement of 
the thousand-year-old Russian state as a responsible and 
predictable member of the international community and a major 
guarantor of geopolitical equilibrium on the planet. It is 
important to realize that the objective progression of events is 
moving in this direction, and that anyone who dares to ignore 
this will soon be swept off the political stage. 
  What should we do? How should we begin releasing ourselves 
from the obtrusive and harmful myths in which Russia has become 
entangled, distorting the truth, misleading the public, and 
delaying the recovery of our national identity? Should we look 
at our own history? 
  "However colossal the power of the state might be," 
Pobedonostsev warned at the beginning of the century, "it rests 
on nothing other than the unity of the spiritual consciousness 
of the people and the government, on the trust of the people. 
Power begins to be undermined when this consciousness based on 
trust starts to split into two separate entities." Today no one 
trusts anyone in Russia. The government exists on its own, and 
the people exist on their own. That is why we should start by 
using all of the democratic institutions and mechanisms of 
government remaining at our disposal and find ways of uniting 
the public, restoring mutual trust, and resolutely ridding 
ourselves of those who will interfere with the normalization of 
the situation. 
  We are not entitled to any more mistakes. Russia has reached 
its limit for social cataclysms. The continuation of 
irresponsible experimentation will be fatal for the country. We 
have had enough of destruction, and now it is finally time to 
start creating! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68535 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   5 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Barkashov Interviewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Barkashov Interviewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0632A Moscow MOSKOVSKIY KOMSOMOLETS in Russian 5 Apr 94 
p 7 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0632A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MOSKOVSKIY KOMSOMOLETS </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Russian National Unity leader Aleksandr </F>
Barkashov by MOSKOVSKIY KOMSOMOLETS correspondent Aleksandr 
Khinshteyn; place and date not given: "Humanist in a Black 
Shirt: Corporal Barkashov Promises Ascent to Power in Two Years"] 
  [Text] RNE [Russian National Unity] leader Aleksandr 
Barkashov agreed to give an interview to MOSKOVSKIY 
KOMSOMOLETS--a newspaper very much disliked by him--with great 
reluctance. And at the start of our interview in his huge 
apartment on Vavilov Street he warned me, as he put his crutches 
aside, that I should be totally objective so that all of us, 
biased journalists, will not regret it later when our heads may 
get cracked together. Two quite impressive-looking guys, who 
opened the door for me and then stayed on duty in the "foyer," 
were the best proof that there will be no shortage of those 
capable of cracking others' heads together. 
  [Khinshteyn] Is it true that you escaped the White House 
through underground passages? 
  [Barkashov] No, I came out together with enforcement 
ministers--Barannikov, Dunayev, and Achalov. They were the first 
to leave, while many others, including Rutskoy, were afraid to 
come out at all and did not believe the guarantees given by 
Alpha. As we were coming out, however, an Alpha officer 
separated the enforcement ministers from the rest, saying that 
there was an order to detain them. Naturally this alarmed us, 
and I expressed a desire to be arrested together with them. I 
showed my passport and said that I was a member of Achalov's 
staff. But the officer said that he did not have an order to 
this effect. 
  [Khinshteyn] How many of your people died? 
  [Barkashov] Two, and 11 were wounded. As we were coming out 
of the White House they somehow got separated from our chain and 
ended up brutally murdered. Their noses and ears were cut off, 
fingers torn apart. (Nothing of this kind is mentioned in the 
forensic report I have seen.--A.Kh.) The "democrats" did this 
out of fear. They thought of themselves as heroes, Rambos, and 
here they are running scared shitless. 
  [Khinshteyn] Did you hide at bases and safehouses after the 
October events? 
  [Barkashov] Partly. There were several safe apartments where 
we lived, because literally in a week I learned that I was on an 
all-Russia fugitive list. I also knew through my own channels in 
the MVD [Ministry of Internal Affairs] that there was an 
advisement not to take live prisoners during the arrest of 
several persons, including myself. 
  [Khinshteyn] How did the assassination attempt on you occur? 
  [Barkashov] It was late night and I was walking along the 
road to Krasnogorsk; I heard the sound of a car in the distance. 
They approached from behind. I did not hear the shots, but felt 
the pain right away. I flagged a passing vehicle. Just in case, 
I let the first one pass me, and then the second--not a 
passenger car--took me to a hospital. 
  [Khinshteyn] Was this an action of our special services? 
Would it have not been easier for them, though, to kill you? 
  [Barkashov] Undoubtedly, it was the special services. 
Perhaps 
it would have been easier to shoot me to death, but things do 
not always come out the way one wants. Also, they may have 
thought that I was armed, too. 
  [Khinshteyn] How did it come out that it was you in the 
hospital? 
  [Barkashov] I do not know. I checked in there under a 
different name, but suddenly general procuracy officers showed 
up and suggested that I move to the MVD hospital. Moreover, they 
said that they did not have a warrant for my arrest. Despite my 
protestations, however, I was transferred there under heavy 
guard. 
  [Khinshteyn] Is it true that the RNE maintains ties with the 
KGB-FCS [Federal Counterintelligence Service]? 
  [Barkashov] Not true. Only a movement that does not have its 
own ideology and strategic goals can be controlled. It can be 
manipulated. The RNE has a clearly enunciated program and 
defined ideas. 
  [Khinshteyn] Do you have people working for special 
services? 
  [Barkashov] In the RNE--no; around it--without a doubt, 
mainly from the Main Protection Directorate. It is impossible 
for an agent to hide his intentions for long. People who come to 
the party resonate with it in their soul. The soul--do you 
understand? One cannot resonate artificially. 
  [Khinshteyn] Do your guys conduct intelligence work? 
  [Barkashov] We have to collect information in opposing 
movements. Those whom we suspect of extremism with respect to 
the Russian people and the Russian nationalist movement, in 
order to protect ourselves and be ready for whatever comes. For 
instance, I consider Beytar such an organization. 
  [Khinshteyn] How many members are there in the RNE? 
  [Barkashov] In Moscow--1,500; across Russia--about 15,000. 
This is just the confederates. 
  [Khinshteyn] God forbid, you come to power. Will there be 
pogroms? 
  [Barkashov] What nonsense. Serious people always start with 
important things. 
  [Khinshteyn] You mean pogroms are unimportant? 
  [Barkashov] Nonsense. Are we going after anybody now? We do 
not even bother MOSKOVSKIY KOMSOMOLETS, and never will. 
  [Khinshteyn] Will you let people emigrate? Yeltsin, for 
instance? 
  [Barkashov] If people disagree with our policy, they will be 
free to leave. But if they have committed crimes, they must be 
tried. In any case, this applies to the current government. 
Their activities will have to be investigated. 
  [Khinshteyn] And when will this happen? 
  [Barkashov] In a year, a year and a half. Definitely within 
two years. Time works in our favor. We will build an objective 
opinion, will get the support of the majority of the population, 
and will absolutely legitimately come to power. When I was in 
prison I was asked to run in absentia in four non-Moscow 
districts, and I am 98 percent certain that I would have won. 
What for, though? 
  [Khinshteyn] I see you have a volume of Hitler on the 
bookshelf. Do you like him? 
  [Barkashov] And why do you not notice that I have Rozanov or 
Blavatskaya? As to Hitler... I like what he did for his country. 
  [Khinshteyn] Are you for concentration camps? 
  [Barkashov] No, I am against it. I tell my wife: Do not 
plant 
potatoes. When she does the weeding, collects bugs, my heart 
aches. I imagine a concentration camp. 
  [Khinshteyn] You sound like such a humanist. Like Romain 
Rolland. 
  [Barkashov] Do not say this. I am a true humanist. A natural 
one. It is the state that concerns itself with idiots while 
millions of Russian children are not provided with elementary 
rations. We need to take care of normal children. 
  [Khinshteyn] Since your release have you seen any of your 
White House confederates? 
  [Barkashov] Those I wanted to see I already have. After all, 
I am ill--can my friends not visit me? Zhirinovskiy came; he sat 
in that very chair. We put away a bottle of cognac to my health. 
  [Khinshteyn] Is it true that you were an instructor in 
Egypt? 
  [Barkashov] I trained in a special unit training 
international soldiers for the Near East, but did not get a 
chance to fight: The president of Egypt refused our aid; 
although I did write memorandums asking to send volunteers to 
fight on the side of the oppressed Arab proper suffering from 
Israel's aggressive policy. So what--I like justice; there us 
such a trait among Russians. I transferred to reserves in the 
rank of senior sergeant. Now I am a corporal. How? I took two 
stripes off and became a corporal. 
  [Khinshteyn] I just cannot figure it out: Would it not be 
easier to ban you? 
  [Barkashov] It will not work. We act within the boundaries 
of 
the current law. We do not have shock troopers--people, carrying 
arms--and neither do we have arms; we never have. That we are 
better prepared for some actions than others is a result of 
discipline. While other parties gather together only once a year 
for a rally, we work daily. We sponsor plants, educational 
institutions, military units. Our guys go there regularly, sell 
newspapers, conduct political propaganda. But we cannot be 
charged with anything. One has to present one's thoughts 
correctly. 
  [Khinshteyn] But you did arm yourselves with submachine 
guns, 
did you not? 
  [Barkashov] I did, and I fired it. We had an order from the 
Supreme Soviet: protect peaceful demonstrators from being shot 
at. An order from a legitimately elected authority. 
  [Khinshteyn] That is, there is nothing to get you on? 
  [Barkashov] All right, so they kept me in prison. What did 
they achieve? Only a rise in our authority. Of course, it is 
better for them to let us go. 
  [Khinshteyn] Aleksandr Petrovich, are you a fascist? 
  [Barkashov] I am for national revival and justice for all, 
without degeneration of the Russian nation. If this is called 
national-socialism, I am a national-socialist. 
  [Khinshteyn] Are there people in the current government of 
Russia who support you? 
  [Barkashov] I do not know... 
  [Khinshteyn] Or perhaps you do not want to say? 
  [Barkashov] Perhaps. Do not ask questions to which you 
cannot 
get an answer. [end Barkashov] 
  As we parted, Barkashov, who promised to accept me into 
the RNE if I a) change my convictions, b) agree with the 
program, and c) actively work, gave me an escort. "So that you 
do not get beaten up," he explained. Emerging onto the street, 
my escort waved to someone invisible. Meaning, it is all right. 
One of ours. It was a somewhat hasty assumption. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68536 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Majority Party' Appeal </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Majority Party' Appeal </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0632B Moscow ROSSIYA in Russian No 14, 13-19 Apr 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0632B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> ["Appeal of the Majority Party Political Council to all </F>
Parties and Public Associations, to the Citizens of Russia": 
"Conciliation Requires Charity"] 
  [Text] Dear compatriots! 
  A wave of rallies is again spilling out onto the streets of 
Russian cities, there is a search again for who is right and who 
is wrong, while politicians still busy themselves only with 
disparaging one another and wasting time on fruitless 
discussions. This was demonstrated especially graphically during 
the sad half-year commemoration of the October 1993 tragedy. 
  In this situation we--a party of the middle class, a party 
of 
stability, legality, and patriotism, a party that rejects 
extremism--proclaim once again that we intend to strive for 
civil peace and well-being through concrete deeds. Within the 
framework of our economic program we are preparing radical 
reform of the taxation system and agricultural production. We 
are implementing projects in the area of culture, sports, 
education, and health care. 
  During these difficult days for Russia we are undertaking a 
new initiative capable of becoming a basis for cooperation 
between all political parties and other public associations for 
the purpose of consolidating Russia and achieving civil peace. 
We are opening a special account, money from which will go 
to help families of those who died in the October 1993 clashes, 
regardless of whose side they were on. The Majority Party 
is making a contribution to this account, which will enable us 
to provide at least 5 million rubles [R] for each family. 
  We urge citizens of Russia, parties, and other organizations 
to contribute to the extent possible, thereby showing a true 
desire for civil peace. Let those representing different views 
bow their heads at the yet-not-erected monument to the victims 
of the October tragedy and take a step toward one another. 
  By 1 June of this year we promise to make public the names 
of 
parties and other associations and the names of 
citizens-participants in the noble action, and invite them to 
take part in the observer council, which will distribute the 
money collected. In the month of June all money deposited into 
the special account will be transferred to accounts of those for 
whom they are intended, as well as spent for commemoration of 
the victims of October events. 
  Our particulars: KB KhELP, correspondent account 115161600 
of 
the Moscow Oblast main administration's clearing center of the 
Central Bank of Russia, interbranch turnover No. 211004, account 
700008, the Majority Party. When transferring money, please make 
the notation: participation in the "October-93" action. 
  Our address: 6, 2 Ochakovskiy Lane, Moscow 119361. 
Telephone 430-70-80. 
  [Signed] On behalf of the Majority Party Political Council, 
Majority Party Chairman Vyacheslav Grechnev 
  ROSSIYA supports the initiative of the Majority Party and 
intends to print the names of its participants. National 
reconciliation is only possible when mercy toward the fallen 
becomes a national affair. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68537 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr050___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-050 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Women's Duma Faction Leader Interviewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Women's Duma Faction Leader Interviewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0650A Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian No 16, 22-28 
Apr 94 p 4 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0650A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with State Duma Deputy Yekaterina Lakhova by Anna </F>
Politkovskaya under the rubric "In the Changing World": "Sex and 
Politics. Yekaterina Lakhova, State Duma Deputy: `I Am Very Much 
Afraid of Little Men.' And From This Follows..."] 
  [Text] On that day she received an invitation to lunch with 
Minister of Foreign Affairs Mr. Kozyrev, and the next morning 
brought an attractive note with a request to "greet His 
Excellency the Ambassador..."--and so each day in the capital 
goes in meetings, hearings, lunches, and also official dinners 
and suppers. Yekaterina Filippovna Lakhova, once a Sverdlovsk 
nurse and then a physician and worker in the public health 
department, knows why she is in Moscow--she is making a 
political career here. She runs around as though on a treadmill; 
it is not easy for her mainly because she is a woman and women 
in Russia, no matter what you say, have their own strictly 
defined place. It is even very difficult for her because in the 
country now are times when even if careers are begun in a second 
they are destroyed in a minute. But she is counting on 
stability, her feminine nature itself tells her that the main 
things are equilibrium, composure, and steadfastness. 
  So she has a large men's briefcase filled with papers in her 
hands, none of these coquettish women's purses, a severe dark 
dress that ignores the trends of fashion, her hair stiff with 
spray from the hair dresser, very high heels even though she is 
tall, a statuesque figure, a purely businesslike walk with torso 
facing forward, and very pretty eyes with moderate, tasteful 
makeup--all this is Yekaterina Filippovna Lakhova, a wife, 
mother, grandmother, chairman of the Duma political faction 
Women of Russia, and a recent adviser to the president. In 
brief, as much as necessary a nomenklatura worker of the 
post-communist period of the middle of the nineties. 
Understandably, there were women like her in the domestic upper 
echelons previously as well--there was the journalist Galina 
Semenova, whom Mikhail Gorbachev made the first woman member of 
the Politburo. They too were sympathetic, businesslike, and 
well-groomed but still one could sense in them a certain strong 
sense of inferiority, which they themselves clearly recognized: 
They were allowed to be with the men who were creating policy 
but they themselves had nothing to say about it. The most they 
could hope for would be to say at a convenient moment that women 
should not have to work on the night shifts. 
  Lakhova is a new type of domestic woman who is ever more 
insistently entering the political scene and ever more 
persistently demanding to be heard as equals. Having 
deliberately chosen their path, these people will not abandon it 
but will proceed persistently to their chosen goal, without 
getting too involved in the gender problem. The Women of Russia 
faction has placed its bets on the women of Russia and speaks on 
their behalf today although, in principle, the women of Russia 
have not especially requested this. Nonetheless the deed has 
been done and we women have to take a good look at those who 
have made us their goal and their means. 
  [Politkovskaya] How do you picture the ideal man? 
  [Lakhova] First of all a man must be intelligent but he does 
not have to be attractive. I do not think that a man should be 
very short because this involves a negative complex. I am very 
wary of short men and I try not to get into conversations or 
disputes with them because this will end in nothing good--they 
are all Napoleons. It is very dangerous when a manager is a man 
who is short. Also very important to me in a man are 
responsibility and honesty. A man should be a person of his 
word: If he has said something he must do it, I do not like 
loudmouths. 
  [Politkovskaya] In your view, does your feminine 
attractiveness and your sexuality play a role in the successes 
you are achieving in parliamentary activity? 
  [Lakhova] I must agree that men evaluate women above all 
according to purely external factors and after that they listen 
to what "she" says and how she says it. Yes, in today's Russia 
external attractiveness is a considerable factor. 
  [Politkovskaya] Is there a "ceiling" on the opportunities 
for 
women politicians in Russia today? 
  [Lakhova] No, there is not, everything depends on the woman. 
I agree with the assertion that if a woman sets for herself some 
clear goal she will always achieve it. Incidentally, I have not 
even set a special goal for myself. I ended up among the 
people's deputies of the RSFSR rather by chance--the Sverdlovsk 
hospitals nominated me although I had declined twice before. But 
the doctors said that it was necessary at the level of the 
Supreme Soviet to try to get to the problems that could not be 
handled at the oblast level at all. 
  [Politkovskaya] Did your political career develop randomly? 
  [Lakhova] I did not even have a political career of any 
kind. 
  [Politkovskaya] But you are already on top. 
  [Lakhova] Where is on top!... I was in the Supreme Soviet 
and 
now I am in the Duma--both of them, in my opinion, are at the 
same level. I was an adviser to the president. I entered the 
last elections so that the experience I had gained as an adviser 
to Boris Nikolayevich regarding questions of family, maternity, 
and childhood could be applied in the new political women's 
movement. Of course, when I came to the Supreme Soviet my 
political life was no longer developing randomly. When I gave my 
consent to become an adviser to the president that was a 
thoroughly considered decision: To me it was important for the 
policy I implemented in parliament to be implemented in the 
executive organs as well. I have the same goals now, in the Duma. 
  [Politkovskaya] Have you been a leader since childhood? 
  [Lakhova] No, I was not especially a leader--either along 
party or along political lines. I was always older--first in the 
class and then in my course, and I was chairman of the local 
committee in the hospital. 
  [Politkovskaya] What do you personally like about political 
life and this battle? 
  [Lakhova] It is very difficult and I cannot say that I like 
it very much. But it is something that has to be done. We do not 
have a culture of interrelations among various political forces. 
The opposition could work more constructively and not be in 
opposition all the time. It seems to me that it is very 
important that we women have appeared in parliament and are 
trying to provide a peace-making buffer, and we think that we 
have succeeded in doing this to a certain degree during the past 
three months. 
  [Politkovskaya] Do you think that perhaps a woman will 
become 
president of Russia in the next few years? Someone like you, for 
example? 
  [Lakhova] In the next few years, I do not think so. We must 
see how prepared our society is. Although we were well supported 
in the last elections this was largely an advance. Perhaps 
everyone would like to be a Napoleon.... 
  [Politkovskaya] What do you personally lack that keeps you 
from becoming the president of our immense country? 
  [Lakhova] I have not thought about this. The people must 
determine this. If the society has such a need and if the people 
give the corresponding assessments, then it would be possible. 
At one time they gave Boris Nikolayevich the benefit of the 
doubt, after all, he did not start at the top. Moreover, while 
in the Scandinavian countries there are women presidents, and in 
Turkey and Pakistan there are women prime ministers, I do not 
think our Russian women are any worse. Perhaps our first woman 
president of Russia is growing up somewhere right now. 
  [Politkovskaya] Could such a woman as Irina Khakamada be 
president or prime minister? 
  [Lakhova] While I have sympathy for Irina I do not think 
that 
she could aspire to this role. In my opinion, she is afraid of 
women and is not aware of purely women's problems. I see that 
she is even communicating with men more and more in parliament. 
The idea she is putting forth now is a very dangerous one that 
greatly disturbs women's organizations. This is the idea of 
adopting a law that would allow women with children under six 
years of age to stay at home and receive wages for this. I am 
convinced that this would lead to dire consequences. The network 
of preschool institutions would fall apart and women's 
employment--to which European women are striving so hard--would 
decline. And not every woman today can sit at home, 14 percent 
of us are single women with children. How would they manage 
this? On the small wage that would be given for a child? That is 
simply absurd. It is impossible not to think that to sit at home 
for six hours a day would automatically mean to lose your 
skills. I have spoken about this with Irina and she understands 
everything and even the fact that the Duma might very well not 
adopt such a law. But even the failure to adopt it would be 
advantageous for Irina. And it seems to me that it is wrong to 
create your own image this way. We must really understand 
women's problems today. 
  [Politkovskaya] In your view, what are Russian women 
suffering from most today? 
  [Lakhova] How can I answer this?... Yes, everything is 
absolutely a burden on them today. Regardless of which problem 
you take, they are suffering everywhere. There is obvious 
discrimination against women. Even in politics: There, when 
decisions are made, we women are practically not represented. 
This is shown by the composition of today's government, which 
included only Ella Pamfilova, and she is no longer there. At 
recent parliamentary hearings on the budget professor of 
economics Oksana Dmitriyeva from Moscow, a deputy from the 
Yabloko faction, spoke. Simply a genius! To put it crudely, she 
is head and shoulders above all of our men. How she understands 
the budget! How remarkably she thinks! I said: Even though she 
is not in our faction, we will nominate Oksana Dmitriyeva as a 
candidate to the post of minister of finance of the Russian 
Federation. If we had managed to get women in the places where 
decisions are made--even 30 percent--these decisions would 
probably be more harmonious. 
  As for parliament, were it not for our women's movement, 
Women of Russia, only five percent would be women, and we 
immediately made it 11.3 percent. If you take the local level, 
the situation is altogether different. We were just recently in 
Novosibirsk, Omsk, and Tomsk, where elections to oblast dumas 
were held, and there is simply not a single woman in them! 
Everyone knows that 75 percent of the unemployed in Russia are 
women, but this does not change anything. Women and men have 
completely different rights when it comes to hiring and firing. 
If a woman is hired the first thing they ask is her age and the 
second thing--how many children and how old they are. Men are 
never asked these questions--they are evaluated only according 
to their professional qualities. The Union of Woman of Russia 
went with legal experts to the judicial chamber for control of 
the mass media under the president--and this is the first 
president--to have them reprimand many newspapers for the fact 
that their advertising of work is discriminatory toward women. 
For example, "We invite everyone except women to work." Or: "We 
invite women without children to work." 
  Take, for example, even the functions to which they like to 
assign us women--family, childbirth, and education. Today a 
woman cannot even normally exercise her age old reproductive 
rights because the death rate of children and mothers is very 
high and in terms of abortions we occupy second place in the 
world after Romania (for every birth we have 2.5 abortions). Is 
this not a problem? But our men today do not think there is any 
need to do anything about the abortion problem at all. They 
continue to think that this is purely a woman's problem and not 
a state problem. 
  [Politkovskaya] In what country would you personally like to 
be a woman? 
  [Lakhova] I have not visited many of them but from all the 
documents we receive from the UN, women are in the best position 
in the Scandinavian countries. Their social status is very high 
there. In the parliament of Finland about 40 percent are women. 
Are they really any worse off in Finland because of this? But I 
personally like living in Russia. I would like very much for our 
women to be aware that we too can do something, to understand 
that even what we did before the elections--we created a 
precedent for the political movement of Women of Russia and the 
corresponding voter bloc--that is a world precedent, there is no 
such thing anywhere else in the world, and now European women's 
movements are coming to study our experience. The Russian woman 
is strong, patient, and very resourceful. 
  [Politkovskaya] How close are you to the ideas of feminism? 
  [Lakhova] Everyone understands feminism in their own way and 
many disapprove of it. Defending the rights of women and 
achieving a policy of equal opportunity--this is the essence of 
feminism. And in this sense I am a feminist. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68538 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94040" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Russian Business Elite Detailed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Russian Business Elite Detailed </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA Experts </H4>

<F P=102> 944E0766C Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 26 Apr 94 pp 
1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0766C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Listing of experts from the mass media and other areas] </F>
  [Text] 
<H5>  Economics Commentators from SMI [the mass media]: </H5>
  Andreyev, V.G. (EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN newspaper), Berger, M.L. 
(IZVESTIYA), Biryukov, V.O. (DELOVYYE LYUDI magazine), Vedev, 
A.L. (the "Vedi" Publishing Group), Vikhrov, A.N. (the weekly 
MERKURIY), Gorlenko, V.F. (TRUD), Gurevich, V.S. (MOSKOVSKIYE 
NOVOSTI), Zasurskiy, I.I. (NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA), Karpov, S.R. 
(Russian Comercial Information Agency), Kirichenko, N. 
(KOMMERSANT-DAILY), Kirpichnikov, Yu.A. (DELOVOY MIR newspaper), 
Klimenko, I.F. (MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI), Kovachich, A.Yu. ("Vedi" 
Publishing Group), Kondratyev, A.Yu. (KOMMERSANT-DAILY), 
Kopyshta, Ye.I. (KURANTY), Krasnyanskiy, E.V. (TORGOVAYA 
GAZETA), Mitin, S.I. (FINANSOVYYE IZVESTIYA), Narzikulov, R. 
(SEGODNYA newspaper), Proshutinskiy, A. ("Broker" television 
program), Smirnov, A. ("Broker" television program), and 
Urazbayev, N.U. ("Open Radio"). 
<H5>  Economics Analysts: </H5>
  Butrimenko, L.V. (International Center for Scientific and 
Technical Information), Kreynin, I.A. (AEN [Economic News 
Agency]), Sidorov, A.D. (AEN), Turanov, S.A. (AEN), Yakovlev, 
A.A. (Higher Economics School), and Yasin, Ye.G. (RSPP [Russian 
Union of Industrialists and Entrepreneurs] Expert Institute). 
<H5>  Political and Public Figures: </H5>
  Gubernatorov, V.A. (Chamber of Trade and Industry), 
Dorosehnko, R.A. (International Corporation for Assistance to 
the New Economy), Makarevich, L.N. (Association of Russian 
Banks), Pimoshenko, Yu.P. (Union of Innovative Enterprises), 
Shpigel, L.T. (Economic Freedom Party), and others. 
<H5>  Businessmen and Entrepreneurs: </H5>
  Andrianov, V.I. (Tepkobank), Androsov, A.M. ("Menatep" 
Bank), 
Anoshko, N.A. ("Tsentrokredit" Bank), Ashurbeyli, I.R. 
(International Bureau of Information and Telecommunications), 
Batayev, V.V. (Brokinvestservis), Vetrov, A.Yu. (Tepkobank), 
Zatselyapina, M.A. ("Imperial" Bank), Ioffe, A.D. (Small 
Business Assistance Association), Kaluzhskiy, A.V. 
(Sovfintreyd), Laptev, S.Yu. (Moscow Commodities Exchange), 
Levchenko, A.P. ("Inzhener"), Rodomanov, S.I. ("Vest" 
International Association), Rozov, P.Yu. (Metals Exchange), 
Senatorov, M.Yu. ("Information Technologies"), Shulyatyeva, N.A. 
(Russian Union of Small Enterprises), and others. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68539 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94041" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   20 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Decree on Excise Duty for Alcohol, Tobacco Introduced </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Decree on Excise Duty for Alcohol, Tobacco Introduced </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0772A Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 20 Apr 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0772A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Decree No 319 dated 14 April 1994 of the Government of the </F>
Russian Federation, Moscow "On the Introduction of Excise Duty 
Marks on the Territory of the Russian Federation"] 
  [Text] For the purpose of ensuring a full collection of 
excises and preventing an illegal import of goods subject to 
excise duty and their sale on the territory of the Russian 
Federation, the Government of the Russian Federation decrees: 
  1. To establish the procedure for the collection of excises 
in the form of sale of excise duty marks of the established 
model. To introduce mandatory marking on beverage alcohol, wine 
and vodka products, tobacco, and tobacco products. 
  To establish that enterprises producing and importing the 
indicated goods are responsible for the marking of goods subject 
to excise duty. 
  2. To introduce the established procedure for the payment of 
excises: 
  --on tobacco and tobacco products during import into the 
territory of the Russian Federation as of 1 July 1994; 
  --on tobacco and tobacco products of domestic production as 
of 1 July 1994; 
  --on beverage alcohol and wine and vodka products during 
import into the territory of the Russian Federation as of 1 
August 1994. 
  3. The State Inspectorate for Ensuring State Monopoly of 
Alcohol Products under the Government of the Russian Federation 
and the Russian Federation State Tax Service within a 1-month 
period shall submit proposals for setting the dates for the 
introduction of marks of excise duty on beverage alcohol and 
wine and vodka products of domestic production. 
  4. To introduce marking with a special mark confirming the 
legality of import and of the right to sell on the territory of 
the Russian Federation of the above-mentioned goods subject to 
excise duty, which are produced and imported from the territory 
of member states of the Commonwealth of Independent States and 
the Moldova Republic. 
  The Russian Federation Ministry for Cooperation With Member 
States of the Commonwealth of Independent States shall inform 
Commonwealth member states of the introduction of the marking of 
goods subject to excise duty on the territory of the Russian 
Federation. 
  5. As of 1 January 1995 to prohibit the sale of goods 
subject 
to marking on the territory of the Russian Federation without 
the presence of excise duty marks on them. 
  6. The Russian Federation Ministry of Finance, the Russian 
Federation State Tax Service, the Russian Federation State 
Customs Committee, and the Russian Federation Department of Tax 
Police within a 1-month period shall submit proposals for making 
changes in existing legislation providing for administrative and 
criminal responsibility for the violation of the rules of import 
and sale of goods subject to excise duty and marking on the 
territory of the Russian Federation. 
  7. The Russian Federation State Customs Committee and the 
Russian Federation State Tax Service, in coordination with the 
Russian Federation Ministry of Finance, shall develop the 
procedure for the marking of goods subject to excise duty during 
import into the territory of the Russian Federation. 
  The Russian Federation State Customs Committee shall 
determine the list of goods imported into the territory of the 
Russian Federation and subject to marking in accordance with the 
codes of the commodity nomenclature of foreign economic activity. 
  The Russian Federation State Tax Service and the Russian 
Federation Ministry of Finance shall make appropriate changes in 
the Instruction on the Procedure for the Calculation and Payment 
of Excises of the Russian Federation State Tax Service. 
  8. The Russian Federation Ministry of Finance and the 
Russian 
Federation State Customs Committee shall establish models of 
excise duty marks and rules of their application. 
  9. To entrust the Goznak Association with the manufacture of 
excise duty marks. 
  10. The Russian Federation Ministry for Cooperation With 
Member States of the Commonwealth of Independent States, the 
Russian Federation Ministry of Economics, the Russian Federation 
Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations, and the State 
Inspectorate for Ensuring State Monopoly of Alcohol Products 
under the Government of the Russian Federation within a 3-month 
period shall conduct negotiations with Commonwealth member 
states on the introduction of quotas for the import into the 
territory of the Russian Federation of alcohol and tobacco 
products produced and imported from CIS countries and the 
Moldova Republic. 
  11. The Russian Federation Ministry of Finance, jointly with 
the Russian Federation Ministry of Labor, on the recommendation 
of the Russian Federation State Customs Committee, the Russian 
Federation State Tax Service, and the Russian Federation 
Department of Tax Police within a 1-month period shall submit 
proposals for an increase in the authorized strength of customs 
and tax service bodies and proposals on sources of financing of 
expenditures connected with the introduction of the system of 
the marking of goods subject to excise duty. 
  [Signed] V. Chernomyrdin, chairman of the Government of the 
Russian Federation 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68540 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94042" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Peasant Farming Efforts Continue Despite Financing, Credit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Peasant Farming Efforts Continue Despite Financing, Credit </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Problems 

<F P=102>   944K1196A Moscow FINANSOVYYE IZVESTIYA in Russian No 15, 
14-20 Apr 94 p iii </F>

<F P=103> 944K1196A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow FINANSOVYYE IZVESTIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Results of a 3-year analysis of farming sector development </F>
by Olga Melyukhina of AGROKHLEB RIPORT, commissioned by 
FINANSOVYYE IZVESTIYA: "Russia's Peasant Farms Are at a 
Financial Impasse"] 
  [Text] With the overall recession in agriculture, 
production is being expanded in the farming sector. And this is 
despite the fact that the credit noose is forcing many farmers 
to abandon the work they started. Since 1 November 1993, 
punitive sanctions of up to 420 percent have been introduced for 
failure to repay credits issued at the expense of centralized 
resources. 
  At the very beginning of the agrarian reform, one of the key 
ideas was the formation of a fundamentally new type of 
agricultural enterprise--the peasant farm. A small peasant 
farm,, managed by its owners and based on their labor, was to 
become an alternative to large-scale production and the 
epicenter of reform for the sector. 
  The Law "On the Peasant Farm" became one of the first acts 
of 
the agrarian reform. It has been 3 years since the new social 
order was established by law, and today there are 270,000 
peasant farms in Russia (See Table 1). Over these years, it 
appeared that farming's development repeated the dynamics of the 
agrarian reform itself. While 1991 may be called the year of the 
sudden start and 1992 the year of the rapid growth of the 
farming sector, 1993 saw a slowdown in the pace of forming new 
peasant farms. Moreover, the number of farms discontinuing their 
activity has begun to increase--as many disappeared in the last 
3 months of 1993 alone as in all of 1992 (See Table 2). 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 1. Number and Land Area of Peasant Farms in Russia (as of 1 January) | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |1991              |1992              |1993              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Number of peasant |49,000            |182,800           |270,000           | 
|farms registered  |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Area of land plot-|2.1               |7.8               |11.3              | 
|s granted to them,|                  |                  |                  | 
| in millions of h-|                  |                  |                  | 
|ectares           |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Average size of l-|42                |43                |42                | 
|and plot, in hect-|                  |                  |                  | 
|ares              |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 2. Number of Peasant Farms in Russia Which Were Formed and Discontin-| 
|ued Activity in 1992 and 1993                                              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |Number of New Far-|Number of Farms Which Discontinued A-| 
|                  |ms                |ctivity                              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |                  |Altogether        |For Each 100 Esta-| 
|                  |                  |                  |blished During Th-| 
|                  |                  |                  |is Period         | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1992              |138,900           |5,100             |4                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1993              |101,200           |14,100            |14                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|First quarter     |49,500            |2,500             |5                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Second quarter    |31,600            |3,300             |10                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Third quarter     |10,500            |3,300             |31                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Fourth quarter    |9,600             |5,000             |52                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  This sad trend provided grounds for the skeptics to maintain 
right away that farming has exhausted the reserves for its 
development and that this social structure is not firmly 
grounded in our economy. However, the results of its development 
over 3 years attests to the fact that the contribution of 
peasant farms to overall agricultural production is increasing 
(See Table 3). While there is an overall recession in 
agriculture, production is expanding in the farming sector. For 
example, the production of grain, sugar beets, meat, and milk 
was roughly doubled and egg production increased by five times 
as much on peasant farms in the past year. Over the past year, 
which was extremely difficult for a sensitive sector such as 
livestock breeding, the number of basic types of livestock 
increased by 1.5 times as much on peasant farms, while it 
continued to decrease on collective farms. So it is at least 
premature to talk about reserves being exhausted in the farming 
sector. 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 3. Proportion of Peasant Farms in Russian Agricultural Production (i-| 
|n Percent)                                                                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |1991              |1992              |1993              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Grain (in weight  |0.2               |2.1               |5,0               | 
|after processing) |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sugar beets (indu-|0.03              |2.0               |3.9               | 
|strial)           |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sunflower seeds   |0.4               |5.8               |10.0              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Potatoes          |0.2               |0.8               |1.0               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Vegetables        |0.2               |0.8               |1.0               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Meat (live weight)|0.1               |0.8               |1.7               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Milk              |0.08              |0.4               |1.1               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Eggs              |0.00              |0.05              |0.2               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  It is doubtful that the slowdown in the formation of new 
peasant farms and the increase in the number of existing farms 
that are disappearing are related to natural inviability of the 
farm structure. This is its completely "healthy" reaction to the 
extreme conditions in agriculture at present. Maintaining 
production, and especially organizing new production, becomes 
more like a feat in such a situation. 
  The sorest point today is financial survival. For the 
peasant 
farms, this is primarily a problem of the availability and 
accessibility of loan capital. In 1993, short-term loans made up 
about 56 percent of the peasant farms' production expenditures, 
and long-term loans made up 58 percent of their capital 
investments. The granting of credit to the farms has depended 
almost entirely on state support. Centralized credit resources 
were provided for them at favorable interest rates and budget 
funds were allocated for credit guarantees. 
  However, the favorable conditions dwindled from year to 
year. 
According to data from the AKKOR [Association of Peasant Farms 
and Agricultural Cooperatives of Russia], one peasant farm 
received an average of 30,000 rubles [R] of loan capital in real 
terms in 1991, R4,500 in 1992, and just R1,000 in 1993. In this 
case, the credits simply had to be won back. For example, in 
1992 the farmers were able to obtain most of the centralized 
credits allocated for the year in December alone. It has become 
harder and harder to gain access to long-term loans. Over the 
past 3 years, the proportion of them in overall credit resources 
being allocated has been reduced, and no loans for construction 
were allocated in 1993 at all. The peasant farms' need for 
long-term loans in 1994 is estimated at R2.1 trillion. This is 
at a time when the government has planned to allocate R2.6 
trillion for the entire agroindustrial complex. How much of this 
sum will actually be transferred and how much will go to the 
peasant farms? 
  There has also been considerable difficulty in providing 
credit on favorable terms. Banks were compensated very late for 
the difference between the favorable rate and the Central Bank's 
prime rate. As a result, the banks simply refused to grant loans 
on favorable terms or made up the difference at the farmers' 
expense. The decision was made in September 1993 to discontinue 
extending credit at favorable rates. While before this the 
peasant farms paid for the credits provided from centralized 
resources at the rate of 28 percent, this rate jumped up to 213 
percent beginning in November 1993, and penalties of up to 420 
percent were introduced for failure to pay back the amount owed. 
By this time, the number of newly established peasant farms fell 
to its lowest point, where it remained until the end of the 
year, and the number of farms falling apart began rising quickly. 
  After the extension of credit on favorable terms was 
abolished, the government promised to introduce alternative 
measures of support. In particular, farmers were to be granted 
the right to pay interest on loans received in 1992 and 1993 
after the sale of their harvest. This deferment was ultimately 
granted, but it was extended only to a small proportion of the 
loans (about 10 to 20 percent), which could not alleviate the 
farmers' financial situation substantially. 
  Budget appropriations to form the charter capital for 
peasant 
farm banks and insurance companies were another measure in the 
federal program for supporting the peasant farms in 1993. They 
were planned in the amount of R6 billion last year, but as a 
result these funds were not allocated at all. Moreover, the 
peasant farm banks are now in a very difficult situation, since 
they have not been compensated from the budget for the 
difference in the interest for farmers' loans in 1994. 
  So the peasant farms find thsmelves in a situation today in 
which financing sources for development are simply becoming 
inaccessible, the interest on their debts is eating up current 
income, and state support is gradually being removed. There is 
no reason to believe that the situation will change in the 
foreseeable future, and we can expect the recession in the farm 
movement to continue. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68541 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94043" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Decline in Moscow's Foodstuff Production for March Seen </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Decline in Moscow's Foodstuff Production for March Seen </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0750A Moscow FINANSOVYE IZVESTIYA in Russian No 17, 
21-27 Apr 94 p II </F>

<F P=103> 944E0750A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow FINANSOVYE IZVESTIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Andrey Yakovlev, economist: "A Slump Has Begun </F>
in Moscow's Foodstuff Market"] 
  [Text] At the end of March, along with the traditional poll 
of private wholesale firms, the Institute of Organized Market 
Research and the Higher School of Economics polled, for the 
first time, the directors of state and privatized wholesale 
trade enterprises operating in the foodstuff market. The 
selection included meat and fish refrigeration plants, dairy 
combines, vegetable warehouses, firms trading in groceries, 
canned goods, wine and spirits items, etc. The results of the 
poll make it possible to draw a conclusion as to the essential 
differences in the evaluations of the current market situation 
made by representatives of the former state food trading 
enterprises and private firms. 
  The general deterioration in the situation in wholesale 
trade 
in foodstuffs in Moscow, which was observed in both sectors of 
the market, can be singled out as the main trend for the month. 
At the same time, while for private firms it was accompanied by 
a noticeable drop in trade turnover, estimates of the volume of 
sales in the past month made by the directors of state and 
privatized enterprises on the whole proved to be favorable. At 
the same time, the predictions and expectations of private 
wholesalers for the next quarter remained considerably higher. 
  The dynamics of the wholesale prices also differed. 
Twenty-six percent of the private wholesalers raised their 
prices in March, and the same number dropped them. As a result, 
on the whole for this sector of the market, a "zero" rise in 
prices was noted for the first time. Conversely, in the state 
sector, 50 percent of the firms polled raised their prices, and 
not a single one began lowering them. Higher inflationary 
expectations were also characteristic for state trade. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-051-83A>      FIGURE </FIG>


  In our opinion, the difference in the estimates of the 
current market situation and the predictions made by respondents 
of INIOR [Institute of Organized Market Research] and VShE 
[Higher School of Economics] were caused, in the first place by 
the varied trade assortment. Food commodities in daily demand, 
as before, were to a considerable extent sold through the former 
state wholesale bases. It is obvious that, by virtue of the poor 
elasticity of demand, the drop in trade turnover here proves 
smaller, and the potentials for a further rise in prices 
--greater than for the commodity products list characteristic of 
private trade. 
  In the second place, the more flexible and quicker reaction 
of the private trade firms to an unfavorable change in the 
system of foreign economic regulation might play a certain role. 
According to the estimates of INIOR and VShE specialists, the 
forthcoming March introduction of new customs duties was 
reflected in the prices of Moscow private trade as far back as 
January-February. It is this (and not just the reserves 
accumulated) that made it possible for them to avoid raising 
prices in March. The state and privatized enterprises, on the 
contrary, follow the change in the foreign conditions of the 
functioning market in their price policy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68542 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94044" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   9 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Activities of Crime `Generals' Viewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Activities of Crime `Generals' Viewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0631A Moscow PODMOSKOVYE in Russian 9 Apr 94 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0631A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow PODMOSKOVYE </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Nikolay Modestov: "`Generals' of the Crime </F>
World"] 
  [Text] [begin boxed item] "Listen, something has to be 
done. Last year Globe was shot, Arsen and Givi died... And how 
did this year begin? Bobon was killed--who, what for..." 
  "It is time to get together and think about what to do next. 
We cannot put up with this..." 
  --From a telephone conversation between Yaponchik, a crime 
boss, and Tayvanchik, an authority in the crime world, who now 
live abroad. (From Interpol radio intercept) [end boxed item] 
<H5>  Where Did You Get It? I Bought It! </H5>
  Gray, pale-faced, in typical dirty pea jackets, the 
prisoners 
appear to be a monotonous mass only to the uninitiated. Special 
laws exist that are consistently and rigorously observed by 
everyone without exception in the "world behind prison bars." 
There is a unique hierarchy here, where everyone knows his place 
and value. The elite of the criminal world--the "crime bosses" 
["vor v zakone"]--are at the very top in the rank of untouchable 
authorities who are considered the main custodians of criminal 
traditions and the "correct" way of life. 
  According to information of the USSR Ministry of Internal 
Affairs, the number of "crime bosses" ["vor"] on the territory 
of the former superpower was approaching 600. There are fewer in 
Russia today. It is difficult to name an exact figure--"crime 
bosses" ["zakonnik"] do not have a union, and militia employees 
use operational information and agent sources exclusively. The 
number of crime bosses from the Baltics to the shores of the 
Pacific Ocean is numbered at about 200 today. The drop in the 
number of "generals" in the crime world is explained not only by 
the collapse of the Union (some of the crime bosses live outside 
Russia) and their death (not always natural). Many, hiding from 
law enforcement organs after accumulating a considerable amount 
of capital, moved to the West happily, which however does not 
hinder them from carrying out their main function--overseeing, 
managing, and performing the role of arbitration tribunal of the 
criminal brotherhood. 
  By far not everyone can become a crime boss. It is not 
enough 
to have the reputation of a "hard-boiled" person and a long 
"service record" under various articles of the Criminal Code. 
(Although a crime boss is obliged to have "walks"--that is, to 
spend time behind barbwire.) The main thing is esteem and a 
respectful reputation among criminals, and the authority and 
ability to "resolve problems." According to unwritten rules, in 
the old days a crime boss did not have the right to create a 
family, under no circumstances was he supposed to work, and he 
was forbidden from engaging in hoarding money. He could satisfy 
any desire, taking money from the common fund--a kind of 
thieves' open account. Once, for observance of these canons, the 
crime bosses entered into a conflict with camp and prison 
administrations, and they even cut off their fingers so that 
they would not have to go to work. But in recent decades the 
traditions, while retaining the main ingredients, have 
experienced significant changes. 
  Today a crime boss is not obliged to be above making money. 
The crime bosses of the new "call-up," to the indignation of 
authorities inclined to nostalgic grumbling over the past, did 
not always spend a lot of time in a camp; in other words--they 
did not have the equivalent experience of camp life of the crime 
boss. But the main thing, in the opinion of informed operatives, 
is that the procedure of the "coronation" itself is already far 
from ideal. It is known, for example, that in recent years many 
wealthy representatives of the criminal Caucasus even bought 
prestigious ranks. (The Georgians, as the detectives think, 
especially transgressed in this way, receiving their countrymen 
for an appropriate payment to the criminal common fund.) 
Incidentally, the last circumstance partly explains the less 
respectful attitude toward the title of "crime boss" on the part 
of young people who have chosen "life outside the law." 
<H5>  Chocolate and Cognac--to the Cell </H5>
  The arrival of a crime boss in the prison area or solitary 
confinement cell is known long before his appearance. The 
world's most reliable communications system operates between 
transit prisons. The esteemed guest is properly met--he is given 
the best place in the cell or barracks, he is assigned a special 
person--something in the nature of an orderly. 
  The administration of the camp also eagerly accepts this. A 
strong crime boss, with whom contact is made, helps maintain 
order among the criminals, and guarantees that the necessary 
number of "muzhiks" appear for work and the necessary 
productivity. Thus, Perm crime boss Yakutenok had in Colony No. 
12 in Nizhniy Tagil (where he spent his last term) a clean room 
in the medical block, cognac, tea, chocolate, and drugs. What is 
more, Yakutenok directed his countrymen from the zone by 
telephone, determining the "policy" of the criminal world. On 
his release from the zone an apartment with an armor-plated door 
and a brand new Zhiguli passenger car awaited Yakutenok. 
  How the crime bosses conduct a court of "honor" can be 
imagined from the situation in Sailors' Rest Prison. As I was 
told by an acquaintance detective, whose ward is now sitting in 
the famous investigative solitary confinement cell No. 1, two 
crime bosses there call the shots. On their orders, the 
good-for-nothings who committed an offense, gave false 
information, or are militia accomplices, or suspected of being 
informers, are thrown from a double bunk bed onto a cement 
floor. After such "falls in their sleep" (of course, not one 
victim will tell the real reason), the person is sent to the 
infirmary for a long time and, if he survives, it is unlikely 
that he will remain healthy. But what is to be done? Not only is 
the crime boss supposed to live according to the "law," but also 
to watch over its fulfillment by the brotherhood. 
  It is interesting that in cases of disrespectful treatment 
toward himself the crime boss is supposed to prove his 
superiority. How and with what methods is his business, but a 
lapse denotes in the eyes of others a loss of authority for the 
crime boss, and consequently his loss of title. In this sense 
the history of the well-known crime boss Kalin, whose godson was 
Yaponchik, an even more famous patriarch of the criminal world, 
is indicative. 
  Kalin did not enjoy any special respect. He was a musician, 
he respected the "laws" and was proud of it. But according to 
the opinion of many, he was not drawn to becoming a real crime 
boss. One day he was enjoying himself in the Olympus Restaurant 
in Luzhniki. At the next table, to his misfortune, a certain 
Mansur Shelkovnikov was relaxing in a civilized way--he was a 
very "tough" authority and the leader of one of the Moscow 
groups, and in addition had a black belt in karate. When Kalin 
got especially noisy, Mansur made a comment to him. Things went 
from bad to worse, a verbal altercation ensued, insults were 
thrown, which for a crime boss who respected himself were 
dishonorable. Kalin, understandably, was not in comparable 
physical condition to Shelkovnikov. Indeed, why did he need to 
be? He took out a knife, and with one blow laid him out on the 
spot. He killed him. Then he got up and left, taking advantage 
of the turmoil and confusion. He was accused of murder and 
arrested, but... 
  Nevertheless, the story ends sadly for Kalin. Within two 
years he was killed by a shot in the head from a Makarov pistol. 
Some frail lad in a sports cap pulled down over his eyes did the 
shooting. He performed his deed and left quietly in the 
direction of a residential area. The name of the murderer is not 
known to this day. 
<H5>  It Is Simply that "Crime Bosses" Are Not Killed This Way </H5>
  Kalin's death seems to have opened up a series of 
sensational 
and always unexpected murders of crime bosses and authorities of 
the crime world. 
  Of course, various ones were killed previously as well. But 
it goes without saying, not in such numbers, and the main thing 
is that they were not as influential and noticeable in our 
normal lives. However, the situation in Russia has changed, 
economic policy has changed, and a majority of mafiosi, not 
wanting to lag behind the times, have thrown themselves into 
commerce, racketeering, and questionable and openly criminal 
business; they have become a real force. Therefore the death 
of any one of them is turned into an event not only for 
criminals but also for business people, the "new Russians," and 
even the politicians. 
  In Vladivostok crime boss Banin, nicknamed Bandit, a former 
sportsman and serviceman, has actively engaged in commerce. 
During a "showdown" competitors killed Bandit and two of his 
bodyguards, and the corpses were burned. Crime boss Ankundinov, 
nicknamed Mistress, a native of Saratov Oblast, was killed. The 
day before, literally sensing death, he transferred the right of 
law enforcer to Banin and Kitayev (nicknamed Chinaman). Vasin, a 
native of Chita and well-known as "Gem," became a crime boss, 
and until recently controlled a huge territory in the 
Trans-Urals. Crime boss Yablochko took control over Samara, 
Togliatti, Novokuybyshevsk, Chapayevsk... 
  The largest concentration of crime bosses, as might be 
expected, is in the capital region. Even those who control the 
remote areas prefer to live closer to the capital. It is here 
that the paths of the authorities cross in the event of the 
resolution of questionable territorial financial questions, and 
it is from here that many famous names--Yaponchik, 
Tayvanchik--left to go abroad, and Isayev, nicknamed Signature, 
one of the crime bosses of the new formation, left to cross the 
ocean. He is worth talking about in more detail. 
  It is said that Signature was crowned on the recommendation 
of Yaponchik especially to squeeze the Caucasus element out of 
Moscow. And Signature took on the job smartly. As he said 
himself during one of his arrests: "I do not do anything bad. I 
only shoot off `Papuans.'" Some operatives think that the famous 
attack on the Chechens at Ostankino, where four Caucasians died 
instantly, can be attributed specifically to Isayev's fighting 
groups. But, in addition, the "feats" are not that celebrated 
and effective. 
  It must be admitted that Signature is a courageous person. 
His heroic conduct did not go unnoticed among people at the top, 
and he fell into serious scrapes twice. The first time during a 
shootout, Isayev was lucky--the bullet was stopped by a 
bulletproof jacket. The second time a hired killer, it seems, 
did everything, and the bullet hit Signature's liver. But 
luckily for him, Sharapov--Signature's bodyguard--was between 
the sniper and the liver. He took the main hit, and died on the 
spot. Isayev, in grave condition, was taken to hospital, and 
afterwards flew to the United States where he was operated on 
again; he is now once again in the capital, full of strength and 
plans. 
  The fate of other kingpins of the criminal world, who became 
Signature's countrymen long ago, was much worse. Givi Rezanyy 
disappeared--he said goodbye to his wife and went into the yard 
to his modest Zhiguli and... Sometime later people in militia 
uniforms came to his wife and politely returned the car keys. No 
one has seen Rezanyy since that time. But what is most curious 
is that no one in either the MVD [Ministry of Internal Affairs] 
or the counterintelligence organs can give any explanation 
regarding Givi's disappearance. 
  According to generally accepted concepts in the criminal 
environment, unknown persons audaciously made short work of 
countryman Givi and the young Georgian crime boss Pipiya. The 
33-year-old, who was repeatedly convicted and is the owner of 
four cars (including cars that are the dreams of eccentric 
Porsche millionaires, which can cost up to $700,000), did not 
work anywhere, and, according to operational data, worked in the 
drug trade and lived in a rented apartment in Moscow. What 
brought him to Moscow's suburban Zelenograd? Now the Criminal 
Investigation Department and the Procuracy are interested in 
this question, because Pipiya and his brother were found with 
their heads shot through accurately at No. 9 on one of 
Zelenograd's streets next to the GSM [cooperative garage] Malino. 
  The fate of yet another crime boss--well-known Georgian 
crime 
boss Mikeladze, nicknamed Arsen, is also tragic. On 22 June of 
last year employees of Petrovka 38 arrested him at Hanoi 
Restaurant. The 50-year-old authority settled matters, and was 
the arbiter in the conflict between the Georgian and 
Solntsevskiy groups. The operatives found 34.5 grams of 
marijuana on Arsen, and after observing pertinent "ceremonies" 
released him on bail. Alas, Mikeladze lived about six months 
after this. 
  At the beginning of winter he and an acquaintance drove to 
Tbilisi for a friend's birthday. It was a small gathering: six 
or seven people. By the way, the popular artist Kikabidze was 
among the guests. At about 2100, on Mikeladze's recommendation, 
they started to break up. Arsen and his friend came out of the 
doorway, got into their Mercedes, and got ready to drive off. 
Suddenly two men with AKM's got out of a Zhiguli that was nearby 
and literally riddled them as they sat in the Merc... 
  One other well-known authority--the crime boss Globe--was 
also shot in masterly fashion last year. He was hit with a 
sniper's bullet from a rifle with an optical sight while coming 
out of the discotheque ULIS'S. And at the very beginning of the 
year, in January, one of Globe's closest contacts was shot--one 
of the toughest mafiosi with the nickname Bobon. The reasons for 
Bobon's murder were more than adequate, and the operatives also 
do not rule out the shootout in connection with a series of 
deaths of well-known mafiosi and businessmen, behind which were 
Bobon's people. 
  The list of crime bosses and authorities is smaller, and 
those who have fallen in the mafia wars of Russia can be 
continued. Although it is clear even so: It is becoming more and 
more dangerous to be a crime boss these days. A lot has changed, 
including in the crime world. You cannot hide from a bullet 
because of authority... As for the activities of the 
"patriarchs," gatherings of crime bosses can be expected in the 
near future, at which the security problems of the "godfathers" 
will be discussed. It is dead certain that they will arrive at 
appropriate organizational conclusions, and they will give 
strict instructions to someone, and someone... It is obvious 
that we will not learn about this from a resolution published in 
the press. We will see the results of the "gathering" and new 
sensational criminal deeds in operational summaries of the 
militia. 
  When this material was being prepared for press, 
several showdowns occurred again between the "generals" of the 
criminal world. In Balashikha the only Chechen representative--a 
crime boss, well-known under the nickname Sultan, was shot. His 
bodyguard was also killed. And literally within several days 
another attempt was made on the life of a crime boss--a 
representative of Signature's Russian mafia. A bomb was placed 
in a car parked next to where he was walking, and it exploded. 
This time also, Signature did not die on the spot. He was taken 
to hospital in serious condition, but it is too early to 
guarantee that he will live. 
  We will recount the details and reasons for these 
crimes in forthcoming issues of this weekly. We think that new 
names will be added to the obituaries by that time. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68543 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94045" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Police Emergency Number Established </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Police Emergency Number Established </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0631B Moscow ROSSIYA in Russian No 14, 13-14 Apr 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0631B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Larisa Galina: "Yell. `KRIK' Will Help"] </F>
  [Text] KRIK--criminal information channel--is a new 
emergency assistance service established recently in the city's 
municipal militia. In some ways it is like the famous American 
911 service. Thus, a report on the crash between a gasoline tank 
truck and a trolley bus on Dmitrovskiy Highway, which all Moscow 
was talking about recently, was first received by the 
dispatchers of the Moscow KRIK Service: The driver of an 
automobile, who fortuitously showed up at the scene of the 
accident, transmitted the information over the radio in his 
vehicle. The KRIK dispatchers now receive more than 100 such 
calls in a day--about traffic lights that are not working, road 
accidents, fights, thefts, and other disorders on the streets. 
By far not all Muscovites, of course, have radio stations or 
mobile radio telephones, and the KRIK employees are not trying 
to subordinate the well-known service numbers "02" and "03" to 
themselves. But try to dial these numbers after seeing a fight, 
for example--it is not easy to get through, and indeed there may 
not be a phone booth on the street. It is here that KRIK will 
come to help--it is necessary to tune in on Channel 9 on the 
radio and say the password "Petrovka." But more simply, dial 
telephone number 254 97 09. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68544 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94046" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Criminal Revolution' in Russia Examined </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Criminal Revolution' in Russia Examined </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0645A Moscow MOSKOVSKAYA PRAVDA in Russian 14 Apr 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0645A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MOSKOVSKAYA PRAVDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with cinematographer/writer Stanislav Govorukhin </F>
by Eric Kotlyar; place and date not given: "A Country That Has 
Betrayed Its Elderly Does Not Have a Future"] 
  [Text] 
  [Kotlyar] Stanislav Sergeyevich, much of what you write 
about 
agrees with the materials we publish; in particular, that 
reforms in Russia are being accompanied by an explosion of 
criminal manifestations on an unheard-of scale! But then how can 
we explain the fact that in August 1991 you were an active 
defender of the White House? 
  [Govorukhin] What is so surprising about this--both in 1991 
and now I defended and continue to defend the constitution and 
democracy. How do you explain that in 1991 our president acted 
in the name of defending constitutional foundations (he took an 
oath of allegiance to the people on this very constitution), 
while in September 1993 the constitution was essentially 
trampled! Now, this logic definitely defies explanation! 
  [Kotlyar] You probably remember that it was said way back in 
the "500 Days" Program that "black" money is capable of 
facilitating the accumulation of productive capital; then there 
were contentions that any initial accumulation of capital is 
good, and the sooner it "accumulates," the better; now the 
president gets horrifying analytical reports saying that crime 
is almost beginning to displace the state! A federal crime 
suppression program is adopted, with an envisaged cost of 2 
trillion rubles [R]. So what do we have: First we seem to urge 
those guys to accumulate money, in order to subsequently put it 
to work, by any means possible; then we start crying: "Help! We 
are surrounded by robbers!"? 
  [Govorukhin] As early as the 1980's we, members of the 
cultural establishment, warned the government that flirting with 
the criminal world would end badly. I wrote a lot about this, 
and my film "We Cannot Live This Way Anymore!" is a graphic 
teaching aid for the powers that be! That crime will flourish if 
it is encouraged was no secret to anyone. It is a different 
matter that the current authorities are artificially creating 
favorable conditions for bringing as many people as possible, 
from different societal strata, into the criminal vortex. It 
turns out that it also makes sense politically: Once you get 
dirty, you have no choice but to support the authority that lets 
you live this way. This is why at all elections the criminal 
underworld actively supports the current regime. By creating 
economic oppression, the authority itself pushes people in the 
direction of "black business," machinations, buying-reselling, 
embezzlement, and thus in a way creates direct dependency on 
these conditions. The criminalization of society is underway. 
One can see the same in the military and the MVD [Ministry of 
Internal Affairs]. Can you imagine the soldiers of the 1991 army 
firing at the Supreme Soviet of Russia? Now, however--you have 
seen it for yourself! The military has been put into extremely 
difficult economic circumstances; it is becoming demoralized, 
corrupted, and losing its moral foundations. Fight crime in 
these conditions? Nonsense! We cannot stop crime through the 
legal system! First, we have to change the socioeconomic nature 
of our life. For instance, the law on taxes. It should be 
profitable to work! It should be promising and attractive to 
produce goods. Loan-sharking, on the other hand, robbing the 
population through the banks, stealing state materials, and 
selling off military equipment should be not just unprofitable 
but outright criminal, dangerous! That is, we have to cut the 
economic roots of crime. As long as a young person sees in the 
experience of people around him, his own parents, that it is 
impossible to live honestly, the ranks of criminals will keep 
getting new recruits from the younger generation. 
  And the second, no less important item--creating a moral 
climate that opposes criminal morality. The spirit of society is 
predicated on the level of culture, on art. These are the most 
effective levers of educational impact on the inner world of a 
person, his formation. The church--yes! But the beneficial 
influence of the goodness of the church shows up gradually, 
being absorbed over several generations. This we will see in the 
children that have not yet been born. Right now, what do we 
have--people come to church in droves, while criminals keep 
multiplying, ignoring everything, and occasionally even robbing 
temples! 
  Only the spirituality of books, theater, cinema, and museums 
are capable today of attracting people, bringing out of their 
hearts an impulse for moral revival. To achieve this we have to 
restore libraries to their proper place, subsidize theaters and 
production of our films--fundamentally change the moral 
atmosphere; only then will the code of legal norms really begin 
to work! 
  After all, it is not that difficult to get rid of street 
crime if needed. In this respect Zhirinovskiy is right--two 
weeks of tough law enforcement on the city streets, and the 
problem will go away. It is simply that right now nobody wants 
to do this. As well as making the punishment commensurate with 
the crime committed. For instance, you steal a hen and get eight 
years, but you steal a car somebody had been saving for all his 
life, and you get two years of probation! It is important to 
correct all this, but only after the main two causes are 
liquidated. 
  [Kotlyar] Stanislav Sergeyevich, now that you are a deputy 
and can observe from inside the law-making mechanism, how do you 
explain that laws on corruption and organized crime still have 
not been adopted; that the notions of "leader" and "organizer" 
have not been defined? Without these legal norms the militia is 
practically toothless. 
  [Govorukhin] You reason the same way as the MVD! This is not 
the point. Of course, we need laws, and the law on corruption 
has already been drafted and will be passed; however, without 
uprooting socioeconomic roots this will have no effect on the 
final outcome. Tell me, what keeps the militia from getting rid 
of street crime today? The lack of a law on corruption? 
  [Kotlyar] We frequently ask this question and hear in reply: 
We do not have enough personnel, we are being sidetracked into 
maintaining law and order during manifestations... 
  [Govorukhin] How many times a year does this happen? Six 
thousand people gather on national holidays. Is this really the 
reason? The reason is different: the military and the militia 
are being readied for suppression of all sorts of public unrest. 
This is happening in the regions under the guise of protection 
of borders, suppression of large-scale crime. 
  [Kotlyar] In your book "The Great Criminal Revolution" there 
is this thought: A country that has betrayed its elderly does 
not have a future. That is, the generation that won the war, 
that built everything that still supports our life, has found 
itself essentially struck out of life and doomed. In the name of 
what? In your opinion, can this be corrected? 
  [Govorukhin] This is precisely the moral atmosphere I am 
talking about. We have rejected the elderly, the keepers of 
popular wisdom and morality, people who have been revered at all 
times. Among other peoples the notion of an elder is a symbol of 
respect. The leadership should be comprised of people who 
understand well what they are doing and what responsibility they 
have to the history of the country. Take cinematography. This is 
where perestroyka actually began. Like a drop reflects the sea, 
this small cell of society reflects all the consequences to come 
of the mistakes that have been made: The system of movie 
distribution--the best in the world--has been destroyed; the 
elders of the profession, who brought world fame to national 
cinematography, have been relegated to the trash heap; state 
support for production of Russian films has been removed; and 
what did we get--ruin! Cinematography is not a 
country--everything happens fast there. But was it not possible 
to draw correct conclusions from the initial stage of the 
experiment? No, they continued along this road, and as a result 
the entire country, its entire industry and agriculture, have 
been destroyed... 
  [Kotlyar] Stanislav Sergeyevich, prominent politicians 
believe that the "Chinese way" is unsuitable for Russia... 
  [Govorukhin] Well, but you see, they all play tennis! 
Remember Dostoyevskiy: Smerdyukov could not imagine 
restructuring Russia without the Germans and the French. Our 
rulers are the same way; they have forgotten our own history and 
literature; they do not remember that from time immemorial the 
Russian eagle has been looking to the West and to the East, 
picking the best in different parts of the world. 
  [Kotlyar] And at the same time, it is laughable, but one can 
find examples in the press that when they want to show the good 
side of capitalism, they say that China and Turkey have fed and 
clothed Russia in no time at all! Meanwhile, the trade routes 
from Turkey and the ill-starred China are littered with young 
victims. Is it possible to return this generation to a normal 
life cycle? 
  [Govorukhin] This is a lost generation. We cannot pin any 
hopes on it! They will not go to work in production, will not 
defend the motherland, and of course will not want to dig into 
the hard rock of science. They have been poisoned by the venom 
of profit. A school of a young tribe of thieves. Children who 
wash cars instead of learning. The usual argument--what is wrong 
in this, let them learn how to work at a young age! Why do not 
let children of big bureaucrats and nouveaux riches wash cars? 
It is the children from impoverished families that stay 
uneducated and quickly become criminalized. When a father is 
asked to come to the school because his son is failing a grade, 
he just shrugs: What can I do, I am unable to feed the family. 
Children from well-to-do families will go to prestigious 
lyceums, get a foreign education. The city of Zabaykalsk. By 
night children rob railcars, and by day they work as rickshaws 
for Chinese merchants. I saw these children--they are happy to 
have what they have. They simply do not know that there can be a 
different life... This is what has been done to the young 
generation. And this is the worst. Not the plundered mineral 
resources--this is bad, but we can survive it, ours is a rich 
country; a future destroyed, however, cannot be replaced! 
  The substance of reforms, for the sake of which we have 
sacrificed our children, is that in the 1990's inflationary 
processes in the West abated dramatically, and business 
activities picked up. Western economists write that about $30 
billion flows there annually and work for Western capital. It is 
rubbish that the West feeds Russia. John Ross puts it straight: 
It is the exhausted Russia that feeds the well-to-do West. Due 
to diminished internal consumption, Russia exports more fuel and 
raw materials... From my own observations--Kentavr, a Chita 
company, signed a contract with a Chinese company to sell 
KamAZes. One KamAZ--one tonne of chewing gum! Nineteen trucks 
for 19 tonnes of chewing gum! Here is a principle for you. The 
more unprofitable the contract is for the state, the greater the 
income "on the side!" The result: Several hundred thousands 
dollars landed in the Chita company's foreign bank account. An 
enormous crime against the state is being committed! 
  [Kotlyar] You voted for the amnesty. The law enforcement 
organs maintain that many of those serving time for grave crimes 
will fall under the formal provisions of the amnesty. 
  [Govorukhin] Quite possibly. This is not the State Duma's 
initiative, however, but the president's. His draft edict on 
amnesty covered only criminals. How can one start living by a 
new constitution by issuing an edict freeing criminals when the 
country is in such a situation? The State Duma added a political 
amnesty so that people would see that there are people among 
deputies who understand very well and make proper judgments of 
events. As it had been under unbridled Bolshevism, the authority 
draws its strength from the criminal strata and seeks support 
and understanding among them. The result: People tiredly reject 
everything that is going on. I meet with people and I hear them 
express horror over what happened during the days of October 
1993; they also want to know more about the new 
apostle--Zhirinovskiy. 
  [Kotlyar] By the way, what is your opinion of him? 
  [Govorukhin] If you listen to him, he is an ardent fighter 
against the current authority. In reality, however, he is 
Yeltsin's man. He supported all edicts, the new constitution--it 
would not have passed without his support! He is now a very 
convenient lightning rod to scare the people: You say we are 
bad, and maybe it is so, but look! This is what you will get if 
we go! A day does not go by without the mass media portraying 
time and again "Zhirinovskiy's horrors." The authority cannot 
survive without an enemy. And who is the enemy today? 
Khasbulatov, who is sitting in Chechnya? Rutskoy, just released 
from prison? Zhirinovskiy fits perfectly the leading part of 
"enemy of the authority and the people." He is a very 
sophisticated and adroit politician. 
  [Kotlyar] Who do you see as the leader of Russia? 
  [Govorukhin] There are many such people! The most important 
thing for each of them is to be a sincere and convinced 
democrat, a man of great culture and fine intuition, a man who 
loves his people without reservation and is loyal to them. Not a 
few fuehrer! 
  [Kotlyar] But every time there is a turn in history the 
possibility of a fuehrer cannot be dismissed. 
  [Govorukhin] Everything is possible. But one can hardly 
imagine anything worse than what we have now. 
  [Kotlyar] Right now you have to work in the State Duma on 
collective decisions together with your opponents; how do you 
feel being next to your colleagues in the deputy corps from the 
opposing camp? 
  [Govorukhin] I do not understand the mentality of these 
people; it is alien to me, and I do not try to find a common 
language with them. 
  [Kotlyar] Do you think that the State Duma has a future? 
  [Govorukhin] No. It has no authority. It is being 
discredited; washing dirty linen in public--a lot of that is 
done. A demonstration for the people--what a collection of 
never-do-gooders and loafers it is. The history of the Supreme 
Soviet is being repeated. That one was disbanded to popular 
applause. Now there will be a presidential edict to disband 
another parliament, and everybody will say: This is great! It is 
important to convince the people that Russia does not need a 
parliament at all! 
  [Kotlyar] Why did you go there then? 
  [Govorukhin] I realized that this would be a powerless body, 
but I could not imagine that it would also be completely mute. 
There is no opportunity to appear on television, to publish in 
newspapers. Only now has a small window opened. People, however, 
want to talk to us. Take, for instance, my book "The Great 
Criminal Revolution"--a million copies sold, in our times! You 
cannot find it anymore. Dozens of regional newspapers reprinted 
it in its entirety. I get swamped with questions, but it is very 
difficult to find a forum where I can reach broad audiences. 
  [Kotlyar] What do you think of Kazannik in this recent 
incident involving his resignation? 
  [Govorukhin] I think he is too naive a person, but 
undoubtedly a man of integrity. 
  [Kotlyar] And about Rutskoy's trust contract? 
  [Govorukhin] Rutskoy was dangerous while he was in prison; 
now the task is to discredit him as quickly as possible. This 
case will be dusted off, although nothing can be proven there. 
But if it cannot be proven, what happens then--will the new 
procurator be held responsible? Hence, they will use all angles, 
will again investigate the Revival Foundation, the Agrokhim, and 
so on. I have said this many times already. 
  [Kotlyar] Are you currently making a new movie, writing a 
new 
book, or playing in a movie? 
  [Govorukhin] I have produced a video film with the same 
title 
as the book, and am working on a new expanded edition, which 
will be translated into several languages. 
  [Kotlyar] Thank you for answering the newspaper's questions. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68545 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94047" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Mafia Wars Examined </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Mafia Wars Examined </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0645B Moscow MOSKOVSKAYA PRAVDA in Russian 14 Apr 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0645B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MOSKOVSKAYA PRAVDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Larisa Kislinskaya: "By the Law of Crime--Otari </F>
Kvantrishvili: They Give It All to Me of Their Own Volition"] 
  [Text] Whoever aimed that gun at Otari Kvantrishvili, 
the shots sounded in the border zone of power. Kvantrishvili was 
a man who personified the attributes of our time. Authoritative 
in criminal communities and respected by the establishment and 
high society, he represented solid proof of sociologists' 
contentions that respectable capital draws its strength from 
shadow sources. While continuing to generate income of 
"unidentified origin," he at the same time took pains to create 
a completely different image for people of this kind: He 
invested immense sums in reinforcing his image as a public 
figure, helped the sports movement, and justly criticized the 
policy of breaking-up the Union. Over a short period of time he 
was able to achieve great popularity. 
  There is probably no other criminal reporter whose 
creative paths crossed the "Kvantrishvili topic" as frequently 
as those of Larisa Kislinskaya. In several published materials 
she persistently drew the readers' attention to dark spots in 
his biography. As a result, she earned the honor of the 
"godfather" referring to her by name... She got several threats 
over the telephone, and one even delivered on television (!). 
Truly, we have strange ways of using our scarce air time. 
  It appears that a period of "extraordinary circumstances" 
has 
begun for the kingpins of the criminal world. Over the past 
several months alone the leader of Balashikha group, Sergey 
Frolov, was killed; Grigoriy Solomatin--the "authority" who shot 
Frolov--disappeared immediately thereafter. Also shot and killed 
were Sergey Sokolov, one of the gang leaders of the Pushkino 
group, and Sultan Daudov, the only Chechen crime boss living in 
the Moscow suburbs. Andrey Isayev--a crime boss nicknamed 
Signature [Rospis]--having barely recovered from old wounds, 
nearly got blown up in a car. This assassination attempt failed, 
too: Although Signature was seriously wounded, he is alive; two 
girls were seriously maimed by TNT charges the car was 
boobytrapped with, and a nearby militiaman was wounded. A second 
assassination attempt did succeed in the case of Vyacheslav 
Vanner (nicknamed Bobon)--the right-hand man of the crime boss 
nicknamed Globe [Globus] (Valeriy Dlugach) shot to death almost 
a year ago. Yuriy Stupenkov, president of the Russian 
professional league Kitek and the professional club by the same 
name, got caught in sniper fire. He had a previous conviction 
and enjoyed a certain authority in capital city criminal 
circles--like the previously convicted famous boxer Oleg 
Karatayev, who was shot to death at Brighton Beach. The Georgian 
crime boss Dzhamal Mikeladze (nicknamed Arsen), on the other 
hand, was killed in Tbilisi. Another old Georgian crime boss 
Givi Beradze (nicknamed Scarface Givi) also disappeared. Small 
gang leaders of the Pushkino and Koptevo-Dolgoprudnoye criminal 
groups were pursued and disposed of with enviable persistency. 
One might think, what else could happen that could shock 
Muscovites, who are used to everything by now? 
  However, the murder of Otari Kvantrishvili, president of the 
Lev Yashin Foundation for Social Protection of Sportsmen, former 
vice president of the 21st Century association, was a real 
sensation. Not because it was clearly a contract murder, as 
evidenced by the rifle with optical scope left in the attic of 
the house where the sniper fire came from, and the fact that the 
killers and their customers definitely knew that on Tuesdays 
between 1400 and 1800 Otari Kvantrishvili unfailingly visited 
Krasnopresnenskiy bathhouse. It was the identity of the slain 
person. He was known for his charitable activities; he appeared 
on television almost every evening urging protection of the 
Russian genetic fund and Russian statehood; he even appeared at 
militia concerts; at the same time, in the unanimous opinion of 
enforcement services, he was a major "authority" in the crime 
world and could easily claim the title of a "godfather" of our 
mafia. 
  So who was Otari Kvantrishvili in reality, in whose way did 
he stand, and who is behind his murder? It is practically 
impossible to give an exhaustive answer to these questions, but 
we will try to reconstruct some pages from the biography of the 
man who is now buried next to Vladimir Vysotskiy--in the same 
place where a little earlier his brother Amiran, shot to death 
in August of last year in the course of gang score-settling in 
the office of the Vodoley international enterprise on Bolshaya 
Yakimanka Street, found his final resting place. 
  Several thousand people gathered at Vagankovskoye cemetery 
on 
8 April--the day of junior Kvantrishvili's funeral. Among them 
were such famous people as Iosif Kobzon, a friend and cohort of 
the deceased in many undertakings; the singers Aleksandr 
Rozenbaum and Anatoliy Dneprov; the comedian Oleg Marusev; and 
famous athletes and public figures. And this is quite 
understandable--the deceased had friends among militia generals, 
marshals, Olympic champions, artistic bohemia, television 
commentators, and journalists, and had "access" to the very top 
echelons of authority. But at the same time this funeral was 
attended by crowds of athletic-looking young men dressed either 
in cashmere coats or tight leather. All of them were hiding 
behind dark glasses or turned away from photographers and 
television cameramen. Some journalists were warned: "Do not take 
close shots or we will smash your camera." Others were permitted 
to take only panoramic shots or pictures of famous performers. 
This is also understandable: All these people are active members 
of the so-called organized crime groups--Izmaylovo, Solntsevo, 
Balashikha, Kazan, and Dolgoprudnoye. There was, of course, a 
large delegation representing the Georgian criminal community 
operating in Moscow. At this sort of event enmity is put 
aside--the "Chechen community" also sent its delegates. 
According to some information, all the well-known crime bosses 
(there are almost 50 Georgian and 14 Armenian ones alone living 
in Moscow) bid their farewell to the deceased during the night, 
after he had been eulogized in the church right here on 
Vagankovskoye cemetery. It is not yet known whether criminal 
"authorities"--leaders of aforementioned groups--were among 
them. All of them clearly did not want to come into view of 
enforcement services, knowing very well that Otari Vitalyevich's 
funeral would be shown on television on numerous occasions. 
There were even rumors that the famous crime boss Vyacheslav 
Ivankov, nicknamed "the Jap," may arrive from the United States 
incognito, wearing a wig and makeup. Either he got cold feet, 
however (after all, he is on the federal wanted list here), or 
the makeup was exceptionally good... 
  The crowd that gathered at Vagankovskoye cemetery that day 
and then later at the wake at the Moscow Hotel was as disparate 
in composition as the opinions about the deceased. Although 
Otari Kvantrishvili was born in 1948 in the Georgian town of 
Zestafioni and spent his early childhood there, he considered 
Krasnaya Presnya his home (it is symbolic that this is where he 
was killed, and this is where he was buried). Over the past few 
years, though, he lived in Odintsovskiy Rayon, in a house 
purchased from Marshal Savitskiy. In the same area he built 
another mansion--with a pool, steam bath, and a training 
wrestling gym. He watched his health carefully, engaged in 
sports, and did not drink or smoke. He did gamble, though. 
  He started card games together with his brother at the 
Sovetskaya Hotel. In militia jargon, their specialization was 
called "rollers." It was then that the two young talents were 
noticed by famous crime bosses of old school--Anatoliy Cherkasov 
(nicknamed Cherkas), Leonid Korolev (nicknamed the Loafer), and 
Scarface Givi. It was these crime bosses, whom Otari Vitalyevich 
worshipped at the time, who entrusted him with "watching over" 
the racetrack and keeping an eye on the totalizator. The crime 
bosses placed their bets on the younger brother, since the older 
one had a reputation as an active gambler and a very unlucky 
one, despite the fact that this whole team played only in their 
own digs, specially equipped with imported radio and television 
systems, optical devices installed by engineers and physicists. 
This is where they skinned gullible plebeians. 
  Otari Vitalyevich soon realized, however, that it is not a 
good idea to limit his social circle to just criminal 
"authorities": He was a professional athlete; later worked as a 
coach at the Dynamo stadium. This is where he acquired many 
acquaintances in militia circles. He was very proud of these 
ties, and imposed his company even on top officials of criminal 
investigations. Until the last moment he made it clear to 
criminals of his acquaintance that he could help, that he had it 
"all covered" over there. I remember how in one telephone 
conversation with the author of this material (I will tell you 
the reason for these calls a little further on), Kvantrishvili 
mentioned that he had raised many athletes who now work in the 
MVD and KGB system and help him. And that he is like a father to 
them--and this is not at all because of money... As the 
conversation went on, the main character of Mario Puzo's 
"Godfather" unwittingly came to mind. Because Don Corleone, too, 
demanded only favors and loyalty of the people he helped. 
  Let us go back to the younger years of our hero. In 1966 he 
had a little mishap--he was sentenced to nine years for 
participation in a group rape. He got an early release--after 
four years, somehow a medical report surfaced on his 
psychological ill-being, which said that the prisoner was 
suffering from latent schizophrenia. At the time the Moscow 
criminal world was run by the crime boss Gennadiy Karkov, 
nicknamed Mongol. As soon as he was put behind bars, the throne 
went to another kingpin of the criminal world, Mongol's 
disciple, the Jap. When finally in 1982 Ivankov also was put on 
ice, Otari Vitalyevich remained free, despite the fact that the 
criminal file on the Jap's case contains documents showing that 
the sportsman had some part in the actions of Ivankov and Co. 
Later, this patron was not forgotten, either. Besides, the old 
"boss" Cherkasov died, and O. Kvantrishvili buried him, helped 
his family. While Ivankov "languished" in a Tula camp, 
Kvantrishvili raised his sons, and got them involved in 
athletics. A real opportunity to help the Jap opened only in 
1989. Such frenetic activities were launched to free him that in 
the haste this especially dangerous repeat offender--who, while 
being in the zone, never lifted anything heavier than a 
glass--almost got amnestied for shock labor and exemplary 
behavior. Well, he was not exactly amnestied, but he was indeed 
released early. I told this entire story in March 1992 in an 
article "Crime Bosses and Their Benefactors." I was warned at 38 
Petrovka that Otari Vitalyevich would not overlook this--lately, 
his greatest concern had been his clean image. And his image was 
by then indeed quite well shaped: a patron of the arts, a 
fixture on television, children's and sportsmen's best friend. 
Having spent some time finding out my unlisted address and 
telephone number, Otari Vitalyevich called me at the beginning 
of summer 1992. He was very polite: "As a Christian and a father 
of four, I feel that a misfortune may befall you. There is plot 
being hatched, and possibly something will happen to you, but 
this will not be my fault, and I have already written a 
statement to this effect to the Krasnopresnenskiy Rayon 
procurator." He had always been a man of foresight: If he 
happened to go out carrying arms in his younger years (later on 
he had almost 150 bodyguards protecting him), he had a gun in 
one pocket and in the other--a statement to the procuracy: "I 
was walking down the street when I found this gun, and I am 
surrendering it to you." 
  He already hated me with a passion by then, as he told 
mutual 
acquaintances in militia circles. "Well, you are a Georgian--are 
you going to fight a woman?" one general asked him. "I do not 
fight women," my telephone companion soon told me. "But when a 
juggernaut like me gets moving, you understand..." He himself 
told me more than once, and it was not hard for me to guess, 
that his calls were of a tactical-preventive nature. He did not 
refute anything that I had written, especially considering that 
in the article on the subject of the Jap's early release, Otari 
Vitalyevich did not figure very prominently (there were more 
substantial names mentioned in it). He simply used to call at 
about 2300, ask why I sounded unhappy, complain that the militia 
was unfair to him... 
  It so happened that I published part of our 
conversation--also as a preventive measure--in the next article, 
in which I described Otari Vitalyevich's role in freeing from 
prison a certain "authority" nicknamed Plum. A member of 
Ivankov's gang and his emissary in Moscow, Plum was detained in 
Solnechnoye Motel with enough drugs to convict two; as time 
passed, however, the dope "evaporated" to symbolic proportions, 
and the Jap's best friend was free again. 
  This article did not interfere with our telephone 
"friendship" either. This ended in August 1993, when the older 
brother Amiran was shot to death. Strangely, the loving younger 
brother directed all his wrath not at the cutthroats who had 
killed the unarmed Amiran when the latter, together with a 
Samara criminal nicknamed Crazy Fedya, came to sort things out 
with members of the "Chechen community" in the office of Vodoley 
company, but again at a journalist who wondered why criminal 
world "authorities," of which Amiran was one, are buried at the 
cemetery that is the traditional resting place for those who had 
been the pride of the nation. 
  By the way, Amiran Vitalyevich had not cared to create for 
himself an image like his brother's. He had different hobbies: 
While remaining a card player, and having gone through the 
school of prison, Amiran Vitalyevich suddenly became a 
playwright and allegedly wrote a play. Moscow criminal 
investigations detectives, attempting to follow this amusing 
story, told me that the newly hatched writer manages to make at 
least five mistakes even in a three-letter word. 
  Anyway, Otari Vitalyevich told me: "God will punish you. As 
for me, this is the last time I will call you. My brother was 
killed, and you call him a gangster." Quite possibly, God did 
punish me for something--nobody is a saint--but not for this: A 
gangster is a still a gangster even when he is dead. 
  The calls did indeed stop. But especially after October, 
when 
Otari Vitalyevich began to appear on television daily and many 
of his speeches resembled preaching, I occasionally heard direct 
hints addressed at me: "All these articles resemble the 
relations between the Elephant and Moska the Dog. The time will 
come when the Elephant will grow annoyed and will simply step on 
Moska." The charitable foundation's president quite frequently 
used precious air time for personal purposes: He upbraided 
journalists who got out of line (some of them had dared to joke 
about the appearance of a champion nominated by O.V. for 
president of the sportsmen's party he had founded); he wagged 
his finger at the militia, hinting that the chief of the 
regional organized crime unit of the Moscow City Administration 
of Internal Affairs has children. These were amazing broadcasts: 
Anchormen cowed before him, and call-ins came only from people 
who said something like "Oh, Otari Vitalyevich is such an 
amazing person. We are grateful that he exists." One anchorman 
could not help but draw a comparison: "In the past we 
said--thank you, Leonid Ilich, for being; now the same is being 
said to you, Otari Vitalyevich." I do not think I saw this 
anchorman anymore. 
  The foundation president lectured Aleksey Matveyev, a 
ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA sports reporter: "You will be knowledgeable 
about sports when you stop arguing with me. And anyway, you are 
too caustic, bitter. Think about it. Or you will get whacked." 
My colleague published this, and a month later was hospitalized 
with deep lacerations to his face. Such a coincidence. 
  He repeated many things to everyone. His phrase: "I do not 
take away anything from anyone and do not even ask. They bring 
everything and give it to me of their own volition" became 
proverbial. Nevertheless in one of our evening telephone 
conversations he mentioned one of our millionaires: "I tell 
him--Artem, give a million to needy children. And he, the rat, 
does not." I have also heard this opinion: Wherever his money 
came from, he gave it to the indigent, children, and orphans. 
Such a modern Robin Hood. But the times of noble robbers are 
gone--now is the time of noble mafiosi. For instance, John 
Gotti, the head of the powerful Italian clan of the American 
Cosa Nostra, built a hospital for the poor in a New York borough 
with his family's money. But in the United States, money 
"laundered" this way did not clean up the influential mafioso in 
the eyes of public opinion or in the eyes of the law. 
  For our vulnerable Criminal Code, people like Kvantrishvili 
are invulnerable. He began building his fortune by helping to 
collect debts--something done now partly by racketeering 
brigades, and partly by private detective companies: one half of 
the money for the client, one half for yourself. "I do not take 
anything away from anybody..." 
  In quite a recent criminal case--kidnapping an Australian 
couple for ransom--there is testimony by one of the suspects, 
who told how his company Sovavstraltekhnika began to be 
"visited" by racketeers. One employee suggested to the head of 
the joint enterprise a meeting with Otari Vitalyevich and 
remarked that the latter may help to settle the incident. 
Kvantrishvili--at the time vice president of 21st Century--said 
that everything could be taken care of provided that the company 
become a member of his association and pay an initiation fee, 
and also suggested that they sponsor a boxing association and 
contribute money to the Uralochka volleyball team. This was not 
all: Otari Vitalyevich demanded that the joint enterprise hire 
his people (all of them were later charged with organizing the 
kidnapping). In turn, "his people" began to dictate their terms 
to the head of the company. Otari Vitalyevich's name also was 
mentioned in court in connection with a case of "hooliganism" in 
the fall of 1988. "Hooliganism" meant a shootout (at the time 
this was still a sensation) between members of the Lyubertsy and 
Dolgoprudnenskoye groups. The overzealous lawyer read out the 
testimony of one of the defendants about to whom the gang, which 
extorted protection money from cooperative members, prostitutes, 
and merchants, paid its own "duty." 
  Another arrested businessman described how the foundation 
president made others hire people to work for their company. 
First he demanded a million for the needy, and then, on learning 
that his request had been refused, sent the company a Balashikha 
brigade led by a major "authority"--the now-deceased Frol. By 
the way, Sergey Frolov and his gangsters were under Otari 
Vitalyevich's protection, and so were the Solntsevo, Lyubertsy, 
Podolsk, Dolgoprudnoye, and Kazan groups. Maintaining good 
relations with the leaders of these gangs, Otari Vitalyevich 
implanted "his eagles" from these gangsters into large 
government organizations, commercial structures, and banks. This 
in turn enabled the gangsters to launder money obtained through 
criminal activities, as well as first claim some part of the 
income of some or other company, and then later take complete 
control of it. In short, he did not take away anything from 
anyone and did not even ask. They brought everything to him and 
gave it to him of their own volition. 
  He was a strong and wealthy man, but had no forgiveness 
whatsoever for those who went against him. Although rumor has it 
that he backed off when faced with a more formidable force. 
  One of the versions of his murder is based precisely on this 
assumption. Everybody expected Otari Vitalyevich to take revenge 
for the death of his older brother. This did not happen, 
however. The Georgian "crime bosses" denounced him for this. 
There are rumors that the "Chechen community" actually declared 
war on him. Especially considering that he had had a conflict 
with members of this clan over the privatization of one of the 
largest hotels located not far from the Ministry of Foreign 
Affairs. He set his sights on the hotel, which had already been 
under the Chechen's "wing" for a long time; Otari Vitalyevich 
backed off. In April this year Kvantrishvili traveled to St. 
Petersburg, where he had an altercation with the local "crime 
bosses." One can judge how serious this conflict was by the fact 
that he asked the Lubyanka to assign to him a protection group 
from the special unit "Vympel" (his 150 bodyguards were people 
in a different line of specialization, to put it mildly). In 
addition, Otari Vitalyevich acquired for himself a foreign 
travel passport in a different name so that in case of danger he 
could quietly slip out of the country (after all his talk of 
love for the motherland). It is hard to tell what triggered this 
conflict--division of spheres of influence or claims that the 
foundation president had distanced himself too far from the 
people (underworld people, that is). Otari Vitalyevich heard 
this kind of comment from the Moscow "authorities" as well, who 
were unhappy with the excessively intense political and social 
activities of their acquaintance and his close ties to the 
militia. 
  In the opinion of professionals, this kind of murder is done 
only over money. And the money involved here is considerable. 
Take, for instance, one of the sectors "supervised" by Otari 
Vitalyevich--the gaming business. The profits are gigantic. But 
lately a well-known "authority" Silvestr began to control an 
increasingly greater share of this juicy morsel. There is talk 
in the criminal underworld that a major leader had something to 
do with the latest events. Besides, a friend and confederate of 
Silvestr, but at the same time his rival--an "authority" 
nicknamed Beard--some time ago disappeared under mysterious 
circumstances. His corpse with a garrote around the neck was 
recently fished out of the Yauza River. Besides, there are quite 
a few people in Silvestr's entourage--and he does not hide this 
fact--who are well-trained marksmen, who handle firearms 
professionally... 
  Not without the approval of their American patron--the 
Jap--Moscow mafiosi implement in practice the motto: The worse 
it gets for the Russian mafiosi (Otari Kvantrishvili did not 
hide his attitude toward the Slavic clan), the worse it gets for 
"Chechens." And, as I have already mentioned, the Russian 
mafiosi have lately encountered quite a few setbacks. 
  When gangsters get rid of gangsters, it is to their benefit 
to implant in the public mind completely opposite versions. 
Hence the rumors that the "hunt" on "authorities" is being 
conducted by the MVD-KGB, and that allegedly a "White Arrow" 
team had been set up for this purpose. It is not hard to guess 
that with such rumors circulating, it is much easier to get rid 
of rivals. 
  Overall, however, the latest events are evidence of complete 
runaway lawlessness: Not only are major bankers and businessmen, 
as well as accidental passersby, getting killed--the biggest 
figures in the underworld are also getting knocked off. In the 
past this was an extraordinary event in the criminal world. But 
the current decline in moral standards has affected it, 
too--there is already a whole new generation for whom there is 
no authority, including criminal. This decline in morals also is 
evident from the fact that the car of singer and composer 
Vladimir Migul was blown up next to a school, on Paliashhvili 
Street. An eyewitness to the event, the son of a girlfriend of 
mine, said that the only thing that saved the kids was that it 
happened in the middle of classes. And added: "When I was in 
Italy I heard that there--the homeland of the Mafia--it is taboo 
to settle scores near schools." Well, it may be taboo over 
there. Here, however, virtual battles unfold in kindergartens, 
many of which have been leased to commercial dealers. There have 
already been two such instances in Moscow. In one the gangsters 
even used the children as cover as they retreated. Neither is it 
good manners "over there" to openly launder dirty money; here, 
we say: "Who cares where the money came from; the important 
thing is that he helped people." Over there, newspaper 
disclosures may at least tarnish an image. Here this only costs 
the journalist a cut-up face. Over there one cannot reach the 
pinnacle of power with a questionable reputation. Here a 
twice-convicted man may become an adviser to the vice president! 
(By the way, Kvantrishvili supported a totalitarian state. 
Although he did not show up on television back then, at least he 
could live in peace.) 
  Over there, laws work; here, the mafia operates. And 
although 
Otari Vitalyevich was by status several orders of magnitude 
higher than the leaders he knew and who had been killed a little 
earlier, his life ended the same way--from a bullet meant 
precisely for him. I have also heard this question: Are we not 
on the threshold of mafia wars? I think that the latest events, 
including those that took place in front of the 
Krasnopresnenskiy bathhouse, tell us that the mafia has declared 
war, but not on rivals--on statehood. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68546 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94048" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   29 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Media Court Decides EXPRESS-GAZETTE Case </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Media Court Decides EXPRESS-GAZETTE Case </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0645C Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 29 Apr 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0645C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> ["Ruling No. 11 of the Judiciary Chamber for Information </F>
Disputes under the President of the Russian Federation, Issued 
on 21 April 1994 in Moscow": "On the Material `What A Life... 
People Have!' Published in EXPRESS-GAZETTE No. 5, March 1994"] 
  [Text] On behalf of the Council of the Federal Assembly of 
the Russian Federation, the Federal Assembly's legal 
administration has filed a claim with the Judiciary Chamber for 
Information Disputes under the President of the Russian 
Federation regarding false information contained in the material 
"What A Life... People Have!" published in EXPRESS-GAZETTE No. 
5, March 1994. 
  After reviewing the material, hearing the legal 
administration's representatives, I.I. Zablotskiy and G.L. 
Dyakonov, and the representatives of EXPRESS-GAZETTE, S.A. 
Shibalov and A.S. Ivanov, and studying additional materials 
supplied by representatives of the parties, the Judiciary 
Chamber finds that: 
  EXPRESS-GAZETTE in issue No. 5, March 1994 under the rubric 
"Investigation" published editorial material on the subject of 
the Provisional Statute on Support of the Activities of Deputies 
of the State Duma of the Federal Assembly of the Russian 
Federation, approved by State Duma Decree No. 41-1GD, dated 21 
January 1994, and published in ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA on 29 January 
1994. 
  Contrary to the content of the Provisional Statute, in the 
material "What A Life... People Have!" the editors put forward 
their own untrue and slanderous conjectures and comments 
regarding material and organizational support for deputies' 
activities. 
  The disgraceful writing style, and a dense concentration of 
insulting, untrue, and absurd allegations are evidence that 
EXPRESS-GAZETTE essentially chose the road of mocking the State 
Duma deputy corps and humiliating and discrediting elected 
representatives of the people. 
  During a court hearing EXPRESS-GAZETTE representatives 
admitted that the material was untrue and biased, but attempted 
to find an excuse by saying that much of its information and 
data had allegedly come from other sources. In addition, they 
said that this is a "young" newspaper and that such writing 
style was allegedly necessitated by the need "to come into its 
own" and "win over its competitors." 
  The Judiciary Chamber rejects such arguments. There are no 
references to other sources in the material. Analysis of 
submitted supplemental materials showed that there are no 
verbatim reprints, while many conjectures, insulting hints, and 
contentions represent EXPRESS-GAZETTE's own "creative work." 
  Also impermissible is the contention that for the sake of 
gaining a foothold in the newspaper marketplace one may resort 
to the use of cheap sensations, publication of untrue and 
insulting materials, and mockery of the institutions of Russian 
statehood. 
  The Judiciary Chamber, of course, reaffirms the right of the 
mass media to cover the activities of state bodies truthfully 
and objectively, which includes criticism. EXPRESS-GAZETTE 
editors had the opportunity to compare their own perceptions 
with the previously published Provisional Statute and see proof 
of elementary ignorance and confusion. Instead, EXPRESS-GAZETTE 
chose a different road--the road of slander, mockery, and 
ridicule. 
  The Judiciary Chamber also found that EXPRESS-GAZETTE Editor 
in Chief A. Kupriyanov deliberately, without good reason, did 
not show up for the hearing and did not present any explanations 
regarding the circumstances of origin of this material. 
  Taking the above into account, and guided by Articles 9 and 
12 of the Judiciary Chamber Statute, the Judiciary Chamber 
resolves that: 
  1. The material "What A Life... People Have!" published in 
EXPRESS-GAZETTE No. 5, March 1994, shall be deemed untrue and 
biased. 
  2. The aforementioned material shall be considered a gross 
violation of legal and ethical norms aimed at insulting the 
State Duma deputy corps and discrediting the institution of 
Russian statehood. 
  3. It is found that EXPRESS-GAZETTE Editor in Chief A. 
Kupriyanov grossly violated Part 2 of Article 49 and Article 51 
of the Russian Federation Law "On the Mass Media." 
  In keeping with Article 12 of the Judiciary Chamber Statute, 
the chamber recommends that the EXPRESS-GAZETTE founders relieve 
A. Kupriyanov of his duties as editor in chief. 
  4. This decision shall be sent to the EXPRESS-GAZETTE 
editors 
for publication. 
  5. The mass media shall be advised that it is impermissible 
to publish untrue and biased data of sociopolitical interest. 
  [Signed] Judiciary Chamber Chairman A. Vengerov 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68547 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94049" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   29 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Media Court Head Vengerov Interviewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Media Court Head Vengerov Interviewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0666A Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian No 17, 29 Apr 
94 p 9 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0666A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Anatoliy Vengerov, chairman of the Judicial </F>
Board on Informational Disputes, conducted by OBSHCHAYA GAZETA 
correspondent: "Power of the Mass Media"] 
  [Text] Anatoliy VENGEROV, chairman of the Judicial 
Board on Informational Disputes, believes: The informational 
space of Russia is ever more becoming a battlefield, on which 
the main problems of its future are decided. 
  In December of 1993, 65-year old professor of law and 
head of the state and law department at Moscow State Juridical 
Academy, Anatoliy Borisovich Vengerov, became the chairman of 
Russia's newly created Judicial Board on Informational Disputes. 
It was organized in accordance with the presidential edict on 
the basis of the Arbitration Informational Court. Today the 
Judicial Board has seven members, three of which are journalists 
and four--jurists. 
  [Correspondent] What real achievements has the Judicial 
Board 
had time to accomplish for society and for the mass media? 
  [Vengerov] In this time, we have issued 11 rulings, all on 
controversial and very complex problems of current times, 
associated with major inter-ethnic conflicts, with the 
recognition of the reliability and objectivity of facts 
published in the press, and with the most acute political 
disputes in society. We have also made two announcements. The 
first--on the newspaper ZAVTRA in connection with the 
publication by Iona Andronova, "The Secrets of the Kremlin," 
which consisted of vicious lies directed toward the 
destabilization of the situation in the country. The second was 
in regard to your publication, in connection with the situation 
surrounding "Version No 1." At the same time, we have issued 
rulings on 50 other various requests and applications. We also 
had to look into the question of who issues licenses for 
television broadcasting today and how. The journalists from 
Arkhangelsk Oblast asked about this, as they were unable to find 
such an agency in the country. It turned out that there really 
is no such agency today, and this is a violation of the law. We 
also received inquiries from Vladivostok, where a journalist was 
insulted, being refused the right to participate in press 
conferences. We reviewed the acute situations surrounding the 
mass media in Orel, Voronezh, Derbent, and Kemerovo. In 
Kemerovo, on the contrary, the local press went beyond the 
framework of what was morally acceptable in its publications, 
and we forced it to write a retraction of its repeated insults 
addressed at the local administration. Although it is true, 
instead of a retraction, it poured forth new insults... In 
short, we are not sitting idle. 
  I would like to stress that most of the cases which we have 
reviewed concern not capital, but regional publications. Most 
often it is there that informational disputes arise, and as yet 
we cannot provide a sufficiently effective mechanism of 
influence by the Judicial Board, which is located in Moscow, on 
local disputes. It seems we must create regional judicial boards 
modelled after our own, for the rapid review of regional 
informational disputes. 
  [Correspondent] Does it not seem to you that, even without a 
further increase in judicial boards similar to your own, we 
already have very many different organizations which are 
supposedly engaged in protecting free speech? 
  [Vengerov] Without a doubt, the Russian informational space 
is simply overloaded with them, and free speech itself may 
perish in the embrace of such defenders. Just look: There is a 
state inspection on protecting freedom of the press and the mass 
media under the Roskompechat [RF Committee on the Press], and 
the Roskompechat itself, and our Judicial Board, and the 
Administration for Informational Provision under the president, 
and the Committee on Informational Policy and Communications of 
the State Duma, and the Federal Service on Television and Radio 
Broadcasting. Here we must add also the numerous social 
organizations--the Union of Journalists, the Committee for 
Protection of the Rights of Journalists, and so on and so 
forth... 
  [Correspondent] Evidently, this is not an elemental process, 
when everyone wants to defend glasnost a little bit? It is not a 
random occurence? 
  [Vengerov] Of course, it is a regularity--a direct 
reflection 
of that state of society when the informational space, along 
with the legal, is ever more becoming the object of very 
specific skirmishes. I am convinced that the mass media today in 
Russia is a real and very strong power, a social field on which, 
perhaps, the very main things in the future of the country are 
being decided. And very many see this informational field as 
such--as a field where they must conquer. This explains the 
emergence of the large number of structures about which we 
speak. They are really waging a struggle for this field, for 
influence in the mass media, which is not only an instrument for 
ensuring power. It can create power, but it can also kill it. 
Newspapers today have the power to give birth to politicians, 
and to cast them down. 
  [Correspondent] It seems to me that you are somewhat 
exaggerating. Such a fateful role is sooner within the power of 
present-day television. As a rule, the real practicing 
journalist today gets the opposite impression, that he is being 
stubbornly ignored both by the authorities and by the people. 
  [Vengerov] No, I know what I am talking about. Television 
today is merely one of the channels of influence by the fourth 
power, perhaps the quickest and most widespread. However, 
sociological studies, including those conducted at our request, 
show that in the regions, of which Russia consists for the most 
part, it is the press organs which have the greatest influence. 
  [Correspondent] It is interesting, how do we, the Russian 
journalists, appear in your eyes today? What are we lacking? 
What do we have in excess? 
  [Vengerov] A certain portion of the journalists, and alas a 
considerable one, appear in my eyes to be totally irresponsible 
people. By irresponsibility I mean primarily a low ethical and 
political culture. However, I would like to emphasize that this 
is specifically my perception, and not reality, since any 
prosecuting or judicial workers most often see the negative side 
of life. In most of the cases which the Judicial Board reviews, 
there is a constant discussion of style and form of presentation 
of material. For example, recently we issued a ruling on the 
EKSPRESS-GAZETA which is published in Moscow, and whose founder 
is the newspaper KOMSOMOLSKAYA PRAVDA (which receives state 
subsidies, and this is important in this situation), along with 
the publishing group SEGODNYA. 
  EKSPRESS-GAZETA regularly publishes materials of an entirely 
inadmissable tone. One may read headlines such as, "Shokhin is 
Not an Onanist," or a narrative by a former journalist who has 
recalled a story told to him by Mikhail Poltoranin. One may have 
varying attitudes toward the latter. One may love him or hate 
him, but it is entirely inadmissable to publish material talking 
about how, when he was a young lad, Misha Poltoranin entertained 
himself with young friends such as himself in his native Altay 
by casting heavy stones across a raging river, and using the 
main object of manly pride as a sling shot. Despite the fact 
that the "Temporary Statute on Provision of Activity of State 
Duma Deputies" has been publicized, EXPRESS-GAZETA publishes an 
article where everything is garbled through and through, and 
where there is a real mockery of the deputy corps. 
  We received an appeal from the Duma apparatus in regard to 
this publication, and rightly so--they have to defend 
themselves. Actually, when we studied the newspaper and the 
given material, we came to the conclusion that its activity 
surpasses all possible bounds of immorality. The lawyers 
defending the interests of the publication at our judicial 
session stated that the newspaper is young and such a 
presentation of material is a means of struggle for its place on 
the newspaper market, a method and style of conquering its 
competitors. Excuse me, but in our opinion this is simply filth. 
As a result, last week we adopted a decision which is 
unprecedented even for us: To ask the founder to dismiss the 
editor-in-chief, Aleksandr Kupriyanov, from his position. 
  [Correspondent] And what if they do not listen to you, leave 
Kupriyanov in his place and after some time renew the 
publication of similar texts? 
  [Vengerov] We have the right to present the question of 
issuing a warning for cessation of publication. I want to direct 
your attention to the fact that the cases with which we deal, as 
a rule, cannot be handled by ordinary judicial institutions. 
Well, can an ordinary court decide, for example, the problem of 
distributing television time between various parties during the 
period of the pre-electoral campaign? There is no way that it 
can. This is not within its competency. Can an ordinary court 
protect the interests of children against the vulgar attacks 
which, for example, the newspaper NOVYY VZGLYAD allows itself by 
publishing sadistic, masochistic and perverse materials? It 
cannot. It is within its powers to exact moral damages if 
someone specific has been wronged, to decide a case in someone's 
specific favor. My idea comes down to the fact that in the new 
pluralistic informational space, unique state arbitration 
agencies must emerge, which safeguard the moral interests of 
society above all. Such is our Judicial Board. 
  [Correspondent] And is it in your power, for instance, to 
deprive a journal of operation? 
  [Vengerov] Without a doubt, especially if the dispute 
surrounding its name is associated with state agencies. We have 
the right to pose the question of rebuke, or of reprimand, or of 
dismissal of a journalist. Recently we reviewed a very painful 
case, when a journalist ascribed her ideas and her own words to 
other persons. We are speaking of a series of publications in 
IZVESTIYA by Irina Dementyeva regarding the Osetin-Ingush 
conflict--"War and Peace in Prigorodnyy Rayon." We determined 
that Dementyeva had ascribed her own, in this case incorrect, 
judgments to the representatives of the organs of state power, 
and thereby distorted the real picture, thus evoking additional 
tension in an already grave conflict. Let us put it this way, we 
only scolded Dementyeva, but we could have posed the question of 
her punishment. 
  [Correspondent] How actively do the Judicial Board's 
decisions get involved in politics? 
  [Vengerov] Yes, we do get involved in politics, except not 
from a political standpoint, but rather from an ethical one. For 
example, we dealt with the situation in Nizhniy Novgorod in 
connection with the elections for mayor which were announced 
there. Governor Nemtsov himself wrote in the decree on elections 
that the state agencies cannot speak out on the side of one 
candidate or another, but then he himself began telling in the 
mass media about how he could simply have appointed anyone he 
saw fit as mayor. Without hesitating, we immediately said that 
Mr. Nemtsov was wrong. We quickly sent our decision by fax to 
Nizhniy Novgorod--to the editorial offices of the newspapers, to 
the mayor's office, and the elections were not held. 
  [Correspondent] Have you personally ever engaged in any 
political activity? 
  [Vengerov] Due to the nature of my character, I cannot 
participate in politics. 
  [Correspondent] What newspapers do you prefer to read? 
  [Vengerov] I subscribe to very many of them. I try to read 
the press which reflects different positions and different 
points of view. 
  [Correspondent] Do you have any favorite newspaper authors? 
  [Vengerov] Yes, I like to read Stanislav Kondrashov in 
IZVESTIYA. I do not like to see moans and groans of complaint in 
the newspapers. I prefer a thoughtful analytical style in which 
the author does not impose his ideas upon the reader, but rather 
invites him to participate in his reflections. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68548 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94050" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   29 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Draft Law on Media's Government Coverage `Astonishing' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Draft Law on Media's Government Coverage `Astonishing' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0666B Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian No 17, 29 Apr 
94 p 9 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0666B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Anna Politkovskaya: "A Dead Season For Domestic </F>
Journalism?"] 
  [Text] Any day now, the State Duma is expected to 
adopt the federal law, "On the Order of Illuminating the 
Activity of Organs of State Power in the State Mass Media," 
which seriously limits the capacities of Russia's journalists to 
carry out their professional responsibilities. The newspapers 
have already written about this--we are not the first here. 
Nevertheless, the topic seems to us to be so important and 
capable of significantly altering the political physiognomy of 
Russia, that we have decided to return to it once again. 
  The draft law was developed under the direct leadership of 
Mikhail Poltoranin, who is currently the chairman of the Duma 
Committee on Information Policy and Communications, Deputy 
Kirill Ignatyev, and two unknown jurists from some Academy of 
the Deputy Corps. The first reading of the draft law passed 
almost unanimously in the Duma, an occurrence which happens 
there quite rarely. This time they were able to accomplish that 
which even the president cannot seem to do--the document pleased 
the overwhelming Duma majority. 
  Let us ponder over what this new law may actually bring to 
each of our lives. 
  The draft law contains 20 articles. The first names the 
specific object of regulations--these are the relations arising 
in connection with the dissemination by the state mass media of 
materials or announcements on the activity of the agencies of 
state power of the Russian Federation and its subjects. The 
second gives assurance that the proposed paper is no more and no 
less than the ONLY (as if the Law on the Mass Media did not even 
exist?--author's note) "standard legal legislative statute on 
the procedure of such illumination." The third article explains 
that henceforth we should understand specifically as agencies of 
state power, i.e., those whom we should relate to this caste, 
which with the receipt of either state position or deputy 
certification, automatically acquire, in accordance with the 
articles of the given draft law, a practically unlimited right 
to speak on the air and to publish in printed publications 
whatever it, this caste, sees fit. 
  It is proposed that the following should be considered as 
agencies of state power: The president, the Federal Assembly, 
the government, the Constitutional Court, the Supreme Court, the 
Higher Arbitration Court, representative and executive agencies 
of the republics, krays, oblasts, cities, autonomous oblasts, 
and autonomous okrugs. In short, very many people. And all of 
them receive their piece of the television and radio air time. 
Even if every other one decides to exercise this right, then we, 
the viewers, listeners and readers, will have a hard time of it. 
There will simply not be any time for anything else. 
  Article 7 obligates state television and radio to include in 
its daily information programs, on the day of the appropriate 
event, reports on: 
  1) "decisions and actions entering into the competency of 
the 
president or the Constitutional Court, or within the 
jurisdiction of the houses of the Federal Assembly;" 2) 
"announcements of the president, the houses of the Federal 
Assembly, and the government;" 3) "speeches by the chairman of 
the RF government, deputy government chairmen, and federal 
ministers at meetings of the houses of the RF Federal Assembly;" 
4) "press conferences of the RF President, the chairman of the 
RF Government, the deputy government chairmen, chairman of the 
Council of Federations, chairman of the State Duma, as well as 
press conferences held at the decision of committees, 
commissions, factions or deputy groups of the houses of the RF 
Council of Federations"; 5) "other socially significant facts 
regarding the activity of federal agencies of power." 
  According to Article 9, the specific conditions for airing 
such announcements are also regulated: "In informational 
programs of state audio-visual mass media, reports on... (read 
preceding paragraph--author's note) must be broadcast 
exclusively as an individual block at the start of the program. 
...These reports are not commented upon. The reports must be 
accompanied by a video series of the given meeting... The 
priority right to an interview in an informational or 
informational-educational program on the question of the agenda 
belongs to the speaker on the given question, the subject of the 
right of legislative initiative, and the representative of the 
profiled committee..." Furthermore, the LAW (!) establishes a 
precise hierarchy, who must follow whom in giving the journalist 
an interview. The journalist thus becomes that very same 
microphone holder of communist times--a role which he had so 
desperately tried to escape all these long years of perestroyka. 
  The draft law intervenes even into the very structure of the 
television and radio programming: "The duration of a block of 
announcements in informational television and radio programs on 
the work of the Federal Assembly houses on the days of their 
meeting must comprise no less than: 30 seconds--for programs 
lasting up to 3 minutes; 1 minute--for programs lasting from 3 
to 10 minutes; 2 minutes--for programs lasting from 10 to 20 
minutes; 3 minutes--for programs lasting from 20 to 35 minutes, 
and 4 minutes--for programs lasting over 35 minutes." 
  For violation of the numerous principles of the proposed 
draft, administrative as well as criminal responsibility is 
introduced, both for journalists who have not fulfilled the 
requirements of the law, and for editors who have allowed 
airing, for example, of an interview outside the hierarchy 
established by the law. Moreover, soon the Duma will already 
begin reviewing corrections to the Criminal Code, introduced by 
that very same Committee on Informational Policy, in accordance 
with which a journalist who has violated the effective 
legislation in the sphere of the mass media may be deprived of 
the right to work in his specialty. 
  We must point out that the draft of these corrections 
concerns all journalists without exception--television, radio, 
and newspeople representing state, independent, private--in 
short any--publications, companies or studios. If the 
editor-in-chief of a publication, company or studio nevertheless 
decides to continue publishing or airing under a pseudonym the 
materials of a journalist who has fallen into disgrace, then he, 
the chief, will also be threatened with removal from his 
position, and will lose the right to occupy it ever again in the 
future! 
  In our opinion, everyone today simply must ask himself the 
question of whether he is capable of working under the proposed 
conditions. If not, then we must, for the n-th time, show strict 
corporative solidarity in the face of the real danger of 
infringing upon our professional rights! 
  And now about the main thing: We may banter as much as we 
like about the unfortunate, clumsy articles which infringe upon 
the right of journalists. But what bothers is something 
else--the sad circumstance that the draft law has received 
almost unanimous support. And for this there are at least two 
explanations. First of all, the developers have placed a correct 
stake on the vulnerable domestic world of those who, having 
finally clawed their way to the top, want to be and to remain 
the nomenklatura, having no intentions whatsoever of departing 
from the political power scene together with the next elections. 
As we know, the only terrible and real enemy on this thorny path 
is the journalist. He is today regularly despised not only by 
the entire Duma, but by the entire Federal Assembly, the 
government, the presidential administration, and so on, and so 
on, and so on. The journalist is blamed for the disintegration 
of the Union, for the collapse of the economy, for the decline 
of a stable state, for fanning hatred toward Khasbulatov's 
Supreme Soviet, for the regional wars, and finally for 
Zhirinovskiy. There is only one way to please this entire motley 
crowd, and all at once: By bridling the mass media. This is 
extremely necessary to all political parties and currents, 
without exception. 
  The second explanation appears although not as superficial 
as 
the first, but nevertheless it too has received the right to 
existence in the current political arrangement. The fact is that 
in the current everyday dealings of the Duma, that "working 
moment" which in common language is called "selling out" has 
become rather widespread. According to the information of a 
source who, for understandable reasons, asked not to be named in 
the newspaper--a source who nevertheless engages in direct 
lawmaking activity--this draft law has become the victim of a 
deal within the Duma. The Zhirinovskiy followers have agreed not 
to vote down a law which is important to the democratic and 
sober minded deputies in exchange for the consent of the latter 
to share their votes during the voting on the mass media. In 
short, we--journalists and all our publications, studios and 
companies--have become a change coin on the political scale. 
They thought that we would survive anyway. But will we survive? 
  There is still time until the second reading, and that means 
the final acceptance of the draft law into law. And we are 
pinning great hopes on this, because it, as we know, is the 
cure. Perhaps during Easter week those Duma members who owe 
their emergence on the political scene entirely to the mass 
media, glasnost and freedom of speech will once again check 
their own moral scales to see what is dearer for them: A free 
press or a deal with the Zhirinovskiy followers. We sincerely 
hope that their common sense wins out. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68549 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94051" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   NTV Said Behind Petersburg TV Scandal Accusations </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    NTV Said Behind Petersburg TV Scandal Accusations </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0666C Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian No 15, 15-21 
Apr 94 p 13 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0666C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "After the Scandal: NTV Accused"] </F>
  [Text] The scandal surrounding Petersburg TV, about which 
OBSHCHAYA GAZETA and many other newspapers wrote in detail, has 
died down. However, readers have been calling and writing to our 
editorial office, requesting information on the development of 
events. How did the "Kurkova case" end, and did it end, they ask. 
  According to the information available to us, the St. 
Petersburg procurator's office conducted an investigation of the 
company's financial activity. In the words of B. Kurkova's 
assistent, V. Pravdyuk (published in the local Petersburg press 
last week), no evidence of compromise was found, and the 
criminal case is being filed not against B. Kurkova, but against 
"three fugitives on the run" (Syroyezhin, Arkhipov and 
Mikhaylov), who up until recently managed the company's 
commercial activity and tried to gain possession of $1.5 million 
intended for the purchase of television equipment. They will be 
accused of financial machinations and gross counterfeiting of 
documents. 
  At the same time, Bella Kurkova, as the local press reports, 
has admitted her personal responsibility for the fact that the 
people who have shown themselves from their very worst side in 
this entire episode were hired for work by her and enjoyed her 
unlimited trust. 
  The company's legal service intends, after generalizing all 
the newspaper publications (and there have been over 200 of them 
during the "reporting period"), to file a court suit against 
those publications which contained lies, slander and insults to 
the honor and dignity of the collective. 
  As the newspaper NEVSKOYE VREMYA reports, at the meeting of 
the management of the GTRK [state television-radio channel] 
"Petersburg channel 5" with the collective of the editors of 
Petersburg TV "Publicist," Viktor Pravdyuk announced that the 
"story with accusations of bribery was merely a smokescreen for 
a large-scale operation on the takeover of the television 
broadcasting networks by various commercial structures hiding 
behind the NTV television company." 
  "We must consider the full acuteness of this battle," V. 
Pravdyuk continued his thoughts in an interview with the 
newspaper VECHERNIY PETERBURG. "NTV represents not only the 
mighty `Most-Bank' association, but foreign capital as well 
(primarily Israeli)." From among several expansions of the 
abbreviation "NTV," the well-known slavophile V. Pravdyuk 
believes the closest to the truth is "Non-Russian TV." 
  The general director of NTV, Igor Malashenko, whom I asked 
to 
comment, characterized all these accusations addressed at his 
company as being "delerium." NTV, in Malashenko's words, does 
not intend to encroach upon the television networks of the 
Petersburg channel. To pay for outdated and worn relay lines 
stretching over hundreds of unpopulated kilometers is an overly 
expensive and senseless luxury. The hatred by the heads of 
Petersburg TV toward NTV, in Malashenko's opinion, does not lend 
itself to rational explanation and has a clinical character. 
  In short, despite the accusations of Kurkova and company in 
corruption and financial abuses which have supposedly been 
rescinded, the situation in Petersburg TV, as before, cannot be 
called healthy. According to information received from several 
associates of the company, the conflict between part of the 
collective and the leadership is deepening. Although the 
management itself maintains that there is no global conflict, 
only that a small portion of the people have a "lack of 
understanding of the general problems, envy, the desire to 
enrich their pockets at the expense of state broadcasting--these 
types of authors, hindered in their grabbing instincts, shout 
most loudly about censorship and fear" (quote from interview 
with Pravdyuk). 
  Be that as it may, instead of looking for the enemy on 
foreign territory, is it not better to look at ourselves? The 
creative state of the Petersburg air time persistently demands 
this. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68550 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94052" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBISxz-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   2 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Controversy at Petersburg TV Viewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Controversy at Petersburg TV Viewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0635A St. Petersburg NEVSKOYE VREMYA in Russian 2 Apr 94 
pp 1, 4 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0635A </F>
<F P=104>  St. Petersburg NEVSKOYE VREMYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Irina Matyash: "Full Face and Profile of St. </F>
Petersburg TV. When Delivering Sermons, One Should Honor the 
Commandments"] 
  [Text] If you want people to keep quiet about 
something, you should keep quiet first. That, in my view, is the 
answer to the question of why the scandal surrounding the 
activity of the leaders of GTRK [State Television and Radio 
Company] St. Petersburg-Channel 5 was not brought to public 
attention for a long time. The press, like the entire society, 
is still faced with a choice: Either to speak openly and 
promptly about the danger of uncontrolled concentration of power 
in a few people or sacrifice this circumstance to the political 
marketplace. One must think that this is why the scandal 
surrounding the GTRK will never really develop--Bella 
Alekseyevna will either cease to be a victim of circumstances 
beyond her control or she will encounter the entire weight of 
the law--the law on pensions. 
  But, after all, for the time being in principle there is no 
need for immediate measures concerning the leadership of the 
GTRK. For now it would be desirable to listen to the brief 
sermon of Viktor Pravdyuk (because before delivering sermons one 
should honor the commandments!) on television and radio, and 
concrete and possibly honest explanations of what is happening. 
Unfortunately, the leaders of Channel 5 prefer not to justify 
their actions, which would be the natural thing to do in their 
situation, but to construct a riddle about why all the press has 
suddenly been included "in the open season on Kurkova." 
  There are three versions of this in circulation. 
  The first was suggested by the shrewd mind of Anatoliy 
Sobchak. In an interview with Pravdyuk, the city's mayor dropped 
an absolutely inscrutable sentence to the effect that the 
newspaper campaign was clearly ordered because all the press had 
been bought up by the banks. This version, to put it mildly, is 
speculation, and it is not easy even for Anatoliy Sobchak to 
bring it to a logical conclusion. Allow me to ask, Anatoliy 
Aleksandrovich, which publications have given up their 
independence to the hands of bankers and how long ago did this 
happen? The fact is that not a single one of the leading 
newspapers that participated "in the persecution" has been 
transformed into a joint-stock company yet. And this is only one 
part of the question; the second requires explanations of 
generally what Bella Kurkova did that displeased our banks so 
much. There is the fear that the explanations are not 
forthcoming: The fantasy was clearly not thought through to the 
end and, most likely, absolutely no thought was given to the 
fact that someone might check it out. 
  The author of the next "riddle" is Bella Alekseyevna 
herself, 
who, of course, thinks that the entire story about the abuses 
was completely trumped up--the abolished GB [security service] 
is "socking it to her." We promise that if the chairman of the 
GTRK comes up with any kind of proof, NEVSKOYE VREMYA will 
simply demand that the monument to Iron Feliks be dusted off and 
immediately installed in its place. 
  The last version belongs to an expert-observer of St. 
Petersburg television, Tatyana Moskvina (her letter was 
published in last Saturday's issue of our newspaper). I quote: 
"...it is clear as day--since so many provocations, frame-ups, 
and scandals have befallen Kurkova, it can only mean one thing. 
It means that somebody wants to be in charge of the television 
company St. Petersburg-Channel 5 instead of Bella Kurkova. That 
is all, my reader friends, that is all." 
  No, that is not all, our critic friend, no, that is not all. 
From a false premise you draw a false conclusion and from the 
standpoint of logic it is a mistake. You will agree that first 
it is necessary to prove that this entire story is nothing but 
"frame-ups and provocation," and then you can move on to your 
conclusions. 
  Of course NEVSKOYE VREMYA has its own explanation for what 
happened and, of course, it does not suit the television leaders 
because the situation, from our viewpoint, is infinitely remote 
from politics. In this case one should speak, in the first 
place, about the absolute lack of control and abuses on the part 
of the leaders of GTRK, second, about the willful 
"improvisation" in commercial transactions and, finally, third, 
simply about arbitrary behavior. How serious these violations 
and negligence are, whether they are from inexperience or 
intentional--this will have to be judged by the corresponding 
commissions according to the results of the corresponding 
inspections. We shall point out only the direct or indirect 
evidence that our television and radio company is not threatened 
with either a creative or a commercial renaissance. If one wants 
to see in this the "gobbledy-gook" of very bigtime politics, 
then our arguments will simply not apply. Although, unlike T. 
Moskvina, we think that it is better not only to list the 
arguments but also to weigh them. 
  Generally speaking, one gets the impression that with the 
exception of people close to the leaders in the studio, 
regardless of which editorial office a person works for, 
regardless of how involved he is in politics, or what he thinks 
about the president or Nevzorov--complaints against the GTRK 
leadership are all of the same kind. First of all, not just 
anybody but precisely Bella Kurkova is reproached for destroying 
the studio and making sure that many talented workers left 
Channel 5. She was the one, when she became Poptsov's deputy and 
opened the branch of Russian television in Karpovka, who took a 
certain amount of television equipment, and creative and 
technical cadres there, leaving Channel 5 plucked in a certain 
sense. Again without coordinating with the collective, Kurkova 
reorganized the structure of the entire studio and, as a result, 
as workers assert, lost the creative potential of the leading 
editors on television (the once elite editorial team of Telefilm 
and the artistic broadcasting editors suffered especially from 
the radical breakup). The reorganization affected the cadres as 
well: She changed the positions of many workers and thus the 
salaries they received changed as well. 
  But it is one thing if she was simply demonstrating her 
indifference to the grumblings of the crowd. But that is not the 
case--she becomes aggressive whenever anyone in the collective 
tries to make a claim to participation in the affairs of the 
television and radio company. Even convening a general meeting 
of the collective causes difficulty--they have not managed to do 
this for about a year and a half: The administration demands a 
written notification for a "plebiscite" with an indication of 
the names of those thirsting for democracy. Taking into account 
the discussions to the effect that out of the 2,000 workers 
Kurkova intends to keep only 400, the meeting should be delayed. 
  Nor is it to Bella Alekseyevna's credit that she has 
restored 
a kind of censorship: While previously (including under Yugin) 
in order to put a program on the air it was sufficient to have 
the signature of the editor in chief of the corresponding 
editorial staff, by order No. 1 Bella Alekseyevna appropriated 
this right for herself and her deputy, Pravdyuk, alone. There is 
no assurance that the GTRK leadership will not thus violate the 
Law on the Mass Media, but there is suspicion that it makes no 
difference to the television leaders whether they do or not. In 
these circles, apparently, it is acceptable to think that the 
bureaucrat himself can become an eternal source of whatever kind 
of legislation may be needed. 
  It is curious, incidentally, how Kurkova herself interprets 
the concept of freedom and independence. The former chairman of 
the commission on mass media of the city soviet, Yuriy Vdovin, 
told what appeared to be an anecdote: At a meeting with the 
leader of the Board of Guardians of the BBC Bella Alekseyevna 
uttered the following sentence: "We are a completely independent 
television company and therefore we have not allowed anybody to 
say anything bad about our president." One wonders what we are 
to do, we taxpayers who think that we may say bad things about 
the president and that, most likely, it is even necessary. 
  True, those who encounter the leaders of GTRK assert that it 
is difficult to call the censorship here political because a 
great deal is explained by simple petty tyranny. The fact that 
Bella Alekseyevna, to put it mildly, is not the country's top 
democrat has been known since the times of "Monitor." About 10 
years ago we students in the journalism department for 
television and radio broadcasting were given some very strange 
directives coming directly from Bella Alekseyevna. In 
particular, none of us was allowed to appear fully facing the 
camera during a television interview. This honor was granted 
mainly to herself and several workers of "Monitor" were 
permitted to show a profile. 
  One of the latest examples is telling: Kurkova ordered to 
have "cut" from the program "St. Petersburg Engagement" Yelena 
Drapeko, who is a member of the jury there, apparently because 
Bella Alekseyevna is not favorably disposed toward her 
husband--a former commercial director of GTRK under Yugin. Is 
this not why the "impudent rumors" are growing stronger that 
Kurkova not only is in charge of all television and radio air 
time in St. Petersburg, but has been trading with them for a 
long time? And, unfortunately, not only in the figurative sense. 
  A certain amount of this is confirmed by the story about the 
head of the commercial center of Channel 5, Syroyezhin: Directly 
or indirectly, participants in these events tell it, of course, 
differently from the way the GTRK leadership does. Viktor 
Pravdyuk, it turns out, has forgotten a great deal! Let us 
recall that it was he and B. Kurkova who thrust the scandalized 
"young man" Mr. Syroyezhin on television. It was Pravdyuk who in 
the autumn of last year presented him to the necessary group of 
people as a genius of commercial operations and the future 
savior of the financial situation of GTRK. And one wonders what 
kept Viktor Pravdyuk from looking then at the labor book of the 
"American businessman" so that later he would not have to feign 
surprise at his acquaintance with Mr. Mikhailov? 
  Apparently there is a need (and pressure from the banks and 
KGB make it incumbent on him) to give his own interpretation of 
this story. And so, immediately after Sergey Syroyezhin gave his 
consent to head up the commercial activity on Channel 5, events 
began to develop extremely rapidly. They simply began to throw 
the belongings of the people who worked at the commercial center 
out of the premises and the workers themselves were transferred, 
without their preliminary consent, of course, to different 
positions or were fired. After successful completion of the 
"operation" in the combined commercial center (OKTs), another 
personage appeared--Mr. Arkhipov, leader of the advertising 
agency Praym (the loud scandal over "radio-rock" has not died 
down yet). 
  The first thing the "newcomers" did was to centralize all 
advertising activity at GTRK, promising to take punitive 
measures against violators. It is quite possible that from a 
business standpoint this was healthy, but the whole question is 
how the funds that are received will be distributed. The editors 
were given promises (and the leaders actively backed them up) 
that they would receive their percentage and that this would 
stir up competition because there were always more people 
wishing to buy advertising time with good programs, and in 
general this would contribute to general prosperity. But 
television workers assert that as a result the editors were left 
without a percentage of the payment for advertising time. 
Moreover, even the provision concerning bonuses which was signed 
by Kurkova began to be violated--they began to pay them 
irregularly, while workers of the OKTs received bonuses in an 
amount of five times their salary. At the same time Syroyezhin 
and Arkhipov--an unprecedented case--were given the right to 
sign checks as well. 
  The events developed even more curiously after that: The 
advertising agency Praym, in which, recall, Mr. Arkhipov 
supposedly did not work, received a colossal markdown from 
television in the amount of 35 percent (true, some people assert 
that the rebate was as much as 45 percent) and, according to the 
agreement, the flow of advertising would not go through the GTRK 
advertising service, which would be the natural thing, but 
through Praym. The advertisers assert that the television 
company did everything possible to make sure that the 
advertising clip bypassed the TV advertising service. The 
explanations were very simple: Conventionally speaking, a clip 
costs us $1,000, and in the Praym agency it only costs $800. 
  One wonders why the television and radio company would lose 
these amounts. Everything is fairly simple if you keep in mind 
that the discount can be exclusive, only for Praym. Although Mr. 
Nikolskiy at a news conference asserted that this was an 
absolutely standard contract and that GTRK had concluded several 
similar ones with various advertising agencies, but so far 
nobody has confirmed this. And it is fairly simple to calculate 
the sums obtained with this "exclusive": In essence Praym is an 
ordinary intermediary office and it does not have to do anything 
except count the money. If you just take 10 percent of the 
billion rubles brought in by advertising each month, that 
amounts to 100 million rubles a month. I do not know whether 
this idea is brilliant from a business standpoint or primitive, 
but in principle it is not difficult to prove that the 
"commercial genius" Syroyezhin was in on this. There are many 
witnesses and a great deal of evidence that Arkhipov and 
Syroyezhin quite openly defended the interests of the Praym 
agency in various negotiations. And it is absolutely 
understandable that without support and certain guarantees from 
the leadership of GTRK, it would never have agreed to do 
business on state television. 
  After this, discussions to the effect that there was the 
idea 
of driving all the creative forces out of Channel 5 and creating 
a joint-stock company with the participation of private 
individuals and a company structure like that of the Moscow 
commercial channel "2 X 2" do not seem extravagant. In pure form 
this is a "rental office," which requires almost no expenditures 
because the air is filled either with American films or news 
from foreign television companies and a large quantity of 
advertising. "Evil tongues say that a plan for this type of 
joint-stock company in principle was approved by the leaders of 
GTRK, and Bella Kurkova intended to sign it with Poltoranan. 
  In conclusion I would like to return to the 
aforementioned piece by T. Moskvina "Do Not Shoot at Bella 
Kurkova!--She Is Leading As Well As She Can." The author refers 
to a conversation with Tatyana Bogdanova--the television 
editor--which took place about 20 years ago. At that time 
Bogdanova characterized TV as Goebbels' department. And Moskvina 
draws the conclusion: "The fact that our television is no longer 
Goebbels' department is largely to the credit of Bella Kurkova." 
One could agree with this conclusion in principle. But the whole 
problem is that if Tatyana Moskvina had conducted the interview 
with her namesake today she would have seen "sadder eyes" and 
would have heard even sharper expressions. But she seems to 
think that such gloomy times as began with the arrival of Bella 
Kurkova, such terrible censorship and clear lack of rights for 
the television collective never occurred, even under CPSU 
leadership. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68551 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94053" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   5 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   V. Bogdanov on Future of TV Broadcasting </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    V. Bogdanov on Future of TV Broadcasting </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM0505092394 Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 5 May 94 
First Edition p 2 </F>

<F P=103> PM0505092394 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Vsevolod Bogdanov, chairman of the Russian </F>
Union of Journalists, by Vasiliy Feklyunin; date, place not 
given: "Let Us Look Truth in the Face" -- first paragraph is 
introduction] 
  [Text] The publication in IZVESTIYA of the famous letter 
about television has generated a flood of letters and protests 
from leaders of regional television companies who are even 
threatening to leave the Russian Union of Journalists. Vsevolod 
Bogdanov, chairman of the Russian Union of Journalists, who 
worked in Ostankino as head of the most troublesome service -- 
that of television programs -- before he arrived in the union, 
answers the following questions. 
  [Bogdanov] I would like to explain straight away that this 
statement was adopted on the basis of the results of 
journalists' hearings which were held under the aegis of the 
Union of Journalists. Representatives of all television 
companies, both state and commercial, were invited to 
participate in them. Unfortunately I was not present at the 
actual hearings and did not participate in composing the letter. 
The fact that my signature is on it is a misunderstanding. 
  It remains a secret to me why representatives of the council 
of leaders of regional television companies did not participate 
in drawing up the recommendations set forth in the letter. The 
flood of emotional telegrams from the localities testifies to 
the differences of opinion which could have been settled at a 
"roundtable" 
  Let us look truth in the face. The state cannot continue to 
maintain around 100 television and radio broadcasting companies 
as it used to in the past. This year the budget for the 
functioning of television has been halved. There are no 
guarantees for vital funding for the future either. 
Consequently, ways of providing for television companies must 
be sought. 
  Forms of ownership can and should be varied. Naturally 
television and radio broadcasting companies in our country can 
be state, public, private, or whatever. Something else is 
fundamental: How to ensure that journalists from regional and 
republic television and radio broadcasting companies do not lose 
control of the situation. We must achieve a situation whereby 
it is precisely the journalists who become the bosses in their 
own editorial offices, on television and radio airtime, and on 
the pages of newspapers and journals. So that they could turn 
from being hired workers into the owners of television and radio 
programs and newspaper columns, and so on. And if this is to 
happen, then they must be ensured the possibility to participate 
on equal terms in the process of privatization and turning 
enterprises into joint stock companies. That is why a law is 
needed. 
  Yes, there is a real danger that television and radio 
broadcasting companies, particularly regional ones, may be 
contracted out [angazhirovany], bought lock, stock, and barrel 
[na kornyu], corrupted, and alienated from journalists' 
collectives. The Union of Journalists will fight against this. 
We consider it to be our duty to fight the ugly phenomenon of 
the parasitic existence, on the body of state television and 
radio companies, of various commercial structures, which are as 
a rule run by showmen. They use state television, which is paid 
for out of the pockets of television viewers, that is, 
taxpayers, to their own ends: They gain huge capital from 
advertising and contracting. In these cases journalists have to 
make bargains with their professional conscience, otherwise they 
would be left without any work. 
  [Feklyunin] So it works out that a number of television and 
radio companies, including the largest one, Ostankino, are only 
symbolically "state" companies, but essentially, as the letter 
published in IZVESTIYA accurately notes, they are "private 
carriers using state transportation." 
  [Bogdanov] My viewpoint is that the essence of the problem 
is not in the name or even in the ownership of the company, but 
in the content of the airtime. 
  Speaking of commercial television, we do not have to explain 
what it can be like. The owners of such a television channel 
naturally do all they possibly can (though within the framework 
of the law) to get profits. This is perfectly explicable -- it 
is business. The consumer, the viewer, has the right to acquire 
this commodity, that is, to watch a program or not. The 
editorial office collective has the right to sell its output. 
  But there is another kind of television in the world. 
People's television, serving the people, television as a means 
of contact with the people, a way of expressing public opinion. 
In the majority of countries it is financed by the people 
themselves, the viewers. People pay for using a particular 
channel. And naturally, those who pay in a certain way control 
the television, so that its programs do not go beyond the 
framework of generally recognized morals, and so that it is 
expressing the viewers' interests. 
  For instance, in Italy there are three RAI channels -- that 
is the state-national television. And another three have been 
created by the notorious Berlusconi. Naturally, these channels 
are of a commercial nature and serve their boss. But Italy's 
private television has been forced to adapt to the best models 
of Italian television art in order not to lose viewers. 
  In our country the state apparently allocates funds to 
maintain the state television and radio broadcasting companies. 
But after all, this is our money, this is the money of the 
Russian citizens, the taxpayers. However, we cannot control the 
way this money is spent or influence the content of the 
programs. Therein lies the essential difference between our 
television and foreign television. 
  Unfortunately, Russian television is gradually turning into 
an arena for games of chance with presenters-brokers 
manipulating wads of banknotes and expensive prizes, and gaudy 
advertisements. This irritates viewers. We are also 
exasperated by the abundance of various preachers from abroad, 
magicians, soothsayers, and astrologers. After all, who stands 
to gain from all this charlatanism on the television screen, who 
earns money from this! There is no country in the world with 
such a market-style television, in the direct sense of the word, 
as we have. 
  [Feklyunin] When I was in Japan recently, I watched programs 
on 12 television channels. And I did not see any scenes of 
violence, killings, so-called oriental combat, or sex on any of 
them. I would call Japanese television humane television 
activity. Although the majority of the companies are nonstate 
companies, moral monitoring of them by the public is very 
strict. In Germany, Sweden, and France television is designed to 
serve the interests of society -- it informs, educates, trains, 
and entertains. 
  [Bogdanov] I would add that any country which respects its 
citizens bans base American blockbusters on television, who, 
thanks to our own television, have become a school of depravity 
for young people, a school of cruelty, crime, and bad taste. 
The worst thing is the pernicious influence of such television 
on our children. 
  It seems to me that it is high time for the complete reform 
of Russian television. You cannot change anything by 
half-measures alone. A concept of Russian national television 
based on the idea of Russia's spiritual rebirth is needed. And 
all studios and companies, regardless of form of ownership, 
should build their program policy within the framework of the 
nationwide concept. 
  We are proposing to declare an open competition for the 
creation of a law "On Russian Television and Radio." Drafts 
will have to go through an examination in republic and regional 
television and radio broadcasting companies before being 
submitted for discussion by the State Duma. 
  The Russian Union of Journalists is putting forward an 
initiative: To create a professional television league which 
would include both employers -- broadcasting television 
companies -- and producers of products for broadcasting. Such 
an organization has already been created by the publishers and 
chief editors of Russian newspapers. 
  A league would help protect the interests of the creative 
collectives of television and radio broadcasting companies and 
have an authoritative influence on the elaboration and adoption 
of the relevant law, elaborate the principles of the 
privatization of television and radio broadcasting and turning 
it into joint stock companies, and would have levers with which 
to control the use of state licenses on television and radio 
broadcasting. 
  In the first ten days of May, we intend to hold an 
international conference on the problems of radio and 
television. We are going to invite leaders of all television 
and radio companies, including regional ones, to participate. 
The Union of Journalists plans to ensure that all participants 
in the conference are received and are given accommodation. An 
exchange of opinions will help find the sensible path along 
which Russian television should develop, remembering the main 
principle: "Do no harm!" 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68552 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94054" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   8 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Journal Appeals to Readers for Aid </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Journal Appeals to Readers for Aid </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0611D Moscow LITERATURNAYA ROSSIYA in Russian No 14, 8 
Apr 94 p 16 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0611D </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow LITERATURNAYA ROSSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Text] LITERATURNAYA ROSSIYA is in danger! 
  Deprived of state subsidies, with no other means of 
financial 
support, and put in the position of a "blockade-raiser," 
independent LITERATURNAYA ROSSIYA is experiencing severe 
financial difficulties. The editorial team has done everything 
within its power to weather the constant rise in the exorbitant 
prices of printing services, newsprint, and so forth. Whatever 
cost thousands yesterday already costs a million today, and 
whatever used to cost a million now costs 8-10 million. 
  We are appealing for aid from all those who grew to love and 
need LITERATURNAYA ROSSIYA in the last few years. The 
disappearance of a newspaper which has consistently defended the 
principles of Russian statehood and state dignity, and which is 
now in the midst of a fierce confrontation with all those who 
are disgracing and destroying Russia, will be an irretrievable 
loss. 
  This loss would be another example of the annihilators' 
skill 
in dislodging the strong props of Russia's substructure and the 
foundation of our common Russian home. 
  We hope we can rely on the support of entrepreneurs and 
businessmen in Russia and on the empathy of our readers. 
  The commercial account of the editorial offices in the 
Business Commercial Bank is MFO 201638 IPO Writers (with the 
notation: for LITERATURNAYA ROSSIYA). 
  Our readers in any part of Russia and the CIS can transfer 
whatever amount they can spare to that account. Muscovites 
should transfer funds to the following: Business Commercial 
Bank, MFO 44583478, acct. 74, 129110 IPO Writers (indicating: 
for LITERATURNAYA ROSSIYA). 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68553 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94055" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Newspaper Appeals for Aid </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Newspaper Appeals for Aid </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Deputies To Aid SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA </H4>

<F P=102> 944F0634A Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA in Russian 15 Apr 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0634A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "We Must Survive Along With You"] </F>
  [Text] And so today's issue of SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA is being 
published with money collected from the readers. But the debts 
remain--250 million to Pressa Publishing House and many millions 
to paper combines, printing offices, and partners in the 
delivery of the newspaper. How did these debts arise? 
  It is known that through the actions of the former Ministry 
of Information and the Press, subsequently declared illegal by 
the court, publication of SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA was halted for two 
and a half months during the October-December 1993 period. The 
editorial office sustained large losses as a result of the 
interruption of the subscription campaign during the first half 
of 1994 and was deprived of income from advertising and retail 
sails--on the whole the losses for the end of 1993 exceeded R1.3 
billion rubles. In addition, the working account of the 
editorial staff was frozen for a long time by an order of the 
Central Bank, which was deemed by the High Arbitration Court to 
be invalid--thus arose a string of debts and unjustified fines. 
  At the same time we know that our readers need the newspaper 
very much--soon it will largely have restored its readership: 
The number of subscribers has exceeded 270,000 and the overall 
circulation is approaching a half million. Since April, 18,000 
subscribers have joined us. And it is becoming increasingly 
expensive to publish the newspaper. We now spend R25-R30 million 
to publish one issue. And this is--for now! How can this be?! 
Let us consult. 
<H5>  Contribution of State Duma Deputies </H5>
  The Communist Party of the Russian Federation faction of the 
State Duma also decided to render aid to SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA. 
Literally during one break between sessions Tatyana 
Astrakhankina filled out a "notice of support": 
  V.M. Zelenin, Yu. P. Ivanov, A.F. Potapenko, N.G. Bindyukov, 
V.N. Volkov, V.D. Filomonov, L.V. Oleynik, T.V. Pletneva, Anat. 
Vas. Ionov, T.A. Astrakhankina, L.N. Petrovskiy, A.N. Mikhaylov, 
A.I. Lukyanov, V.V. Semago, Ye.S. Krasnitskiy, S.N. Reshulskiy, 
I.M. Bespalov, A.N. Gordeyev, G.A. Zyuganov, V.I. Ilyukhin, O.O. 
Mironov, O.A. Shenkarev, K.A. Tsiku, G.N. Seleznev, O.O. Begov, 
V.S. Shevelukha, V.I. Nikitin, V.V. Chikin, V.A. Bayunov, V.S. 
Martemyanov, Ye.A. Kosterin, N.N. Goncharov, V.A. Bokov, T.M. 
Gudima, A.N. Zaytsev, A.V. Aparina, V.I. Sevastyanov, V.P. 
Kartashov, V.I. Zorkaltsev, V.A. Frolov, Yu.K. Sevenard, I.M. 
Bratishchev, V.A. Kovalev, A.K. Frolov, A.A. Ponomarev. 
  The deputies of the faction Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation were joined by Hero of Russia Magomed Tolboyev. 
  Wednesday evening the deputies turned over R520,000 to the 
editorial office. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68554 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94056" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Newspaper Appeals for Aid </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Newspaper Appeals for Aid </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA Appeals to Readers </H4>

<F P=102> 944F0634B Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA in Russian 15 Apr 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0634B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Appeal by A. Shakhnazarov: "A Suggestion to All: National </F>
Support for the National Newspaper"] 
  [Text] I received the last issue of the newspaper 
SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA on Tuesday, 29 March 1994. As I learned, the 
newspaper is not being published because of the indebtedness of 
the editorial office for printing services and paper. But 
perhaps we readers can help. Let us calculate. 
  The newspaper's circulation is reaching 470,000 copies 
and in all probability a good half of these are direct 
subscribers--that is 235,000 people. 
  I am firmly convinced that if the editorial office were 
to appeal through the mass media to the subscribers at this 
critical point IF ONLY FOR R1,000 EACH, this would amount to: 
235,000 X R1,000 = R235 million. It would already be possible to 
retire some of the debts. 
  ...Because if I do not receive my SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA it 
is tantamount to cutting off my oxygen supply. 
  On 12 APRIL 1994, at such a critical time for the 
newspaper I decided to go directly to the editorial offices and 
contribute R5,000 to the fund to help the newspaper. 
  [Signed] A. Shakhnazarov 
  Odintsovskiy Rayon 
  p/o 
Staryy Gorodok 
  Moscow Oblast 
  We invite every subscriber and every reader of 
SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA to contribute no less than R1,000-R2,000 to 
the fund to aid the newspaper. This will help it to come out 
regularly. 
  Thank you for your help, friends! 
  A reminder of our bank account number: 
  125137 Moscow, 24 Pravda Street, working account 362902, 
correspondent account 237161100, MFO 201843 in the Transportnyy 
Branch of the MIB--for the newspaper SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA 
  Telephone (095) 257-23-12 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68555 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94057" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Yakovlev on OBSHCHAYA GAZETA's First Year </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Yakovlev on OBSHCHAYA GAZETA's First Year </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0665A Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian No 16, 22-28 
Apr 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0665A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yegor Yakovlev: "A Handshake in Passing"] </F>
  [Text] It is a line from Levitanskiy, I believe: "A year 
has passed, like no time at all, we did not even have a chance 
to talk..." It comes to mind over and over again specifically 
today, on the day of a more than modest anniversary. It has been 
one year since OBSHCHAYA GAZETA renewed its publication. To 
those two issues which appeared in the days of the putsch, when 
the unification of the printed word and the people which had 
been growing since '85 reached its highest point, 39 more issues 
have been added. They began their journey as of April of '93, in 
the time of opposition and tragic discord. 
  All these issues were conceived to be more interesting than 
they turned out. They were conceived as a dream and, like a 
dream, they were not fully realized. I cannot restrain myself 
from saying the most banal thing: How quickly this year has 
flown! And we really did not have a chance to talk: Only an 
inconsequential part of what we wanted to say when we first met 
at the OBSHCHAYA GAZETA editorial office has been realized. 
  We began by adopting three precepts. 
  Not a single intelligent person shall be left 
aside. The newspaper prides itself on its authors. But 
their circle could have been broader. There is an abundance of 
intelligent people in Russia. 
  To create without destroying. We strived to 
analyze the current without breaking the ties of the times, 
without depriving the readers of their greatest valuable--their 
life experience. After all, how much can be achieved in a place 
where, for the sake of a career, they are ready to divest 
themselves of the past?! 
  To get to know ourselves and the times. And here 
we were not overly successful. It still remains in question: 
What kind of society are we creating, and how will each of us 
live in it? 
  Then again, there is still plenty time to sigh about what we 
did not have time to do. On the day of the anniversary, we 
should speak about that which has been accomplished. The 
newspaper is being published! For our times, that in itself is a 
significant achievement. The editorial staff consists of people 
who are devoted to the newspaper and friendly with each other. 
This too is a rarity nowadays. The newspaper has a readership, 
and people write to us. I can testify to the fact that, in 40 
years of working on newspapers, this is the first time I have 
encountered such well-prepared readers, who formulate precisely 
and with ease that which concerns them. 
  No, we cannot brag about our circulation--alas!, nor about 
the fact that we shout louder than anyone else. The most 
important thing is that we have been able to foresee, to sense 
the attitudes in society which have become ever more obvious in 
the course of the year. We publish reflective articles to 
counterweigh the political prattle which is intolerable for 
people engaged in important matters. We suggest that we not 
waste time waiting for ideal heroes to come to power. It is more 
useful to judge about what is going on from moral positions, for 
all to hear, without hiding the truth about the leading persons 
and executors. In returning the name "Obshchaya" [common] to the 
newspaper, we understood that the greatest deficit of our times 
is the deficit of commonality with the states surrounding 
Russia, and within it--commonality between people. The current 
general propensity toward reunification, toward accord, which is 
being raised up by the popular wave in spite of the calculations 
of various politicians, confirms the fact: Here too, we were not 
wrong. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68556 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94058" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commercial Consolidation at Ostankino Viewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Commercial Consolidation at Ostankino Viewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0665B Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian No 16, 22-28 
Apr 94 p 13 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0665B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Irina Petrovskaya: "Will We Be Able To Force the </F>
Genie Back Into the Bottle?"] 
  [Text] Last week an event occurred whose necessity had been 
long reiterated by many of those people who understand even a 
little bit about the economics of television. The event was a 
milestone, revolutionary, worthy of press conferences and widely 
broadcast announcements. Finally, an effort will be made to 
somehow regulate the chaotic and uncontrolled commercial 
activity of "Ostankino"--the source of many and all kinds of 
abuses. According to the most modest estimates (which were used, 
specifically, by the Presidential Control-Inspection 
Administration, which conducted an investigation of the 
company), "Ostankino" underreceived over 60 billion rubles (R) 
last year. They disappeared without a trace, settling in 
someone's private pockets. The average cost of a minute of 
advertising today is $5,000. There are 100 such minutes at 
"Ostankino" in the course of a day. That means it should receive 
somewhere on the order of half a million dollars a day. Yet in 
fact it receives $600,000 - $700,000 a month! 
  The heads of the company (different ones and in different 
periods) sooner or later came to the idea of centralized 
advertising. It is true, there were always opponents who tried 
to persuade the "chiefs" that once the genie had gotten out of 
the bottle, it would be impossible to force him back in. The 
scope of business was too great, there were too many people and 
structures interested in the real possession of advertising 
time. There was too much money involved. 
  Despite all the "buts," the current leadership of 
"Ostankino" 
has nevertheless decided to force the genie back. It is doing so 
in a surprisingly quiet, if not to say secretive, manner. In the 
week which has passed since the moment the decision was adopted, 
there has not been a single interview or a single piece of 
information in any of the newspapers! 
  Obviously, this really is a delicate matter, if the 
respected 
and competent people to whom I turned for explanations hesitated 
and avoided direct answers, while sceptics agreed to talk 
exclusively in a confidential manner. 
  On the whole, all of my "consultants" agreed on one thing: 
The creation of a single holding company which would sell all 
the advertising time on channel one at firm prices is a good 
idea. It is specifically according to such a scheme that many 
Western companies exist. However, in the West they went to this 
scheme systematically and gradually. For us, however, the 
realities are different: "Ostankino" produces only one-fifth of 
the entire product. The remainder it presently buys from 
independent television companies, paying them in advertising 
time. They, in turn, sell this time and decide for themselves 
how to spend the money they receive. They produce cultural 
programs, which are unprofitable and to which they cannot tempt 
advertisers, at the expense of profitable commercial programs. 
  Now "Ostankino" intends to settle accounts with them in real 
money, obtained from the sale of advertising time. And here is 
where the questions and the doubts arise: Will programs which 
are educational and cultural but unprofitable and not attractive 
to advertisers disappear from the air? Will the new "master of 
the money" dictate to "Ostankino" what to buy and what not to 
buy? Why, for example, should it buy an expensive domestic 
program when it can buy a cheap movie in the West, which will 
bring a huge profit? From the standpoint of business, this is 
normal. Yet from the standpoint of creativity, culture, and the 
interests of society? When the advertising holding company 
receives the first real profits, will it not be interested in 
further increasing them by means of reducing expenditures? After 
all, the stockholders--private firms--did not take on this 
endeavor out of charitable convictions?! They have to pay off 
"Ostankino," and to "cook up" something for themselves, if you 
will excuse the expression! 
  I have heard apprehensions to the effect that the 
advertising 
holding company may go from being a mediator to being a 
contractor, determining the company's program policy. (It is the 
same principle: He who pays calls the tune). Then channel one 
will simply collapse, turn into a broadcaster of third-rate 
films, "soap operas" and advertising clips. 
  Moreover, the skeptics say, "Ostankino" is a bottomless pit 
which is capable of swallowing up any amount of money, millions 
and billions. Just hand it over. Since there has been no 
reorganization of the company's outdated structure, and the 
budget deficit remains high, "Ostankino" will use the money 
received from commercial activity primarily for continuing to 
feed its overly inflated staff and its administrative apparatus, 
and to patch up the numerous holes and breaches. Where is the 
guarantee that there will be enough left over to settle accounts 
with private companies in a timely manner (and at a real 
price!)? There is no such guarantee. 
  Well, and finally, the main thing: The changeover of 
"Ostankino" to stockholding with the participation of the 
television producers themselves (which is natural) has stopped. 
It has gotten bogged down somewhere at the level of the 
president's apparatus, and there is almost no hope left for it. 
"Ostankino," while in fact remaining state-owned, is in essence 
even now being changed over to shareholding. Moreover, the piece 
being auctioned off is its most profitable and choice one--the 
advertising space. In principle, there is nothing else to 
auction off. "Ostankino" does not own anything but air 
time--neither equipment, nor its own building, nor the desks in 
the offices, nor even the lights in the restrooms. All this 
belongs to an entirely different, independent organization--the 
Television Technical Center. Now even the advertising time has 
an owner--a strong, economically well-grounded monopolist which 
unites six advertising agencies. All the other agencies (and 
there is a great multitude of them in Moscow alone) will either 
buy advertising time from it, or will perish (which is 
improbable), or will begin a struggle. And we know what happens 
when spheres of influence are divided up. However, we do not 
want to think about this. First of all, because for "Ostankino" 
this is an experiment. After all, it is never too late to return 
to the former scheme. Secondly, all the apprehensions which have 
been expressed are in the category of versions and suppositions 
which, nevertheless, must be "sound-tracked." After all, it is 
better not to allow something than to try to correct it later. 
For now, it has not yet begun. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68557 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94059" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Ostankino Advertising Director Interviewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    New Ostankino Advertising Director Interviewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0665C Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian No 16, 22-28 
Apr 94 p 13 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0665C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Sergey Kuvaldin, general director of the </F>
joint-stock company "Reklama-Holding" ["Advertisement-Holding"], 
conducted by Anna Kachkayeva: "`Ostankino' Enters the Era of a 
New Advertising Policy"] 
  [Text] Henceforth, the right to place advertisements 
on channel one air time is being handed over to the closed type 
joint-stock company "Reklama-Holding" 
["Advertisement-Holding"]. 
  Its founders are comprised of large advertising agencies, 
with the controlling packet of stock (30 percent) belonging to 
the "Ostankino" television company. The rest of the stock is 
distributed between the founders as follows: The agency "Premier 
SV," "Inter ViD," "Video International"--15 percent each; 
"Maxima"--12 percent; "LogoVaz press" and "Oster"--6.5 percent 
each. Professionals in the advertising business worked on 
developing the model for the holding company. Foreign experience 
was also taken into consideration, and specifically the practice 
of creating television advertising agencies on the state 
channels of Germany and France. Aleksandr Dmitriyev has been 
appointed president of the a/o [joint-stock company] 
"Reklama-Holding," and Sergey Kuvaldin--its general director. 
  Our correspondent spoke with the latter, and asked him to 
explain in greater detail about the new commercial structure. 
  [Correspondent] Will there be a principle change in the life 
of the first state channel with the creation of the holding 
company, and what will the viewer get as a result of its 
activity? 
  [Kuvaldin] The creation of the holding company is the first 
important element in the new economic mechanism which is 
gradually being developed at "Ostankino." Its main goal is the 
centralization of advertising. What is the advantage? A singular 
program and price policy is established, dumping (pricing below 
production cost) is not permitted, and the uncontrolled 
placement of advertisements on the basis of barter is 
discontinued. The quality of the advertising product is 
improved. Moreover, "Ostankino" will not only get a percent of 
the profits from placement of the advertisements, but it will 
also receive a three-month advance on the funds which it so 
badly needs for production of its programs. The holding company 
will pay out in advance the sum at which "Ostankino" estimates 
its advertising time for the quarter. The viewer will also not 
lose out. At present, I fully understand his irritation when 
there are 15 minutes of advertising in a row--at the end of a 
broadcast, between broadcasts, and at the beginning of the next 
broadcast. Now we will be able to build an advertising schedule 
which does not exhaust the television viewers. Advertising 
should not take up more than 15 percent of the air time, and 
will be distributed equally throughout the course of the day. 
  This means that some broadcasts will not have any 
advertisements at all, while in those such as "Field of 
Miracles" their presence is not only justified, but also 
economically expedient. Advertisements for alcoholic beverages 
and tobacco products may be aired during the evening hours. It 
is true, I must concede--significant changes will not take place 
right away. We must not forget that "Ostankino" has already 
concluded agreements until the end of the year. Naturally, 
"Reklama-Holding" will have to work in a mixed regimen, 
fulfilling the former obligations while trying to mildly 
implement its own policy. 
  [Correspondent] How will the holding company's price policy 
be formulated? 
  [Kuvaldin] The most preferable scheme is the following: 
"Ostankino" appraises its advertising time and defines its 
amount. This advertising time is "cut up" into packets, which 
include "prime" and "non-prime" time. These packets are then put 
up for auction, with the starting price being the "Ostankino" 
price plus 10-15 percent. Understandably, it is profitable for 
the holding company to sell the advertising time at a higher 
price. First of all, because the founders expect dividends, and 
secondly because it is necessary to justify the expenditures for 
maintenance of the agency. The arithmetic here is simple: The 
higher the price at which the holding company sells the 
advertising time, the greater profits both the joint stock 
company and its founders will receive. However, it is 
inexpedient to raise the price endlessly, or it will be 
impossible to find buyers. By the way, one of the tasks of the 
joint-stock company is to help "Ostankino" reach real 
advertising valuations. 
  [Correspondent] What will be the relationship between 
"Reklama-Holding" and independent producers working at channel 
one? 
  [Kuvaldin] Their interests, undoubtedly, must not be 
infringed upon. The producer must receive as much as his program 
costs by estimate and in accordance with its rating. If we 
proceed from notions of profit, then the holding company is 
interested in a good channel and quality broadcasts. A dull and 
boring channel cannot have expensive advertising, and expensive 
and high quality advertising is one of the means of reducing its 
volumes. 
  [Correspondent] There are mixed feelings at "Ostankino" 
about 
the creation of the joint-stock company. What, in your opinion, 
is the reason for this? 
  [Kuvaldin] As in any new endeavor, they doubt its success 
simply because we have never had anything like it before. 
Moreover, the centralization of advertising touches upon the 
personal, corporative interests of some workers at "Ostankino." 
Small advertising services in the studios are being cut, and the 
company itself will change its relations with its 
producers--studios and associations. "Ostankino" will buy 
broadcasts from them, and the number of purchased broadcasts 
will determine the staff numbers of the studios, their financial 
condition and their capacity for providing their associates with 
social benefits. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68558 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94060" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Federal Employment Service on Unemployment Level Forecast </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Federal Employment Service on Unemployment Level Forecast </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
for   1994 

<F P=102> 944E0785A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 28 Apr 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0785A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article issued by the RF [Russian Federation] Federal </F>
Employment Service: "Government Forecast of Growth in 
Unemployment Publicized; In May There Will be 1,714,000 Persons 
`Officially' Unemployed"] 
  [Text] On 1 April 1994, the State Employment Service 
registered 1,363,600 citizens who were not engaged in labor 
activity, among those--1,083,400 were unemployed. For March the 
number of citizens not engaged in labor activity increased by 
97,200 as compared with the preceding month, and the number of 
unemployed--by 94,000, respectively. 
  On the whole for the first quarter of 1994, the number of 
citizens not engaged in labor activity and unemployed increased 
by 1.3 times. 
  Citizens laid off from enterprises, organizations and 
institutions comprise 25.1 percent of the overall number of 
those not working. 
  The level of unemployment (ratio of the number of registered 
unemployed to the number of the able-bodied population of 
working age) comprised 1.3 percent for Russia as a whole on 1 
April 1994. For the first quarter of the current year, the level 
of unemployment rose by 0.3 percent. 
  The number of job vacancies reported to the State Employment 
Service increased by 14,500 for March, and on 1 April comprised 
289,400. Eighty-three percent of the vacancies were for 
blue-collar workers, and 17 percent--for white-collar workers. 
  On the average for Russia there are 4.7 persons not engaged 
in labor activity (including 3.7 unemployed) for each vacancy 
reported to the State Employment Service. In a number of regions 
the pressure on the labor market is characterized by great 
tension. For example, in the Ingush Republic there are 180 
out-of-work citizens for each vacancy, in the Aga-Buryat 
Autonomous Okrug--105; in Yaroslav, Pskov and Sakhalin Oblasts, 
the Chuvash Republic and the Nenets Autonomous Okrug--from 30 to 
45, and in Bryansk Oblast, the Republics of Mari El, Kalmykiya, 
Adygeya, Altay and Buryatiya--from 21 to 27 idle persons. 
  There were 26,800 persons participating in public works in 
March of 1994. On the whole for the first quarter of this year, 
the number of public works participants comprised 40,800 
persons, which is 1.8 times greater than the same period last 
year. 
  The overall number of citizens undergoing training in a new 
profession at the direction of the employment service comprised 
88,000 persons in the first quarter of 1994. This is two times 
more as compared with the corresponding period last year. 
  In January-March of 1994, 26,200 unemployed persons 
exercised 
their right to early retirement, including 8,500 in March. 
<H8>  * * * </H8>
  [NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA note] According to the forecast of the 
Government Center for Economic Market Conditions, in May the 
number of persons not engaged in labor activity should exceed 
the 1.5-million mark, and in June it should reach 1,714,000. The 
numbers for unemployed persons are forecast by the center as 
being 1,301,000 and 1,425,000 persons, respectively (see table). 
According to this forecast, in June there will be more than 4 
percent unemployed in Pskov, Kostroma, Vladimir and Yaroslav 
Oblasts, the Udmurt Republic, as well as in the Republics of 
Kalmykiya and Dagestan. 


Forecast of basic indicators of the labor market on the whole for the Russian 
Federation in 1994 (thousand persons) 

                 January     February    March     April       May         June 
                 report      report      report    estimate    forecast    forecast 

Number of        11651266    1364        1472      1583        1714 
citizens 
registered by 
the employment 
service who 
are not 
engaged in 
labor activity 


Listed as        894         989         1083      1188        1301        1425 
unemployed 
-total 

unemployed,      236         252         268       285         357         428 
idled by 
layoffs from 
enterprises 
and 
organizations 

Unemployed       569         633         713       806         882         970 
persons 
receiving 
benefits 

Availability     283         275         289       244         206         187 
of open jobs 
and vacant 
positions 
(thousand 
positions) 

Level of         1.07        1.18        1.29      1.41        1.54        1.68 
unemployment 
(%) 



<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-051-109A>      Forecast of the RF Government Center for Economic Market Conditions </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-051-109B>      Increase in number of employed persons continued in the first quarter, but gradually (thousand </FIG>


<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-051-110A>      Official statistics on persons not engaged in labor activity, unemployed and receiving benefits </FIG>





</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68559 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   4 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> ARMENIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liparityan Views Karabakh Peace Process </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liparityan Views Karabakh Peace Process </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1191A Yerevan RESPUBLIKA ARMENIYA in Russian 4 May 94 pp 
1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1191A </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan RESPUBLIKA ARMENIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Zhirayr Liparityan, Armenian Republic deputy </F>
minister of foreign affairs, by Ida Martirosyan, under the 
rubric "War and We"; place and date not given: "The Possible and 
the Necessary"] 
  [Text] The possible and the necessary--these are the 
premises on which we should base our actions in order to shift 
to more complex issues--is the opinion of Zhirayr Liparityan, 
Armenian Republic deputy minister of foreign affairs. 
  [Martirosyan] Mr. Liparityan, in your opinion, is the 
peacekeeping process progressing, regressing, or not going 
anywhere? 
  [Liparityan] Most likely, the latter. Although of course 
there is a certain progress, and certain retreat. For instance, 
Azerbaijan does not accept any mediating efforts, any 
cease-fire. It is ready for a new offensive and de facto 
continues the war, air raids--that is, Azerbaijan's position is 
evidence of the lack of progress in the peacekeeping process. On 
the other hand, the CSCE has become more active. 
  Mr. Eliasson has sufficiently analyzed previous mistakes and 
now is demonstrating a new approach, which inspires certain 
hopes. That is, as you can see, there are both pluses and 
minuses, so we may say that as a result they neutralize one 
another or, in other words, there is no particular progress. At 
the same time, the opportunities for it undoubtedly exist. To 
carry them through, however, one has to work hard, in order to 
first and foremost identify where and how they could be 
utilized. I would count as an unquestionable achievement the 
fact that the main parties in the conflict--Azerbaijan and 
Karabakh--finally came to understand that the problems cannot be 
resolved in a military way and the process of peaceful 
settlement remains the only viable option. This may be done 
within the CSCE framework, the way Eliasson suggests. It could 
be the Russian initiatives. It is an inarguable fact that Russia 
as the country in closest proximity, which has a stake in 
normalizing the situation in the region and has ties with all 
parties to the conflict, may play a very significant role. We 
hope in any case that Eliasson will be able to combine the 
efforts of both the CSCE and Russia, which undoubtedly is ready 
for it. In this case we will be able to speak of moving toward 
progress. 
  [Martirosyan] Some Western political scientists and 
journalists believe that despite the fact that the West had 
certain interests and plans here, its initially active position 
on the Karabakh issue is on the wane, and that in the final 
count the outcome will be determined by Russia. In Russia, 
however, there is a belief that instead of showing activism in 
the peacekeeping process--which is within the abilities of the 
CSCE, and United Nations, and the United States--the West does 
not miss the occasion to throw sticks in the wheels of Russian 
initiatives. Would it be fair to say that this disjointedness 
and asynchronicity, which stems from a certain divergence of 
their interests, is in fact one of the reasons producing the 
lack of clear progress in settling the conflict? 
  [Liparityan] Your concern over this is understandable and 
justified in a sense that relations between the West and Russia 
are far from clear-cut. Several years ago they were perceived 
differently, as more difficult. After the disintegration of the 
USSR and especially now, when the policy of Russia as a state is 
more clearly defined, many aspects are becoming more clear. And 
especially how Russia itself sees its place in the world. This 
is also a multistep process, in which the West does not always 
understand or accept Russia's position and, vice versa, Russia 
also does not always correctly perceive the former's intentions. 
They are both in the process of getting to know one another. 
There is no doubt, however, that an understanding will come, 
their positions will get mutually fine-tuned, and they will 
adjust. One can already see it in the example of Bosnia, where 
we are seeing precisely this stage of fine-tuning, a step toward 
cooperation between Russia and the West. Let us hope that this 
will happen here, too. 
  I must say that newspaper items and even statements of some 
politicians and diplomats sometimes [line illegible] actions. 
And I repeat, they reflect not so much the probability of events 
as the deep fear of the worst. Although there is nothing 
particularly terrible in it; on the contrary, this is like a 
warning of danger. It is clear, however, that one cannot form a 
judgment of the real policy from them. Russia has an image of 
the country that is quite responsible in its policy and actions. 
And, I repeat, both Russia and the West are moving step by step 
[line illegible] all, where each will take its place in a new 
set-up. Therefore I have no doubt that Russia will not act 
against international law, the CSCE, and the United Nations; on 
the contrary, together we will find an approach to settling our 
conflict. By the way, do not forget that even when there exist 
apparent similarities, each conflict has its own character and 
therefore requires a special approach to its resolution. I must 
say that this is precisely the direction in which our diplomacy 
is working: finding common points in the interests of Russia and 
the West in order to strengthen their interaction and impact on 
the fastest possible resolution of the problem. This is the main 
approach. Of course, there are disagreements not only between 
Russia and the West as a whole, but also in the approaches 
favored by the United States and the EC. But they are not 
substantive. Thus, I repeat, everything boils down to 
painstaking work, and I am convinced that mutual understanding 
is inevitable. 
  [Martirosyan] Do you consider correct an approach that makes 
cease-fire a cornerstone and only then a search for a peace 
formula? Perhaps it would be more correct to put the latter 
ahead of the former, or act in parallel in both directions? 
  [Liparityan] We have discussed this issue in great depth, 
and 
not only we but other states as well. From the methodological 
aspect, there are three approaches. The first is a simple 
cease-fire. Then, in several phases, resolution of other issues. 
  The second is to first define the status and after that 
cease-fire and everything else. The first approach is 
unrealistic, because Azerbaijan does not accept it. They are 
afraid that in the current reality the issue of returning the 
seized territories will be postponed until further negotiations. 
Therefore, it agrees to a simultaneous cease-fire and return of 
seized territories. The first option alone does not suit it. We 
and Karabakh are ready to accept the first option, but, as I 
said, we know that for Azerbaijan it is unacceptable. As to the 
second--to start with the status--in our opinion, this will lead 
to exacerbation of the conflict because there are tremendous 
principal disagreements between the parties precisely on this 
issue. And there is deep mutual mistrust. Therefore, it is 
simply naive to assume that under this option the parties will 
be able to come to an agreement. Thus, our approach is in 
working from the premise of what is possible and necessary. To 
find these components [line illegible] move over to more complex 
issues. Our package consists of three points that meet the 
requirements of possible and necessary. It is cease-fire, the 
return of seized territories, and lifting the blockade. All of 
this is spelled out in the CSCE's Vienna document and the 
Russian initiative. The problem is that there is no guarantee 
for a cease-fire without some disengaging forces. We cannot 
trust Azerbaijan. A cease-fire must be stable and guaranteed. If 
a cease-fire is guaranteed, we guarantee the return of the 
territories. Without Lachin, of course, which is subject to 
further negotiations, because for Karabakh it is a lifeline. And 
lastly, lifting the blockade. These three points as a package, 
in our opinion, are the most acceptable and realistic solution. 
But to consider it all even in parallel with the issue of 
status, I think, albeit possible, is fraught [as published] 
because unresolvable issues associated with it will immediately 
arise. It means that we have to admit that the issue of 
status--and it is this issue that in the final count constitutes 
the cornerstone of the peace formula--is the most difficult one 
and it is not advisable to give it priority. You see, there is 
one more serious nuance in the issue of defining the status: 
More weight will be given to the voice of the party that will 
rake up more military victories by the time of negotiations. 
Subsequently, this will reduce the guarantees of a real 
cease-fire process. Which is the most important point. A 
cease-fire is necessary in order to stop bloodshed; in order for 
people to return to normal life, taste it again, and realize 
that nobody will benefit from an endless war between peoples 
living side by side; and finally, in order to reduce domestic 
pressure for both sides and for simple human desire for normal 
peaceful life to prevail. And perhaps it is after the 
cease-fire, during the period of returning to normal life, that 
people will find those ways and possibilities for coexistence 
that we cannot find now. They will reach compromises they now 
consider unthinkable. That is why I am saying that right now the 
most important part is to apply all efforts in order to 
implement the three conditions I have enumerated above. 
  [Martirosyan] Over these years, the conflict has gone 
through 
several stages. Initially it was between a republic and its 
autonomy within the boundaries of one state; then it was 
considered internal within the framework of one newly formed 
sovereign state, although in essence it was between one 
recognized state and another one claiming recognition. Now it 
has transcended into an international stage, although the world 
community seemed to try to avoid precisely that. Judging by all 
signs, however, the world community does not take into account 
this transformation, because otherwise the legal aspect of 
approaching the settlement would have been changed. Could this 
perhaps be the reason why the peacekeeping process is not moving 
anywhere: the lack of a fresh look, a new legal approach to the 
conflict, which is going through transformation during its 
development, which stem from objective changes on the political 
situation? 
  [Liparityan] You see, internalization of this problem also 
has gone through several stages. The first was the result of the 
collapse of the USSR, when it changed from being an internal 
problem of the latter to an external one, because one of the 
interested parties, in addition to the ones directly involved, 
was a sovereign state--Armenia. The second happened at the point 
when Armenia and Azerbaijan joined the CSCE as members. A CSCE 
mandate dated 24 March 1992 was adopted that said that the 
resolution of this conflict must be found through mediating 
efforts of the CSCE. The third stage is when Azerbaijan called 
in mujahidin and other contract soldiers. What I want to say is 
that there have not been any particular legal changes but there 
obviously have been certain political ones. For instance, now 
the United Nations has entered the process--an organization 
which, unlike the CSCE, has its own military contingent and the 
right to bring it into a territory where certain events take 
place, and without the consent of the parties to the conflict at 
that. That is, it is a certain qualitative change in the 
political approach.... But, I repeat, there are no such changes 
in the legal aspect. There is still no decision, a CSCE or UN 
document, presenting the issue differently. 
  [Martirosyan] Still, in your opinion, is a change in the 
approach on the part of the world community needed? 
  [Liparityan] You see, in a certain form it already has 
happened. The CSCE has realized that by its very structure it 
does not possess the capabilities of implementing the decisions 
entrusted to a peacekeeping mission or group under its aegis. I 
mean the process of cease-fire. In some decisions the CSCE has 
acknowledged that by very [as published]. The result of this 
realization was that Russia directly joined in on the issue. In 
reality, it already has happened, although officially the CSCE 
does not say that it is no longer engaged in the issue of 
cease-fire. Both the numerous statements of the Minsk Group 
chairman and UN resolutions mention the mediating part of 
Russian peacekeeping forces in the cease-fire process. This is 
happening both de facto and de jure, since there exist 
corresponding UN resolutions. That is, as you can see, when it 
is obvious that the CSCE does not possess the ability to 
influence one or another process, it steps aside, handing this 
right over to whoever has the real ability. In this respect Mr. 
Eliasson has a very clear position, more active: If Russia can 
do it, let it happen, while we will send our observers. 
  [Martirosyan] Mr. Gilmore believes that the question of 
bringing in the troops is not as simple as it may seem, 
especially in such a protracted and bloody conflict as that of 
Karabakh, and that it is unlikely to be a panacea. Besides, he 
says it is a question of time, since numerous issues involving 
the status and mandate of such a contingent must be 
resolved--from their rights and duties to subordination and 
financing. Meanwhile, there are many who do believe that without 
a disengaging military contingent, resolution and observers 
alone will not guarantee real compliance with the terms of 
cease-fire. You have said earlier in this interview that you 
support the priority of cease-fire and everything else should 
come later. Does it mean that even this--provided that a 
peacekeeping contingent does need to be brought in--now will be 
delayed under the pretext of defining the status of the latter? 
  [Liparityan] Mr. Gilmore undoubtedly is correct when he 
mentions the problems associated with the mandate. There are, 
however, forms, accepted by the international community, when 
this can be dispensed with. For instance, CSCE rules envisage an 
option of bringing in third-country peacekeeping forces without 
a special CSCE mandate. We do not see any particular problem in 
whether these troops will have a CSCE or UN mandate (although of 
course it would be good) or whether it would be a contingent 
supplied by the third country. The main item is the scope of 
their authority. This is what should be in the center of 
discussion--not the formalities aimed at dragging out the 
process. 
  [Martirosyan] Do you not think that Armenia's participation 
in the negotiations' process contributed to a certain degree to 
its even greater involvement in the conflict as a directly 
interested party? In any case, this is the way it looks--on one 
hand, we proclaim that we do not participate in the war and, on 
the other, sit at the negotiations table. If the former is true, 
why is Turkey, for instance, not sitting next to us, since they 
have certain relations with Azerbaijan, or Russia for which this 
role is more fitting as a legal successor to the USSR than the 
role of a mere peace keeper? Perhaps if Armenia had not taken 
upon itself originally the mission of representing Karabakh in 
the negotiations process, the world community would have been 
compelled to recognize Karabakh as an independent side in the 
negotiations sooner, since they had to be conducted with someone. 
  [Liparityan] Armenia participates because its territory is 
under attack. This is one aspect of our participation. And the 
second is that we have a direct stake in the security of 
Karabakh, which is populated by our kin. And finally, the 
foremost reason for our participation was that at the time the 
negotiation process began, Karabakh was not recognized by the 
world community as a subject with an independent right to 
participate in negotiations. So we had to undertake it. Armenian 
officials, unlike the ones of the Nagorno-Karabakh Republic, had 
the official right to represent Karabakh's interests, and simply 
speak for it at official meetings at an international level in 
various countries and organizations. Although of course one 
could speak of some form of participation by Turkey as an 
interested party as well. For us, however, what is important is 
not formality but the work, its results. Now Karabakh 
participates in this process. Now that this process has started, 
our role should gradually diminish from that moment on. 
  [Martirosyan] Do you believe that as a result of 
negotiations 
we have come even a step closer to ending the war and that 
something still needs to be changed in the world community's 
approach to the Karabakh conflict in order to speed up its 
resolution? 
  [Liparityan] In my opinion, I have already answered quite 
fully the second part of the question. The international 
community must apply a certain effort and pressure on Azerbaijan 
to make it accept one of the options. And second--the 
international community must combine its efforts. That is, 
Russian and the CSCE must interact at least to make the former 
happen--exert influence on Azerbaijan. After all, look, both we 
and Karabakh are coming up with peace initiatives. Azerbaijan, 
on the other hand, keeps coming up with delays. On the other 
hand, it is obvious that its complex domestic situation does not 
allow those healthy aspirations for peace--which probably do 
exist there, but do not have the opportunity to manifest 
themselves--to come through. In short, in order for the 
peacekeeping process to proceed more actively, we need greater 
activism by the world community. Everything that depends on us 
we already do. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68560 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   8 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> ARMENIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liparityan Comments on Trips to Turkey, Iran </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liparityan Comments on Trips to Turkey, Iran </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1132 Yerevan AZG in Armenian 8 Mar 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1132 </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan AZG </F>
<F P=105>  Armenian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with First Deputy Foreign Minister Zhirayr </F>
Libarityan in Yerevan; date not specified] 
  [Text] Zhirayr Liparityan, first deputy minister of foreign 
affairs, recently returned from a working tour of Russia, 
France, Turkey and Iran. What were the results? What issues were 
discussed? What changes were observed? These are the topics our 
correspondent discussed with the first deputy minister in an 
interview. 
  [Liparityan] Our principal goal was to convey to those 
countries our view of the present situation which was created as 
a result of the developments of recent months and to hear their 
assessments. When I was in the United States in January, I was 
able to convey our approaches to officials of the State 
Department. At that time I also met with Jan Eliason, the 
chairman of the Minsk Group of the CSCE. Let me note with regard 
to this trip that we discussed the issue of the development of 
bilateral relations with Iran. Although we do not have bilateral 
relations with Turkey, we agreed that we must reinstate the 
direct ties that were cut following the recent occupation of 
[Azerbaijani] territories. 
  [AZG] Last year you visited Turkey again and, if I am not 
mistaken, at that time you noted a certain understanding in the 
Turks' position. Of course one cannot expect any change of 
position on matters of principle, but did you notice any 
movement in terms of the correct perception of the 
[Armenian-Azeri] conflict? 
  [Liparityan] I think that there is such a movement. Our 
meetings were all working meetings. We were very interested in 
knowing the results of [Azerbaijani President Haydar] Aliyev's 
visit to Turkey. The Turks intend to back Azerbaijan's 
approaches, at least officially. When Azerbaijan began to 
respond negatively to all the proposals put forward, the Turks 
reaffirmed that Azerbaijan has the right to do that. Turkey's 
position is also that [Armenia] should withdraw from the 
[occupied] territories. During our talks we focused on that 
issue in greater detail and pointed out that it is impossible to 
solve the Azerbaijani problem with that approach. 
  First, our position is that the problem is not one of 
territory because both Nagorno-Karabakh and Armenia have 
endorsed the plan which envisages that they withdraw from those 
territories--except Lachin which, as a complex problem, must be 
discussed in the second stage. 
  We asked why Azerbaijan is raising the issue of territories 
and is trying to seize by force what it can get without any 
fighting. Azerbaijan continues to state that it does not wish to 
discuss the issue of blockades. The Turks agree with these 
questions we raised. They are also in agreement on the issue of 
a ceasefire, but they are not so keen about the insertion of 
peacekeeping forces. We explained to them that the situation is 
already such that it is doubtful if a ceasefire can be 
maintained without separating forces. 
  [AZG] Has there been any movement in Turkey's policy with 
regard to Azerbaijan? 
  [Liparityan] I think that the Turks now realize the mistakes 
they permitted last year during Elchibey's tenure. Now that they 
see how Aliyev plays with different countries, they do not have 
the confidence they had during Elchibey's time. At the same 
time, however, they do not wish to lose their influence over 
Azerbaijan, and, as a result, do not want to engage in a 
confrontation with Aliyev. My impression is that Aliyev asked 
for many things but did not get much. He demanded much, but 
promised little. Consequently, the Turks were not very happy 
with his visit. 
  [AZG] What is the situation in Iran relative to Turkey? 
  [Liparityan] In our opinion, Iran's position is more 
practical. Iran is saying: We will accept and are prepared to 
contribute to any initiative which works, brings peace and ends 
the conflict. 
  [AZG] But Iran persists in speaking out in favor of 
Azerbaijan's territorial integrity. Also, it has stopped 
offering its offices for mediation. 
  [Liparityan] For the present time, Iran has not offered a 
mediation role. Our opinion is also that at this time what is 
needed is not a new mediation mission, but to reduce the 
existing missions and combine them into a single one. The 
Iranians are prepared to help in any way that the sides propose. 
  Also, in their newspapers the Iranians refer to changes of 
borders rather than territorial integrity. In this regard the 
most severe comments were made by Rohani, the deputy speaker of 
the Iranian parliament. 
  I told them that such a question does not exist. Azerbaijan 
can recover all of its territories if it wishes by agreeing to 
any peace plan. 
  [AZG] Did you discuss the issue of the blockade around 
Armenia with Turkey? 
  [Liparityan] We did. They have no intention of resolving 
that 
problem until the conflict ends and the peace process begins. If 
that happens they are also prepared to develop bilateral 
relations. 
  [AZG] What is the status of Armenian-Iranian relations? 
  [Liparityan] Those relations were frozen in a political 
sense. Now things have changed. We even agreed to exchange 
ambassadors instead of charges d'affaires. For the Iranians what 
is important is not so much the issue of occupied territories 
but the establishment of a ceasefire, because they are concerned 
that all these developments may have an effect on the Azeris 
living in Iran. However, this must not be interpreted in general 
that the issue of territories is not of great concern to Iran. 
  [AZG] You also visited France. What is the position of 
French 
diplomats? 
  [Liparityan] France believes that it is no longer possible 
to 
work with the Vienna plan. They think if one of the sides has 
rejected that plan, the others must work on new approaches. We 
explained to them that there are a few ways of solving that 
problem. First we must think about the cessation of hostilities 
and then move on to the other steps. At present there are two 
major difficulties. One is that the parties to the conflict do 
not trust each other. Azerbaijan believes that Karabakh wants to 
keep the occupied territories or to exchange some of them for 
recognition of its status. Karabakh believes Azerbaijan will use 
any ceasefire to rearm and to resume its offensive. The other 
difficulty is that there are countries that want to solve other 
problems. For example, Turkey wants to use this conflict to 
advance its agenda in Azerbaijan and Central Asia. Although 
Turkey is interested in ending the conflict it wants to develop 
its relations with Azerbaijan, and to that end has not 
established relations with Armenia. Unlike Turkey, the problem 
Iran wants to solve is not this. It has not predicated the 
development of its bilateral relations with Armenia on this 
conflict. In contrast, Turkey has not only refused to establish 
relations with Armenia, but has taken a position in the conflict 
which is not rational. 
  [AZG] What is Russia's position in the wake of recent visits 
by Kazimirov and Kondratev to the region? 
  [Liparityan] That is related to the 18 February document. 
Azerbaijan rejected it at the beginning but agreed to it later. 
However, there are no practical results because additional 
meetings are necessary to solve the technical problems. 
  [AZG] Azerbaijan rejected that plan at the beginning, but 
they declared later that they accept it. Subsequently it was 
stated that they rejected it. How can that be interpreted? Are 
there differences within the Azeri leadership or is it another 
ploy? 
  [Liparityan] It can be interpreted in two ways. It seems 
that 
there are some differences [within the Azeri government]. On the 
other hand, they can always agree to it today and reject it 
tomorrow. When Russia says a few words they say yes. When 
Russia's envoy returns to Moscow they say no again. Azerbaijan 
has always had that problem. Its representatives never had the 
necessary authority during negotiations in the Minsk Group. Even 
when they agreed to a plan, they reneged on it after they 
returned to Baku. 
  We have never had such problems--saying yes first and then 
saying no. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68561 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> ARMENIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Citizenship Reportedly Sought for Terrorist </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Citizenship Reportedly Sought for Terrorist </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1132B Yerevan AZG in Armenian 11 Mar 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1132B </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan AZG </F>
<F P=105>  Armenian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Text] We reported in our 26 February issue, based on a 
report filed by the Noyan Tapan news agency, that "the French 
authorities officially applied to the Armenian embassy in Paris 
with two questions: a) Is Armenia prepared to accept Simon 
Nairian? b) Is Armenia prepared to offer him permanent 
residence?" Noyan Tapan picked up this news from the Committee 
for the Defense of Armenian Political Prisoners. A member of 
that committee, Armenian Supreme Council Deputy Aleksandr 
Manucharyan, rushed to gather signatures in parliament to appeal 
to the Armenian president to grant citizenship to one of the 
principal figures of tragic incident at Orly airport in Paris in 
1983. Nairian is now completing the last weeks of his 15-year 
sentence in a French prison. Manucharyan's initiative is based 
on the premise that "if Armenian citizenship is not granted to 
Nairian, after he is released he will be turned over to Turkish 
authorities who will definitely hang him." Nairian is a citizen 
of Turkey where he has been condemned to death in absentia. 
However, when our correspondent in Paris contacted the Armenian 
embassy in France to verify these facts he was given an 
ambiguous answer. He was told that neither the French 
authorities nor any official person has come to them with any 
such problem and that they consider the uproar that has been 
raised in Armenia a tempest in a teacup. What remains unanswered 
is from where the Committee for the Defense of Armenian 
Political Prisoners picked up this information and what basis it 
has for its verity. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68562 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> ARMENIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Armenian Labor Market, Privatization Viewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Armenian Labor Market, Privatization Viewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1132C Yerevan YERKIR in Armenian 12 Feb 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1132C </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan YERKIR </F>
<F P=105>  Armenian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Davit Tumanyan, candidate of economic sciences </F>
and director of the Yerevan Employment Center: "The Labor Market 
and Employment of the Population in Armenia"] 
  [Text] The Armenian labor market is characterized by a 
number of special features: 
  a) The new type of labor market is in a state of formation 
which has been proceeding in parallel with the transformation of 
the economic system together with fuel, raw-material, energy and 
financial crises as well as the war in Karabakh. 
  b) A restructuring of the economy, based on new forms of 
ownership, is under way in the republic. As a result there is a 
movement of the workforce from the state sector of the economy 
to the private one. However, the weak private sector cannot 
absorb the supply of available idle labor. A class of private 
entrepreneurs and employers who can employ large numbers of 
workers from the labor market while building or developing 
production units has not yet formed. The essential and proper 
conditions to organize production are not yet present in the 
republic. Only small enterprises are created in which the 
recruitment of workers is based on ties of friendship or blood. 
  The number of persons employed by the state sector of the 
economy in 1993 was 3.2 percent less than what it was in 1992 
(1993 figures are estimated). The number of persons employed by 
the entire economy dropped by a similar amount over the said 
interval. There have also been significant changes in the 
structure of labor resources. The relative weight of persons 
employed in public production declined by 2.8 percentage points 
while those who are unemployed increased by 3.1 percentage 
points. 
  c) The branch structure of the republic's economy has not 
yet 
been determined. As a result, the formation of demand for labor 
is blocked. The resolution of the branch structure policy became 
essential beginning in 1990 when it was decided to make a 
transition to a new economic system. However, that was not done. 
Today work in that direction is slow. The policy on economic 
branch structure must be in harmony with the republic's resource 
(both material and labor) potential as well as its internal and 
external economic, social and military interests. It must reduce 
the production volume of energy- and material-intensive branches 
and expand the volumes of labor- and knowledge-intensive 
branches. Special attention must be paid to the service sector. 
It must be pointed out that in all developed countries more than 
half the workforce is employed in the service sector. In those 
countries, the number of persons employed in the primitive 
sectors of the economy (agriculture, forestry and fishing) is 
small (2 to 10 percent of the total workforce). In our republic, 
20 percent of the workforce employed in public production is 
employed in primitive sectors, and 40 percent is employed in the 
service sector. This distribution must be gradually changed, and 
the relative weight of the service sector must be increased. 
  d) The imbalance between the supply of and the demand for 
labor is associated with the reduction in the overall number of 
work places. A rigorous inventory of work places in the republic 
has not been taken. As a result the dynamics of their 
development can be estimated only on the basis of indirect data. 
Analyzing the last few years' data for capital investments, the 
utilization of primary resources and the number of persons 
employed in the economy as well as the results of individual 
studies, one can conclude that the number of work places has 
followed a declining trend since 1991. The number of work places 
in 1992 was roughly 4 to 6 percent less than in 1990. The 
qualitative aspect of the correlation between work places and 
the workforce is characterized by a severe imbalance. Most of 
the existing work places are incompatible with current 
scientific and technological standards and Armenia's new 
situation. The republic must have work places equipped with 
modern technology and equipment in order to open up to the world 
market. Unfortunately, most of the basic resources of existing 
enterprises are fatigued metaphorically and physically. In many 
work places the basic conditions necessary for work are 
nonexistent. 
  e) The low level of wages is aggravating the problems of the 
labor market. The wage level has also become the important 
factor which is forcing a large number of employed persons to 
seek better-paying employment and to change the nature of their 
work. 
  f) A portion of the workforce is leaving the republic in a 
disorganized manner. That has reduced the scale of the problems 
of the labor market. It must be pointed out that most of those 
who leave are highly-trained specialists, craftsmen as well as 
businessmen who could have raised the standard of employment by 
a certain amount. 
  g) The role of the labor unions in the organization of the 
workforce is very poor. Although an agreement was signed between 
the labor unions and the government last year, no practical 
results have yet been observed. 
  h) The presence of a large number of refugees [from 
Azerbaijan] in the republic has heightened the tensions in the 
labor market. 
  In order to visualize the scale of the problems of the labor 
market in Armenia let us review certain data we have computed. 
In Armenia, an average of 340,000 to 360,000 persons look for 
work each year. An overwhelming majority of these people are 
persons who want to change the type of their work. Of these, 43 
percent find work. About 68 percent of unemployed citizens and 
only 2 percent of those who want to change the type of their 
work apply to employment centers. On the average, only 25 
percent of all persons looking for work apply to employment 
centers. 
  As of the beginning of 1993, 67,600 persons were registered 
at employment centers. Of those, 64,400 were unemployed persons. 
By the end of 1993, the total number of persons registered at 
employment centers had risen to 114,000 of which 110,200 were 
unemployed. At the end of year, the supply of [idle] labor had 
increased by 68.6 percent compared to the beginning of the year, 
while the demand for labor had declined by 37.3 percent. Because 
of the low demand for labor, only 5,400 citizens were placed in 
work by employment centers in 1993. As of 1 January 1994, more 
than 102,600 citizens had the status of unemployed. More than 60 
percent of the persons with the status of unemployed are women. 
The number of young unemployed persons is also quite high. The 
education level of more than half of the unemployed citizens is 
middle-school education or lower. Those with higher [above high 
school] education constitute 17 percent of the total. 
  The labor market in Yerevan is significant because of its 
large size. Approximately one-third of the republic's population 
lives in that city. The capital is home to a substantial portion 
of scientific, cultural, industrial enterprises and agencies of 
the state apparatus. Also the population of the capital is 
highly mobile which expands the outer limits of the labor 
market. The labor market of Yerevan is characterized by severe 
imbalances. Nearly 90 percent of the jobs offered through the 
employment centers are worker positions and 10 percent are 
service positions. The supply of [idle] labor, however, has 
exactly the opposite distribution. As a result, the number of 
citizens with the status of unemployed had increased by 11,100 
(2.2-fold) at the end of 1993 compared to the beginning of the 
year. 
  The [earthquake] disaster zone encompasses 15 districts 
[rayons] and four cities subject to republican administration. 
As of 1 January 1993, 25.2 percent of the republic's population 
lived in this region. Although 5 years have passed since the 
earthquake of December 1988, the status of reconstruction work 
is far from being satisfactory. In the conditions that have been 
created, that work has either come to a stop or continues at a 
very slow pace. Because few enterprises have been rebuilt and 
construction work is continually postponed, the level of 
unemployment is quite high. The disaster zone accounts for 34 
percent of the unemployed persons in the republic. 
  These figures refer to unemployed persons who are officially 
registered. There is a large number of hidden unemployed persons 
in the republic. Generally industrial enterprises either do not 
work at all or work with interruptions. Those who work in those 
enterprises are, in effect, unemployed. According to statistical 
data, 12 to 15 percent of persons employed in the state sector 
(90,000 to 115,000 persons) were subject to forced layoffs each 
month in 1993. In industry that figure is as high as 24 to 31 
percent (71,000 to 82,000 persons). Hidden unemployment is 
always present in agriculture. The number of people in that 
category has grown recently because of the war situation in the 
border regions. Finally, there is a substantial army of jobless 
persons amongst the unemployed (migrants, "small vendors,' 
swindlers, etc) and refugees. 
  When these groups, that is the hidden jobless, are taken 
into 
account, the number of unemployed persons in Armenia can be 
estimated to be 250,000 to 350,000. 
  The special peculiarities of the workforce in Armenia are 
likely to persist in the near future. More importantly, in 
conditions of high rates of currency devaluations it is 
impossible to keep work places that are not operational. If the 
phenomenon of hyperinflation penetrates the industrial sector it 
would be impossible to avoid massive unemployment. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68563 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   4 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> ARMENIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Energy Situation in Republic Viewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Energy Situation in Republic Viewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1192A Yerevan RESPUBLIKA ARMENIYA in Russian 4 May 94 pp 
1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1192A </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan RESPUBLIKA ARMENIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ashot Aramyan: "Energy `Today' Energy </F>
`Tomorrow.' Four-hour limit--`Ceiling' or `Floor'?"] 
  [Text] Recently our, shall we say, swimming in luxury, that 
is, in electric energy, which has begun to remain in our 
apartments not only for the four "scheduled" hours but also 
longer, has given people hope for a brighter energy future. In 
fact, since in practice the delivery of electricity to the homes 
of the population lasts from 0600 to 1600, is it not possible to 
increase the schedule for the delivery of electric energy to the 
population until at least, say, 1800. Some people say: Why do we 
need a schedule now, let them give us more light without any 
schedules--and that is all there is to it. But the aspect of a 
schedule is important in that only these hours are guaranteed by 
the state: Beyond that there might be light and there might 
not--and nobody who has received his four hours can complain 
about the lack of additional energy supply. 
  The president of the state concern Armenergo, Mels Akopyan, 
for example, does not rule out the possibility that the 
surpluses of electric energy that appear will be distributed 
unequally among the various localities. For instance, in places 
where operational conditions are created for uniform provision 
of electric energy to all the buildings for eight hours, some 
will receive it for 16 hours, some for 10 hours, and others will 
receive only the four hours that are guaranteed anyway. Thus 
raising the "ceiling" of the guaranteed quota of electric energy 
will probably be disadvantageous for those who have become good 
at selling these surpluses. It is clear that the greater the 
scheduled supply, the lesser the surpluses and, correspondingly, 
the possibilities of various manipulations and machinations. 
  But there is also the opposite side of the coin. Actually 
our 
current relative well-being with respect to energy is in fact 
extremely tenuous. For example, excessive usage in the gas line 
could put an end to this immediately--and we would all be 
sitting as we were during the winter with a zero schedule. So 
far there are only two scales of differentiated provision of 
electric energy to the population: the border regions and the 
republic disaster zone receive 25 percent more electric energy 
than the quota for the rest, which, incidentally, even here does 
not preclude abuses in the localities. Because the quota is 
determined centrally and handed down from Yerevan but the 
functions of uniform and fair distribution of it are still up to 
the local energy departments. For example, in Vanadzor, 
according to the local schedule, the people's homes have light 
for two out of every five hours (not counting the night hours, 
when the electric energy might be turned off altogether). After 
we eliminate the six night hours from the 24 hours of the day, 
through simple calculations we reach the point where the people 
of Vanadzor today have light only four to five hours during the 
day time. Even worse, according to operational information, the 
state of affairs in Gyumri, whose population so far can have 
light for only two hours a day, it sometimes happens, for 
example, that it is from 12 midnight until 0200.... 
  "We are running into another danger today," says Mels 
Akopyan, "--insolvency or deliberate refusal to pay for electric 
energy, on the part of both the enterprises and the population. 
According to our predictions, this problem will be aggravated 
even more in a month or two, and its peak will come during the 
middle of the summer, when it would seem that there should be no 
special problems with the provision of electric energy. Based on 
this, the following decision has been adopted: for the 
appropriate prepayment we can increase the quota of electric 
energy released to any rayon of the republic or rayon of the 
city of Yerevan. That is, if you show me a receipt saying that 
Araratskiy Rayon of the republic has paid for electric energy 
for 12, 16, or all 24 hours a day during next month, then its 
quota for energy released will be increased correspondingly. 
And, conversely, if it continues to underpay, the rayon will be 
given the minimum according to the schedule, at best...." 
  Today changes are taking place in the proportions of the 
sources of electric energy as well. While during the winter, as 
we recall, the gas ran out a good--or not good--dozen times, and 
then all the electric energy produced in the republic came from 
organic fuel (mazut) and it placed a heavy burden basically on 
the hydraulic resources, now the fact that the republic is 
receiving an acceptable amount of the blue fuel has removed some 
of the load from the exhausted rivers, and mainly from the 
literally exhausted Sevan, although the proportion of 
hydroelectric energy in the overall volume of energy produced in 
the republic is still fairly large. 
  Now a couple of words about nuclear energy. Today one can 
say 
quite simply that the population is faced with one more winter 
without a nuclear power plant. Deputy Prime Minister V. 
Chitechyan at his recent news conference stated that even when 
it is on line the nuclear energy will be used in areas where the 
turnover and return on capital are high--so as to recoup costs 
of starting up the Armenian Nuclear Power Plant as quickly as 
possible, and after that the nuclear energy can help to ease the 
energy crisis of the actual population. Which areas are these? 
One can make the assumption, say, that the following scenario 
will occur: Gas freed up because of the availability of energy 
from the "atom" could be transferred to Nairit in order to step 
up the production of products that are in great demand abroad. 
It would also be possible to give nuclear energy to the complex 
of copper-molybdenum mining-enriching combines of the republic 
in order at least to increase the extraction of raw material and 
then sell it abroad. In a word, there are various possibilities 
here. One thing is clear: In this breakdown of things the 
immediate energy needs of the population are in one of the last 
if not the very last place. Moreover, let us not forget that 
nuclear energy can create conditions for saving on water of the 
Sevan. In a word, so far the nuclear power plant is clearly not 
about us. With the same or greater success we could link our 
hopes to a partial solution to the energy crisis with the 
startup of the fifth power block of the Razdanskaya GRES [state 
hydroelectric power plant], where the problem of financing has 
already been solved ($57 million) and at which construction work 
is now in full swing. So next year the republic, including the 
energy-producing facilities, will have a fifth block of the 
hydroelectric power plant with a capacity almost as great as 
that of the block of the nuclear power plant--300 megawatts. 
Now, in particular, at the second International Energy 
Conference in Yerevan, they are working extra hard on the 
possibilities of financing the construction of a sixth block of 
the Razdanskaya GRES with the same capacity--300 megawatts. So 
in any case there are prospects of, if not completely then at 
least partially, overcoming the energy crisis in the republic, 
but, alas, not until next year. 
  In conclusion, a couple of words about the organizational 
side of the matter. Recently the special-purpose state 
enterprise Armenergo was transformed into a state concern. What 
brought this about? Mels Akopyan explains this by the need to 
improve it and bring it into line with modern requirements for 
the structure of the department. In particular, the head of the 
enterprise has now been assigned purely management functions, 
and the lower levels--greater independence. But here is another 
fact that is even more difficult to explain. During the winter a 
good share of the property of Armenergo was arbitrarily placed 
at the disposal of the Yerevan City Council and, corresponding, 
the Yergorelektronet [Yerevan city electric energy network]. Not 
only was such a decision not written into any laws, it 
reinforces people's impression that it is now possible to do 
anything you want to with state property--a circumstance that 
does not contribute to good feelings. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68564 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   4 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> ARMENIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Georgia, Armenia Sign Railway Agreement </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Georgia, Armenia Sign Railway Agreement </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1192B Yerevan RESPUBLIKA ARMENIYA in Russian 4 May 94 pp 
1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1192B </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan RESPUBLIKA ARMENIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ruben Karagezyan: "The Problems Are Finding </F>
Solutions. Railroad Workers of Armenia and Georgia Work 
Together"] 
  [Text] From now on the railroads of Armenia and 
Georgia will coordinate their cargo shipments without the 
participation of intermediary firms. Their interference has made 
transportation work considerably more difficult and caused 
confusion in the rate policy. 
  The new principle for the operation of the railroad 
services of the two neighboring states was backed up by an 
agreement signed a couple of days ago in Tbilisi--while a 
government delegation from the Republic of Armenia headed by 
State Minister G. Martirosyan was there. The delegation 
discussed a number of issues regarding economic relations and 
ensurance of the safety of the operation of communications 
facilities of the two states. 
  Recently the capital of Georgia has become a kind of Mecca 
for transportation and communications leaders of the Republic of 
Armenia. They have been coming here very frequently to 
coordinate problems of mutual interest, to resolve operational 
issues related to cleaning up after the blowing up of the gas 
line, railroad bridges, and a strip of road, as well as other 
facilities, and to reach agreement regarding crucial problems 
that are of interest to the two parties. 
  It is known that for more than a year since withdrawing from 
the Ministry of Railways the Armenian Railroad has been in a 
crisis situation. The situation is exacerbated even more by the 
constantly increasing prices of electric energy, which have gone 
up almost 50-fold since the beginning of this year. Without 
state support, the railroad is trying to get out of the 
situation by itself. 
  "If we want to keep the railroad we cannot take the path of 
constantly raising rates for transportation of passengers and 
freight," said a member of the delegation, chief of the Armenian 
Railroad Administration Vladimir Asriyants. "This tendency is 
already having a negative effect on the volumes of 
transportation and frightening away clients, who prefer to use 
other means of transportation when they have relatively small 
volumes of cargo. 
  "After coordinating the tariff policy with Tbilisi we 
decided 
that until the end of the year, regardless of the price 
increases, we would not change the established rates for freight 
shipment. 
  "This meeting enabled us to take another step toward solving 
other problems and also removing certain obstacles standing in 
the way of efficient operation of the railroads. For example, we 
reached mutual understanding regarding an issue so important for 
us as efficient use of empty equipment. We had been experiencing 
great difficulties here--hundreds of empty cars in unusable 
condition were located in various stages of the Georgian 
railroad. Now, in keeping with the agreement, all of the 
maintenance of the unused equipment will handled by the Georgian 
railroad. 
  "And there is another detail that is of great significance 
to 
us [passage illegible] cars [passage illegible] for Armenia. 
  "[Passage illegible] work groups for finding these cars on 
the territory of Georgia and returning them to Armenia. These 
groups will also determine the value of stolen cargo, which will 
be compensated for by the Georgian side. 
  "An agreement was also reached concerning unimpeded 
unloading 
of our cargo in the ports of Poti and Batumi. The Armenian 
Railroad, taking into account the difficulty of the situation in 
these cities, has sent a diesel engine to Poti to organize the 
maneuvering work. We are being paid for operating this 
locomotive. 
  "In the plan for technical cooperation we agreed, in 
particular, to do repair work on rolling stock in the plants of 
Georgia and to jointly repair the tracks between the 
Sadakhlo-Ayrum stations and also the bridge across the river 
Khrami. 
  "Analyzing the statistics concerning the sabotage committed 
at night, we decided, for purposes of safety of the movement of 
the trains, to use the road mainly during the day. In 
conjunction with the Georgian side we are allotting labor and 
material resources for restoration work. We have developed 
measures providing for passenger safety and also for changing 
the schedule for movement of passenger trains, receiving and 
dispatching cargo, and providing for their storage on the 
territory of Georgia in extreme situations--explosions, natural 
disasters." 
  In conclusion, Vladimir Asriyants said that today, in spite 
of the sharp increase in the cost of ties and rails and the 
repair of locomotives, communications, and signalization, 
centralization, and blocking, the railroad administration is 
stepping up its work for improving the tracks and other railroad 
facilities from Yerevan to Ayrum and is preparing them for 
summer passenger transportation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68565 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   5 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> ARMENIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Economic Agreement Signed in Austria </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Economic Agreement Signed in Austria </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1192C Yerevan RESPUBLIKA ARMENIYA in Russian 5 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1192C </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan RESPUBLIKA ARMENIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed report under the rubric "Diplomacy": "Austria </F>
Is Coming Closer"] 
  [Text] A government delegation of the Republic of Armenia 
headed by Minister of the Economy of the Republic of Armenia 
Yegiazaryan was in Austria for several days. 
  In Vienna they signed an agreement on trade-economic 
cooperation between the two countries. They also okayed another 
agreement concerning promotion and protection of foreign 
investments. 
  The delegation from Armenia had a meeting with the minister 
of transportation and nationalized industry of Austria, during 
the course of which a draft agreement between the two countries 
in the area of air communications was discussed. The agreement 
will make it possible to complete flights in the air space of 
the two countries, use airports, service aircraft, etc. Thus the 
airline companies will have a legal basis for concretizing their 
relations with the corresponding agreements. 
  Delegates from Armenia visited a number of enterprises of 
the 
Austrian capital and learned about their activity. Then in the 
Ministry of Transportation and Nationalization of Industry of 
Austria, which has jurisdiction over the state enterprises, 
there was a businesslike discussion of certain mutually 
advantageous programs. 
  From the Chamber of Commerce, which essentially unites a 
number of industrial ministries and enterprises and also 
performs banking functions, an agreement was reached to the 
effect that the Austrian side would render to Armenia a certain 
amount of assistance in the matter of training personnel and 
encouraging investments. 
  The trade-economic and other agreements will undoubtedly 
help 
in the development and deepening of Armenian-Austrian 
cooperation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68566 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   3 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> AZERBAIJAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Banking Irregularities Detailed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Banking Irregularities Detailed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1190A Baku EKONOMIKA AZERBAYDZHANA in Russian 3 May 94 p 
1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1190A </F>
<F P=104>  Baku EKONOMIKA AZERBAYDZHANA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by A. Yusifova: "Banks Have Been Audited"] </F>
  [Text] The Main Administration for Banking Control of the 
National Bank of Azerbaijan audited 31 commercial and joint 
stock-commercial banks in the first quarter of 1994. 
  The audits revealed the following shortcomings: To this day 
a 
large amount of indebtedness on loans remains at many commercial 
banks; unlawful increases in banks' statutory fund, failure of 
some joint-stock banks to issue stock, absence of registrations 
by the Ministry of Finance of the republic, violations of the 
quota of cash holdings, provision of cash services to customers 
without permission from the National Bank, violations of rules 
in the process of accepting customer documents, violations of 
the economic standards of banks, failure to meet compulsory 
reserve requirements, and deficiencies in opening accounts have 
occurred. 
  For the most part the absence of letters of guarantee from 
enterprises which are indebted to the banks, guarantees of 
security for personal property, and other credit guarantees, as 
well as the absence of control over the use of the credit issued 
were the reasons for the violations. 
  Besides, it was noted that the founders of the Naftabank 
commercial bank have contributed to the statutory fund 460,000 
manats out of the funds issued to them as a loan. Five other 
commercial banks have violated the percentage ratio for 
contributing monies to the statutory fund (it should be no 
greater than 12 percent). Some banks were not adequately 
equipped with security devices. Seventeen banks were fined 
11.049 million manats for failing to comply with compulsory 
reserve requirements. In 728 cases, enterprises did not have 
certificates of registration with the tax inspectorate. Some 178 
enterprises and organizations have not been registered by the 
Ministry of Justice. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68567 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   3 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> AZERBAIJAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Monopolism Barrier to Market Transition </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Monopolism Barrier to Market Transition </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1190B Baku EKONOMIKA AZERBAYDZHANA in Russian 3 May 94 p 
1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1190B </F>
<F P=104>  Baku EKONOMIKA AZERBAYDZHANA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by I.M. Dzhabrailov: "Monopolism: Barriers in the </F>
Way to the Market. Problems and Solutions"] 
  [Text] Historically it so happens that on its way to the 
market the economy of Azerbaijan has to destroy a 
supermonopolized structure and provide conditions for the 
formation of a competitive environment. It is impossible to 
create a market economy in the absence of demonopolization, just 
as it is impossible to create competition without privatizing 
state property. 
  This problem is frequently brought up in the mass media, 
which consider naive and primitive patterns for fighting 
monopolism. Scenarios are proposed which frequently identify 
monopolism with monopolies, and the latter--with the dominant 
position of companies in the market. Various forms of monopolism 
are frequently mixed up, while techniques for fighting them are 
borrowed either from the "workaday" world or from college 
textbooks on economic theories. 
  The urgency of developing the effective means for combating 
monopolism can hardly be overestimated, because this is now 
problem No. 1. It is virtually impossible to embark on 
privatization, solve any structural problems, or fight inflation 
to counter a slump in production unless we are able to develop 
an economic strategy that could successfully counter monopolism 
and destroy the economic basis for its recurrence. 
  Not a single state of the world has been able to avoid a 
fall 
in the living standard of the people, a slump in production, 
inflation, unemployment, and so on in the process of making a 
transition to the market. The difference is that some states 
effect demonopolization in the economy by resolute methods 
within one year (for example, the Czech Republic) or stop 
hyperinflation within two or three months (Greece, Austria, 
Yugoslavia), whereas others unsuccessfully try to solve these 
problems over decades (most Latin American countries). This is 
why the issue should not be just how to develop the concept of 
an antimonopoly policy and a program for demonopolizing the 
economy (on paper) but also how to take the greatest possible 
advantage of opportunities to implement them. 
  It may be conjectured that it is virtually impossible to 
perform financial stabilization and implement anti-inflationary, 
fiscal, and foreign economic policy without restricting [as 
published] the interconnection with the antimonopoly policy. In 
anticipation of objections from my unseen opponents, I would 
like to refer to the experience of Russia, Ukraine, Kazakhstan, 
and Turkmenistan. For example, Ye. Gaydar's program of financial 
stabilization failed solely because they tried to solve this 
serious problem exclusively by monetary methods. It is 
impossible to solve this problem through the sphere of 
distribution, without serious changes in the economic structure, 
in the environment in which objective conditions exist in the 
economy for the expanded reproduction of inflationary phenomena. 
This elementary truth appears to have been forgotten by us. 
Moreover, we can be accused of Marxism and antireformism. 
However, we would like to remind propagandists and agitators of 
various hues who have a notion of economic theory at the 
"street" level that the Marxist theory of money, capital, added 
value, profit, reproduction, and crises has not yet been refuted 
by anyone. The wish is to solve all problems in a hurry without 
destroying the economic mode that has been created over decades. 
This thought was borne out yet again by a sharp deterioration of 
the economic situation in Russia at the end of 1993 and the 
beginning of 1994, following the monetarist experiment of the 
Russia's Choice type. 
<H5>  Results </H5>
  The crisis in the economy is growing. There are no rays of 
stabilization in the economy. The following data for the first 
quarter of 1994 compared to the corresponding period of 1993 
testify to this: 
  --output of the net material product fell by 25.5 percent; 
  --the defaulted debt of enterprises increased by a factor of 
13; 
  --gross capital investment was off by 41 percent; 
  --housing construction diminished by 55 percent; 
  --retail sales fell by 46 percent; 
  --the index of prices and rates for goods and services went 
up by a factor of 11.3; 
  --the monetary income of the population increased by a 
factor 
of 4.5. 
  The coefficient of the lead of the growth of prices compared 
to the growth of monetary income came to 2.5. The purchasing 
power of the population diminished by the same amount. We should 
add to this the monthly level of inflation--30 percent, and an 
abrupt reduction in employment. According to our data, 
unemployment in the republic now comes to about 0.9 million. 
This amounts to 35 percent of the economically active 
population. No wonder that under the circumstances, the 1994 
state budget was drafted with a deficit of 47 billion manats. 
Therefore, budgetary expenditures exceed revenues by 30 percent. 
<H5>  Macroeconomic Problems: Reality and Projections </H5>
  A reduction in the monetary income of the population in real 
terms has brought about a contraction of effective demand. The 
capacity of the market for consumer goods fell by a factor of 
2.5 to three. Delays in the payment of wages, retirement 
benefits, and allowances by two to three months should have 
apparently stabilized the growth of prices and the level of 
inflation. In reality everything is the other way around: the 
rate of inflation and prices increase month after month. 
  A fall in investment by a factor of more than two and a 
13-fold increase in defaulted debt have brought many enterprises 
to the brink of bankruptcy; consequently, the recession in 
production has deepened and employment declined. 
  In reality, the slump in production does not come to 25-26 
percent, as reported by official statistics, but is considerably 
greater. The government and the National Bank are trying to 
prevent reductions in output by higher state expenditures and 
credit outlays. However, these measures are not successful 
because they depreciate the manat and distort monetary 
circulation still more. 
  The slump in production will deepen unless extraordinary 
measures are taken promptly. This poses the danger of an 
economic cataclysm. 
  It seems that the government has opted for an erroneous 
tactic. Two versions of a solution are possible in this 
instance. The first is to restore centralized management of the 
economy. The second is to develop a program for priority 
measures for carrying out market reform with an active system 
for social protection of the population. In this case, programs 
for the demonopolization of the economy should become a priority. 
<H5>  Types of Monopolism in the Economy </H5>
  There are differences between monopoly practices, a 
monopoly, 
and the dominant economic agent. If we recognize as dominant the 
position of an economic agent (joint-stock company, limited 
liability company, and so on) which is based on the superiority 
of its economic potential and which makes it possible for the 
agent to decisively influence the competition and thus hamper 
access to the market to other participants in the market, an 
economic agent whose market share exceeds 35 percent is 
considered dominant. Correspondingly, there may not be more than 
two to three dominant economic agents in the market. 
  An economic agent which absolutely dominates the market is 
recognized to be a monopoly. As a rule, its share exceeds 51 
percent. 
  There may be one monopoly in the market. However, there may 
be several monopolists in the market for homogeneous goods. This 
is a so-called "collective monopoly" whereby several economic 
agents are bound by an agreement among themselves. Monopolism, 
or monopoly practices (activities, behavior), should be 
distinguished from a monopoly and a dominant economic agent. 
Both monopoly and nonmonopoly economic agents, state central and 
regional organs of power, or departmental organs of government 
whose actions are aimed at preventing, restricting, or 
eliminating competition to the detriment of consumer interests 
may engage in monopoly practices. Therefore, the following types 
of monopolism shall be distinguished: 
  --state monopolism (that of the organs of power); 
  --departmental monopolism (that of the organs of 
government); 
  --regional monopolism (that of the organs of local power); 
  --monopolism of economic agents. 
  The following are derivative from the above four types of 
monopolism: 
  --financial and credit monopolism; 
  --natural monopolism; 
  --patent and license monopolism; 
  --monopolism arising out of horizontal and vertical 
agreements between players in the market. 
  Therefore, monopolism is associated with activities aimed at 
restricting or eliminating competition and harm the interests of 
consumers. In Azerbaijan state and departmental monopolism, the 
monopolism of economic agents, as well as natural and 
financial-credit monopolism shine through most vividly. 
<H5>  Abuses by Market Agents as a Form of Manifestation of </H5>
Monopolism 
  It is necessary to note that there are monopolists and 
monopolists. Theoretically, two kinds of monopolists may exist. 
Some can ensure their dominant position through a difficult but 
honest competitive struggle. As a rule, they engage in fair 
competition without restricting it and without harming the 
interests of consumers in any way. Other monopolists take 
advantage of their dominant position in the market to raise 
market prices, with the quality of the product deteriorating, 
and use illegal means for counteracting competition. Abuses in 
the market may be manifested in the following forms: 
  --market share manipulation, raises or, on the contrary, 
reductions in it with a view to causing a shortage; 
  --price manipulation, with the price being raised or reduced 
with a view to increasing consumer demand and taking advantage 
of it for one's own interest; 
  --product quality manipulation, which pursues the objective 
of reducing the cost of production; 
  --the use of methods of a noneconomic nature with a view to 
erecting barriers in the market and suppressing existing or 
potential competitors. 
  Virtually all forms of the manifestation of monopolism are 
registered in the economy of Azerbaijan. The growth of prices 
following their liberalization was largely "due" not only to 
inflation but also monopolism in the economy. The situation is 
exacerbated by the absence of a competitive environment in 
markets for particular products, as well as the absence of all 
effective methods of antimonopoly regulation, and an economic 
mechanism for counteracting the abuses of monopolies and 
dominant market agents. It has now been more than one year since 
the parliament passed the Law "On Antimonopoly Activities," but 
it is still inoperative because of the lack of a mechanism for 
its implementation. 
  Meanwhile, the situation in the market has been 
deteriorating 
continuously. The gap between the growth of prices and the 
monetary income of the population has been growing. Customer 
demand has been restricted to the necessities, goods with a low 
elasticity of demand, and the physical subsistence minimum. 
  Who is responsible for this? Six out of 17 ministries of the 
republic and five state committees out of 22 are economic 
ministries and state committees. However, this is of no use. A 
state program for transition to a market economy has not been 
approved to this day; implementation arrangements for most of 
the laws adopted by the parliament in 1992-1993 are absent. 
Banking and tax legislation is imperfect.... 
  Data from the bulletin of the State Committee for 
Statistics of Azerbaijan for the first quarter of 1994 and data 
from the CIS Statistical Committee have been used in this 
item. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68568 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> AZERBAIJAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guliyev on CIS Viability, Relations With Russia </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guliyev on CIS Viability, Relations With Russia </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1186A Moscow NOVAYA YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA in Russian 26 
Apr 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1186A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NOVAYA YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with R.B. Guliyev, chairman of the National </F>
Assembly of Azerbaijan, by Anatoliy Blyudin, under the rubric 
"Visits"; place and date not given: "Rasul Guliyev: We Will Not 
Yield a Single Square Meter of Land"] 
  [Text] Rasul Guliyev, in Soviet times a prominent 
functionary of the oil industry of Azerbaijan, and currently the 
chairman of the National Assembly of Azerbaijan and, they say, 
the second most important person next to Aliyev in Baku, will be 
arriving in Moscow today on an official working visit. 
  Rasul Guliyev has given an interview to NOVAYA 
YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA. 
  [Blyudin] Rasul Bayramovich, what is your attitude toward 
the 
present-day problems of the CIS? In general, do you believe in 
the viability of this union? 
  [Guliyev] This is not the first case in history of an empire 
falling apart. The same thing happened in Italy, England, and 
other countries. Indeed, this process is proceeding very 
painfully here, and there are many reasons for this: Some of the 
new states are still young, and do not have adequate experience 
in statehood. Strong mutual mistrust is the second factor. Let 
us not dwell on explaining the reasons for this mistrust; let us 
acknowledge that it exists. Well, the third factor--it seems to 
me that there are still many people who would like to return to 
the past--a single Union, centralization, etc., once again. A 
general economic crisis is, to my mind, the main reason for 
difficulties in the CIS. In the Union, the economy was 
completely subordinated to political interests. Important 
economic decisions were made not only without any serious 
scientific analysis but also contrary to common sense. We are 
now having to pay for this. 
  We must reconcile ourselves to this because there is no 
other 
way to a better life. History indicates that time passes, wounds 
caused by the disintegration of empires heal, and life returns 
to normal. Look at India, it now has normal economic relations 
with England. The old enmity has been forgotten. We should now 
have courage to admit that we will be drawing closer to one 
another for a long time to come and with difficulty and, well, 
also to believe that this will happen anyway. 
  [Blyudin] Numerous facts have been reported in our newspaper 
which testify to the anti-Russian sentiment in Baku: Russians 
are being evicted from their apartments, they are leaving the 
republic. What is your attitude toward this? 
  [Guliyev] Yes, the Russian-speaking population emigrated 
from 
Azerbaijan during the reign of the People's Front. However, the 
situation has changed since Geydar Aliyev was elected president. 
We see that people are already coming back. 
  There are about 200,000 Russians in our country; some of 
them 
have lived here for more than 200 years. Our parliament will 
pass laws that will securely protect their interests. Nobody 
asks you in America what your ethnic background is; everybody is 
American there. We should build approximately the same relations 
in Azerbaijan. The idea of mononationalist politics is a dead 
end. We want the Russian-speaking population to feel that 
Azerbaijan is their motherland. 
  I am convinced that the parliament will pass the necessary 
legislative acts as soon as the first half of the year. 
  [Blyudin] What role do you assign to Russia in stopping the 
Armenian-Azerbaijan war? 
  [Guliyev] Of course, we believe that the Russian state will 
assist in solving all the problems that have accumulated in our 
region in recent years. I am convinced that Russia has such an 
opportunity; both its political and economic resources are 
sufficiently powerful. International organizations could take 
part in these issues, shall we say, arithmetically, to the tune 
of 20 percent. 
  We understand that complex and contradictory processes are 
underway within Russia. However, we see that the above 
notwithstanding, the real political forces are striving to solve 
the problems peacefully. Nonetheless, political stabilization is 
underway in Russia, and I attach great hopes to the growth of 
the role of Russia in the peacemaking process along with this. 
  [Blyudin] What are the objectives of your visit to Moscow? 
  [Guliyev] First of all, I would like to become better 
acquainted with my colleagues in Russia and share our views on 
our common problems, learn where we are close to each other and 
what we differ on: We must simply know each other before 
anything is resolved. I would very much like a regular 
businesslike relationship to develop between our parliaments. 
  Strong economic relations have historically evolved between 
us. This is why borders between Russia and Azerbaijan should not 
exist as far as investment and the economy are concerned. 
Naturally, the laws our parliaments pass should promote rather 
than hamper the processes of integration. 
  Russia is our big neighbor; we want to open all borders for 
the economies. There will be no barriers to Russian investment, 
but Russia should not throw up barriers to Azerbaijani 
investments, either. We are in favor of civilized relations. 
  I worked for 12 years as the director of an oil refinery. At 
that time we reported to a Union ministry; I know many Russian 
oilmen well and have many friends in Russia. I come to Moscow 
with great hopes because I believe in the power of common sense; 
I believe that if there is enough will, a compromise may be 
reached on any difficult issue. 
  Naturally, discussing the issue of stopping the war is also 
an objective of my visit. Neither the Azeri nor the Armenian 
people need this war. People are dying on both sides. I think 
that everybody has ascertained this: We will not yield a single 
square meter of our land. This should be understandable. If they 
try to compel us to make a certain decision by forcible methods, 
this means that we will fight. However, I would like to say 
again that the war is not needed. Political decisions are needed. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68569 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   30 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> AZERBAIJAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Situation in Gas Industry `Critical' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Situation in Gas Industry `Critical' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1163A Baku VYSHKA in Russian 30 Apr 94 pp 1-2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1163A </F>
<F P=104>  Baku VYSHKA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Tariel Abulfaz Ogly Guseynov, president of </F>
the Azerigaz State Gas Company of Azerbaijan, by an unidentified 
correspondent; place and date not given: "Tariel Guseynov: `To 
Strictly Save Gas Everywhere and in Everything.' Tariel Abulfaz 
Ogly Guseynov, President of the Azerigaz State Gas Company of 
the Republic, Is Our Interlocutor"] 
  [Text] FROM OUR FILES. T. Guseynov has been working 
in the oil and gas industries for more than 30 years now. He 
began his labor activities as a fitter with the Artemeft NGDU 
[Oil and Gas Production Directorate]. After serving in the army, 
he graduated from the imeni M. Azizbekov Oil and Chemistry 
Institute (currently, the Oil Academy). Subsequently, he worked 
within various establishments for marine oil and gas production 
and was director of the Azerbaijan Gas Processing Plant. For 
seven years, he headed the Aztransgaz administration. He has 
been president of the Azerigaz State Gas Company since September 
1992. He has a son, a daughter, a grandson, and a 
granddaughter. 
  [VYSHKA] Esteemed Tariel, you are at the very apex of the 
pyramid of a complex and diverse economic unit which is one of 
the pillars of the republic's economy. This pyramid has been 
shaking for a long time, and the magnitude of this "fever" 
strikes a strong blow at our entire lives. After all, it is hard 
to even imagine Baku being left without the blue fuel.... 
  [Guseynov] Let us not take too dim a view of the situation; 
nonetheless, this is not ruled out. It is paradoxical that one 
of the powerful oil and gas regions of the former Soviet empire 
cannot presently provide fuel for itself. The reasons for this 
are many. The disintegration of the uniform imperial structure 
for the management of the most significant, strategic sectors 
that had operated for decades actually paralyzed the gas sector 
of Azerbaijan. The established centralized system of gas 
distribution (even if greatly flawed) was destroyed, and this 
affected in a most lamentable manner the economy of not just our 
republic but also other states of the CIS. 
  Emergency measures were needed to salvage the gas industry 
and use it as much as possible in the interest of a sovereign 
Azerbaijan and its people. The creation of the Azerigaz State 
Company by an edict of the president of the republic one and a 
half years ago marked the beginning of this effort, as immense 
as it is crucial. 
  [VYSHKA] Pardon me, but attempts to somehow gather the gas 
sector under the same hand had been made in the republic 
before.... 
  [Guseynov] Certainly, attempts had been made. Beginning in 
1980, I had personally pushed through projects of centralizing 
the gas supply of the republic at the various levels of 
authority. However, this did not advance beyond verbal approval. 
Proceeding from its interests, Moscow tenaciously held all the 
ropes of the gas supply in its hands. The gas sector of the 
republic was an eternal stepchild: In some cases, it was merged 
with other state structures, and then they would think of 
something else. In a word, the sector was left without a master. 
Figuratively, it was tightly bound hand and foot. As a result, 
the structure of the distribution system is chaotic; it does not 
comply with international standards and, most importantly, at a 
great cost, which even now results in nothing but losses. 
  Of course, one and a half years is not a period sufficient 
for bringing the sector to the level of effective development, 
even more so in view of a huge "backlog" of pent-up problems. 
However, is it possible to discuss any shifts at present? 
  Of course, there have been certain changes but they are not 
of the essence. The main point is that our company which has 
succeeded in creating a unified sectoral mechanism has asserted 
itself. The might of Azerigaz is great: There are about 10 
associations, the gas facilities of cities, main administrations 
of construction, two machine-building plants, the Scientific 
Research Institute of Gas Issues, and dozens of other auxiliary 
enterprises and organizations. It is very important for this 
huge mechanism to begin operating smoothly.... 
  [VYSHKA] Unfortunately, this has not come about yet. At 
present, reports on gas deliveries are akin to messages from the 
front line. This is how you hear it: Turkmenistan has suspended 
gas deliveries to Azerbaijan; plants have stopped because of a 
shortage of the blue fuel; gas supply to the rayons has been 
turned off. 
  [Guseynov] All of this is true. Putting it frankly, the gas 
delivery situation is critical. The overall need of our republic 
for gas comes to 16 billion cubic meters. Previously, we 
received 7 billion cubic meters of gas from Russia and 
Turkmenistan; Iran delivered another 3 billion cubic meters. At 
present, we obtain about 6 billion cubic meters of our Azeri gas 
and, in addition, we have a contract for the delivery of [number 
illegible] billion cubic meters of Turkmen gas on a clearing 
basis. Turkmenistan must deliver over 8 million cubic meters of 
gas. [word illegible] production toward the repayment of the 
debt has not been shipped from our republic so far. Only a few 
days ago did the government confirm quotas for the shipment of 
Azeri products; this has been recorded in a pertinent decree. We 
are now taking measures to solve the existing problem although 
this is not all that easy to accomplish, given that the debt for 
the Turkmen gas has come to 60 million of accounting dollars 
since the beginning of the year. 
  [VYSHKA] Apparently, the existing situation is prompting the 
Azerigaz to take extreme measures. 
  [Guseynov] Of course, there is no other way out. Gas supply 
for many rayons of the republic has been cut off. We deliver gas 
at the very limit of our potential to the enterprises and 
population of Baku and other large cities. At present, the most 
significant task is to create reserves of the blue fuel, to pump 
the gas received into underground storage facilities. We endured 
the past winter with difficulty. We should now think about the 
forthcoming cold season. Fuel prices are growing and by all 
signs the growth of costs will continue. Therefore, one can 
hardly count on an abrupt improvement in gas supply in the 
immediate future. 
  [VYSHKA] In all of this, it should be taken into account 
that 
the still immense quantity of gas that is purchased at great 
expense during what is wartime to us is simply lost, and at 
times also stolen. At present, the issue of [lines missing in 
the original], strict accounting, and the prevention of all 
theft is as acute as ever. You will agree that in this respect, 
the Azerigaz itself has many shortcomings. 
  [Guseynov] I agree. Despite the measures taken, the large 
loss of gas persists. Imagine that until very recently one out 
of four or five consumers in the republic was not registered. 
Rampant permissiveness and arbitrariness of individual leaders 
of rayons, enterprises, services, and so on have produced the 
background for all types of violations in the consumption of 
gas. In the last two years, a lot has been done to rectify the 
situation although I will repeat that a very great loss is still 
allowed to occur. We have introduced a new service within the 
organization of our company--the directorate of state gas 
supervision--which regularly examines the correctness of gas 
consumption. I will note that in Baku alone, recent inspections 
have established major violations in the consumption of gas in 
Sabuninskiy, Surakhanskiy, Narimanovskiy, Khatainskiy, 
Nasiminskiy, and other rayons. Unregistered enterprises and 
organizations have been discovered that have been consuming gas 
for a long time without paying for it. We also clarified the 
picture of gas consumption in the residential sector where great 
loss is also allowed to occur. We can say that in the republic 
as a whole, up to 10 percent of natural gas consumers are 
unregistered. 
  Besides, the condition of many gas mains serving farms is 
lamentable; tremendous funds are needed to upgrade them. We are 
now making various efforts to reduce the loss of gas; we have 
tightened up monitoring in order to prevent its theft [lines 
missing] to create a precise system of accounting for gas. Some 
300,000 household gas meters will be manufactured for us under a 
$14-million contract signed with Minimetals, the Chinese state 
company. The technology of producing these meters is also being 
purchased (250,000 a year), with the right to sell them to all 
countries for five years. Incidentally, the first 30,000 meters 
have already been delivered to Baku; at present, preparatory 
work for their installation is underway, primarily in the 
suburbs of the capital city. We engage in active cooperation 
with Israeli companies with regard to the local production of 
gas lines made of polyethylene. 
  Several days ago, we had yet another meeting with 
representatives of the World Bank with whom we are negotiating, 
by decision of the government, the allocation of credit for 
upgrading the entire gas industry. We are developing a technical 
and economic feasibility study on rejuvenating the gas sector of 
the republic jointly with SOFREGAZ, the well-known French 
company. On the whole, the signing of an agreement on the 
extension of a large long-term loan at the level of our 
government and the leadership of the World Bank is scheduled for 
the fall of this year. 
  [VYSHKA] All of this is good; all of this is in the future; 
of course, in the absence of rejuvenation industry will not be 
placed on a developmental path. However, what is to be done 
about gas, what is to be done in order not to be left without 
the blue fuel? 
  [Guseynov] It should be saved, and saved again everywhere 
and 
anywhere. The government of the republic has confirmed priority 
measures to save natural gas. It is necessary [lines missing] to 
switch to the use of liquefied gas in rayons, villages, and 
settlements, to convert enterprises on a mandatory basis to 
residual fuel oil (of course, where conditions for this exist), 
to introduce high punitive sanctions, and to use other measures 
against the violators of gas consumption procedures. We should 
dispense once and for all with the flawed practice whereby: You 
provide natural gas for us, and we will settle later. Consumers 
owe us more than 4 billion manats, and we just cannot collect 
them. However, no sooner than we cut back gas delivery to a 
debtor, complaints are lodged with all echelons. 
  [VYSHKA] Incidentally, recently some publications have 
missed 
no opportunity to let you have it--among others--without 
concealing their malice. 
  [Guseynov] I respond to such antics by some sorry excuses 
for 
journalists calmly. Unfortunately, the pages of certain 
newspaper publications have become a place for slandering and 
abusing people, for accusations without proof against officials. 
We talk to such solely through the judicial system. Something 
else is alarming: Recently, attempts at undermining confidence 
in the authorities and the leaders of state structures have been 
growing; they are bending over backwards to promote nervousness 
and get in the way of actual endeavors to overcome the crisis in 
the national economy and the entire republic. This is why we 
cannot relax by any means. We should undertake to skillfully 
solve problems, to do everything to defeat the enemy and 
strengthen and develop our native independent Azerbaijan. 
  [VYSHKA] Thank you for the interview. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68570 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   24 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> AZERBAIJAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Georgian, Azeri Independence Parties Seek Cooperation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Georgian, Azeri Independence Parties Seek Cooperation </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1014C Baku MILLET in Azeri 24 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1014C </F>
<F P=104>  Baku MILLET </F>
<F P=105>  Azeri </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Declaration by Georgian National Independence Party: </F>
"Declaration of the Georgian National Independence Party "] 
  [Text] The Georgian National Independence Party, 
considering the national and state interests of the Georgian 
people and government, gives great importance to strengthening 
relations of friendship, good neighborliness and mutually useful 
cooperation between Azerbaijan and Georgia. Our party considers 
that the deepening of relations of sincerity, friendship and 
all-round cooperation with neighboring Azerbaijan will 
strengthen Georgia's sovereignty and territorial integrity, and 
contribute to peace and stability in the region. 
  A delegation of the Georgian National Independence Party 
headed by its chairman traveled officially to Azerbaijan's 
capital, Baku, on the basis of an official invitation from the 
Azerbaijan National Independence Party on 15-18 January 1994. In 
the course of the visit, an Agreement on basic principles of 
cooperation between the Georgian and Azerbaijani National 
Independence Parties was signed. 
  Based on these principles, our parties consider that from 
the 
point of view of mutual belief, friendship and cooperation 
between our peoples the preservation of citizenship rights for 
Azeris living in Georgian territory and Georgians living in 
Azerbaijan's territory has paramount importance. Serious action 
is needed in this direction. Strong enemies of the Georgian 
people and Georgia's independence are trying to worsen and 
complicate relations between Georgians and Azeris by all means. 
They are even trying to start ethnic military conflicts. May God 
protect us from this! 
  It is necessary to implement a series of measures to rectify 
completely the citizenship rights of Azeris who are Georgian 
citizens. From this point of view: 
  a) to strengthen to the maximum the fight by law enforcement 
organs and strong administrations against all criminal activity 
on the territory of Gardaban, Marneul, Volnis, Tetriskaroy, 
Sagarchevo and Lagodekh Rayons, and to reduce the probability of 
creating personal conflicts between Azeris and Georgians; 
  b) to assure the active participation of Azeris along with 
Georgians in local government and administrative structures, the 
procuracy, the Ministry of Internal Affairs and the security 
organs on the territory of these rayons; 
  c) to include both Georgian and Azeri citizens in the ranks 
of the armed forces of the Georgian Republic; 
  d) to broaden cooperation between government organs of the 
Georgian and Azerbaijan Republics in the sectors of defending 
the independence and territorial integrity of our states, to 
guarantee the inviolability of existing borders, to strengthen 
national security, stability and democracy, to give guarantees 
on human rights and the rights of national minorities, and to 
conduct a struggle against terrorism, narcobusiness and banditry. 
  By giving to greatest importance to friendly and neighborly 
relation between Georgia and Azerbaijan, we hope representatives 
of higher government organs will approach this declaration with 
attention. 
  [Signed] I. Sereteli, chairman, in the name of the Georgian 
National Independence Party, 22 January 1994. 
  The declaration was submitted to E. Shevardnadze, head of 
state of the Georgian Republic, J. Yoseliani, chairman of the 
Temporary Committee on the Special Situation, I. Georgadze, 
Minister of Security, G. Karkarashvili, Minister of Defense, Sh. 
Kviraya, Minister of Internal Affairs, and J. Babilashvili, 
Chief Procurator. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68571 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   24 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> AZERBAIJAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Political Groups Protest Arrest of Opposition Leaders </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Political Groups Protest Arrest of Opposition Leaders </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1014D Baku MILLET in Azeri 24 Feb 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1014D </F>
<F P=104>  Baku MILLET </F>
<F P=105>  Azeri </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by Kheber-Servis: "Declaration by Political </F>
Organizations"] 
  [Text] Six political parties in the 
republic -- the Azerbaijan People's Front, the ADP [Azerbaijan 
Democratic Party], Musavat, Yurddash, the People's Democratic 
Party, and the Independent Democratic Party -- have disseminated 
a joint declaration. The reason for issuing the declaration was 
the arrest on 19 February of opposition representatives in 
Khachmaz Rayon. In the document it states that the arrest for 
political motives of members of opposition organizations in 
Baku, Nakhchyvan, Beylegan, Goranboy and now Khachmaz, and 
illegal actions against people's representatives proves the 
strengthening of the reactionary regime in Azerbaijan. The 
government is trying to exclude opposition forces from the 
country's political life. 
  In the declaration it notes that official circles within the 
government are blatantly violating human rights. The opposition 
parties are demanding to put an end to the imprisonments and set 
the political prisoners free. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68572 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> AZERBAIJAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   People's Front Official on Duties of Democratic Opposition </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    People's Front Official on Duties of Democratic Opposition </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1015A Baku AZADLYG in Azeri 6 Mar 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1015A </F>
<F P=104>  Baku AZADLYG </F>
<F P=105>  Azeri </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Neriman Gasymoghlu: "Some Goals and Duties of </F>
the Democratic Opposition"] 
  [Text] It can be accepted by everyone that an organized 
democratic opposition with clear political goals is a national 
and state resource. In my opinion, there are enough clear ideas 
about the place, role and weight of a democratic opposition 
because this resource is exploited in global, strategic issues 
such as national state-building. Unfortunately, recent events 
have not helped to embody these ideas in practice so they have 
remained more on the theoretical level. 
  In Azerbaijan the basic political contradictions that still 
remain in the nature of relations between the opposition and 
those in power consist of reasons which characterize the 
standoff between empire and national liberation. Other reasons 
often seem to be of secondary importance. In general, because 
the movement we have described as a national liberation struggle 
is democratic in nature, we evaluate it as a democratic 
movement. It is only natural that if our movement is connected 
with leading democratic processes in the world, another reason 
is that it is based in the national characteristics of 
Azerbaijani society itself. 
  The basic political goal of democratic opposition forces in 
Azerbaijan is to achieve representation through the realization 
of the basic goals of their program in the government. It is 
completely natural that this issue is distorted in official 
propaganda channels so that in the public mind it appears as an 
ugly, immoral concept. Through television and the press, it is 
interpreted to mean that coming into the government is in the 
interests of certain individuals or groups, but this is not a 
step forward for the people, etc. It is clear that official 
information policy is directed at disarmament and away from 
national democratic values. Independent polls confirm that the 
influence of the government among the population continues to 
fall. The reasons for this are published frequently in the 
opposition newspapers. It suffices to say that it is difficult 
to speak of future directions in any sector. Coming to the 
consistently stressed issue of the unique role of the government 
in safeguarding stability within the society, this is 
exaggerated, and the value of the intelligent, calm comportment 
of the democratic opposition is reduced to nothing under wartime 
conditions. As for all kinds of problems, blaming them on the 
conflict with Armenia and justifying the slowdown in needed 
reforms seems meaningless. Incompetence, bribery and corruption 
have led to a national catastrophe which has reached to the 
level of a national tragedy. 
  Superficially, it appears that the opposition which has 
changed to more passive activity, should dwell more on internal 
organizational questions so that when the present powerholders 
who, under the new conditions, lack administrative ability and 
the democratic habits brought about by this are defeated, they 
can come into the government without difficulty. We have to 
mention that among some opposition forces the habit of lying in 
ambush exists. I want to mention two dangerous aspects of this. 
The first demands the creation of extreme conditions and is 
connected to the hope that the question of a change in 
government will be resolved through external influences, and 
that the passiveness of the society and the population will 
help. For example, the period of the events of last summer were 
like this. The population was not on the side of the rebels, it 
was occupied with their traveling to Baku, etc. It is clear that 
extreme conditions are not in the interest of the nation. The 
second dangerous aspect is that public opinion is created 
counter to the national interest as the result of a policy of 
waiting. For democrats engaged in political activity, this is 
unforgivable. One is in the position that there can be a sudden 
social explosion of a people whose way of life is becoming 
gradually worse. Under such conditions, saboteur circles managed 
from Moscow will fertilize the field, and the probability of a 
catastrophe increases. All this gives opposition forces cause to 
think. We do not claim to teach intelligence to the powers that 
be. But they have to understand that their level of 
responsibility for any kind of national catastrophe is all the 
greater. 
  Very serious, troublesome work which requires courage stands 
before us. This is essentially connected to the war. The hopes 
of the government and the democratic opposition, who have 
sacrificed thousands from its ranks for the Fatherland since the 
Armenia-Azerbaijan war began, are the same. And generally, the 
war which drew the democratic opposition into relative passivity 
is also a factor. It is natural that such passivity is 
spiritually justifiable. But there is a question put forward by 
the national interest that the democratic opposition must think 
about carefully in their work. Their political habits should not 
be such that stability is violated in the name of covering up 
their lack of capability in their work style which would give 
those in government the needed excuses to undermine the 
democratic opposition. Since a change in government is an 
historical and natural process (the discussion is on a legal 
change of government), they have to discuss strategic questions 
and they must make their move to come into the government in an 
only partially known environment. It is also necessary to 
consider every kind of environment which could be created. 
  The primary duty of the democratic opposition is to 
organize, 
and this work occurs at various levels. This question means 
purifying and strengthening their ranks, and a change in 
quality. There are not a few individuals in whom representatives 
of democratic forces have lost confidence who served at various 
levels of the former government, and who have been forgotten by 
the people; it is not desirable that they return to political 
activity in the ranks of the democratic opposition. They could 
be obstacles in the struggle for public opinion. It is clear 
that this is a psychological question and democratic 
organizations must cross this psychological barrier without 
falling into internal fragmentation! 
  Many articles in the opposition press have been devoted to 
analysis of the democrats' fall from government last June. While 
most of these were both objective and subjective, basically, the 
objective reasons were more discussed. Only one must not forget 
the subjective because the speculations on the mechanism by 
which the ranking oppositionists were overthrown are narrow. 
There is basis to think that the subjective anatomy of the 
government change which took place following the July events 
have not been revealed. In my opinion, leaders of the democratic 
opposition, including the renewed leadership of the APF 
[Azerbaijan People's Front], must pay attention to this question. 
  They were damaged because of the shrinking social basis of 
the democrats. The most difficult and troublesome work will be 
to revive this basis; this includes the activity on the 
direction of building a correct idea among the population about 
national-democratic values which have been exposed to a certain 
amount of deformation. Propaganda should not be conducted in the 
framework of traditional government-opposition contradictions, 
but in the sector of explaining the nature of the freedoms and 
values we have mentioned. In other words, not propaganda 
creating a sense of primitive confrontation, and imbued with a 
sense of psychological superiority. 
  The question of the transition to a market economy still 
conveys a declarative character. It appears that those in the 
government do not have too much interest in this. The stalling 
of reforms and the widespread bribery and corruption has impeded 
business structures which had just begun to be formed by 
businessmen, and a natural flow of capital in the republic 
abroad is taking place. The democratic opposition must be turned 
into the spokesman of the representatives of free economic 
striving. Those leading the way in this expression will be 
found. But if we wish to make the transition to a market 
economy, if we wish to understand the advantage of this to the 
state, create the economic grounds for social guarantees for the 
poor, and the importance of economic freedom in society, we must 
not stint on every kind of political-spiritual and intellectual 
aid for the development of free business. And the reasons 
impeding this development must be explained clearly to the 
people. If every opposition organization were to prepare 
concrete programs of economic reform and turn these over for 
discussion among business circles, then it would be an excellent 
proof of the seriousness of an opposing force. 
  There is much talk about shortcomings in the constitution. 
If 
a constitutional commission were to be organized by the 
opposition to discuss alternatives (despite the presence of 
opposition representatives on the state commission), and if they 
were to prepare an alternate draft, it would not be bad. One 
could hold a campaign of constitutional discussions by the 
opposition. 
  The democratic opposition must reach conclusions and 
actively 
publicize clear directions of needed reforms connected with the 
question of building the country. Because this question has been 
moribund, state institutions are not operating. The democrats 
must clarify for themselves how they want to view an independent 
state at the upper, middle and lower echelons, and conduct 
reforms for the sake of the nation's interests. The last 
government stalled on this issue and was compelled to work in 
structures inherited from the empire. 
  A more important question consists of the democratic 
opposition's bringing dynamism into foreign policy. Concepts in 
public opinion about foreign contacts guaranteeing that they 
will not cease to back our independence are weak. Some steps 
taken by the present government in foreign policy and the policy 
followed during the democrats' government are manifestations of 
this. In other words, the present government understands that 
only pro-Russian contacts increase the possibility of Moscow's 
breaking up our independent state and, as a consequence, would 
drive them from the government. 
  The idea has been widely spread that processes in Russia 
influence the real situation in Azerbaijan. Setting aside the 
correctness of this idea, the channels of such influence have 
still not been clarified. Efforts by Moscow to tie Azerbaijan to 
itself through militarily siding with Armenia and to preserve 
its geopolitical influences in the Caucasus region raise the 
obvious question as to whether this is the Russian strategy and 
a visible side of its policy. The ways to fight against this are 
also clear. The invisible side is no less dangerous; it serves 
to shake our national security from within and serves the 
obstructions in building the state. There is a need for more 
clarification here. In higher and middle-level state structures, 
Moscow's seen and unseen cadres are in action. The leadership, 
by keeping the former in their positions, demonstrates that it 
is following a competent policy with regard to Moscow. As for 
Moscow, it uses them to put pressure on the leadership and to 
implement concrete sabotage scenarios if they do not bow to 
this. This is a mechanism which preserves the republic under 
Moscow's control while at the same time preventing the 
development of healthy political relations within the republic. 
We have to say that this mechanism also functioned in the time 
of the preceding government. In March, April and May of last 
year the future of this mechanism came into question through the 
activity of Western diplomacy. From this standpoint, the 
clarification of the subjective anatomy of the June events is 
rather important. One question that cannot be forgotten is that 
the West can increase its own activism in Caucasian politics 
after the restoration of democratic laws in Azerbaijan. 
Realization of this would coincide with the neutralization of 
imperial influences in the region. 
  One can say that ideological differences between 
organizations of the democratic opposition are slight. There is 
objective room for cooperation. The question of 
interorganizational liaison must, in general, be turned into 
norms of political behavior, and, from the spiritual standpoint, 
this is also useful for public opinion. It is natural that no 
individual or organization can take responsibility for pulling 
Azerbaijan out of the crisis alone. A coalition must be built 
among the opposition organizations. Perhaps the former power of 
the APF was a coalition by its nature. This was justified by the 
times. The content of the APF is changing according to 
conditions and, having broken up its organization, we are now 
preserving an internal sense of definition which knows its 
limits. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68573 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   3 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> AZERBAIJAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Opposition Calls for Inter-Party Solidarity </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Opposition Calls for Inter-Party Solidarity </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1015B Baku AZADLYG in Azeri 3 Mar 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1015B </F>
<F P=104>  Baku AZADLYG </F>
<F P=105>  Azeri </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Appeal by APF, Musavat Party, People's Liberation Party and </F>
Azerbaijan Democratic Party: "Appeal to Opposition Parties by 
Leaders of Information Structures of Political Organizations"] 
  [Text] For more than a month meetings of political 
structures of political organizations have been held regularly. 
In this period a communique reflecting the principles of 
cooperation of these structures has been signed, regularized 
exchanges of information have been set up, important steps have 
been taken in the defense of freedom of speech and of the press 
in Azerbaijan, and appeal has been passed to state organs about 
unifying forces in the sector of eliminating problems created by 
Armenian aggression, and a joint press conference by opposition 
parties was organized for the first time. 
  These meetings helped to bring together the positions of 
parties on a number of important issues and prepared the ground 
for their broad cooperation. 
  But now the need to broaden the circle of joint activity of 
the political structures of political organizations and to 
develop and strengthen domestic and foreign ties demands that 
the work of these meetings be built up to a qualitatively new 
level. This is only possible under conditions that other 
structures of the parties begin to cooperate. 
  At a period when the sociopolitical situation in Azerbaijan 
is gradually worsening and social conditions are becoming more 
serious, and in a period when problems created by the war have 
reached dangerous limits, establishing such unity would be a 
great step in the direction of finding the optimal way out of 
the situation, maintaining stability in the country, and 
creating civic solidarity. 
  Taking all of this into consideration, we appeal to the 
parties we represent to make use of closer forms of cooperation 
and expedite the work of establishing unity among the democratic 
forces. 
  [Signed] APF [Azerbaijan People's Front], Musavat Party, 
People's Liberation Party, Azerbaijan Democratic Party 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68574 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   3 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> AZERBAIJAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   People's Front Meeting Views Islam, Human Freedom </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    People's Front Meeting Views Islam, Human Freedom </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1015C Baku AZADLYG in Azeri 3 Mar 94 p 8 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1015C </F>
<F P=104>  Baku AZADLYG </F>
<F P=105>  Azeri </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by APF Information Center: "`Islam And Human </F>
Freedom'"] 
  [Text] On 28 February religious functionaries, scholars and 
party representatives held a meeting on "Islam and Human 
Freedom" at the Central Apparatus. Hajy Faiz, prorector of the 
Higher Spiritual Medrese under the Spiritual Administration of 
Transcaucasian Muslims, Meshedi Behruz, a teacher at the 
medrese, Hajy Jebrail, chairman of the Farmers' Union, and his 
deputy Hajy Nazim, Hajy Osman Efendiyev, chairman of the 
National Enlightenment Party and docent Philosophy Department at 
the Economics Institute, Tariyel Hesenov, a colleague in the 
humanitarian policy department of the Office of the President 
and Professor of Theology at Baku State University, Etibar 
Talybly, chairman of the university rayon department of the APF 
[Azerbaijan People's Front], Arif Aliyev, deputy chairman of the 
APF, Meshedi Arif, member of the Presidium of the APF, and 
others took part in the meeting. 
  The orientalist and translator of the Koran into Azeri, 
Neriman Gasymzade, chaired the meeting. 
  During the discussion the return to the Koran, Islam and 
tradition, remnants of idolatry in Islam, religious education 
and problems of religion and policy were discussed. 
  It was noted that the concept of "there is no God but God" 
is 
the major source of human freedom. In the Islamic concept, 
freedom has three supports: glasnost, equality and solidarity. 
Religious functionaries explained their positions by saying 
"essentially, there is freedom in Islam, but scholars must 
absolutely reveal it." 
  The scholars discussed the damage done to society by 
religious illiteracy, what the fragmentation of Islam means to 
fragmentation of the nation, and the traces of idolatry in 
Islam, and noted that one could consider the effort to iconize 
certain political leaders even today as a manifestation of this 
idolatry in modern times. 
  The party representatives gave more stress to the subject of 
religion and politics. It was noted that the politicization of 
Islam primarily damaged the religion itself. Religious believers 
can implement their needs and demands through politicians 
without interfering in politics themselves. Politicians must 
create conditions for propagandizing religion on a healthy basis 
and guarantee the inviolability of freedom of conscience. But 
the establishment of religious parties as an effort to put 
religion in a political framework is acceptable to no one. 
  At the end of the meeting it was decided to hold such talks 
more often and to hold conferences on specific religious themes. 
Agreement was also reached on organizing a special meeting of 
the leaders of all confessions in Azerbaijan, scholars and 
politicians. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68575 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> AZERBAIJAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   People's Front Official on Cadre, Policy Changes </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    People's Front Official on Cadre, Policy Changes </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1016A Baku AZADLYG in Azeri 26 Feb 94 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1016A </F>
<F P=104>  Baku AZADLYG </F>
<F P=105>  Azeri </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Ibrahim Ibrahimli, first deputy chairman of </F>
the APF, by Elchin Seljuk: "`The Fate Of The APF Is More 
Important For Me...'"] 
  [Text] 
  [Seljuk] Ibrahim, What duties stand before the APF 
[Azerbaijan People's Front] after the cadre changes in its 
leadership? 
  [Ibrahimli] At this stage, we have laid the foundations of a 
principle of changing from quantity to quality. Determining the 
place and role of a social and political organization in society 
depends on this factor to a great extent. We can say that in our 
inner-organizational work questions of revival are over despite 
the fact that for well known reasons great obstacles stood 
before the solution of these questions. Many offices of rayon 
departments of the APF were empty and there was uninterrupted 
persecution and pressure on our members. Although preparatory 
work for our regular congress had stalled, the organizational 
conferences had concluded. 
  Some mechanisms to enable the APF to perform its role in the 
political process again have been prepared. Primarily, the 
creation of an alliance of democratic forces has turned into the 
need of the day. The deepening of the economic crisis in the 
country and problems in the war zone have created a bad 
psychological mood among the people. The number of those looking 
optimistically toward the future has fallen. In such a 
situation, no political group can influence public opinion 
alone. We will join in a democratic alliance and also reinforce 
the guarantees of democracy in the country. This alliance, as a 
guarantor of democracy in Azerbaijan, will awaken the special 
interest of international organizations acting according to the 
general game rules in government-opposition relations. 
  [Seljuk] For a number of months preparatory work has been 
done for the regular congress of the APF. When is it planned to 
hold this event, which will bring clarity into a number of 
issues? 
  [Ibrahimli] As you know, since the day the organizational 
committee for congress preparation began to work, we have not 
been satisfied with inner-organizational discussions connected 
with the activity of the APF. With the goal of bringing the 
public into these discussions, a series of articles have been 
published in the mass media. Thanks to these, we have drawn the 
necessary conclusions from our mistakes. Purely organizational 
conferences for holding the congress are over. We have begun to 
hold theoretical conferences as a preliminary step, and broad 
discussions on the status of the APF, and on its place, role and 
duty in the system. Analysis connected with the sociopolitical 
and military situation in the republic have been conducted at 
these conferences. 
  [Seljuk] Ibrahim, how much time was set aside for these 
theoretical conferences you mentioned? 
  [Ibrahimli] Taking into consideration the breadth and 
actuality of the questions proposed for discussion, it would not 
be correct to set time limits on the organizational conferences. 
  [Seljuk] How are intergroup relations regulated in the APF? 
As first deputy chairman of the APF, those who wish to have 
"talks" with you connected to the fact that you are a member of 
the Musavat Party... 
  [Ibrahimli] The broad social basis of the APF differentiates 
it from other political groups. Thus, the activity of different 
groups within the APF is natural. The basic issue is finding the 
mechanism of common principles among these groups and conducting 
a joint struggle for the goals of the program of the 
organization. The cadre changes in the higher organs of the APF 
were born from this need. 
  As for the gossip about my membership in the Musavat Party, 
in order to cast some light on this question I want to talk 
about it in some detail. I have been in the front ranks of the 
people's movement in Azerbaijan since the day it began. At that 
time I conducted my activity in Nakhchyvan. As a result of this 
activity I was elected a people's deputy of Azerbaijan from the 
district in which I declared myself, and then a member of the 
National Assembly. Since I had the idea of reviving the Musavat 
Party in Azerbaijan, I was in a position to realize this 
question. As I was a member of the revival bureau of the 
Musavat, we held a revival congress. Then I was elected to the 
Board of Musavat. During the June events the chairman of the APF 
and the chairman of the APF Executive Committee left Baku for 
well known reasons. Those coming into the government selected 
the APF, which was a real force, as their first target. Driving 
this organization from the political arena was carried out 
without deviation. APF members were persecuted at various 
levels. In such a tense political atmosphere, I took on myself 
the defense of the overthrown government and the democratic 
opposition in the National Assembly. Because of my speeches in 
the National Assembly and the position I held, I was both 
praised and reviled. 
  The electoral organs of the APF recommended my candidacy for 
the duty of chairman of the APF Executive Committee to E. 
Elchibey. Although I was a member of the electoral organs of the 
Musavat Party, I wrote a petition saying that the fate of the 
movement and the APF was the more important for me, and left 
Musavat. I returned once again to the Zeyneddin village support 
point of the Babek Rayon chapter of the APF -- to the 
organization of which I was a member until Musavat. 
Subsequently, the instructions of the APF chairman were turned 
over to the High Assembly. 
  [Seljuk] Can Ibrahim Ibrahimli, who was elected as the 
second 
man in terms of duties in a large organization like the APF, 
fulfill his commitments? 
  [Ibrahimli] It would be better if you asked those of the 
members of this organization who are engaged in policy. 
  [Seljuk] What do you think about the recent use of force by 
the police in Khachmaz Rayon against opposition forces wishing 
to hold a meeting, and the arrest of a national representative, 
journalists, and members of the APF, Musavat and the ADP? 
  [Ibrahimli] I view the Khachmaz events as part of an 
intentional policy conducted at the state level conducted 
against the opposition. This fact shows once again that the APF 
leadership, taking the dangerous situation in the republic into 
consideration, has listened to proposals on general game rules 
in government-opposition relations for the protection of 
stability. 
  The application of these measures against members of the 
opposition weakens the government's position. As in every other 
time, this time we turned officially to law enforcement organs 
in the name of the organization. We will try to place questions 
connected with this fact on the daily agenda of the National 
Assembly. At the same time, we have submitted documents to 
international organizations connected with human rights in 
Azerbaijan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68576 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   24 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> AZERBAIJAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   PKK Presence in Armenia Detailed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    PKK Presence in Armenia Detailed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1016B Baku AZADLYG in Azeri 24 Feb 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1016B </F>
<F P=104>  Baku AZADLYG </F>
<F P=105>  Azeri </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Gulden Aydin: "The PKK in Armenia"] </F>
  [Text] From the Political Department: Turkish 
journalists writing as Kurds themselves prepared this material. 
Certainly, the Kurdish question in Azerbaijan is perceived 
differently from Turkey. This is only natural. Mutual relations 
between Azerbaijan citizens who are of other nationalities and 
Kurds are not at the level of armed confrontation as in Turkey 
and could be characterized up to the present by peaceful 
understanding and mutual respect. 
  But it is an undeniable fact that a number of foreign 
political and state circles are intentionally active to 
artificially inflame ethnic relations in Azerbaijan -- the 
sources of tension of the Lezgian question in the north, the 
Kurdish question in the west, and the Talysh question in the 
south corresponds to the geographical aspects of the territories 
where these problems are inflamed. 
  The Kurdish question, as seen from these abbreviated 
materials (and not only from these) surfaced under the influence 
and administration from Moscow as channeled through Yerevan for 
many years. 
  Today Armenia is bringing the "Kurdish card," which has 
been used very capably against Turkey, into the "game" with 
Azerbaijan. 
  We wished to believe that our Kurdish compatriots would 
understand this truth: as a result of inflaming the Kurdish 
question in Azerbaijan artificially and in a dangerous 
direction, they will serve the interests of not only the Kurds, 
but also completely different forces. 
  According to official information, 56,000 Kurds live in 
Armenia; according to the Kurds, there are 150,000. The PKK 
[Kurdistan Workers' Party] began its "Armenia action" two years 
ago. The majority of the first group consisted of PKK members 
coming from Cologne. Their goal was to draw the Kurds living in 
Armenia into a "fight." This was not very difficult because all 
of the Kurds living in 21 villages had migrated there from 
Turkey in 1828. 
  Two years ago the PKK began its "Armenian action" by 
wandering from village to village asking this question: "Would 
you rather dance, or have an independent state?" As time went 
one, the number of those opting for an independent state 
increased. Today, all 21 villages in Armenia are a PKK 
encampment. Theoretical instruction is being given. Every adult 
village inhabitant comes to the lectures of the PKK cadres in 
the village house. The lectures are aimed toward an 
understanding of "Independent Kurdistan in Turkey." It is also 
possible to see camp discipline in the villages. All cultural 
activity is about "Kurdishness" and directed from the same 
center. 
  When we were guests in the home of Ishhan Aslan, who 
formerly 
worked in the Kurdish broadcasting section of Radio Yerevan but 
has now been selected as the commander of all the PKK in Armenia 
and bears the stamp of the Lachyn Kurdish Republic on his hand, 
explained the new strategy of the PKK: "When the sun rose, he 
gave 72 peoples the place they wanted, and now it is our turn. 
We know that our liberation can only be possible with the 
liberation of Turkish Kurdistan. Therefore, we are going to 
fight." 
  Ishhan Aslan is from Diyarbekir. His family emigrated to 
Armenia in 1936. The walls of his home in Afshin village are 
full of photographs showing the Mahsum Korkmaz Academy together 
with PKK partisans, Abdullah Ojala (leader of the PKK -- ed.) 
and portraits of dead guerrillas. "As soon as it is needed we 
will send the Kurds under our command to fight." 
  "The same pertains to Armenia, which causes no problems 
among 
us." 
  The military command of the PKK in Armenia does not 
publicize 
the partisan groups, those in training, or questions about 
weaponry, but a "very recent" video cassette did not fail to put 
us on the track: The Krasnodar meeting! This is a documentary 
film on a PKK meeting of which we were unaware up to now. The 
PKK held a meeting attended by 102 representatives in Krasnodar 
in Russia from the 1st to the 8th of July. There were 12 Kurds 
from Armenia and 54 from Central Asia. At the end of the meeting 
a joint resolution was issued. Ishhan Aslan was elected as 
military commander at this meeting and took up his duties in the 
Assembly of the Lachin Kurdish Republic which was declared in 
June 1992 with Armenia's permission. 
  He says: "We are training an army of 20,000 soldiers. There 
were close to a million Kurds in the former Soviet Union. We 
know that many will join us in this fight we are beginning. This 
question was also discussed in Krasnodar. We established the 
Kurdish Union. It was said that the Lachyn lands would be turned 
over to this union when it passed into Armenian-Azeri ownership." 
  On 15 August the 10th anniversary celebration of the PKK was 
held in Afshin village with four thousand people taking part. 
This is the central base of the PKK in Armenia. It is 50 
kilometers from Kars. Ishhan Aslan, military commander of the 
Kurds in Armenia, lives in this village. We went to the village 
square and found a crowd playing zurnas [a kind of lute] and 
bells. In their hands were pictures and portraits of Abdullah 
Ojala, and the red, white and green flag with a sun in the 
middle of the Mahabad Kurdish Republic under which we believed 
that all Kurds would rally...The crowd was chanting the slogan 
"Bizhi Apochi, bizhi PKK!" We had the feeling that some youths 
were standing at a distance from the cameras. We entered the 
"guest house." Inside were many chairs and benches. The 
bookshelves were filled with books and magazines. The walls were 
occupied by signs and announcements written in the Cyrillic 
alphabet. Lectures are being held in this "guest house." 
Meetings and seminars are held here. The question of "Kurdistan" 
is discussed here... 
  An old man emerged from the crowd and came to our side. "My 
father is Botanly. I was born here. May the road to Apo be 
smooth. If he wishes, God will grant it. I am 65 years old, but 
I am ready to fight." Mers Memlioghlu shouted in Turkish: "We 
want to come and give our own blood. May there be a Kurdistan, 
may the Kurds have their own land. May the PKK be victorious..." 
A youth raised a picture of Abdullah Ojala and shouted in 
Kurdish: "I am going to fight as a partisan!" Barzany Dirbo, who 
was the same age, also shouted "I am from Kars. I, too, am going 
to fight!" Hano Cherkez added, "Me, too." 
  Koroghlu Esger, 53 years old and from Kars, promises: "When 
I 
say Apo, I think of Kurdistan. We live in comfort here, but our 
hearts are there. Thus, we are sending the youths to fight. We 
have still not had a martyr." Although Koroghlu Esger says that 
they have given no "martyrs," Javo Avdal from Afshin, who was 
killed in an operation the south-west in the last few months, 
was in the PKK. His father Abdul and his mother Nigar Avdal said 
"May our ten sons be sacrificed for independent Kurdistan." As 
for Javo Avdal's wife Aloyan, she lives in Yerevan. Although we 
wanted to meet with her, she did not want to meet with us. Her 
acquaintances say, "Aloyan is also going to war, she is also in 
the PKK and has no children." Javo went alone to Turkey. He went 
with three companions from Shamiran, the largest J=Kurdish 
village, and a PKK member who had come from Turkey. They 
traveled in the following way: one hour to Batumi, and from 
Batumi by sea to Trabzon and Kars... 
  We asked about those fighting in Turkey and whether they had 
any arms training before they went, but received no answer... 
  Yet another proof of the presence of the PKK in Armenia are 
the two weekly newspapers located in central Yerevan: REYA TAZE 
(NEW WAY) and BOTAN REDAKSIYON. REYA TAZE, with a circulation of 
two thousand, is the organ of the Armenian Communist Party and 
the central state press organ. Within the 52 newspapers 
published in Yerevan, it stands in third place. For the last two 
years REYA TAZE, which has existed for 63 years, has been 
spreading the ideas of the PKK. As for BOTAN REDAKSIYON, it was 
begun by PKK members who came from Turkey and Europe a few 
months ago and has a circulation of 2,500. 
  We met with Amerike Serdar, director of the press bureau of 
REYA TAZE in a twelve-storey building in Yerevan. Serdar is also 
the director of the Kurdish Intellectuals Union, which was 
founded two years ago. "I am a member of the PKK," he says. "The 
struggle of the PKK is the basic struggle of the Kurdish nation." 
  "I am also an Apochu. We have tied our future to the future 
of the PKK. We do not belong here. Finally we will have a 
country of our own. Whoever wants to can go there and settle 
down." 
  We await Dr. Sheref Ashir at REYA TAZE. He is professor of 
the politics of the peoples of the Middle East at the Yerevan 
Polytechnic Institute and assistant to the General Director of 
the Kurdish Intellectuals Union. But Ashiri has an even more 
important position: he is a member of the Assembly of the Lachyn 
Kurdish Republic...When he met with us, he selected a very 
attentive and cautious manner. In answer to our question "Are 
the PKK-ists coming here?" he said: "Kurds come and go here from 
everywhere. The basic criterion is love of country." Our duties 
are for the future. We are striving for social, economic and 
political power for the Kurds. "In this question, we also have 
relations with the state of Armenia." 
  We asked Sheref Ashiri about Mustafa Vekili, head of the 
Lachyn Kurdish Republic. "I have not seen him for a long time," 
he says. We do not believe him because we know that they were 
both at the meeting in Krasnodar a week earlier. 
  The fact is that the PKK camps in Armenia did not correspond 
to the image of a PKK encampment that was in our imagination, 
but what we saw, proved and heard in Armenia proved without 
doubt that the PKK is present there. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68577 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   22 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> AZERBAIJAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Criminal Actions Against Azeris in Georgia Reported </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Criminal Actions Against Azeris in Georgia Reported </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1016C Baku AZADLYG in Azeri 22 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1016C </F>
<F P=104>  Baku AZADLYG </F>
<F P=105>  Azeri </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [TURAN report: "Situation in Rayons Inhabited by Azeris </F>
Worsens Again"] 
  [Text] The criminological situation in rayons where 100,000 
Azeris live clustered together in the east of Georgia has 
worsened again. According to information from the TURAN News 
Agency, bandits broke into the home of M. Guliyev, a resident of 
Gyzylhajyly, and stole his property last week. 
  At the same time, unknown persons opened fire on the 
Baku-Marneuli bus on the bridge over the Khrami River. 
  The Ozan Society which defends the interests of Azeris 
living 
in Georgia has appealed to the country's leadership to expose 
these crimes and punish the criminals. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68578 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> GEORGIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Interview With Ajaria's Abashidze </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Interview With Ajaria's Abashidze </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM2704084594 Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 26 Apr 94 
First Edition p 2 </F>

<F P=103> PM2704084594 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Aslan Abashidze, chairman of the Ajarian </F>
Supreme Council, by Lyubov Volkova; date and place not given: 
"Georgia: There Is a Small Passage Amid the Flames"] 
  [Text] 
  [Volkova] Aslan Ibraimovich, Ajaria is the only oasis of 
internal stability, civil accord, and law and order in Georgia 
today. How do you explain this situation, which inspires such 
hope? How do you manage to preserve peace amid the fires of war 
on your little strip of land? 
  [Abashidze] I will answer with a parable. A father says to 
his son: When you buy a house from a man who built that house 
with his own hands, do not make the mistake of haggling with him 
-- whatever happens, he will not give in. He knows what the 
house cost him. If he did not build it himself, haggle away; he 
will lower his price, perhaps even give it to you for a song, 
because he has invested nothing in it of his own. I am the 
same. I know how we have kept peace by a hairbreadth. 
  [Volkova] Is it true that you offered your own family -- 
your wife, children, and grandson -- as hostages for talks in 
Abkhazia? 
  [Abashidze] There was a time when I thought that events in 
Abkhazia could be slowed down or halted. And I proposed that 
Ardzinba come here for talks. I felt that he was simply wary of 
traveling outside Abkhazia. Now, once upon a time in days of 
old, kings, in order to establish good relations among 
themselves, made use of family affairs -- they married 
princesses or gave their daughters in marriage to a king's son. 
And this was a very civilized form of establishing firm, 
friendly relations. I did not come up with any new idea. 
  But do not imagine that I was prepared for this. I simply 
felt during my telephone conversation with Ardzinba that he 
might not agree to come, and I used my final argument -- that 
which is most dear to me, my wife, daughters, and grandson. I 
guarantee everyone safety, I said. If this is not enough, I 
will come to Abkhazia myself. Then he agreed. But I found no 
supporters in the Georgian parliament. 
  There are forces interested in ensuring that instability is 
maintained in Georgia for as long as possible. For it is 
instability which keeps these people afloat. If the war ends, 
it will be time to build. And then they will prove to be 
superfluous, just as they were before. 
  Take a look at this photograph: Who do you think this is? 
It is my father's youngest brother. A most powerful 
personality, a historic personality. He is a general; they 
write about him a lot. You know, when they did away with this 
class -- in both Russia and Georgia -- great harm was done to 
the nations. Generation after generation the race put forward 
its best sons. They had the opportunity to receive a brilliant 
education, brilliant training. The most difficult burdens lay 
on their shoulders. Both in our country and in Russia. They 
were all in the first ranks. And then they were destroyed; the 
flower of our nation was destroyed, decapitated. And how much 
of our moral life disappeared together with them. You know, 
they had a very firm framework which they could not overstep. 
They had honor, conscience, morality, a nation. Everything was 
destroyed. And now it is like this: A man comes along who 
knows nothing. He makes a speech in parliament: "Why do we 
need the Russian ruble? Why are we entering the ruble zone? 
Let us enter the hard currency zone!" Can you imagine it? As 
though the United States would open its banks right now and say: 
"How much do you want?" And hand out dollars to all and 
sundry. Only Russia is capable of such expansive gestures. For 
the sake of the relations which formerly existed. You can kill 
a Russian soldier, you can label Russia an occupier, and it will 
give you gas, bread, and money. 
  [Volkova] It is precisely of pro-Russian sentiments that you 
are most often accused in Tbilisi. 
  [Abashidze] They accuse me of all sorts of things. In just 
one article I was accused of selling Ajaria to Russia and Turkey 
simultaneously. I ask: Which part am I selling to Russia and 
which to Turkey? We have been called all sorts of names in 
Georgia. 
  The fact that we are at peace is most important for business 
contacts between Russia and Georgia, and Georgia's constituent 
part, Ajaria. 
  [Volkova] You get the sense that there are no anti-Russian 
feelings here. Neighbors live together as neighbors. There are 
many streets with Russian names -- Lermontov Street, Pushkin 
Street, and so forth. 
  [Abashidze] We live together as one family, just as we 
always did, taking this communist slogan as our own. When the 
order came to use only Georgian, on Ajarian television we 
instantly set up Russian-language editions of exactly the same 
programs. This provoked misunderstanding among the Georgian 
leadership. 
  We commemorated 23 February [Army Day], 8 March [Women's 
Day], and Border Guards Day. On 9 May [Victory Day] we marched 
with veterans to the Glory Obelisk and laid wreaths at the Tomb 
of the Unknown Soldier. This was against the tide. 
Anti-Russian sentiments did not get a grip on us. Of course, 
some things were felt even here: There were exchanges of fire, 
attacks on troop units; Major Kirillov was killed in front of 
his wife and child. I issued a statement and invited his wife 
to come here, offering her an apartment and money. 
  Some people believe that I am swimming against the tide. No. 
I have always swum with the tide. And at the present time 
everything keeps within certain bounds. 
  [Volkova] Do you not have too few rights personally, as 
chairman of the Supreme Council of an autonomous republic, to 
make independent decisions? Does this not have an effect on 
business contacts between Ajaria and Russia? 
  [Abashidze] This does not depend on us alone. This also 
depends on our partners. Yes, I am the leader of an autonomous 
republic, but nothing has prevented me from making very bold 
decisions and assuming responsibility. Of course, I have seen 
no steps to meet me halfway. Neither inside Georgia, nor abroad. 
  For instance, I go to Moscow. I want to step off the 
gangway. A border guard climbs onto the gangway and checks my 
passport. I have a Soviet passport. There are no new passports 
either in Russia or in Georgia. I tell him: Why are you 
checking, we have the same passports. He felt awkward and did 
not look me in the eye. And what happened next was this. The 
inspectors -- two women -- moved aside. We had been waiting, 
thinking that they would begin to search us. But they say: 
What are you waiting for, pass through, for God's sake. You 
know, a ballad should be written about these women. Two women 
protested the leadership's decision, which forcibly separates 
us. It is pitiful. 
  For example, under the former Georgian leadership I received 
orders to make an inventory of the Russian garrison's property. 
But not only did I not do this, I even gave orders to shoot to 
kill anyone who approached the Russian unit. I knew I was 
making the right decision. And time proved this to be true. 
They did not help us to arm our own Ministry of Internal 
Affairs, which defended the interests of Russian troops here. 
But they handed out weapons to those who attacked the units of 
the Transcaucasus Military District. It is obvious why. But 
all the same we did not quit this road, knowing that afterward 
the Georgian central authorities would see that we were right. 
Which is what happened. 
  We concluded a treaty independently with Udmurtia. And the 
Georgian central press wrote about this: Why is Abashidze going 
to Udmurtia? They have got guns there, surface-to-air missiles, 
and so forth. They draw their own conclusions: We are arming 
ourselves, they say. But if you are worried who will think or 
say what about you, you won't achieve anything useful. We make 
our own decisions, the ones we need. And time will judge us. 
  There are very many artificial barriers and borders. Have 
you seen border guards mounting gangways and checking flights 
from Moscow in our country? No. I made the decision 
autonomously: Let them recognize that all this separation is 
artificial. 
  We do not get the Russian press in Ajaria. We went to Moscow 
to purchase newspapers in order to distribute them at home -- 
let people read, let them know what is happening in Russia, our 
age-old neighbor. We were greeted rapturously in the Russian 
Ministry of Communications. We agreed that we would 
systematically import the press to Ajaria. We paid for the 
plane at the airport. But they did not let it take off. They 
told us: "You are allowed 10 newspapers. That is all." The 
print runs of the papers we bought are now lying somewhere in 
our friend's dacha. 
  Barricades have been erected on all sides. 
  [Volkova] This winter kiwi fruit, pineapples, bananas, and 
oranges from overseas countries were sold in Moscow. But we 
have not seen mandarins, oranges, or green vegetables from 
Ajaria. Why not? Surely it was not impossible to sell 
something from the last harvest to Russia and earn some money at 
least? 
  [Abashidze] Unfortunately not. The railroad was blocked 
off. We chartered several ships and exported citrus fruits. We 
made several trips. But that is only part of the harvest. 
Citrus fruits are a highly perishable commodity. One train was 
detained for around a month in Tbilisi and the freight rotted. 
  [Volkova] You are in a bad way as regards raw materials. 
Are you managing to establish contacts with Russian procurement 
agents? 
  [Abashidze] Some stuff reaches us somehow or other by 
roundabout routes, and enterprises are able to work to 20-30 
percent of capacity. But, of course, these are not the contacts 
which used to exist and which we need. For instance, we have 
the only plant in the former Union which produced transformers 
for everyone. We have a tung-oil refinery which produces 
high-quality oil from this subtropical product. It is used in 
aviation and the shipbuilding industry. These oils are highly 
stable and irreplaceable. We always used to sell them in the 
Soviet Union. Now Russian aviators and others get hard currency 
from the state and buy this oil abroad at three times the price. 
And we have barrels of it. We have the only caffeine plant in 
the former Soviet Union. Your pharmacology and medicine are 
also evidently suffering. And many similar things as well. The 
Western market will not take our products. Here is an example: 
We were unable to put together two wagonloads of citrus fruits 
of the same size. In the past you and I lived together as 
follows: We grew fruit however it would grow, we bought 
whatever was on sale. We talked a different language to the 
Western world; we lived on a different planet. Now we must 
climb into the same boat, called the market, together and learn 
together. We will fail if we go our separate ways. 
  We wanted to purchase sugar; a businessman came, took the 
money, and left. They say to us, Interpol can find him, if you 
pay $50,000 per day. Pay for 10 days, and there's the stolen 
sum. And you still won't know whether Interpol will find him. 
  But if someone deceived you in Russia, you could phone him 
and give him a dressing down: You made a mess -- clear it up. 
  Here is a surprising fact which we have underrated: Right 
now you can phone any point in Russia or Central Asia from any 
of our telephones and say: I am the director of a plant, the 
unit you sold me has malfunctioned. And people will come here 
from Russia, they will pay no attention to these transparent 
borders or borders of reinforced concrete. We lived together -- 
that is what we are used to. It is like in the movies -- "Bound 
by One Chain." 
  Russia needs Georgia like the air it breathes. And I think 
that Georgia needs Russia just as much. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68579 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   19 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reform of Russian Banking System Outlined </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reform of Russian Banking System Outlined </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0740A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 19 Apr 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0740A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yuriy Agapov, president of the Kredo-Bank, </F>
candidate of economic sciences, and Oleg Lavrushin, president of 
the Center for Banking Research, academician: "What Is a Bank in 
Russia? Proposals for Reform of Our Banking System"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Position </H5>
  Calls for reform of Russia's banking system, including its 
Central Bank, have begun to appear more and more frequently in 
the press recently. In the opinion of some, the Russian banking 
sector should be transformed based on American experience 
(following the model of the Federal Reserve System of the United 
States). Others think that the banking system of Russia should 
be reformed according to the German model (following the 
experience of the Bundesbank, with a developed network of branch 
banks and strict control from the center). While agreeing in 
principle with the need for banking reform, the Central Bank 
thinks that it should not be conducted hastily, but gradually, 
that it will take about two years to complete it, that to 
mechanically apply readymade structures from other countries to 
a Russian base is unfeasible, and that it would be more correct 
to take advantage of the experience both of the Federal Reserve 
System and Bundesbank and of the Central Bank of Russia. 
  Inclining more toward a position of a weighed approach which 
takes into account both the patterns and the peculiarities in 
the development of the banking business, national culture and 
historical traditions, and the overall condition of the Russian 
economy as an economy in transition, we, however, think that 
when determining the direction for the development of its 
banking system Russian society must first resolve a number 
of principle issues for itself. 
  Do we have the right to reform the banking system or would 
it 
be more correct in this stage to speak about creating its 
design? Does this system exist in Russia or does it still have 
to be formed? In which stage of bank construction are we and are 
we certain enough about how what has developed should be 
transformed? Can we postpone the transformation of banking in 
the country and limit ourselves solely to discussions and 
declarations, allowing ourselves to become involved in heated 
but particular discussions (this would not be the first time 
this has happened in our life, it is happening at this very 
moment as we are beginning to react to one idea or another that 
has been foisted upon us) and philosophize at length without 
proposing something specific in exchange? Finally, will we 
continue for long to grasp individual ideas and parts without 
resolving questions of its creation and management 
comprehensively? When answering these questions a great deal 
depends on how we evaluate what has already happened with our 
banks. If we understand the task as being primarily to destroy 
the old system--the monopolism of the former State Bank of the 
USSR, the state monopoly in forming banks, then we can say that 
we have carried it out to a considerable degree: The Gosbank 
[State Bank] as a concept in the history of Russian banking has 
receded into the past and modern business banks are being 
generated not only on state but also on private initiative. If, 
however, we set as our tasks not only to destroy but also to 
construct something new and adequate to the market, then, 
naturally, the answer will be negative. One can probably agree 
that our banking system is for the time being some kind of 
hybrid of the market and centralized systems. The Central Bank 
is no longer the state bank, but it is not a bank that 
corresponds to a market economy. Commercial banks are not 
branches of a single giant but they are still far from being 
banks that have their own set of banking services and have the 
capital base and technology of operations enabling them to carry 
out large-scale capital investments. 
  Which path shall we take from here? Let us try to formulate 
several general approaches. 
  1. First of all we should agree that transformations in 
the banking sector are not short-term acts, they are a 
long-term, stage-by-stage program of actions based on increasing 
both the activity of the Central Bank itself and the activity of 
large commercial banks, banking associations, scientific 
centers, and organizations. 
  2. During the process of reconstruction of the banking 
system 
we cannot reform just one element of it--just the Central Bank 
or just the commercial banks. The formation of a new type 
of banking system must be comprehensive in nature, 
affect all elements of the banking sector, provide 
for the necessary interaction among them, and provide for 
effective functioning not only of the Central Bank but also of 
the banking sector as a whole. 
  3. I would like to give warning about something else--we 
must 
not regard the transformations of the banking sector as a 
panacea for solving all and especially larger (than purely 
banking) national economic problems. 
  With all their economic and political power the banks 
operate 
in a sphere which is only a part of the reproduction of society. 
Their activity is linked to the formation and distribution of 
monetary resources and mobilization of savings for the needs of 
economic development. 
  The monetary-credit policy of the banks therefore can 
resolve a limited number of problems. Of course, it can 
exert an influence on the acceleration (retardation), and 
expansion (narrowing) of production, but mainly through 
exchange, a system of special (monetary) instruments. The banks 
influence the utilization of resources and have an impact on 
liquidity, capitalization of incomes, consumer demand, and 
capital investments, but one must not forget that they operate 
on the basis of already created accumulations, their 
"capital-creating" capabilities are limited, and they 
are practically nonexistent under conditions of high inflation. 
To exaggerate or underestimate the role of the monetary-credit 
policy are two extremes, both of which can lead to new 
disproportions. 
  4. Banking monetary instruments are capable of exerting an 
influence on social development only in concert and 
simultaneously with other instruments. Transformations in 
the sphere of banking should therefore be regarded only as part 
of systemic general economic transformations. Since the 
banking system as a whole in a certain sense is derived from the 
economic and political structure of the country and since 
changes in the banking sector should take place only to the 
proper degree and as a reflection under the conditions of the 
transition period and in real branches of the national economy 
and state and political structures. 
  Therefore one can assert that the transformation of the 
banking system is merely an element of the overall economic 
strategy, which is called upon to serve the process of other 
reforms (in the area of diversification of property, 
demobilization, the establishment of new markets, restructuring 
of interregional and interrepublic relations, etc.). 
  5. The reforming of banks has independent significance and 
should provide for democratization of the banking system, 
strengthening of credit institutions, and the formation of a 
banking market and banking infrastructure. 
  Transformations in the banking system should, in our view, 
begin with a solution to certain conceptual problems. 
Strange as it may be, they include discovering the essence 
of the banking system itself. Let us recall that the 
banking system is frequently interpreted as the totality of 
particular banking and nonbanking institutions (so-called credit 
institutions). With this approach there is no system, 
because a system presupposes not only elements in relation to 
one another as they interact but also elements that are 
interconnected with the external environment. It includes, 
consequently, not only the aforementioned credit institutions 
but also something that is actually lacking in our life, namely 
a banking infrastructure, a money market, and a legislative 
base. 
  Unfortunately, a banking market in the real sense of 
the word has not yet been formed in Russia. Accumulations, 
on whose basis the banking sector could develop and which could 
nourish the resource base of commercial banks, are clearly 
inadequate. The average deposit of the population as of the 
beginning of this year was little more than 1,400 rubles [R]. 
Bank deposits (including call deposits and short-term deposits 
in the Sberbank, and also certificates of deposit) amounted to 
R8,135 billion or 21.1 percent of the overall money supply. The 
proportion of deposits in commercial banks was little more than 
11 percent. Deposits from the population in the overall total of 
liabilities of Russian commercial banks amounted to a miserly 
sum--0.88 percent (as of 1 September 1993). The capital base of 
enterprises has been bled dry by the severe inflation. Many 
years will pass before real accumulations will reach a level 
sufficient to consider the banks to be provided with resources 
for granting credit. 
  The market presupposes vigorous trade. Although trade among 
banks is developing, a number of commercial banks are operating 
not so much with their own capital and capital in the accounts 
of their clients along with interbank credit as on the basis of 
regular infusions from the Central Bank. Centralized loans 
account for more than 80 percent of the overall sum of credit 
obtained by commercial banks from other banks. 
  Essentially, the old machine for distribution of 
resources in the form of credit limits of the State Bank 
have largely been replaced by a system of distribution of 
credit of the Central Bank. One can say that the system of 
market mechanisms, including the sale of credit at auctions, is 
just taking its first steps. 
  The fundamental questions include also the very 
understanding of a bank, its essence, functions, and role 
in the economy. Let us note that it is not such a simple matter 
to give a definition to a bank. Banks have been in existence for 
several millennia and their modern activity is so diverse that 
sometimes it is not easy to distinguish them from other 
financial institutions. Yet an analysis of their essence makes 
it incumbent on us to single out something special, specific; in 
a word it makes it incumbent on us to single out that which 
distinguishes the phenomenon under consideration from any other. 
  In modern science and practice the definition of a 
"bank" is approached from two positions: legal and 
economic. From the legal standpoint a "bank" is defined 
from the position of what it does (which operations it performs) 
and what it can do. Of course, this approach has a right to 
exist, but it can only be of secondary significance. What seems 
more rational to us is an analysis that includes in the essence 
of a bank what it does and how this distinguishes it from other 
institutions and therefore makes it a bank as such as distinct 
from other financial institutions. 
  Unfortunately, our previous research on banks was not as 
deep 
as we would have liked. Let us recall that it was linked to the 
understanding of the bank as part of the state apparatus, of a 
particular superstructure. Hence--the more banks there were, the 
greater the costs of administration and the more national income 
that was eaten up. Such an understanding was justified to a 
certain degree. Society and the banks lived with a different 
kind of measurement, interbank competition did not exist and 
could not under the conditions where the spheres of activity of 
numerous credit institutions were divided up and essentially 
there was mandatory "registration"--assigning each client to a 
particular bank. 
  The market changes the position of the bank. It forces banks 
to work not with resources obtained from above through 
distribution but on the basis of its own capital and largely on 
the basis of what it has managed to collect from its clients. 
Under the conditions of the market the productive nature of 
banking activity is manifested more clearly. The bank creates 
its own specific product in the form of means of payment and 
traditional and nontraditional services, without which it is 
impossible to maintain or accelerate production and circulation. 
The bank inevitably becomes part of the base of society and 
creates a certain increase in gross product and national income. 
  The concept of a "bank" thus goes beyond the framework of 
the 
purely theoretical debate. Unless this concept is defined 
correctly we cannot defend the interests of depositors or 
correctly conduct tax policy regarding banks and we open up the 
possibility for nonbank institutions to unjustifiably acquire 
the status of a bank. 
  In our view, the productive character of banking 
activity gives us every justification to depart from the 
old representatives [as published] and inevitably leads us 
to a definition of a "bank" as a basic element--as a 
special enterprise. This is demonstrated by international 
experience as well. In the modern legislation of a number of 
developed countries (Germany, France, and others) the bank is 
described precisely as an enterprise. There is also other 
evidence of this which may be indirect but is nonetheless 
important. It is no accident that according to generally 
accepted ideas the bank is characterized as an independent 
autonomously financed legal entity, and many normative documents 
regarding the bank and the enterprise proceed from the same 
principles and provisions (inclusion of expenditures in 
production cost, taxation, etc.). 
  Let us assume that the concept "banks" in the Law "On Banks 
and Banking Activity" can be defined as follows (two versions): 
  1. "A bank is an enterprise that engages in the emission of 
means of payment on a credit basis, cash settlement services for 
clients, and accumulation and distribution of monetary means on 
the basis of repayment and interest payment." 
  2. "A bank is an enterprise that produces a specific product 
in the form of emission of means of payment, organization of 
settlements, accumulation of resources, and their distribution 
based on principles of recoverability." 
  It is no accident that we began by speaking about one of the 
banking laws. The fact is that it is precisely at this time, as 
has been noted repeatedly in the Russian press, that at various 
levels, including in the banking subcommittee of the State Duma, 
there is discussion of a new redaction of two main banking laws. 
The existing Laws "On the Central Bank of the Russian 
Federation" and "On Banks and Banking Activity" unfortunately 
contradict certain provisions of the new Constitution of the 
Russian Federation, the Civil Code, and the Fundamentals of 
Civil Legislation. Some of their articles are obsolete and 
require development. 
  The Law "On Banks and Banking Activity" should not 
merely define what a bank is, but correctly reflect the types of 
banks. As we know, functioning in Russian practice are not 
only commercial but also investment, innovation, savings, 
mortgage, authorized, and municipal banks. Unfortunately, 
existing legislation does not make it possible to strictly 
determine the list of operations they have the right to perform 
while considering the interests of the depositors. All these 
banks strive to be universal commercial banks, which in 
principle should not be the case from the standpoint of 
protection of savings and deposits of the clients. 
  A number of Russian banks have ended up in the role of 
"puppet" banks, held captive by the stockholders. Wanting to 
gratify their stockholders and finding themselves dependent on 
them, a number of Russian banks invest their own and attracted 
funds in the economies of stockholding enterprises, helping 
them, and they increase the risk of defaulting on credit 
payments and essentially place themselves in a position of 
potential bankruptcy. None of these cases are described in 
existing legislation and they require concretization and 
development. 
  This pertains also to such an apparently inoffensive concept 
as "credit institution." It was no accident that it appeared in 
the drafts of new banking legislation. The fact is that in the 
banking market there is a group of financial institutions which 
have been granted the status of bank although essentially that 
is not what they are since they do not simultaneously perform 
the three mandatory operations (deposit, credit, and 
settlement), which provide justification for considering them 
banks (according to international standards it is thought that 
it is this sign of simultaneously performing the three 
traditional banking services that provides grounds for including 
one institution or another in the category of bank). The 
term "credit institutions" introduced in the draft of new 
banking legislation is improper since it does not separate 
nonbanks from authentic banks, which mainly act as large credit 
institutions. Moreover, although it is incorrect to call these 
"special financial institutions," that is what they are called 
in banking legislation of a number of Western countries. 
  For banking legislation it is of principal 
importance not only to more completely designate the system 
of banks and determine the boundaries of the activity of each 
type but also to determine their social significance. 
It is known that in the consciousness of modern Russian society 
banks are perceived not only as a real economic force that 
accumulates immense monetary wealth and is called upon to serve 
the economic needs of the national economy and nourish the 
economy with additional "energy" resources. In the awareness of 
a fairly broad segment of people banks are associated with 
speculators, shopkeepers, money lenders, and bribetakers who are 
concerned only about their own advantage. The idea that "banks 
are for the rich and not for the poor" with all the antagonism 
instilled by decades will be present for a long time to come in 
the awareness of simple people, essentially keeping both them 
themselves from saving at least part of what they have in modern 
life, ravished by inflation and political instability, and the 
banks from prospering, for the latter can prosper only if the 
people are wealthy and are motivated to save. 
  To be fair, we must not fail to note that certain banks 
provide reasons for a negative assessment of their role in 
society. Being commercial in essence and working according to 
the principle of profitable management (that and no other), 
through their activity the banks contribute to the acquisition 
of profit by the clients and hence to their own profit. The 
appetites of certain banks, however, turn out to be too hefty, 
their "grasping" reflex becomes apparent, and it surpasses their 
concern for the common good. Banking legislation creates no 
barriers for restraint here. Taking into account the idea that 
is developing in Russian society of banks as purely commercial 
structures supposedly striving for their own exclusive advantage 
and also keeping in mind the actual existence of certain banks 
with these kinds of reflexes, it would be expedient, in our 
view, to include the following important provision in the law: 
"The bank as an enterprise, being a social institution and 
representing generally accepted interests, is called upon to 
provide for the economic and social development of society." 
Of course we are far from thinking that all bankers will 
become good boys and stop shifting all their risk to the 
shoulders of the clients; this will not happen directly or 
immediately, but it will be strictly established, if you will, 
that there is a legal and moral norm which no bank generated by 
the interests of society and called upon to contribute to the 
satisfaction of these interests will have the right to forget. 
  This provision goes beyond being a declaration and should be 
reinforced by concrete legislative measures. Thus it would be 
expedient, in our view, legislatively to restrict the 
proportion of interbank credit (except for centralized) in 
the overall volume of attracted resources of commercial agents. 
This will create incentives for expanding the clientele of 
commercial banks, which is possible only on the basis of radical 
improvement of the quality of the services granted and their 
diversity. 
  It could be extremely useful to have a special code for 
the banker, which would determine his behavior in the 
capital market and constantly assert the idea that work for the 
sake of the client's profit is the most advantageous and 
profitable kind of commercial activity, and that "fleecing 
people," conversely, is the most disadvantageous operation for 
the banker. 
  Among the conceptual issues we discussed previously is the 
understanding of the essence, functions, and role of the 
Central Bank. Let us try to figure these out in 
greater detail. According to our estimates (and also the 
estimates of Western experts) the load on the Central Bank of 
the Russian Federation as an institution for financing exceeds 
its actual capabilities. In industrially developed countries the 
proportion of assets of the Central Bank in the assets of the 
banking system does not exceed 15 percent (and there is even a 
tendency toward reduction), while in Russia this indicator is no 
less than 50 percent. The burden on credit as a whole as a 
source for making expenditures is at its limits. Centralized 
credit, including the one-third granted to banks of Russia to 
cover the federal budget deficit (not including a considerable 
proportion of the government expenditures also covered by 
credit), is ready to blow up the money supply and undermine the 
already weak incentives for growth of production and increase of 
the productivity of public labor. 
  It is in this connection that it is important to figure out 
what they are and what functions and purposes they have. The 
paradox of modern banking practice is that neither in theory nor 
in existing banking legislation are these fundamental concepts 
applied to the activity of the Central Bank of Russia, nor are 
they clearly defined. The authors of the new draft Law "On the 
Central Bank of the Russian Federation" proceed from the 
previous idea of the Central Bank as the only emission center. 
Such an interpretation is more typical of a strictly centralized 
system and does not correspond to accepted universal practice of 
issuing money that is being practiced currently in Russia 
whereby a multitude of economic entities have the right to issue 
stocks, bonds, bills, and other securities and means of payment. 
  In modern practice, in various kinds of publications and 
also 
in banking laws themselves, the concept of "functions of the 
bank" is used fairly frequently. It subsequently turns out that 
the function of the bank is equated with its operations, but 
this is something altogether different. Banking legislation 
still has to define what the function of the bank is and what 
its operations and tasks are. 
  It seems to us that within the framework of the new 
redaction 
of the Law "On the Central Bank of the Russian Federation" its 
content could be defined as follows: "The Central Bank of 
the Russian Federation is the emission center for the Russian 
Federation which is granted the exclusive right to put state 
bank notes and metal coins into circulation." 
  The functions of the Bank of Russia should include: 
  1) regulation of monetary-credit relations; 
  2) oversight of the activity of commercial banks; 
  3) analytical-informational activity. 
  It is important both in practice and in 
legislation more clearly to articulate the idea of the 
special political responsibility of the Central Bank. 
Unfortunately, we have confused two things here: The superfluous 
political battle which the Central Bank waged of its own accord 
or by coercion, and its responsibility for political stability 
in society. While the former aspect of the bank's activity is 
worthy of sympathy and discussion, the latter circumstance in 
inevitable, because whether the Central Bank likes it or not, 
one way or another its monetary instruments bear a political 
load. Everyone knows that withholding the payment of wages to 
workers and employees through the fault of the Bank of Russia 
(for example, in the summer of 1992) caused severe social 
conflicts. Poor protection of the monetary units from forgery 
and theft in the form of false notes had a direct effect not 
only on the incomes of the state but also on the deposits of the 
banks which, as a result of these thefts, ended up on the verge 
of bankruptcy. And the very instrument of the monetary and 
credit policy and the fight against inflation are capable of 
causing significant social consequences. In our view it would be 
more correct in the Law "On the Central Bank of the Russian 
Federation," having reflected this circumstance, to write that 
"within the framework of the economic policy that is being 
conducted the Central Bank of Russia is responsible for 
political stability in society." 
  Within the framework of the regulatory function performed by 
the Central Bank it is important to determine 
unequivocally that it does not perform operations for serving 
clients (neither through its territorial administrations 
nor through the excessively bloated network of cash settlement 
centers, a significant proportion of which need to be 
transformed into purely commercial credit institutions). 
  A certain amount of regulation is also needed with the 
oversight function of the Central Bank. It is known 
that the stability of the banking system depends on how well 
this is performed. It is precisely for purposes of increasing 
the role of this kind of activity of the emission bank that it 
is more expedient to separate it in the form of a social 
state department under the jurisdiction of the Bank of 
Russia. 
  Unfortunately, the analytical-informational function of the 
Central Bank has almost not been designated in legislation and 
is clearly in need of improvement in terms of content. The Bank 
of Russia should provide analysis of the monetary-credit sector, 
payment discipline, the dynamics of prices and savings, 
prognostication of the development of monetary-credit relations 
in the country, and on a regular basis publish information about 
the condition of the money supply and the payment condition of 
the state and branches of the national economy. 
  On the whole, we are inclined to think that the most 
important thing in the reform of the Central Bank of Russia 
should be not so much renovation of its management structures as 
maintenance of its activity. Whether the Central Bank will 
be constructed according to the American model (Federal Reserve 
System) or the German model (Bundesbank) is, as they say, of 
little importance. Both the German and the American models 
deserve respect not because of their particularity, the 
exclusive features of their construction, but because of their 
content, their smooth operation, their analytical potential, a 
particular monetary view, and their evaluation of the 
development of production. 
  The formation of the National Banking Council of 
Russia as an organ not under but over the Central Bank 
should help in the matter of restructuring the banking system. 
The National Banking Council should include representatives of 
state power, the Bank of Russia, commercial banks, the national 
economy, trade unions, and the scholarly community. The purpose 
of this Council is to consolidate the interests of the Bank of 
Russia, the national economy, the government, and the banking 
community as a whole, to develop recommendations for the Central 
Bank of Russia concerning strategic issues in the development of 
the banking system and the most crucial current problems of 
monetary-credit regulation and the development of a legislative 
and normative base, and to work out a policy for interaction 
between the Russian and the world banking systems in financing 
state programs for the development of the country's economy 
(including the private sector) and a number of other fundamental 
decisions. This Council could also take on functions of 
coordinating research problems of banking, international 
relations, and programs for reconstruction of the Russian 
banking system and inform the country's president and State Duma 
in periodical reports on the condition of the monetary-credit 
system. 
  Decisions of the Council as the national organ for the 
Central Bank of Russia could be an essential aid in implementing 
the general program for transforming the banking sector. 
  An important direction for the reform of the Central 
Bank is to increase its role in the formation of the banking 
infrastructure, providing for reliability, stability, and 
viability of the banking system and protection of the interests 
of the depositors. The banking infrastructure includes the 
development of legal foundations and methodological and 
scientific support, the development of bookkeeping and auditing, 
the formation of structures providing ratings of banks and their 
clients, training and retraining of personnel, etc. 
Unfortunately, the Central Bank of the Russian Federation has 
organized all these structures poorly and their condition gives 
cause for serious alarm. As was already noted, Russia really has 
no banking system because it lacks, among other things, this 
most important element, without which the concept of a banking 
system is given a literary, prosaic, but not strictly defined 
scientific interpretation. In order to form a banking 
infrastructure it is necessary: 
  --to step up the work for creating methodological support 
for 
the activity of banks (regulations, instructions, and 
methodological and practical aids); 
  --to form on a joint-stock basis a Fund for the Development 
of Basic Research and Modern Banking Technology; 
  --to develop a plan for priority research in the area of 
banking; 
  --to form analytical consultation firms with a banking 
profile as parts of the Central Bank of Russia and independent 
founders; 
  --to prepare a program for extensive on-the-job training of 
Russian economists in Western banks and banking scientific 
centers; 
  --to form a permanent international work group of experts 
working on problems of regulating banking in Russia; 
  --to draw up a state program for the development of training 
and retraining of personnel with a financial-banking profile; 
  --to form a network of certified educational institutions 
providing for continuous personnel training; 
  --on the scale of the country, to develop a system of 
training and retraining teaching personnel for educational 
institutions and replacing scientific cadres; 
  --to set up a system of information support, including a 
rating system for evaluating the activity of banks and their 
clients (on the basis of special agencies and joint-stock 
companies and the creation of rating information), publication 
of archive and contemporary statistical materials on the 
condition of banking in the country, etc. 
  It is necessary to establish the responsibility of the 
Central Bank of the Russian Federation for the creation of a 
system for insuring deposits and other systems providing 
for stability of the functioning of banks and the preservation 
of confidence in them. It seems that insuring deposits and 
investments (especially of the population) should be organized 
on a centralized basis, creating for this purpose a "Specialized 
State Centralized Fund for Insurance of Investments and 
Deposits." 
  In order to complete the formation of the banking system of 
Russia there will be a considerable amount of work for 
improving banking legislation. In such cases everything is 
usually reduced to amendments to the two existing Laws "On Banks 
and Banking Activity" and "On the Central Bank of the Russian 
Federation." Actually a new redaction of them is needed and it 
is also necessary to update and augment information on a number 
of important issues we have already discussed as well as other, 
no less essential ones that have to do with licensing commercial 
banks, relations between the Central Bank and the legislative 
and executive branches, etc. But it is not just a matter of 
these amendments and additions. The modern banking legislative 
base is fairly limited, it does not encompass the entire banking 
sector and therefore requires essential expansion. Russia still 
has to adopt and implement a legislative program 
which includes not only a new redaction of existing laws but 
also a package of other laws, including: "On 
Organization of Oversight of the Activity of Banks and Special 
Financial Institutions," "On Bank Holding Companies," "On 
Procedure for the Activity of Foreign and Joint Banks on the 
Territory of the Russian Federation," "On Equal Opportunities 
and Protection of the Interests of Depositors, Borrowers, and 
Other Categories of Banks and Special Financial Institutions," 
"On Savings and Loan Institutions," "On Foundations of the 
Structure of the Credit System of Russia and Credit Operations," 
"On Mortgage Banks," "On Bank Secrets," "On Securities and the 
Stock Exchange in the Russian Federation," "On Financial 
Companies," "On the System of Insurance in the Russian 
Federation," etc. 
  A separate discussion should be devoted to the system of 
Russian commercial banks, including normatives for regulating 
their activity, expansion of the network, strengthening of the 
capital base, and conditions and measures for gradually 
including Russian banks in the world banking community. But that 
is the subject for a separate discussion. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68580 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Concept of State Participation in Investment Process Viewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Concept of State Participation in Investment Process Viewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0749A Moscow KOMMERSANT in Russian No 13, 12 Apr 94 pp 
2,3 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0749A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Nikita Kirichenko, Aleksandr Privalov, and </F>
Andrey Shmarov entitled "Hunting Season for Private Investments 
Opens"] 
  [Text] A favorite idea of KOMMERSANT experts, solving the 
investment crisis through shared participation of the state in 
investment projects, is definitely acquiring not only 
well-wishers but active advocates in government organizations. 
According to information received by the KOMMERSANT editorial 
staff, the Ministry of Economics has submitted, simulatneously 
to the government and to the judgment of business circles, "On 
the Concept of State Participation in the Investment Process 
Through the Use of Stock Market Instruments," This, of course, 
is only the first step, but that's why it's important. 
<H5>  Let's Congratulate Ourselves: The First Pancake is Being </H5>
Baked 
  Employees of the Central Checking Investment Fund 
participated with the specialists of the Ministry of Economics 
in developing the concept, so it seemed natural to make the 
All-Russian Conference of Checking Investment Funds the site for 
the document's debut. This was held from 28 March through 1 
April in Izhevsk. ChIFs [checking investment funds] approved the 
basic provisions of the concept, which is natural, as we will 
soon show. 
  The heart of the concept is a quite complicated mechanism 
for 
"attracting the capital of private investors for achieving goals 
stipulated by state programs" through the concept of state 
guarantees of investment activity. We will try to briefly -- and 
consequently in an oversimplified way -- to describe the main 
points of this mechanism. 
  The state, guided by its priorities, decides to invest in a 
certain project. It accomplishes this as a purchase from the 
recipient of the investment of a block of his stock (at face 
value). The recipient is obligated to subsequently redeem the 
shares at a price indexed to the dollar (a typical "repo" 
operation takes place), and also gives the state bills of 
exchange for yearly payments for interest for credit. For each 
block of securities redeemed in this manner, the state 
establishes a trust with a government agency. This agent -- here 
is the central point of the concept -- "accepts the indicated 
securities to its balance in exchange for its own obligations 
which ensure the attraction of additional investment of private 
investors and the full repayment of funds to the state, as well 
as a rate of profit equal to the prime rate during the 
established time period." 
  These government agents (the authors of the concept call 
them 
"General Investment Funds" or GRIFs [griffin] -- smells of 
Freud, doesn't it?) may be of two types. 
  First, a GRIF can be a specially created "state guarantee 
fund." Then the securities it issues would have the status of 
state securities and represent, according to the authors' 
notion, an "absolute guarantee" for private investors attracted 
to participation in the given projects. These are the GRIFs 
which would have to attract the population's capital, private 
pension funds, and so on, "minimizing their risk in long-term 
investment." 
  Second, a GRIF can be a non-state investment structure. In 
this case it is delegated "the right to issue state guarantees 
in the distribution of securities to private investors". For 
example it could issue bonds to redeem these securities at a 
certain fixed rate after a certain time period -- but not before 
the given investment project is completed. 
<H5>  "You would never understand what I will get out of this" </H5>
  The scheme, to be sure, works out beautifully. Practically 
nothing is required from the agent of the government, the GRIF. 
Remember: it "ensures. . .the full repayment of funds to the 
state, as well as a rate of return equal to the prime rate (! - 
KOMMERSANT) in the established time period." And it achieves 
these results entirely from the profits from investments, for, 
it is assumed, other opportunities for using the money will be 
closed to it according to the agreement with the state. There 
are, it turns out, "wonderful growth areas" in our economy, 
where investments pay for themselves in less than six months 
(based on the current annual rate for centralized credits of 210 
percent)! 
  What remains incomprehensible is: if the Ministry of 
Economics specialists concede the presence of such "growth 
areas" in the economy, then why not just extend credit to them 
directly -- by using the capital of the Central Bank at a 
refinancing rate with payoff in the aforementioned "established 
time periods"? KOMMERSANT's experts (possibly due to their 
naivete) supposed that the government's Credit Commission, 
Ministry of Finance, and Ministry of Economics should have been 
searching for just such ways of financing through centrally 
allocated resources. 
  A second unclear point is: why did the document's drafters 
so 
blindly believe the credit allocated by the scheme would go to 
investments, and not to the "idling" which they hate so much? 
There are so many ways to convert investment money into working 
capital that it is somehow indecent for the authors of this 
document to pretend that they are not familiar with at least one. 
  And finally the third unclear point: why is it necessary to 
create GRIFs to attract the population's funds to the investment 
process, inventing two types of state agencies? If you don't 
want to finance investment projects from Central Bank capital, 
there is still a way out. Why not, for example, raise the rate 
on deposits to the Russian Federation Savings Bank to the 
refinancing rate and attract the population's money this way? 
After all, the "growth areas" will guarantee everything "up to 
par" and "on schedule." And the question of guarantees is also 
solved -- deposits in the Savings Bank are guaranteed by the 
state. There are also other types of profitable and guaranteed 
assets (GKOs [short-term bonds], gold certificates, "October" 
and "April" series treasury notes) which the state can issue and 
put the money into investment projects. 
  In short, KOMMERSANT's experts get the feeling that the 
proposed scheme does not promise any investment success for 
either the state or private investors, except for that which 
could be achieved by quite traditional methods. 
<H5>  On failure and this attempt to kill two birds </H5>
  Expressing the same conclusion somewhat differently, the 
concept is inordinately complicated. It has, to use the term of 
the medieval philosopher, too many superfluous essences, which 
is bad for two obvious reasons. One, such an intricate design, 
requiring the creation of a whole cohort of new institutions 
from materials on hand, will not work in principle -- or, at 
best, will take a long time to start to work. Two, if the state 
agencies put all their strength into this scheme, then there 
will be no strength left for the more natural (and that means 
more promising) methods -- as we know, there isn't all that much 
strength. The good deed of government encouragement of private 
investment will be left undone. 
  The reason behind the extreme intricacy of the concept seems 
perfectly obvious to KOMMERSANT experts. The trouble is that the 
authors were trying to kill two birds with one stone: provide 
joint state-private financing of priority projects, and save 
hundreds of ChIFs from impending oblivion, hiring them in the 
role of GRIFs. 
  Actually, the authors (remember that among them are 
representatives of the ChIFs) don't hide the "dual use" in the 
concept. That's just the way they write: "At present the 
checking investment funds, realizing the difficulties associated 
with the coming stock market crisis, and the real possibility of 
total bankruptcy, are completely ready for transformation into 
investment companies, investment banks, branches and departments 
of investment banks" -- and so on, and so on. 
  "Such a trend in their development should be supported," but 
for this reason: "create, based on them, an essential 
infrastructure of agents of the RF government, who will fulfill 
the functions listed above." 
  This train of thought is entirely understandable. Up to now, 
the ChIFs were engaged in a rather unnatural business -- they 
accumulated certain securities which were artificially invented, 
not engendered by economic reality, and exchanged them for not 
very natural shares of stock in enterprises which were to one 
degree or another doing poorly. Now, when this business has 
ended with the conclusion of the voucher era, the majority of 
these economic homunculi, not hoping to survive in a real 
economy, are hurriedly trying to find another just as unnatural 
business. But if the ChIFs think the role of government agents 
in the proposed scheme is just the role which would allow them 
to survive, then it is hard to agree with them. Reread the list 
of a GRIFs duties in previous administrations, and you will see 
that a firm capable of surviving in such work does not need the 
title of government agent. 
  But actually the ChIFs would like more: they would like a 
part of the non-liquid shares of privatized enterprises which 
they have already accumulated to be at least partially exchanged 
for state securities within the framework of this scheme. This, 
of course, is pure insanity; we simply don't feel like 
commenting on such a plan of partial renationalization of the 
most hopeless of the enterprises which have just been privatized. 
<H5>  Bad is the block of wood that doesn't want to be Pinnochio </H5>
  But there is, there is in the document a kernal of truth. If 
the ministry specialists will rid themselves of their attraction 
to their entrepreneur partners, who love themselves in business 
more than the state interests in them (and thank God!), and will 
chop off superfluous essences, then it is possible to cultivate 
this kernal. Here is how this agrotechnical operation looks to 
KOMMERSANT's experts. 
  First of all, about the guarantees to private investors, 
whose money will be used to finance the projects. Everything 
that is written in the document in this regard is too 
complicated. In reality the matter is much simpler. 
  Shares in a project will be bought if they are safe and 
profitable -- this is obvious. Here no state guarantees are 
needed. On the contrary, the state has already compromised 
itself as a reliable borrower and is just now beginning to win a 
decent reputation (in particular, in the GKO market). For this 
reason a far more impressive recommendation for potential 
stockholders in a project is the participation of the private 
investor who invests his own money in it. 
  From this comes the first conclusion. In each project with 
shared investment the already invested private 
capital should be clearly visible, with a minimum of 
commercial secrets and a maximum of openess. Only this condition 
will create for potential stockholders realistic prerequisites 
for return on their money. That's the logic of investing. The 
state only secondarily attracts private money. It primarily 
seeks projects on which money has already been spent, evaluates 
them according to their merit, and offers to help with money -- 
on terms advantageous to the private investor. 
  It's not bad if foreign capital participates in the project, 
or if the possibility is at least seriously discussed. In the 
Soviet mind, the capitalist will not miss out on a profit; an 
analysis of the results of check auctions confirms this 
recommendation. 
  Second conclusion. In order to make shares lucrative and 
attractive to investors, whose funds are needed by the project 
in addition to the state and private capital already invested, 
one has to work to improve these shares. It is obvious to 
everyone, however, that until the project starts to yield a 
profit, there is no reason to count on dividends. Nevertheless 
the earning potential of the securities can be ensured if the 
securities are issued as growth stock. 
  If a dividend is even paid on growth stock, it is purely 
symbolic; the profit comes as a result of the increase in price 
of the security. The point is that effective, even potential, 
investment in a real sector provides a real basis for growth. 
First, because the value of the project's assets grows in 
proportion to its development, even if not yet in operation 
(recall from our investment surveys how costly unfinished 
projects are). Second, the nearer the project is to completion, 
the nearer the time it will begin to yield a return and 
dividends. And the more clearly visible they are, the higher the 
price -- every child knows this. 
  For this reason, the role of the "agent of the government" 
which figures in the Ministry of Economics concept in reality 
comes down to one thing: it must make markets in stock issues. 
The task of such a market-maker is to price shares of stock, 
raise their price, earn on margin. The task, clearly, is 
difficult, but someone will succeed. Some ChIF, let's say, will 
succeed -- wonderful! (and it's not worth mentioning anything 
more about checking funds in this context). 
  This may be the basic scheme. It could be dressed up with 
various decorations, but the essence won't change. 
  Let us comment on one other point in the document. For some 
reason the bureaucrats of the Ministry of Economics are lately 
more holy than the Pope; one and all shy away from the growth of 
the budget deficit as from the Devil's temptation. No deficit is 
fine, but this is unrealistic. In point of fact the authors 
estimated the amount of private capital attracted, on which they 
are counting, to be one trillion rubles. But this is a drop in 
the bucket -- scarcely more than one percent of the year's 
predicted investment program. What can you do with so little 
money? 
  But the idea of shared financing is different. The trick is 
in return of capital and effectiveness of investments. If shared 
financing does this, then let the inflated money be invested by 
the state. Paris, in the end, is worth the mass. And money. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68581 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   13 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Antimonopoly Committee on Goods Certification System </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Antimonopoly Committee on Goods Certification System </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0753A Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 13 Apr 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0753A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Nikolay Podlipskiy: "Antimonopoly Committee </F>
Rises Up Against the System"] 
  [Text] Members of the Government Commission on 
Operational Matters reacted ambiguously to the view of the 
Antimonopoly Committee on the need for substantive reform of 
Russia's system of goods certification. But the State Committee 
on Antimonopoly Policy (GKAP) was not seriously counting on 
convincing all opponents right away--its aim was simply to 
acquaint First Deputy Prime Minister Oleg Soskovets with an 
alternative point of view on this problem. 
  [Begin box] Over the period 1992-1993, more than 225,000 
certificates were issued for Russian production output, 
including about 180,000 for foodstuffs. In addition, about 
108,000 certificates were issued for import production, of which 
about 100,000 were for foodstuffs. More than 2,600 product items 
failed to obtain a certificate due to lack of conformance with 
safety requirements, including 2,000 food product items. [End 
box] 
  Sergey Bezverkhiy, chairman of the Committee on 
Standardization, Metrology, and Certification, presented his 
view of the problems of the department under today's conditions. 
In his words, Russia has presently subscribed to three 
international certification systems and talks are already 
nearing conclusion on the adoption of several others 
(certification of metals, composites, and railroad 
transportation). A number of unresolved problems exists in the 
domestic system, however. These problems deal primarily with the 
poor legislative base--Russia has only six legislative acts 
"covering" this sphere, while Japan has 33, the United 
States--160, and the European Community--over 300. In addition, 
transition from the Soviet certification system to a purely 
Russian one--GOST R [State Standards--Russia]--must be 
accompanied by a simultaneous reworking of the "Soviet" 
standards. However, the committee's capabilities do not permit 
rapid improvement and perfection of 26,000 old state standards. 
  Oleg Soskovets concisely expressed his opinion of the 
report: 
"loud but incoherent." The first deputy prime minister devoted 
far greater attention to the report of the Antimonopoly 
Committee's expert who cast doubt overall upon the advisability 
of maintaining the Russian system of certification in its 
present form. In the opinion of GKAP, this system has at least 
two flaws. The first--mandatory receipt of a certificate of 
conformance with national state standards (which, incidentally, 
is a purely Russian invention)--provides no advantage to the 
Russian exporter from the practical point of view. In the West, 
the quality of Russian (Soviet) standards themselves still 
remains to be proved. Even on the domestic market, incidentally, 
the system of total certification has failed to improve the 
quality of goods. The second flaw lies in the fact that the 
Certification Committee combines commercial and control 
functions--the right to issue certificates of conformance is 
delegated only to testing centers and laboratories under the 
committee's jurisdiction. GKAP specialists presently have 
information on "deals" (between the certification company 
Rostest-Moscow and the Moscow Customs Office, for example), 
leading to the formation of a monopoly for this variety of 
service. 
  [Begin box] Russia Subscribes to the Following 
International Certification Systems: 
  --system of certification of means of road transportation 
(Geneva Convention of the European Economic Commission of the 
United Nations); 
  --system of the International Electrical Engineering 
Commission for testing electrical equipment with respect to 
conformance with safety standards (accreditation of Russian 
laboratories within this framework is scheduled for May 1994); 
  --the Brussels Convention on Reciprocal Recognition of 
Control Markings for Firearms and Ammunition (accreditation of 
Russian laboratories is scheduled for June 1994). [End box] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68582 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Documents on Demonopolization, Competition </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Documents on Demonopolization, Competition </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM1504101894 Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 14 Apr 94 
First Edition pp 4-6 </F>

<F P=103> PM1504101894 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Russian Federation Government decree "On State Program for </F>
Demonopolization of the Economy and Development of Competition 
on the Russian Federation Markets (Main Avenues and Priority 
Measures)" followed by "State Program for the Demonopolization 
of the Economy and the Development of Competition on the Russian 
Federation Markets (Main Avenues and Priority Measures)" and the 
"Statute on the Interdepartmental Commission for Competition 
Policy"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Russian Federation Government Decree No. 191 "On the State </H5>
Program for the Demonopolization of the Economy and the 
Development of Competition on the Russian Federation Markets 
(Main Avenues and Priority Measures)" 
  With a view to implementing the program of the Russian 
Federation Council of Ministers-Government for 1993-1995, "the 
development of reforms and the stabilization of the Russian 
economy" and creating the necessary legal, organizational, and 
economic conditions for the development of competition on the 
Russian Federation markets, the Russian Federation Government 
decrees: 
  1. That the attached State Program for the Demonopolization 
of the Economy and the Development of Competition on the Russian 
Federation Markets (Main Avenues and Priority Measures), 
hereinafter referred to as the State Program, be approved. 
  2. That the implementation of the State Program be assigned 
to the Russian Federation State Committee for antimonopoly 
policy and the support of new economic structures and its 
territorial administrations and the organs of executive power of 
the Russian Federation components. 
  3. That with a view to ensuring the coordination of measures 
aimed at the demonopolization of the economy and the development 
of competition on Russian Federation markets and coordinating 
the activity of ministries and other federal organs of executive 
power and the organs of executive power of the Russian 
Federation's components in implementing the State Program, an 
interdepartmental commission for competition policy. 
  That the attached Statute on the Interdepartmental 
Commission 
for Competition Policy be approved. 
  That O.N. Soskovets, first deputy chairman of the Russian 
Federation Government, be approved as chairman of the 
Interdepartmental Commission for Competition Policy and that he 
be instructed to draw up the composition of this commission 
within two weeks and submit it for approval by the Russian 
Federation Government. 
  That the organizational and technical support for the work 
of 
the Interdepartmental Commission for Competition Policy be 
assigned to the Russian State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy 
and the Support of New Economic Structures. 
  4. That the Russian Federation Ministry of the Economy in 
conjunction with the Russian Federation State Committee for 
Antimonopoly Policy and the Support of New Economic Structures 
and the Russian Federation State Committee for the 
Administration of State Property elaborate by 1 May 1994 
methodological recommendations for the short-term and long-term 
forecasting of the economic consequences of implementing, at 
sectorial and regional level, special measures aimed at 
developing competition on the Russian Federation markets. 
  5. That the Russian Federation State Committee for 
Statistics in conjunction with the Central Bank of the Russian 
Federation, the Russian Federation Ministry of Finance, the 
Russian Federation State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy and 
Support for New Economic Structures elaborate by 1 May 1994 the 
forms and procedure for statistical reporting on the development 
of competition on the Russian Federation markets. 
  6. That the organs of executive power of the components of 
the Russian Federation implement in the first quarter of 1994 
corrections to regional demonopolization programs in accordance 
with the State Program. 
  7. That the Russian Federation State Committee for 
Antimonopoly Policy and the Support of New Economic Structures 
annually submit to the Russian Federation Government a report on 
the development of competition on the Russian Federation markets. 
  8. That the Russian Federation Ministry of Finance in 
conjunction with the Russian Federation State Committee for 
Antimonopoly Policy and the Support of New Economic Structures 
examine in the first quarter of 1994 the question of finance in 
1994 for measures to create methodological normative, 
information, cadres, and technical support for the State Program 
and to carry out an expert appraisal of the projects implemented 
within its framework. 
  9. That the Russian Federation Ministry of Finance, in 
forming the drafts of the federal budget, provide for the 
necessary financial resources for the development of the State 
Program. 
  [signed] V. Chernomyrdin, chairman of the Russian Federation 
Government 
  9 March 1994, Moscow. 
<H5>  State Program for the Demonopolization of the Economy and </H5>
the Development of Competition on the Russian Federation Markets 
(Main Avenues and Priority Measures) 
<H5>  1. General Provisions </H5>
  The state program for the demonopolization of the economy 
and 
the development of competition on the Russian Federation markets 
(main avenues and priority measures), hereinafter referred to as 
the State Program, establishes the goals, priorities, and place 
of the demonopolization of the economy and the development of 
competition in the overall state policy of economic reforms, the 
stages and methods of the formation and development of a 
competitive environment, the tasks and measures to demonopolize 
the economy and develop competition at federal, sectorial, and 
regional levels, and also restrictions in this field. 
  The aim of the state policy of the demonopolization of the 
economy and the development of competition on the Russian 
Federation markets is to increase social production efficiency 
on the basis of the market regulation of economic processes. 
  The main task of the demonopolization of the economy and the 
development of competition on the Russian Federation markets in 
1994-1995 is to reduce the concentration of production and to 
create the necessary conditions for the development of 
competition on the Russian Federation markets for priority 
groups of commodities (operations and services). 
  The implementation of this task envisages: 
  --the analysis of the commodity markets which have taken 
shape and the behavior on them of enterprises and various 
associations of enterprises which are not the subjects of a 
natural monopoly; 
  --the formation of the necessary economic organizational 
prerequisites for effective competition on the Russian 
Federation markets; 
  --the establishment and maintenance of a single economic 
area 
on the territory of the Russian Federation; 
  --the creation of a system of state control and regulation 
of 
the activity of subjects of natural and state monopoly; 
  --the creation of legal and economic organizational 
conditions for activating the market mechanisms for optimizing 
commodity flows and forming prices and tariffs for socially 
important goods and services which are relegated to the sphere 
of a temporary monopoly; 
  --the consideration of the market structure when privatizing 
enterprises with a view to enhancing the competitiveness and 
effectiveness of their activity; 
  --the development of entrepreneurship. 
  The demonopolization of the economy and the development of 
competition on the Russian Federation markets are interconnected 
with financial stabilization, anti-inflation measures, and 
investment and export and import policy. The provisions of the 
State Program are used when forming other federal programs, 
including programs for the structural restructuring and 
development of the economy as a whole and of its individual 
sectors and also programs for the regions' socioeconomic 
development. 
  The direct protection of the competitive environment and 
businesses [khozyaystvuyushchiye subekty] against monopoly 
activity is effected on the basis of the Russian Federation Law 
"On Competition and the Restriction of Monopoly Activity On 
Commodity Markets" and is not the subject of this State Program. 
  The process of the formation and development of a 
competitive 
environment for markets is geared to the long term, with the 
annual specification of priorities. 
  Sectorial programs for the demonopolization of the economy 
and the development of competition are an inalienable part of 
the State Program. They include the analysis of the structure 
of commodity markets broken down by sector output and of the 
level and forms of the manifestation of sectorial monopolism, 
validated proposals for the list of subjects of a natural 
monopoly, and plans for the demonopolization of the economy and 
development of competition on the markets of temporary 
monopolies at federal level. Plans for the demonopolization of 
the economy and the development of competition on the markets of 
temporary monopolies which have geographical market borders 
inside national-state and administrative-territorial formations 
are coordinated with the organs of executive power of components 
of the Russian Federation as regards measures affecting the 
economic interests of national-state and 
administrative-territorial formations. 
  Regional programs for the demonopolization of the economy 
and 
the development of competition are included in the programs for 
the region's socioeconomic development and are an inalienable 
part of these programs. They include an analysis of the 
structure of commodity markets, validated proposals for the list 
of subjects of a natural monopoly, and plans for the 
demonopolization and development of competition on the markets 
of temporary monopolies at local level. Within regional 
programs proposals are formed for demonopolization and the 
development of competition on interregional commodity markets. 
  The process of the demonopolization of the economy and the 
development of competition on the Russian Federation markets 
stipulates a consideration of the following general requirements: 
  --orientation toward the creation of a competitive market 
and 
the protection of consumers' rights and interests; 
  --the comprehensive nature of the solution of the tasks of 
demonopolization, privatization, and the structural 
restructuring of the economy; 
  --a differentiated approach toward the targets of 
demonopolization wit a consideration for social interests and 
sectorial (product) and regional features; 
  --the interconnectedness of the solution of demonopolization 
problems and the development of competition at the federal, 
sectorial, and regional levels; 
  --a consideration of factors of the Russian economy's 
integration into the world economic system and the openness of 
commodity markets to international competition combined with 
measures to protect Russian commodity producers; 
  --the monitoring of the change in the structure of the 
market 
and the compliance of the program implementation mechanism for 
demonopolization and the development of competition with its 
structure; 
  --the ensuring of publicity for the measures which are 
implemented and for their results. 
  Temporary monopolies which have arisen as a result of the 
use 
of inventions and the introduction of patents and equipment 
produced under license are not subject to demonopolization for 
five years as of the moment the license or patent is acquired or 
the invention is registered. 
  The State Program does not include among demonopolization 
measures the establishment of state control and the regulation 
of prices for temporary monopolies. When high (or low) monopoly 
prices are set, the suppression of this abuse is in accordance 
with article 5 of the Russian Federation Law "On Competition and 
the Restriction of Monopoly Activity on Commodity Markets." 
  For the purposes of the State Program the following concepts 
are used: 
  --commodity market -- the market for each commodity, type of 
operation or service (hereinafter referred to as commodity) or 
for each group of interchangeable commodities; 
  --interchangeable commodities -- commodities which are close 
to each other in terms of consumer properties and satisfy 
basically the same needs; 
  --the market's commodity borders -- the selection (list) of 
goods which are interchangeable or satisfy a specific need; 
  --geographical borders of the market -- the sphere of 
circulation of a commodity and its substitutes, defined on the 
basis of the economic opportunities of consumers for acquiring 
the commodity on the relevant territories and the lack of such 
opportunities outside the territories' borders (by relevant 
territories, together with national-state and 
administrative-territorial formations is also understood groups 
of population centers or other territories within the borders of 
these formations); 
  --demonopolization -- the reduction of the concentration of 
the production of goods and the creation of the necessary 
conditions for the development of competition on commodity 
markets; 
  --natural monopoly -- a monopoly whereby the creation of a 
competitive environment on the commodity market (including 
through the import of output onto a given market) irrespective 
of the level of demand is impossible or economically ineffective 
given the existing level of scientific and technical progress; 
  --state monopoly -- a monopoly created in accordance with 
Russian Federation legislation defining the commodity borders of 
the monopoly market, the subject of the monopoly (monopolist), 
the forms of control and regulation of his activity, and the 
competence of the contrloling organ; 
  --temporary monopoly -- a monopoly under the conditions of 
the temporary absence of competition; 
  --group of enterprises -- amalgam of businesses having 
relations based on direct or indirect property control of one 
business over one other (or other) businesses through the 
possession of a controlling block of shares (holdings, stakes) 
in the incorporation capital or by exerting decisive influence 
by other means on the decisions which are made. With regard to 
the aims of demonopolization a group of enterprises is seen as a 
single business. 
<H5>  2. Priorities of Policy of Demonopolization of the Economy </H5>
and Development of Competition on the Russian Federation Markets 
for 1994-1995 
  The following priority avenues for the policy of the 
demonopolization of the economy and the development of 
competition on the Russian Federation markets are defined for 
the immediate future: 
  --the creation of a legal normative and organizational basis 
for state control and regulation of the activity of the subjects 
of natural and state monopolies; 
  --the implementation of priority measures to demonopolize 
economic complexes: the trade, construction, communications, 
transport and road (except for railroad), and machine building 
complexes; 
  --the implementation of state control over the progress of 
the privatization of state and municipal enterprises with a view 
to observing antimonopoly requirements and preventing the 
creation of new monopoly structures which are not natural 
monopolies; 
  --the elimination of economic and administrative barriers 
for 
the free movement of commodities, services, and capital on the 
Russian Federation markets; 
  --the reduction of financial and economic, organizational, 
and legal barriers to the entry of new competitive structures 
onto the market (footnote), (by financial and economic, 
organizational, and legal barriers is meant the usually 
non-returnable expenditure when organizing and carrying out 
production, various restrictions when investing in projects and 
providing credits, leasing premises, making use of land, and 
gaining access to sources of raw material, technologies, sales 
markets, and commercial information); 
  --the propaganda of the policy of the demonopolization of 
the 
economy and the development of competition on the Russian 
Federation markets and the training of cadres for the 
implementation of antimonopoly legislation and the 
demonopolization of various spheres of the economy. 
<H5>  3. Policy of demonopolization of the economy and </H5>
development of competition on the Russian Federation markets 
under the conditions of integration processes in industry 
  The Russian Federation law "On Competition and the 
Restriction of Monopoly Activity On Commodity Markets" 
stipulates the absence of opposition to structures which 
dominate the Russian market if: 
  --their activity is economically justified, accords with 
consumers' interests, and does not lead to the narrowing of the 
market's competitive environment; 
  --they do not abuse their dominant position on the Russian 
market and do not allow monopolist actions, defined by articles 
of the Russian Federation law "on competition and the 
restriction of monopoly activity on commodity markets." 
  That is why, when determining the expediency of creating 
industrial or financial and industrial groups operating on 
Russian markets, there must be a consideration of the predicted 
likely impact of a group's activity on the state of competition. 
  Here it is essential to observe the following conditions: 
  --to avoid abuse of a dominant position large industrial or 
financial and industrial groups are not allowed to acquire 
monopoly influence on local commodity markets or to restrict 
access to them to other businesses, including foreign subjects; 
  --an industrial or financial and industrial group must not 
include supplying firms or consuming firms if they occupy a 
dominant position on the relevant markets; 
  --when creating industrial or financial and industrial 
groups 
on the basis of the principles of export cartels, firms which 
are competitors on a particular commodity market should not 
unite if the inclusion of these firms in the group will lead to 
the substantial complication or restriction of competition on 
the domestic market. 
<H5>  4. Organizational and Cadres' Backup for the State Program </H5>
for the Demonopolization of the Economy and the Development of 
Competition on the Russian Federation Markets. 
  The implementation of measures to demonopolize the economy 
and develop competition on the Russian Federation markets 
provides for the creation of the relevant organizational 
mechanism for implementing the State Program. 
  The implementation of the State Program is assigned to the 
Russian Federation State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy and 
the Support of New Economic Structures and its territorial 
administrations and organs of executive power of the components 
of the Russian Federation. 
  The coordination of the actions of ministries and other 
federal organs of executive power and the organs of executive 
power of components of the Russian Federation in implementing 
the State Program is implemented by the interdepartmental 
commission for competition policy. 
  Regional commissions for competition policy can be created 
at 
regional level by a decision of the organs of executive power of 
components of the Russian Federation. 
  To ensure the implementation of the State Program it is 
essential to implement measures to form a positive public 
opinion of problems of the demonopolization of the economy and 
the development of competition on the Russian Federation markets 
and of the work of the organs assigned the implementation of the 
State Program. 
  Propaganda support for the State Program envisages: 
  --the holding of regular consultations between antimonopoly 
organs and societies for the protection of consumers' rights, 
unions of entrepreneurs and industrialists, trade unions, and 
other public organizations; 
  --acquainting representatives of ministries and other 
federal 
organs of executive power and organs of executive power of 
components of the Russian Federation, businesses, entrepreneurs, 
trade unions, and the population with the State Program and 
antimonopoly legislation; 
  --disseminating in the mass media items on questions of the 
demonopolization of the economy and the development of 
competition on the Russian Federation markets. 
  The training and retraining of cadres in the field of 
demonopolization envisages: 
  --the study of the need for cadres and the development of 
training programs for avenues of demonopolization of the economy 
and the development of competition on the Russian Federation 
markets; 
  --the preparation of complete sets of training and 
methodological manuals, the translation and adaption of foreign 
materials on questions of the demonopolization of the economy 
and the development of competition on the Russian Federation 
markets; 
  --the organization of training, retraining, and the 
improvement of qualifications for workers in the organs assigned 
the implementation of the State Program; 
  --the formation and development of the relevant centers for 
training cadres and the organization on their basis of a 
consultative service for questions of the demonopolization of 
the economy and the development of competition on the Russian 
Federation markets. 
<H5>  5. Information and Technical Backup for the State Program </H5>
for the Demonopolization of the Economy and the Development of 
Competition on the Russian Federation Markets 
  Antimonopoly regulation, demonopolization, and the 
development of competition on the Russian Federation markets 
require information on the level of monopolization of markets 
and the monopoly actions of businesses on them. 
  To this end an information and reference system should be 
created for antimonopoly regulation and the demonopolization of 
the economy and development of competition on the Russian 
Federation markets. 
  To implement this task it is necessary: 
  --to put in order the Russian State Committee for 
Statistics' 
existing system of statistical reporting with a view to ensuring 
the comprehensive provision of information on the reforming of 
the economy, expanding the use of selective methods of 
collecting information about businesses of all organizational 
and legal forms of ownership operating on commodity markets, and 
determining the procedure for obtaining information on the 
activity of businesses on commodity markets and the transmission 
of this information to the organs assigned the implementation of 
the State Program; 
  --to integrate the information resources of ministries, 
other 
federal organs of executive power, and the organs of executive 
power of the components of the Russian Federation, to simplify 
information exchange procedures, to organize the collaboration 
of organs assigned the implementation of the State Program with 
the organizations holding the relevant information, and to 
ensure the use of existing data bases and banks and the creation 
of new ones to analyze quantitative and qualitative indicators 
of the commodity markets; 
  --to create software for the proposed information and 
reference system and automated work stations for the solution of 
tasks and the implementation of plans for demonopolization and 
the development of competition on the Russian Federation markets. 
<H5>  6. Financial Support for the State Program for the </H5>
Demonopolization of the Economy and the Development of 
Competition on the Russian Federation Markets 
  The sources of finance for measures and work to implement 
the 
State Program and to elaborate, amend, and implement the 
sectorial and regional programs for demonopolization and the 
development of competition which are being implemented within 
the framework of the State Program are the funds of the federal 
budget and the budgets of national-state and 
administrative-territorial formations of the Russian Federation 
and also the funds received from the privatization of state and 
municipal property and the relevant extrabudgetary funds and 
voluntary contributions from enterprises, institutions, and 
organizations. 
  Here measures and operations for the information backup for 
the implementation of the state program, for the conducting of 
the relevant targeted research, the preparation of legislative 
acts and methodological norm materials, the organizational and 
technical backup for the organs assigned the implementation of 
the State program, the training of the relevant specialists, and 
the monitoring of the progress of implementation, are financed 
predominantly through federal budget funds allocated directly to 
the Russian Federation state committee for antimonopoly policy 
and the support of new economic structures. 
  The financing of measures and work to elaborate, amend, and 
implement regional programs for the demonopolization of the 
economy and the development of competition is through the 
budgets of the relevant components of the Russian Federation and 
the money received from the privatization of state and municipal 
property. 
  The financing of the elaboration, amendment, and 
implementation of sectorial programs for demonopolization and 
the development of competition is mostly through the relevant 
extrabudget funds and voluntary donations from enterprises, 
institutions, and organizations. 
  The diversification and deamalgamation of enterprises, 
institutions, and organizations with a view to creating 
competing structures are implemented and financed as a rule 
within the framework of programs for the structural 
restructuring of the economy and conversion. 
  Tax benefits stipulated by legislation can be used to 
encourage initiative-driven deamalgamation of businesses. 
  Specific shape to the provisions of the State Program set 
out 
in sections 1-6, the most important work and measures to 
implement it, and the basic tasks of the demonopolization of the 
economy and the development of competition on the Russian 
Federation markets and also general methods of resolving these 
tasks are given in appendices 1-5 of the State Program. 
<H5>  Appendix No. 1. Amalgamated Structure of the Information </H5>
and Reference System of Antimonopoly Regulation, 
Demonopolization of the Economy, and Development of Competition 
on the Russian Federation Markets 
  [Following information is presented in tabular form in 
original; numbered subtitles below refer to "subsystems"; 
information is presented in three columns headed "Basic 
functions, tasks"; "Types of information"; and "Sources of 
information according to type"; these are indicated in text 
below as "Function," "Information," and "Sources of information" 
respectively] 
  1. Regulation and Management at Federal Level 
  [Function] Determining the structure and powers of federal 
organs of executive power. 
  [Information] Legislative and other statutory acts of 
federal organs of executive power. Functions, rights, and 
responsibility of ministries and other federal organs of 
executive power. 
  [Sources of information] Federal Government Communications 
and Information Agency's GUIR [not further identified]; 
information services of ministries and other federal organs of 
executive power. 
  [Function] Determining the structure of state ownership. 
  [Information] Program principles and practice of 
implementation of privatization; proportion of state ownership. 
  [Sources of information] Russian Goskomimushchestvo [State 
Committee for the Management of State Property]. 
  [Function] Support for enterprise and the development of 
competition on Russian Federation commodity markets. 
  [Information] Volume, forms, and terms of financial support 
for enterprise and the development of competition. 
  [Sources of information] Russian Ministry of Finance, 
Russian Ministry of the Economy, Russian State Committee for 
Antimonopoly Policy and Support of the New Economic Structures. 
  [Function] Price regulation. 
  [Information] Setting of prices for products bought into 
federal, reserve, and special stocks. Regulation of prices for 
the products of subjects of natural monopolies. 
  [Sources of information] Russian Ministry of the Economy, 
Russian Ministry of Finance, organs of regulation of the 
activity of natural monopolies. 
  [Function] State regulation of commodity and financial 
markets. 
  [Information] Information on export and import concessions, 
quotas, licenses, customs duties and rules, subsidies, 
subventions, and the financing of the activity of enterprises 
and development projects and programs from the federal budget. 
Volume and recipients of credit support, terms for the issuing 
of credits, bank interest rates. Data on the licensing of 
individual types of activity and on the taxation system. Volume 
of deliveries of products for state needs, regulation of 
channels of sale. 
  [Sources of information] Russian Ministry of the Economy, 
Russian Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations, Russian State 
Customs Committee, Russian Ministry of Finance, Bank of Russia, 
Russian State Tax Service. 
  2. Structure of Internal Markets 
  [Function] Defining groups of interchangeable products. 
  [Information] Classifications of types of activity, 
products, and services; expert assessments. 
  [Sources of information] Russian Federation Committee for 
Standardization, Metrology, and Certification, Russian State 
Committee for Statistics, the information and sociological 
services of ministries and other federal organs of executive 
power. 
  [Function] Identifying businesses which compete with one 
another. Defining the boundaries and capacity of commodity 
markets. Calculating the businesses' share of commodity markets. 
  [Information] Volume of production and deliveries of groups 
of interchangeable products by businesses. Volume of imports 
and exports of products to the territory of the Russian 
Federation and its regions. Dynamics of prime cost, ex-factory 
prices, and end prices of products. Dynamics of inflationary 
processes. Population's effective demand. Degree of 
satisfaction of public need for products. 
  [Sources of information] Russian State Committee for 
Statistics, Russian Federation Committee for Trade, Russian 
State Customs Committee, information services of organs of 
executive power of Russian Federation components, Russian 
Ministry of the Economy, Russian Ministry of Finance. 
  3. Activity of Groups of Businesses on Internal Markets 
  [Function] Identifying a list of groups of businesses and 
the composition of each group with reference to the market on 
which they are active. Calculating the market share of the 
group of businesses. Identifying forms and indicators relating 
to the merging of businesses within the group. Evaluating forms 
and indicators relating to anticompetitive activity by groups of 
businesses. 
  [Information] Management structure of the sector (subsector) 
and main indicators of the economic activity of businesses 
belonging to it; register of financial and industrial groups. 
Volume of production and deliveries to the market of the 
products of businesses belonging to the group. Founding 
documents of businesses belonging to the group. Instances of 
anticompetitive behavior on the market by businesses belonging 
to the group or by the group as a whole. 
  [Sources of information] Russian Ministry of the Economy, 
Russian State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy and Support of 
the New Economic Structures, Russian State Committee for 
Statistics, information services of ministries and other federal 
organs of executive power, businesses, registration services of 
local organs of power, courts of arbitration. 
  4. Economic Situation on Commodity Markets Subject to 
Demonopolization 
  [Function] Identifying businesses operating as suppliers on 
the commodity market and indicators relating to their activity. 
  [Information] Volume of production and delivery of products 
by businesses operating as suppliers on the commodity market. 
  [Sources of information] Russian State Committee for 
Statistics, information services of federal organs of executive 
power and organs of executive power of the Russian Federation 
components, businesses. 
  [Function] Identifying businesses operating as purchasers 
(or citizens as consumers) on the commodity market, their need 
for products and ability to pay. 
  [Information] Volume of purchases and consumption of 
products by businesses operating as purchasers (or citizens as 
consumers) on the commodity market. Degree of satisfaction of 
need and demand. 
  [Sources of information] Russian State Committee for 
Statistics, Russian Federation Committee for Trade, commodity 
exchanges, trading establishments. 
  [Function] Comparative analysis of prices for similar 
products on different geographical markets. 
  [Information] Dynamics of prices for products on 
geographical markets. 
  [Sources of information] Russian State Committee for 
Statistics, Russian Ministry of the Economy, Russian Ministry of 
Finance. 
  5. Financial Market 
  [Function] Monitoring of the formation of financial and 
industrial groups. Monitoring of packages of stocks and shares 
acquired and share of participation in incorporation capital of 
businesses. 
  [Information] Share represented by banks and other financial 
entities among the body of founders of financial and industrial 
groups. Share represented by businesses among the body of 
founders of financial and industrial groups. Information on the 
acquisition of stocks, shares, and share in incorporation 
capital of businesses by legal entities, individuals, and 
financial entities. Information on the activity of commercial 
banks, stock exchanges, investment funds, check auctions, and 
agents on the insurance market. 
  [Sources of information] Russian Goskomimushchestvo, Russian 
Ministry of Finance, Russian State Committee for Antimonopoly 
Policy and Support of the New Economic Structures, stock 
exchanges' interexchange information structures, investment 
funds, Bank of Russia, Russian State Committee for Statistics, 
registration services of local organs of power, check auctions, 
insurance companies. 
  6. Development of Enterprise 
  [Function] Monitoring of the activity of small enterprises. 
Observation of the activity of enterprise support funds. 
Support for small business infrastructure. Development of 
educational base for the training of entrepreneurs. 
  [Information] Number of small enterprises by sector, number 
of people employed at enterprises, their average wage. Volume 
of products produced by small enterprises and their share of the 
total production volume. List of enterprise support funds, 
volume, forms, and terms of financial support for small 
business, sources of funds, areas of their utilization. List 
and schedule for fulfillment of regional programs being 
implemented with the use of resources from enterprise support 
funds. Information on small business infrastructure and the 
activity of educational structures training entrepreneurial 
cadres. 
  [Sources of information] Russian State Committee for 
Statistics, Russian Ministry of the Economy, Russian Ministry of 
Finance, Russian State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy and 
Support of the New Economic Structures, information services of 
organs of executive power of Russian Federation components. 
<H5>  Appendix No. 2. Plan of Measures for the Implementation of </H5>
the Aims and Tasks of Demonopolization of the Economy and 
Development of Competition on the Russian Federation Markets in 
1994-1995 
  [Following information is presented in tabular form in 
original, with three columns headed "Content and area of 
operations," "Date set for implementation," and "Body 
responsible for execution or drafting"; these are indicated in 
text below as "Content," "Date," and "Body responsible" 
respectively] 
  1. [Content] Formulation of legal support for operations in 
the demonopolization of the economy and the development of 
competition on Russian Federation markets. 
  1.1. [Content] Draft law "On Monopolies," defining the 
procedure for state monitoring and regulation of subjects of 
natural and other types of monopolies at federal and local level. 
  [Date] March 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian State Committee for Antimonopoly 
Policy and Support of the New Economic Structures, Russian 
Center for Privatization, Russian Ministry of the Economy, 
Russian Goskomimushchestvo, RTsER [not further identified], 
Russian State Committee for Industrial Policy, Russian State 
Committee for the Defense Sectors of Industry, Russian Ministry 
of Fuel and Energy. 
  1.2. [Content] Draft law "On Organized Commodity Markets," 
defining the legal bases of trade brokerage and the procedure 
for trading in the form of auctions, fairs, and tender deals, as 
well as trade on exchanges. 
  [Date] December 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian State Committee for Antimonopoly 
Policy and Support of the New Economic Structures, Russian 
Ministry of the Economy, RTsER, interested ministries and 
departments. 
  1.3. [Content] Draft law "On Mergers and the Concentration 
of Production and Capital," defining the levels of concentration 
of production and capital achieved through mergers which are 
subject to control, as well as a system of antimonopoly bans 
with a view to preventing monopolization of markets. 
  [Date] June 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian State Committee for Antimonopoly 
Policy and Support of the New Economic Structures, Russian 
Center for Privatization, Russian State Committee for Industrial 
Policy, Russian State Committee for the Defense Sectors of 
Industry, interested ministries and departments. 
  1.4. [Content] Draft law on amendments and additions to the 
RSFSR Law "On Foreign Investments in the RSFSR," reflecting the 
change in Russia's state status and system of state power and 
widening legal guarantees of the protection of foreign 
investments with a view to developing a competitive environment 
in Russia's internal market. 
  [Date] April 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian Ministry of Foreign Economic 
Relations, RTsER, Russian Ministry of the Economy, Russian 
Ministry of Fuel and Energy, Russian State Committee for the 
Defense Sectors of Industry, Russian State Committee for 
Antimonopoly Policy and Support of the New Economic Structures, 
Russian Ministry of Finance. 
  1.5. [Content] Draft law "On Concessions," defining the 
terms and procedure for their creation on Russian Federation 
territory with a view to developing the economy and the 
competitive market environment. 
  [Date] April 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian Ministry of the Economy, Russian 
Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations, RTsER, Russian State 
Committee for Industrial Policy, Russian Ministry of Fuel and 
Energy, Russian State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy and 
Support of the New Economic Structures. 
  1.6. [Content] Draft law "On Amendments and Additions to 
Russian Federation Legislation on Taxation," with a view to 
stimulating processes of demonopolization of the Russian 
Federation economy and the development of competition on 
commodity markets. 
  [Date] March 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian Ministry of Finance, Russian 
State Tax Service, Russian Ministry of the Economy, Russian 
State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy and Support of the New 
Economic Structures, interested ministries and departments. 
  2. [Content] Adjustments to programs for demonopolization 
and the development of competition on the markets for the output 
of economic complexes in line with the provisions of the State 
Program for Demonopolization of the Economy and the Development 
of Competition on the Russian Federation Markets (Basic 
Guidelines and Priority Measures). 
  2.1. [Content] Trade. 
  [Date] April 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian Federation Committee for Trade, 
Russian State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy and Support of 
the New Economic Structures, Russian Goskomimushchestvo, Russian 
Ministry of Finance, Russian Federation Committee for 
Standardization, Metrology, and Certification, Russian Ministry 
of Agriculture and Food, Russian Ministry of Foreign Economic 
Relations, Russian State Committee for Statistics. 
  2.2. [Content] Transport and roads economic complex. 
  [Date] April 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian Ministry of Transport (Department 
of Air Transport, Department of Maritime Transport, Department 
of River Transport, Department of Motor Vehicle Transport, 
Federal Roads Department), Russian Goskomimushchestvo, Russian 
State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy and Support of the New 
Economic Structures, aviation transport enterprises. 
  2.3. [Content] Construction economic complex. 
  [Date] April 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian State Committee for Construction, 
Russian Ministry of the Economy, Russian State Committee for 
Statistics, Russian Goskomimushchestvo, Russian State Committee 
for Antimonopoly Policy and Support of the New Economic 
Structures. 
  2.4. [Content] "Communications" economic complex. 
  [Date] April 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian Ministry of Communications, 
Russian Ministry of the Economy, Russian State Committee for the 
Defense Sectors of Industry, Russian Goskomimushchestvo, Russian 
State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy and Support of the New 
Economic Structures. 
  3. [Content] Formulation of programs for demonopolization 
of the economy and the development of competition in sectors not 
defined as priority avenues of the policy for demonopolization 
of the economy and the development of competition on Russian 
Federation markets in 1994-1995. 
  [Date] In accordance with existing statutory acts. 
  [Body responsible] Russian State Committee for Industrial 
Policy, Russian Ministry of Railways, Russian Ministry of 
Agriculture and Food, Russian Ministry of Fuel and Energy, 
Russian State Committee for the Defense Sectors of Industry, 
Russian Federation Committee for Geology and the Use of Natural 
Resources, Russian Federation Committee for Machine Building, 
Russian Federation Committee for Metallurgy, Russian Federation 
Committee for Water Resources, Russian Federation Committee for 
Fishing, Russian Federation Committee for the Chemical and 
Petrochemical Industry, Russian Federal Forestry Service, 
Russian Federation Committee for the Distribution of Printed 
Materials, Russian FSTR [not further identfied], Russian KMFT 
[not further identified], Russian Ministry of Health and Medical 
Industry, Russian Ministry of Culture, Russian State Committee 
for Antimonopoly Policy and Support of the New Economic 
Structures. 
  4. [Content] Formulation of a program for demonopolization 
of foreign trade associations and creation of a system of equal 
access to foreign markets for exporting enterprises with a view 
to increasing the effectiveness of exports. 
  [Date] April 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian Ministry of Foreign Economic 
Relations, interested ministries and departments, Russian State 
Committee for Antimonopoly Policy and Support of the New 
Economic Structures. 
  5. [Content] Formulation of a program for demonopolization 
of the credit and finance sphere. 
  [Date] April 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Bank of Russia, Russian Ministry of 
Finance, Commission for Securities and Stock Exchanges Under the 
Russian Federation President, Russian State Committee for 
Antimonopoly Policy and Support of the New Economic Structures, 
Russian Ministry of the Economy. 
  6. [Content] Formulation of regional programs for 
demonopolization of the economy and the development of 
competition in accordance with the provisions of the State 
Program and systems of information support for local commodity 
markets. 
  [Date] April 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Organs of executive power of the Russian 
Federation components, territorial administrations of the 
Russian State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy and Support of 
the New Economic Structures. 
  7. [Content] Expert study of draft federal, sector, and 
regional programs for the structural restructuring of the 
economy, including programs for the dismantling of state 
ownership, privatization, demonopolization, and the development 
of competition. 
  [Date] Continuously. 
  [Body responsible] Interdepartmental Commission on 
Competition Policy, Russian State Committee for Antimonopoly 
Policy and Support of the New Economic Structures and its 
territorial organs. 
  8. [Content] Implementation of measures to break up 
associations, concerns, and other formations which are hampering 
the development of competition on the federal commodity market. 
  [Date] 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian State Committee for Antimonopoly 
Policy and Support of the New Economic Structures and its 
territorial organs, organs of executive power of the Russian 
Federation components, ministries and departments. 
  9. [Content] Implementation of measures aimed at the 
demonopolization of the economy and the development of 
competition within the framework of sector and regional programs. 
  [Date] In accordance with plans and work schedules. 
  [Body responsible] Russian State Committee for Antimonopoly 
Policy and Support of the New Economic Structures and its 
territorial organs, local organs of executive power, ministries 
and departments. 
  10. [Content] Development of enterprise. 
  [Date] Continuously. 
  [Body responsible] Russian Ministry of the Economy, Russian 
State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy and Support of the New 
Economic Structures, ministries and departments. 
  11. [Content] Organizational and cadre support for the 
State Program. 
  [Date] Continuously. 
  [Body responsible not stated] 
  11.1. [Content] Preparation of programs for specialized 
training courses in antimonopoly policy, demonopolization of the 
economy, and the development of competition, for use as a basis 
at various levels of the system of education and retraining of 
cadres. 
  [Date] 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian Ministry of Education, Russian 
State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy and Support of the New 
Economic Structures, ministries and departments. 
  11.2. [Content] Presentation of scientific study, 
information, and educational programs on radio and television, 
preparation of a series of articles in the periodical press and 
pamphlets on problems of demonopolization of the economy and the 
development of competition. 
  [Date] Continuously. 
  [Body responsible] Russian State Committee for Antimonopoly 
Policy and Support of the New Economic Structures, Russian 
Federation Committee for the Distribution of Printed Materials, 
Russian FSTR, ministries and departments. 
  12. [Content] Information and technical support for the 
State Program. 
  12.1. [Content] Formulation of a technical plan for the 
creation of an integrated state information system for 
observation, monitoring, and regulation of commodity markets at 
federal and regional levels. 
  [Date] April 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian State Committee for Statistics, 
Russian Ministry of the Economy, Russian State Committee for 
Antimonopoly Policy and Support of the New Economic Structures, 
Russian Goskomimushchestvo, Russian State Committee for 
Standardization, Metrology, and Certification, Russian 
Federation Committee for Trade, Russian Ministry of Finance, 
interested ministries and departments. 
  12.2. [Content] Introduction of the integrated state 
information system for observation, monitoring, and regulation 
of commodity markets at federal and regional levels. 
  [Date] 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian State Committee for Statistics, 
Russian Ministry of the Economy, Russian State Committee for 
Antimonopoly Policy and Support of the New Economic Structures, 
Russian Goskomimushchestvo, Russian State Committee for 
Standardization, Metrology, and Certification, Russian 
Federation Committee for Trade, Russian Ministry of Finance, 
interested ministries and departments. 
  12.3. [Content] Formulation of a technical plan for an 
integrated state information system for observation, monitoring, 
and regulation of financial markets at federal and regional 
levels. 
  [Date] April 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian Ministry of Finance, Bank of 
Russia, Russian State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy and 
Support of the New Economic Structures, interested ministries 
and departments. 
  13. [Content] Introduction of the integrated state 
information system for observation, monitoring, and regulation 
of financial markets at federal and regional levels. 
  [Date] 1994. 
  [Body responsible] Russian Ministry of Finance, Bank of 
Russia, Russian Ministry of the Economy, Russian State Committee 
for Antimonopoly Policy and Support of the New Economic 
Structures, interested ministries and departments. [numbering 
of items 12.3 and 13 as published] 
  14. [Content] Monitoring of the course of implementation of 
the State Program. 
  [Date] Continuously. 
  [Body responsible] Interdepartmental Commission for 
Competition Policy, Russian State Committee for Antimonopoly 
Policy and Support of the New Economic Structures and its 
territorial organs, organs of executive power of Russian 
Federation components. 
<H5>  Appendix No. 3. Standard List of Tasks for the </H5>
Demonopolization and Development of Competition on the Commodity 
Market with a Stable Structure 
  The standard list of tasks for the demonopolization and 
development of competition on the commodity market with a stable 
structure is used to form sectorial and regional programs for 
the demonopolization of the economy and the development of 
competition. It is based on an analysis of the relevant market 
and the provisions of the State Program for the demonopolization 
of the economy and the development of competition on the Russian 
Federation markets and proceeds from the goal of creating 
conditions for the development of competition on a specific 
commodity market. 
  I. General Signs of the Presence of a Competitive 
Environment on the Commodity Market 
  1. There should be operating on the market suppliers -- 
independent in property and organizational terms -- of goods in 
a quantity sufficient for the emergence of competition between 
them. The independent suppliers of a commodity under review can 
be independent producers of this commodity or sellers of a 
commodity from independent producers, or independent sellers of 
the commodity of one producer on condition that there is no 
vertical agreement between suppliers and producers restricting 
the freedom to set prices and delivery volumes. The quantity of 
suppliers on the market sufficient to create a competitive 
environment depends on the form of commodity, the nature of 
consumption, and the level of demand. That is why the task of 
creating a competitive environment for each commodity requires 
its own special implementation mechanism. 
  2. There should be operating on the market purchasers -- 
independent in property and organizational terms -- of 
commodities in a quantity sufficient for competition between 
them and for the formation of a certain level of effective 
demand. Independent purchasers can be the final consumers of a 
particular commodity or middlemen in its sale. To implement the 
real independence of middlemen it is essential that they supply 
their commodity to consumers who are independent in property and 
organizational terms. The number of purchasers on the market 
sufficient to create an independent environment depends on the 
type of commodity, the nature of its consumption, and the level 
of demand. 
  3. To ensure effective competition on the market under 
review, the economic dimensions of enterprises should be 
comparable (footnote) (the economic dimensions of enterprises 
competing on the market depend on production expenditure, the 
level of demand, and the market's geographical and commodity 
borders and as a rule are measured by the annual turnover of 
capital and volumes of production or deliveries). 
  4. The market's competitive environment is maintained by the 
lack of economic and other obstacles in access to raw and 
semifinished materials, subassemblies, capital, manpower 
resources, technologies, and information backup for market 
relations and of barriers to entering the market in the form of 
territorial, legal, property, and other economic restrictions. 
  5. A competitive market is characterized by the independent 
economic behavior of suppliers and consumers (the lack of deals 
and horizontal agreements). 
  II. Requirements for Indicators Characterizing the Economic 
Situation on a Competitive Commodity Market. (These requirements 
determine guidelines in the process of making decisions on 
demonopolization and in the choice of methods for demonopolizing 
markets with a stable structure. Specific markets dictate their 
own individual conditions for the development of competition.) 
  6. The total number of suppliers of output to a given 
commodity market should meet the requirements of competition. 
The minimum necessary number of suppliers for the creation of a 
competitive environment can be set by proceeding from the 
specifications of the output, the size of the market, and other 
indicators. If the actual number of suppliers on the market is 
less than standard, measures to demonopolize it should include 
an increase in the number of suppliers. 
  7. All suppliers of output to a given commodity market with 
a view to effective competition and to avoid abuses of a 
dominant position must to a certain extent be comparable in 
terms of volumes of deliveries to a given commodity market in 
physical terms. This requirement does not apply to markets in 
the period of the alteration of their structure, for instance 
thanks to the expansion of the volume of deliveries or to 
deliveries of new output as a result of the improvement of the 
organization and (or) technology of production. 
  III. Standard List of Tasks for Demonopolization and the 
Development of Competition on the Commodity Market 
  8. The standard list of tasks for demonopolization and the 
development of competition on the commodity market includes: 
  a) the formation of proposals for the composition of natural 
monopolies with a consideration for the possibility and economic 
effectiveness of creating a competitive environment on the 
commodity market under review, including through the import of 
output. The inclusion of natural monopolies in the system of 
observation, control, and regulation of activity on a 
legislative basis; 
  b) the definition of commodity priorities and stages of 
demonopolization and the development of competition on commodity 
markets of temporary monopolies at federal and regional levels 
on the basis of an analysis of the volumes and structure of 
output consumption and the distribution of levels (groups) of 
consumption of output according to degree of priority; 
  c) the determination of the geographical borders of 
commodity 
markets categorized as commodity priorities in the relevant 
stage of demonopolization and the development of competition; 
  d) the assessment of the actual structure of the commodity 
market and the indicators characterizing the economic situation 
on the commodity markets which have been hived off and their 
recording as standard markets. This work is performed with the 
aid of the information and reference system for antimonopoly 
regulation, the demonopolization of the economy, and the 
development of competition on the commodity market. The actual 
structure of the commodity market and the indicators 
characterizing the economic situation on it are to be published 
regularly. On the basis of the results of an analysis of the 
actual structure of the commodity market and the economic 
situation on this market the standard number of suppliers on the 
market under review is selected and a decision is made on the 
sufficient number of suppliers of output to a given commodity 
market or on the need to increase them. A business which has 
undergone registration at the relevant organ of executive power 
or which has a license to supply output to the commodity market 
under review can be described as a supplier of output to a given 
commodity market provided that the business' property is not 
controlled by another business supplying output to this market. 
Otherwise both businesses must be regarded as a single supplier. 
A decision is also made on the absence or presence of the 
domination of businesses on the commodity market under review 
and the need (or absence of need) to take steps to change the 
structure of this market; 
  e) the formation of a list of subtasks for the stage of 
demonopolization of a given regional or federal commodity market 
whose composition and content are determined by the need to 
encourage the transformation of these markets' monopoly 
structure into a competitive structure; 
  f) the elaboration of measures for demonopolization and the 
development of competition on the commodity markets which have 
been hived off, which must be synchronized and can include 
successively: 
  --an increase in the number of suppliers and the volume of 
output deliveries through the import of output from abroad or 
from other regions; 
  --the lowering of barriers to entry onto the market; 
  --the abolition of interregional barriers to commodity 
exchange; 
  --the privatization and hiving off of independent 
enterprises 
from their associations; 
  --the creation of corporate bodies on the basis of 
structural 
subdivisions of existing enterprises on condition that the main 
production is preserved and there is a demand for this output; 
  --the development of entrepreneurship and the creation of 
small enterprises to saturate the market with these enterprises' 
finished output or to create a competitive environment for the 
repartitioning of technologies; 
  --the inclusion of the output of monopoly enterprises in 
market systems for its sale on competitive markets, including 
foreign markets; 
  --the sale of output through the organization of marts and 
auctions; 
  --the extensive provision of information for purchasers on 
prices for commodities in other regions. 
<H5>  Appendix No. 4. General Methods of Increasing the Number of </H5>
Suppliers on the Commodity Market 
  [The following material is published in the form of a 
two-column table, with the left column headed "General Methods 
of Increasing the Number of Suppliers on the Commodity Market" 
and the right column headed "Conditions in Which the General 
Methods of Increasing the Number of Suppliers on the Commodity 
Market Can Be Applied"; these are indicated in text below as 
"General methods" and "Conditions"] 
  [General methods] 1. Importing interchangeable goods from 
neighboring regions or nearby foreign countries and those 
further afield 
  [Conditions] When there is a shortage or when there is high 
demand and insufficient competition on the domestic market 
  When there are low customs barriers to the import of goods 
  When there is the normative-legal, economic, and 
informational backup for imports 
  [General methods] 2. Hiving off independent businesses from 
associations of enterprises producing interchangeable products 
  [Conditions] Given the possibility of the technological, 
organizational, and (or) territorial splitting up of the 
enterprises 
  When it is possible to demarcate enterprises' spheres of 
activity within the framework of commodity specialization 
  Given normative-legal, economic, and informational backup 
for 
access to resources, including credits, and markets 
  [General methods] 3. Hiving off independent businesses from 
associations of enterprises producing non-interchangeable 
products and hiving off individual sections or shops on the 
initiative of the labor collective during the privatization 
process or by means of the compulsory splitting up of businesses 
  [Conditions] When there is a possibility of the 
technological, organizational, and (or) territorial splitting up 
of the enterprises, structural subdivisions, or structural units 
  Given the possibility of demarcating the spheres of 
influence 
of enterprises, structural subdivisions, or structural units 
within the framework of commodity specialization 
  If such hiving off promotes the development of competition 
  Given normative-legal, economic, and informational backup 
for 
access to resources, including credits, and markets for the 
hived-off businesses 
  [General methods] 4. Developing entrepreneurship with a 
view to demonopolizing markets in accordance with the priorities 
of the policy of demonopolizing the economy and developing 
competition on Russian Federation markets 
  [Conditions] Given that there is demand for the products 
  Given the implementation of a selective economic policy (tax 
breaks, subsidies, preferential credits for the formative period 
of small enterprises) 
  [General methods] 5. Creating competing production units 
via new construction 
  [Conditions] If new construction is economically expedient 
and the production resources and investors are available 
  [General methods] 6. Diversification (reprofiling) and 
conversion 
  [Conditions] If enterprises do not have a market for their 
products 
  [General methods] 7. Lowering the legal, organizational, 
and economic barriers hampering the entry of new businesses onto 
the market, including the world market 
  [Conditions -- blank] 
<H5>  Appendix No. 6. General Methods of Increasing the Number of </H5>
Purchasers on the Commodity Market 
  [The following material is published in the form of a 
two-column table, with the left column headed "General Methods 
of Increasing the Number of Purchasers on the Commodity Market" 
and the right column headed "Conditions in Which the General 
Methods of Increasing the Number of Purchasers on the Commodity 
Market Can Be Applied"; these are indicated in text below as 
"General methods" and "Conditions"] 
  [General methods] 1. Hiving off independent consumer 
businesses from associations of enterprises or hiving off 
individual consumer sections and shops for the products in 
question on the initiative of the labor collective during the 
privatization process or via the compulsory splitting up of 
businesses 
  [Conditions] Given the possibility of the technological, 
organizational, and (or) territorial splitting up of the 
enterprises, structural subdivisions, or structural units of 
consumers of the same kind of output, and also of the 
demarcation of the spheres of activity of the enterprises, 
structural subdivisions, or structural units within the 
framework of of commodity specialization 
  Given normative-legal, economic, and informational backup 
for 
access to resources, including credits, and markets for the 
hived-off businesses 
  [General methods] Hiving off autonomous independent channels 
for the movement of goods 
  [Conditions] Given the possibility of the organizational and 
(or) territorial splitting up of the commodity routes 
  Given normative-legal, economic, and organizational backup 
for access to commercial information, manufacturers and markets 
for output (work, services), and financial resources 
  [General methods] 3. Selling output via sale in an open 
public form (auctions, exchange, fair, wholesale, and other 
trading) 
  [Conditions -- blank] 
<H5>  Statute on the Interdepartmental Commission on Competition </H5>
Policy 
  1. The Interdepartmental Commission on Competition Policy 
(hereinafter the Commission) is the organ coordinating the 
activity of ministries, other federal organs of executive power, 
and the organs of executive power of the Russian Federation 
components to implement the State Program for the 
Demonopolization of the Economy and Development of Competition 
on Russian Federation Markets (Main Avenues and Priority 
Measures), hereinafter the State Program. 
  2. In its activity the Commission is guided by the Russian 
Federation Constitution, Russian Federation laws, edicts and 
directives of the Russian Federation president, decrees and 
directives of the Russian Federation Government, and the present 
Statute. 
  3. The Commission's main tasks are: 
  --preliminary examination of sector programs for the 
demonopolization of the economy and development of competition 
on Russian Federation markets and the preparation of findings on 
them; 
  --participation in preparing draft legislative and other 
normative acts aimed at demonopolizing the economy and 
developing competition on Russian Federation markets; 
  --the coordination of work aimed at demonopolizing the 
economy and developing competition on Russian Federation markets; 
  --the preparation of forecasts of the consequences of 
implementing measures aimed at demonopolizing the economy and 
developing competition on Russian Federation markets; 
  --monitoring fulfillment of the State Program and of sector 
and regional programs for the demonopolization of the economy 
and development of competition on Russian Federation markets; 
  --informing the Russian Federation Government about 
implementation of the State Program; 
  --the study and dissemination of positive experience of 
forming and developing a climate of competition on Russian 
Federation markets. 
  4. In accordance with the tasks entrusted to it the 
Commission: 
  --analyzes progress in implementing the State Program and 
sector and regional programs for the demonopolization of the 
economy and development of competition on Russian Federation 
markets and generalizes proposals from ministries, other federal 
organs of executive power, and industrial, financial, and 
scientific circles on the most important questions of 
competition policy; 
  --submits to the Russian Federation Government proposals on 
developing entrepreneurship with a view to demonopolizing 
Russian Federation markets; 
  --organizes and carries out the expert assessment of draft 
legislative and other normative acts concerning questions of 
demonopolizing the economy and developing competition on Russian 
Federation markets, and also federal structural, investment, 
export-import, and financial projects and programs; 
  --analyzes the state of Russian Federation markets with a 
view to preparing proposals on developing competition; 
  --creates where necessary temporary working groups made up 
of 
Commission members and enlisted specialists in order to carry 
out the tasks entrusted to it; 
  --cooperates with business circles and entrepreneurs' 
associations and unions of the Russian Federation and foreign 
countries; 
  --receives in accordance with the prescribed procedure draft 
legislative and other normative acts and reference and 
information materials. 
  5. The membership of the Commission and the chairman of the 
Commission are ratified by the Russian Federation Government. 
  6. The chairman of the Commission: 
  --leads the Commission's activity; 
  --can enlist in the Commission's work specialists from 
ministries and other federal organs of executive power, leading 
scientists, the leaders of Russian Federation enterprises and 
organizations, their associations, and representatives of 
foreign states' business circles and international 
nongovernmental organizations; 
  --reports on the Commission's activity to the Russian 
Federation Government. 
  7. Members of the Commission take part in its sittings with 
full voting rights, can head working groups formed by the 
Commission, and have the right to submit for examination by the 
Commission proposals and recommendations regarding matters 
within its purview. 
  8. Sittings of the Commission are held as necessary, but at 
least once per quarter, and are deemed quorate if over 50 
percent of members of the Commission are present. 
  9. Sittings of the Commission are formally minuted. 
Decisions are deemed to be passed if a majority of the members 
of the Commission present at the sitting has voted for them. 
  Members of the Commission take part in its work only in 
person. 
  The minutes of a Commission sitting are signed by the 
sitting's chairman. 
  Minutes and other information on the Commission's activity 
are brought to the attention of members of the Commission and 
other interested parties. 
  10. Decisions adopted by the Commission in accordance with 
its powers are binding upon ministries, other federal organs of 
executive power, and organs of executive power of Russian 
Federation components whose representatives are members of the 
Commission, and also upon enterprises and organizations under 
their jurisdiction. 
  The Commission submits appropriate proposals on matters 
requiring a decision by the Russian Federation Government. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68583 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   16 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Deputy Inveighs Against Draft State Budget </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Deputy Inveighs Against Draft State Budget </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM1804154194 Moscow PRAVDA in Russian 16 Apr 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> PM1804154194 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow PRAVDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Doctor of Economic Sciences Professor Mikhail </F>
Sidorov, State Duma deputy: "What Kind of Reforms Are These if 
They Find the People an Obstacle?! Notes on State's Income and 
Expenditure in 1994"] 
  [Text] Moscow -- So then, the federal budget for 1994. 
The government's plan puts income at 120 trillion rubles [R] 
and expenditure at R183 trillion. You can see that once again 
the population is trying to spend more than it pays in tax. 
This is once again an obstacle to the reformers. Just how can 
the deficit be covered? The government sees two main ways -- 
the first is Central Bank loans to the tune of R38 trillion, and 
the second is foreign loans totaling R19.3 trillion. The third 
source of funding, which is the main source in civilized 
countries, is through state securities bought by banks, 
enterprises, and the population. But Russians have failed to 
grasp their advantages and have hardly been buying these bonds, 
which is again hampering the reforms. 
  On what terms does the government raise loans? It is wiser 
in this respect than enterprises and the population. Just try 
getting a 10-year bank loan at 10 percent. You will be referred 
to a psychiatrist. But the authorities have favorable terms, 
they are borrowing the R38 trillion they need from Gerashchenko 
at 10 percent interest over a 10-year term. 
  I would like to see the reaction of the chairman of the U.S. 
Federal Reserve if the White House asked him for a loan at 1 
percent when the rest of the economy was paying 7 percent. It 
would hardly be considered humorous. 
  Now to turn to the second source -- foreign loans to the 
tune 
of R19.3 trillion. Who will provide them -- America, Japan, the 
FRG? This means that we take out loans in dollars, process them 
through speculators on the foreign exchanges, and fill the 
cracks in the budget with "worthless" rubles. Later, 
admittedly, these loans -- which certain journalists often call 
aid -- will have to be repaid. In oil, gas, and gold. Does it 
never strike you that Russia, which extracts up to 200 tonnes of 
gold a year, has almost none left for itself? 
  Let's talk about budget revenue -- that part of the earnings 
of enterprises and the population which is transferred to the 
treasury by means of tax. The higher production volumes and 
profits are, the higher the revenue side of the budget is too. 
And, conversely, when there is a recession, the revenue side 
shrinks -- as does, consequently, the expenditure side. That is 
the basis of a country's full-fledged budget. 
  Naturally, our "reformers" could not fail to be alarmed 
about 
this fundamental principle. In 1991 production and national 
income were already falling. In order to bring budget revenue 
more into line with expenditure in 1992, the reformers 
introduced value-added tax [VAT] at a level unprecedented 
anywhere in the world -- 28 percent. This was a truly 
"revolutionary" breakthrough in economic science and practice. 
Production began to fall, fiscal pressure was increased, and 
price-setting was handed over to monopoly enterprises and 
merchant speculators. And we waited for the economic miracle. 
Once again enterprises and the population were unable to grasp 
and implement these "brilliant" ideas. The economy went to the 
dogs. 
  But the government gleefully reports that the reforms are 
making progress and that their policy should not be changed. 
Obviously, this is a mixture of economic ignorance and criminal 
intent. 
  The authorities of the report to the State Duma "On the 
Federal Budget in 1994" repeatedly stress that all their 
calculations are based on the existing tax system -- the same 
system which helped bring about the production slump. We do not 
need any subtle calculations to realize that the production 
slump in 1994 will be more than the 7-8 percent which the 
budget's compilers were aiming for. Consequently, there will be 
no way to collect the R120 trillion in taxes which are the basis 
of the revenue side of the budget. 
  The reforms have also set about foreign economic activity 
with a will. With a sensible approach organized for the benefit 
of the population this could, of course, be a "goldmine." It 
accounts for almost 23 percent of revenue. Twenty-three rubles 
in every R100 comes from export and import duties, funds 
realized by the centralized export of output, and other income. 
Not bad, right? But this money comes from the sale of 
nonrenewable natural resources. And the export quotas and 
licenses issued to hundreds of dubious firms help to promote the 
excessive and undeserved enrichment of a narrow group of people, 
the growth of social tension, and the spread of crime. 
  Moscow and St. Petersburg are already importing more than 
half of their food, while their own production is collapsing and 
food is rotting away in warehouses. It seems that this food is 
uncompetitive. But the point is that foreign-currency food 
loans have allowed a group of "entrepreneurs," who have paid off 
the powers that be, to get rich. The newspapers and television 
shape the opinions required for the continuation of this 
predatory activity. They have no time for the 
"Russian-speakers" working in the confectionery industry, at 
meat combines, or at enterprises in the Russian agro-industrial 
complex, which is collapsing faster than other sectors of the 
economy. 
  What about federal budget expenditure? The reformers, in the 
manner to which they are accustomed, are talking about two 
extreme options. The first is the best option, the government 
option. Reducing expenditure to a minimum -- loans, support for 
enterprises, defense orders, pensions, and spending on science, 
education, and culture. Under these circumstances there will be 
financial stabilization and low inflation. Just what 
unemployment will be like, how much people will have to pay to 
survive, how far production will collapse, and what will happen 
to the defense complex, science, and health is not so important. 
But there will be financial stabilization. The Malthusian 
approach. 
  The second option, which the reformers talk about with 
nostalgia, is connected with meeting the needs of ministries and 
departments for capital investment, subsidies, pensions, and 
other spending on social needs. It would then be necessary to 
spend not R183 trillion, but, staggeringly, R237 trillion. 
Inflation, the draft's authors assure us, would then be 32 
percent a month by the year's end. It would be the ruin of the 
state. The government, of course, cannot go along with all 
these petitioners. 
  There is still life in that cherished old dog of the Gaydar 
supporters -- monetarism. The authors of monetary theories are 
people with a mercenary and usurious slant of mind. Their 
philosophy and the aim and purport of their activity revolves 
around money, trading, exchange, and banking operations. 
Long-term fundamental processes take a back seat as far as they 
are concerned. 
  It is interesting to note that the draft law on the federal 
budget has been submitted for discussion by the State Duma, 
which is to receive a government ruling [zaklyucheniye] on its 
actions. Otherwise they might confuse "red" articles with 
"brown" articles. Or again revive militarism and help idle 
scientists. Or encroach on the "holy of holies" -- foreign 
economic activity. 
  Nonetheless, the budget, as democratic gentlemen on both 
sides of the ocean are noting, is militarist in nature. It is 
planned to spend R37.1 trillion (20.3 percent) on defense. The 
largest item in the budget. This money will be used to maintain 
the Army, pay for state orders from defense industry 
enterprises, and for the Russian troop withdrawal from the newly 
independent states. 
  After all, the collapse of the unified system for protecting 
the state and the unified defense industrial complex along with 
the collapse of the state will not make it possible in the 
foreseeable future to create a similarly reliable system to 
allow people to live in their fatherland without fear. Just 
look at how greedily the eyes of almost all our neighbors burn 
at the thought of Russian lands. What are we supposed to do -- 
hand them over and embrace pacifism? 
  The second biggest item on the expenditure side of the 
budget 
is state support for national economic sectors -- R33.2 trillion 
(18.1 percent). This section looks quite puzzling. It lists 
the federal programs on Chernobyl, housing for servicemen, the 
fuel and energy complex, transportation, conversion, and so 
forth that have been examined and adopted by the government. 
What remains unclear is the funding mechanism -- who 
specifically will get the money and where is the guarantee that 
it will be utilized in a targeted way? 
  Experience shows that budgetary funds channeled through 
commercial banks and different funds help to make intermediary 
speculators rich. Russian producers receive only part of the 
funds. But even then, the leaders of enterprises and the small 
enterprises, foreign economic structures, and other market 
formations that have flourished under them often defend their 
own market interests. These people, needless to say, are 
thinking about their own pockets. 
  The funding sources for national economic investment break 
down into domestic (R19 trillion) and foreign (R12 trillion). 
The latter will be used to buy agricultural equipment, 
transportation equipment, and medical equipment in the United 
States, Germany, Britain, Japan, and other countries. That is, 
as is the case with agriculture, we are supporting Western 
producers while destroying our own. 
  Compare the R12 trillion channeled by the Western countries 
to Russia to ensure that it buys their technology and equipment 
with the budgetary spending on the conversion of Russian defense 
complex enterprises. It turns out that our reformers love 
Western enterprises 16 times more than Russian enterprises. 
  It will take major amounts of investment to seriously change 
the structure of production and renew it, but this money is 
lacking and, clearly, will not be forthcoming in 1995 either. 
It will take the Russian economy more than two or three years 
to get out of the hole which we have dug for it. 
  There are many more interesting points in the reformist 1994 
budget. Admittedly, it is already April -- we have been living 
through the first and second quarters without any legislative 
examination of the budget. But, after all, someone was 
preventing the government from drawing up the budget in 
November-December 1993. There was no Supreme Soviet and no 
State Duma either, but they were impeding things too. So was 
winter, and the elections, and surging prices -- what prices 
would be used to calculate the budget? And so did the ruble's 
steady fall against the dollar -- what level should be chosen 
for the calculations? 
  There is a draft budget. Now the State Duma will cause 
problems -- why, it will ask, is only R591.7 billion being 
allocated to federal migration and resettlement programs when a 
minimum of 1 million refugees are expected from the CIS 
countries? That equates to around R600,000 per person. That is 
enough to buy a tourist tent. Yet at the same time loans to the 
CIS countries' national regimes total R533 billion. 
  But it is hard to believe the figures in the draft budget. 
Who knows what inflation will be like -- after all, in early 
1993 they had wanted to hit the 5-7-percent-a-month mark by the 
end of the year, but, it seems, the Supreme Soviet got in the 
way, as did people, who for some reason wanted to receive their 
pay. That is why inflation went higher. How many enterprises 
will still be left by the year's end? Judging from the size of 
state "support" and the authorities' investment policy -- not 
many. 
  But it is quite obvious that, with the current system of 
taxes, foreign economic policy, rivalry between the regions and 
the center, and the government's inability to carry out phased 
and well-considered reforms, the current budget will not be able 
to improve the economic situation. The annual budget is in any 
case more suited to trading operations rather than to an 
assessment of investment projects and serious structural changes 
in the national economy. The destructive reformers, living day 
by day with their vindictive attitude to the past and their 
passion for foreign economic operations, will not be able to 
reassure the country. They have drawn up the current budget any 
old how and will fail to carry it out -- as was the case in 1992 
and 1993. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68584 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Acting Minister Defends `Realistic' Budget </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Acting Minister Defends `Realistic' Budget </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM2804114194 Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 27 Apr 94 
First Edition pp 1, 3 </F>

<F P=103> PM2804114194 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with acting Russian Finance Minister Sergey </F>
Dubinin and Deputy Finance Minister Sergey Aleksashenko by A. 
Yevgenyev; date and place not given: "If Inflation Can Be Kept 
in Check, Major Capital Will Move Toward Us. So Russian 
Federation Finance Minister Sergey Dubinin Believes"] 
  [Text] ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA's guest "this Wednesday" is 
acting Russian Finance Minister Sergey Dubinin. For three 
months he has headed a department which has found itself by the 
will of fate at the epicenter of Russian economic reform. He is 
43. He is a doctor of economic sciences. While paying tribute 
to his competence experts noted on his appointment that, unlike 
the uncompromising Fedorov, he is a softer person. We would 
add, however, that Dubinin does not yet seem to have provided 
any reason to remember that parallel. 
  Deputy Finance Minister Sergey Aleksashenko also took part 
in 
our talk. 
  [Yevgenyev] Sergey Konstantinovich, what is happening with 
the 1994 draft budget? It had great difficult and incredible 
adventures in passing its first reading in the state Duma. 
  [Dubinin] We had not expected everything to be sweetness and 
light. We had assumed that the debate would be fierce. It is 
not a question of some personal failings or shortcomings. It is 
all more complicated than that. Any budget reflects a certain 
economic policy. It cannot exist outside one. But it was not 
hard to predict that the current economic policy would meet with 
plenty of opponents in different parties and factions in the 
lower house and that they would use the debate on the budget to 
overthrow the proposed strategy. In principle this is normal. 
  [Yevgenyev] How have the regions and ministries assessed the 
draft? 
  [Dubinin] We have done a lot of work with both of them. We 
tried out different options and came back again to our initial 
positions. In general the budget was drawn up under a new 
classification that is as close as possible to international 
standards. IMF recommendations have been taken into account. 
We included a great many things that were not previously in the 
budget -- for instance, the cost of shipping goods to the Far 
North. In our view, the budget is realistic. This is why 
sectors have mainly been dissatisfied about what they received 
-- they had all asked for more. But it is quite difficult to 
fundamentally change the budget structure within existing 
resources. And going beyond those limits would mean going in 
for fantasies. 
  [Yevgenyev] The Finance Ministry is being rebuked for 
overstating the revenue side of the budget. 
  [Dubinin] Until we have actually collected the cash, the 
arguments about the revenue side are merely estimates. 
Nonetheless, I do not think that we have gone overboard. We 
calculated it as follows: Last year on average we collected 10 
percent of Russia's GDP in tax for the budget. This year, if we 
keep to the previous structure and collect what we plan to 
additionally mobilize for the federal budget, we plan to bring 
in 10.6 percent. As you can see, that is a small difference. 
Future growth -- up to almost 16 percent -- will be powered by 
the proceeds of the 3-percent increase in value-added tax, 
better collection of excise duties, and so forth. I think that 
by the year's end we will be able to achieve the indicator set 
out in the budget. Problems have come from the least-expected 
quarter. And, strangely enough, they are connected with the 
victory in the fight against inflation. You know, inflation 
fell to 10 percent in February and to 8.5 percent in March. It 
will be in that ballpark in April as well. This means that 
nominal growth in gross product, income, and all the rest will 
be slower than envisaged by the budget. Consequently the tax 
base will also grow more slowly than planned. But just try to 
convince the recipients of budget funds that they will now have 
to make do with less than was stated in the budget. 
  [Yevgenyev] Gaydar and Fedorov stated that the spending in 
January-February would lead to a new surge of inflation in 
April. But you are claiming that April will be as quiet as 
March. How do you explain that? 
  [Dubinin] By the fact that there was no dramatic expenditure 
in January-February. We did not allow it. 
  [Yevgenyev] What about March? 
  [Dubinin] Not in March either. 
  [Yevgenyev] So, what about the debts? 
  [Dubinin] What debts? The budget debts? We have already 
paid off those debts which the government has recognized by 
concluding contracts at different times -- and they come to more 
than 4.5 trillion rubles [R]. We are planning to repay another 
R1 trillion with treasury bills. But there have been a lot of 
wrongheaded interpretations, mutual misunderstandings, and 
confusion in this area. For instance, people are saying that we 
are not giving the Army its extra pay. When the decision was 
made in December to index the pay of workers in the 
budget-funded sphere, the Finance Ministry warned that the money 
for these payments was not there. We were not listened to. 
Consequently, when the time came to pay up, we told the Army 
leaders that we would not be increasing their salaries. 
Naturally people disagreed with this, and they believe that 
they are regularly failing to receive their extra pay -- that in 
February they received their pay for January, that in March they 
received their pay for February, and so forth. In other words, 
we have created problems for ourselves, with our own hands. If 
we are unable to pay, we should not take on commitments. That 
is why we insisted that the minimum wage and bands in the 
unified pay scale not be indexed in the second quarter. There 
are no funds for this in the budget. 
  [Yevgenyev] But the countryside has gotten enough for its 
soup and porridge. 
  [Dubinin] This is the way things have gone with the 
countryside. We had just one commitment to them -- for grain. 
It was not immediately released onto the free market, as would 
have been logical, given the good harvest; instead it was 
decided to sell it at high fixed prices, indexing those prices 
into the bargain. And only to deregulate prices as of 1 
October. The Finance Ministry again lodged a protest, since 
elementary calculations showed that we would simply be unable to 
finance such expensive grain. As a result, we had to spend an 
extra R1.5 trillion. It can be said that the entire loan 
received from the IMF last year was spent on grain purchases. 
Then what happened? "Roskhlebprodukt" received this money as a 
budget subsidy. They mobilized the grain, delivered it, and are 
storing it in silos, having partially paid for it, partially 
pledged to take care of it, and partially accepted, as it were, 
state funds without repaying them. By their reckoning, the R1.5 
trillion already allocated is no longer sufficient. Then we 
told them -- "release the grain, release it. It will be used 
for flour, the flour will be used for bread, and the profits 
will make their way back to you. And you can pay off your 
creditors." For some reason they are unable to resolve this 
issue. The money that the population has paid for the grain is 
not being repaid by the grain-owners. And if the grain is 
released, it will be at the price at which it was procured. And 
they will again demand budget funds for new purchases in the 
spring -- that is, funds from taxpayers like you and me. What 
does this mean in the context of inflation? It means that they 
are eating up the circulating capital that was issued to them -- 
in other words, they are not acting in a market-driven fashion 
at all. And the Finance Ministry should provide compensation 
for all this. 
  The following things happened next. "Roskhleboprodukt" 
recast the terms of the contract for grain accepted for 
responsible storage, declaring it to have been bought. And we 
are being presented with the bill: There is still some grain 
that has not been paid for. That is how we are living -- eating 
up circulating capital and forgetting what a free market is. 
Mired in endless debts that we cannot hope to repay. And 
nobody is particularly worried about it. They say that the 
Finance Ministry will fund it. You even find some strange 
things happening. The Commission for Urgent Questions is 
examining the sowing situation. Who do you think the report 
writer will be? The Finance Ministry. The Ministry of 
Agriculture and Food has probably solved all its problems; only 
the Finance Ministry is failing to pull its weight. 
  [Yevgenyev] So do you still owe "Roskhleboprodukt" anything? 
  [Dubinin] Yes, we have agreed to allocate it another R200 
billion from the budget. This is over and above the aforesaid 
R1.5 trillion. But "Roskhleboprodukt" will receive the funds in 
the form of bonds which it can sell as securities. The bonds 
will come into circulation this spring, and they can be sold on 
the market to raise R200 billion. And that, clearly, will 
settle the issue of the 1993 underpayment. That weight will be 
lifted from our backs. But the problem will remain. Because it 
is not clear how we can continue to work under such a system. 
  [Yevgenyev] No matter what we do, we seem to come off badly. 
There is not enough money for anything. At the same time, 
$15-20 billion is finding its way into Western banks each year. 
Doesn't that worry you? Or have you gotten used to it? 
  [Dubinin] It does worry me. But what are you proposing? 
There is a system of licensing the export of foreign exchange 
resources and their placement abroad. We have the Federal 
Service for Currency and Export Controls, which is designed to 
monitor these processes and hunt down criminals. Virtually 
everything possible in the way of administrative bans has been 
done. But until it becomes more profitable to import than to 
export capital, we will not be able to reverse these currency 
flows. 
  [Yevgenyev] But surely it is beneficial to keep foreign 
currency in Russian deposit accounts? Nobody anywhere in the 
world will give you 36 percent annual interest the way we will. 
  [Dubinin] Well, suppose for a minute that you are a 
businessman. You have earned $1 million. What are you going to 
do with it here? Putting it in the bank at 36 percent is boring 
and not without risk either. It is impossible to acquire any 
real property. Our well-known "Lukoil" company is buying a 
network of retail stores in Turkey. Why not in Russia? We have 
no network. We just have one store, and then another, and 
another.... And it is tiresome to have to buy up trade outlets 
one by one. When every Russian has the opportunity to open a 
store in Russia, when they can acquire everything they need, 
that is when capital will work here as well, rather than just in 
Germany and Switzerland. Apart from its well-known advantages, 
voucher privatization also has some disadvantages. Virtually 
the biggest of these is that you cannot acquire anything for 
your money. Practically every bank in Moscow is housed in 
rented premises. They cannot even buy their own offices. Where 
else can you find a situation like that? [Dubinin ends] 
  S. Aleksashenko entered the conversation: 
  [Aleksashenko] I agree, we are experiencing major outflows 
of capital. But, strangely enough, since the middle of last 
year there has also been an inflow of capital -- but in a 
concealed, cash form which is hard to register. When money 
passes through bank accounts everything is clear, but when 
dollars in cash are brought into Russia by the suitcase, it is 
hard to keep track of them. Nonetheless, according to Central 
Bank estimates, such capital imports amounted to $5-7 billion 
last year. 
  [Yevgenyev] Is this a reaction to that 36 percent? 
  [From this point on the identity of the respondent is 
unclear] 
  [Interviewee] The way I see it is this -- the hottest, 
riskiest capital has already come here. It is important that it 
does not expand the realm of the criminal, black economy, but 
that it should work in an entirely civilized and open manner. 
Post-voucher privatization will provide the conditions for this 
to be possible. And if inflation is kept in check, major 
investment will soon be heading Russia's way. 
  [Yevgenyev] But what is happening? There has been a squeeze 
on inflation, and production is literally on its last legs. 
Can't you see the connection? 
  [Interviewee] There is a connection, of course. Any country 
bearing down on high inflation is forced to pay the price in the 
form of a recession. We are into our second attempt in the 
space of less than two and a half years of reform to really get 
inflation down. We tried first in mid-1992. And we are trying 
again now. Each time falling inflation is accompanied by 
recession. Even if we start providing incentives for 
production, this will not mean that production will invariably 
take off again. We could see the same scenario as in the fall 
of 1992, when production stabilized for three or four months at 
its previous low level. Or things could be even worse -- 
production could continue falling quietly and, by supporting 
industry, we would find ourselves stoking inflation yet again. 
And that would be no joke. Calculations have been done -- they 
show that in order to halt the production slump we would need to 
pump money into the system to such an extent that inflation 
would rise to 50 percent a month. At any point our weary 
population might say that it had had enough of prices rising 
every day and demand that we lower them. We would again start 
bearing down on inflation. And we would again pay for it with 
recession. If we go up and down this switchback for another 
couple of years, will there be anything left of production at 
all? The classic recipe for economic stabilization is to 
squeeze inflation out of the system once and quickly. And to 
suffer just one recession. 
  [Yevgenyev] Is something of the sort possible in this 
country? 
  [Interviewee] Theoretically, yes. We could conquer 
inflation in the space of a single quarter. For instance, we 
could get it down to 3 percent a month. There are some quite 
well-known instances of that around. To begin with, we should 
not borrow money from the Central Bank. But many enterprises 
would then be unable to adapt to a reality that would be new to 
them. A large slice of the economy would simply be destroyed. 
That is why we are forced to move gradually to 10-, 8-, and 
then 7-percent inflation. In order to give industry time to 
reorient itself and do something. But I would note that many 
directors are hoping for something else. They are traipsing 
around the Finance Ministry, the Council of Ministers, and the 
Kremlin asking for handouts. I can say quite categorically that 
their enterprises are doomed. They will not last long. One such 
famous director recently told me that he had twice been 
reprimanded by the Politburo for not boosting production of 
combine harvesters. They had wanted to remove him for his slow 
pace of construction. Today he has everything he needs -- 
workers, components, and materials. But he cannot sell the 
harvesters. He wanted R200 billion to somehow survive until 
such time as they can be sold once again. 
  [Yevgenyev] Well, that was "Rosselmash." 
  [Interviewee] This is the kind of logic they have. "You do 
your experiments there and carry out your reforms. And let me 
quietly sit out all this commotion." Of course, we could 
mothball a plant in that way and hold out until the historic 
time when the economy comes good. But if our entire industry 
has to wait for everything to change of its own accord, without 
changing anything itself, then we will all find ourselves in the 
kind of dead-end that the AZLK [Moscow Leninist Komsomol 
Automobile Plant] and ZIL [Likhachev Automobile Plant] plants 
are currently in. 
  [Yevgenyev] Flotation has done them no good. They were 
floated, but now they are saying: "Pay us." 
  [Interviewee] And if you total up what the ZIL Plant is 
asking for it comes to R1 trillion. 
  Quite often of late I have received administration heads 
from 
quite wealthy oblasts asking for help of any kind. Their oil 
refineries have ground to a halt -- the products are so 
expensive that nobody is buying them. We advise them to lower 
their prices -- for both gasoline and other petroleum products. 
My visitors' eyes would come out on stalks -- "How can that be 
done when everything is getting more expensive?" But we are in 
the marketplace. 
  The thinking is as follows -- since there is a market, let 
prices go through the roof. What is happening with grain, for 
instance? Our peasants' wages are 1 percent of world wages, our 
fuel is 30 percent of the world price, our equipment is 20-50 
percent of the world price, but we produce grain at the world 
price. And sausages and milk too. Food prices in any store are 
at world levels. And if you make allowances for our very 
mediocre quality, then we are actually paying more. 
Nonetheless, demand constraints are starting to kick in. Two 
oil extraction companies -- "Lukoil" and "Yukos" -- recently 
announced that they had frozen their prices for the whole 
quarter. 
  [Yevgenyev] Do you not think that these enterprises need to 
be encouraged in some way? 
  [Interviewee] Such as? Presenting them with a red banner or 
scroll of honor? They have provided their own incentive -- 
their output is being bought and paid for. Incidentally, prior 
to this our oilmen had given us no peace for six months in their 
demands for subsidies. Throughout this period a package of 18 
documents, each worth between R300 billion and R1 trillion, was 
circulating among government members. People tried to wheedle 
official stamps out of them. Thank God, they stood firm. That 
is why the Finance Ministry did not give out the money, and why 
the demand constraints have started working. Now we will see 
what happens next. I think that our oil industry will live 
normally if it learns the rules of the market. 
  [Yevgenyev] But there are natural monopolies -- railroads, 
electricity, gas. What about them? 
  [Interviewee] In those areas we cannot do without a system 
of state regulation. From my standpoint, nobody exploits their 
monopoly position as shamelessly as the power generation people 
at the "YEES Rossii" [Russian Integrated Power Grid] Russian 
Joint-Stock Company. When they charge one rate in one oblast 
and another rate bigger by an order of magnitude in another 
oblast, what do you call that? That sort of thing does not 
happen in any country anywhere. And they will not accept the 
cheapest power from nuclear stations onto their grid for fear of 
spoiling their indicators. 
  [Yevgenyev] Nuclear power workers recently picketed the 
White House. Was that related to the behavior of the Integrated 
Power Grid? 
  [Interviewee] Undoubtedly. This situation was largely 
brought about artificially. In this connection I would like to 
say the following. Yes, our miners have been in a difficult 
position, and that is now true of the military. But trillions 
of rubles pass through their hands. They have the funds to give 
themselves room for maneuver. Why is it that people will 
seemingly forget about one place somewhere? Wages will not have 
been paid there for five months, people will have been pushed to 
the limit, to the point of starvation. I suspect that these 
sources of extreme tension are created with a purpose. Then 
everyone suddenly seems to remember about them. The press and 
television suddenly descend and show us the starving. The 
"background to the disease" begins to be teased out. And this 
is used to get money for the entire sector. 
  You will note that these situations are reproduced 
systematically. It seems to me that we are dealing with a kind 
of blackmail, to which both the government and society are 
subjected. And all of us have to pay. For instance, to fend off 
the miners' discontent, we gave them R2 trillion that had been 
earmarked for increasing wage bands in the second quarter. This 
means that we are robbing Peter to pay Paul. 
  [Yevgenyev] We need to close mines that have no future. 
  [Interviewee] Yes, we do. Although that costs money too. 
Nonetheless, last year the coal industry was planning to find 
R40 billion and close just one mine -- at Khalmer-Yu. It did 
not find the money and did not close the pit. It has been given 
R2 trillion this year, yet there is still no money to spare for 
the closure. The pit is located inside the Arctic Circle, where 
mining anything is senseless, and the coal quality is as bad as 
it gets. I fear that the rumor that 10 pits will close in the 
first half of the year will remain a rumor. Miners already know 
from experience that they can overspend, present the government 
with an ultimatum, and get what they want. Even at somebody 
else's expense. 
  [Yevgenyev] But few people know about this. Why are facts 
of this sort not made public? Why is information not regularly 
published on pay, the number of working days in the year, and on 
the leave for workers in different sectors? 
  [Interviewee] We need to do that in depth. And, clearly, 
not only on an intersectoral basis. For instance, take a major 
enterprise maintained by injections of state funds and look at 
its spending structure -- how much the director earns, how much 
the engineers and workers earn, whether the soccer team is 
funded, whether dividends are paid on the shares, and what kind 
of social costs there are. This detailed analysis should be 
carried out at a micro-level so as to provide a clear and 
accurate picture. 
  You are probably right. This would be instructive to many 
people. I promise to think about it. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68585 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Privatization Progress Viewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Privatization Progress Viewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0761A Moscow KOMMERCHESKIY VESTNIK in Russian No 3-4, 
Mar-Apr 94 pp 6-9 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0761A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERCHESKIY VESTNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Malyshkov, deputy mayor of the </F>
Government of Moscow and chief of the department of consumer 
services and the market, under the rubric "Trade: Analysis, 
Projections": "The Shops Have Been Privatized: The Entire Sense 
of the Privatization of Trade Is To Serve the People"] 
  [Text] Privatization of the trade sector has opened the 
gates to the path of the development of market relations in our 
country. Denationalization should be viewed as a process of 
transition to a variety of ownership arrangements, new forms of 
economic operations, and entrepreneurship, as a means to bring 
dynamism to our entire economy by enhancing labor incentives. 
  Why did the trade sector advance to the forefront of 
privatization, where particularly decisive actions are needed? 
Because simply no advancement toward a market economy is 
possible until the system of bureaucratic distribution of the 
manufactured product is broken down. For many years there was 
concern about how to distribute "properly," from whom to take 
things and to whom to give them. It was precisely this system 
for distributing anything and everything that was one of the 
pillars of the command economy, and of the shadow economy that 
complemented it. 
  Time has indicated the intrinsic inability of the state 
trade 
sector to provide real incentives to producers, to animate 
transactions between urban and rural areas, and to stimulate 
activities in the acquisition of goods. The economy was 
structured on the basis of the laws of direct distribution, 
without effective feedback for the entire set of parameters in 
the national economy. However, the quality of products, 
abundance of merchandise, and integrity of trade cannot be 
ensured by dictum but are rather shaped by economic conditions. 
The customer, the buyer has one eternal inalienable right--the 
right to choose in the marketplace by "voting" with his wallet. 
This is an important feature of the political freedom of the 
individual. 
  At the same time, the distributive system turned out to be a 
quite costly activity associated with maintenance of a huge 
apparatus for the distribution of goods at all levels and within 
all organizations (within planning organs, ministries, soviets 
at all levels, and so on). It is proper to note that the 
distributive system is congenitally conducive to abuse, 
speculation, and corruption. Speculation itself is the blood 
child of the state monopoly on the production of and trade in 
consumer goods. It is also exceptionally important that a market 
economy make it possible for the country to become an integral 
part of the world economy and take advantage of a division of 
labor of this kind. To this end, common rules for 
entrepreneurship, the freedom to trade in goods, a stable 
currency, and most importantly, a rule-of-law civic society are 
needed. 
  Along with other measures, privatization of the trade sector 
is called upon to change the situation fundamentally: to 
eliminate the administrative superstructure, to usher in 
competition, and to overcome merchandise shortages which, even 
if they did not occur naturally, were generated artificially. 
Shaping a social market mechanism and a free trade sector 
capable of keeping demand and supply on the market in balance is 
a means rather than an end. The social role of the trade sector 
is being enhanced. Defense of consumer interests is the 
strategic path of its development. Trade is the sector in which 
the quickest and most radical changes in ownership arrangements 
and a high degree of privatization can be expected. 
  More than 90 percent of shops and public catering and 
consumer service enterprises have been privatized in Moscow. 
This is a lot, considerably more than in any other region of the 
country. The process of "minor" privatization has become 
irreversible; apparently, it will be virtually over shortly. 
  As is known, Moscow proceeded to privatize enterprises in 
the 
service sector virtually from scratch: There was still no 
regulatory foundation. Much has been accomplished. It is never 
easy for the trailblazers. All aspects of "minor" privatization 
Moscow-style have drawn criticism: what has been accomplished 
hastily, what has not been accomplished yet, and the manner in 
which things have been accomplished. 
  Have mistakes been allowed to occur? Yes, they have, and 
major, fundamental mistakes at that. However, the criticism that 
is still being leveled is not necessarily well-argued, 
substantiated, and convincing at all times. There is a lot of 
extraneous politicking in such criticism. It is written and said 
that privatization in the sector has accomplished nothing, that 
trade outlets are "getting fat," and that customer services have 
deteriorated. 
  We learn by comparison. Let us recall the fall of 
1991--complete disintegration of the market, empty stores, 
humiliating lines, a feeling of hopelessness. There were a great 
many predictions of famine, cold times, and rebellion. These 
projections have not come true; the market is being restored. It 
is an elementary truth that we should proceed from the fact that 
the daughter (the trade sector) is like her mother (the economy) 
in order to understand correctly what happened and is happening 
in the trade sector and to evaluate privatization in a 
substantiated manner. The trade sector is a snapshot of the 
condition of society, its barometer. There is no reason to 
attach hopes to a "correct" barometer when the weather is bad. 
Past ills and present-day miscalculations afflict the trade 
sector perhaps more than anything else. 
  Now it is already possible to say that there is a light at 
the end of the tunnel. His Majesty the Merchandise is the main 
player in the market. A shortage of consumer goods was a 
"birthmark" of our entire history when the 
command-administrative system existed. In terms of theory and 
practice, dogma was adopted to the effect that consumer demand 
must continuously outstrip the production of goods and their 
supply to the population. In short, demand cannot be met under 
socialism, and the tired word "deficit" is eternal. 
  The notion of "real income" has long become a convention 
because it is impossible to name a class of merchandise for 
which demand was met in full. According to approximate 
estimates, in the prosperous year 1970 (for which some people 
are still nostalgic) 20 percent of the increment of savings, and 
in 1978 as much as 53 percent--was generated due to pent-up 
demand. 
  In the years that followed, the "infusion" of money not 
backed up by goods became cataclysmic and ultimately finished 
off the trade sector. The hope that the consumers would be able 
to buy inexpensive goods, albeit at the price of standing in 
lines, was less and less justified. Quite a few people could not 
buy such goods, and the money issued to the population was 
patently depreciated. 
  The monetary income of citizens consistently exceeded the 
growth of the total volume of sales and paid services. At the 
same time, the hidden growth of state retail prices occurred and 
the quality of goods sold at old prices worsened. This entire 
shortage of products was not due to the poverty of the country: 
After all, the country was capable of being second to none in 
terms of military might. Those were the fruits of a certain 
choice, of an ideology, in a word--of the implementation of 
postulates to the effect that, unlike under capitalism, demand 
here should outpace the production of goods and push it along; 
such was, allegedly, the advantage of our state. The crisis of 
the system brought about a veritable free fall of production 
which made for the most acute shortage. 
  As recently as one to two years ago the shelves of many of 
our stores were, as the saying goes, a wide open space. Although 
not everywhere, the counters are now filled with merchandise 
which the customers hardly saw as being available for 
unrestricted sale even in better times. Enterprises have 
appeared which are not inferior to the best contemporary models 
in terms of saturation with merchandise, techniques and 
organization of trade, and customer service. The following have 
become the most characteristic signs: full economic independence 
of enterprises, direct contacts with suppliers, abandonment of 
the practice of quota allocation with its paper trails and theft 
of funds and the time of a tremendous number of employees, and 
finally the emergence of new stores reaching the level of world 
standards. 
  Look at GUM [Main Department Store], which recently 
celebrated its centennial. Its collective has taken the path of 
creating a world-class trading house. No, this is not an attempt 
to "sell GUM to foreigners lock, stock, and barrel," as some 
"specialists" maintain. The purpose is different: The 
shareholders are searching for and finding partners who will 
redouble their efforts to organize a modern trade enterprise. 
Large wholesale and retail associations such as Master-Leader, 
Olbi, Roditi, Office-Club, and many others have made their 
presence felt. Joint ventures with many countries are 
successfully operating in the capital, including the 
Moscow-McDonald's, the Moscow Pizza, the MOS-Dannone 
Russian-French joint venture, the Russian-German venture 
Taki-Moscow, and so on. The old-timer McDonald's restaurant and 
its two younger "brothers" are particularly popular. Interest in 
expanding joint commercial activities is apparent not only in 
the capital but also in other cities. An improvement in the 
standard of service and the introduction of new 
technologies--naturally, on the basis of mutual interest and 
advantage--are the fruits of such cooperation. 
  Would you like to see the stores that are the jewels of the 
trade sector in the capital city on all scores? If so, visit the 
Novoarbatskiy Delicatessen and the Tverskoy Delicatessen. They 
have an extensive assortment of almost all fresh foodstuffs. The 
stores have been converted to joint-stock format and work 
without intermediaries. Therefore the proportion of the trade 
sector in the prices of goods, for example, at the Tverskoy 
Delicatessen is just over 11 percent--considerably less than 
anywhere else. Having embarked on leasing four years ago, the 
enterprise has been building up its sales, which amount to 1 
billion rubles [R] per month at present. The delicatessen was 
paired up with a bank as its co-owner. One more sign: Suppliers 
from nearby and distant foreign countries trust the store with 
their goods. Products sold on consignment, that is with 
settlements with suppliers effected upon the sale of the goods 
to the population, account for about 30 percent of sales. 
  There are many similar stores. However, there are still more 
that unfortunately are a pain to behold, which operate on the 
principle "I do as I please" and trample on the rules of trade. 
Drunk with the freedom granted and the opportunities for easy 
and quick profiteering, these trade "outlets," if you will, 
practice abuse, taking no care of their own development. One 
customer in two is cheated on weight or change at such 
enterprises. They often sell inferior quality foodstuffs or even 
those that pose a health risk. Of course, such are the 
drawbacks, and we will restore order in this area. 
  However, let us go back to privatization. The picture would 
be lamentable at present had Moscow not hastened to make this 
effort and was still receiving goods in keeping with the "plan" 
and allocated "quotas." State deliveries which were planned last 
year and at the beginning of this year have, as the saying goes, 
failed miserably. The capital city received, and still receives, 
less than one-half of the promised deliveries. About 55 percent 
of the foodstuffs used by Muscovites have been purchased and 
already shipped in by new entrepreneurial structures. Almost 100 
percent of the products are procured in this manner in the case 
of many manufactured goods. These are the first fruits of a 
pick-up in the trade sector, its contribution to provisioning 
this city of many millions. 
  Let us look at another aspect of the issue--the social 
structure of sales. It is changing rapidly and quite 
substantially in terms of ownership arrangements. For the first 
time, the shoppers of Russia left less money at state trade 
establishments than at nonstate establishments. At present the 
former account for just 46 percent. The proportion of private 
trade comes to 40 percent, and that of consumer cooperatives to 
approximately 14 percent. 
  Retail trade is the leader in the domestic economy in terms 
of privatization: At present 40,000 stores, stands, cafeterias, 
and cafes belong to private individuals. This accounts for just 
8 percent and appears to be little. However, this small segment 
of privatized enterprises has the same volume of sales as the 
entire state trade, and even more if the sales of consumer 
cooperatives are taken into account. 
  State shops are inferior in terms of not only merchandise 
sales but also profit margins: They are 1.5 times greater for 
private "outlets," and if measured by the effectiveness of 
outlays (the ratio of profits to the cost of 
distribution)--twice as large. 
  Of course, retail prices charged by private operators are 
1.5 
times higher than those in state stores. However, let us repeat 
that the huge distributive apparatus associated with the 
practice of quota allocation, the issuance of requisition slips 
to pick up goods, and so on has been eliminated. As a result, 
the total volume of sales in 1993 exceeded that in the previous 
year by 4 percent. Please note that it went up rather than down. 
The use of food staples in natural units--meat and meat 
products, eggs, potatoes, vegetables, sugar, and 
confectioneries--also increased. 
  However, let us be fair: Some problems are being solved, 
whereas others are at an impasse, and new problems are also 
developing. As a rule the former state and municipal enterprises 
have privatized in the capital city in the form of the property 
of labor collectives. At present, only 30 percent of them have 
sale-and-purchase contracts and certificates of property rights. 
This means that almost two-thirds of privatized enterprises are 
"suspended" between the earth and the heavens, between being 
state-owned and being private. Virtually not one of them has a 
legally valid land-use document (for the place where the trade 
outlet is located). 
  Therefore, on one hand, most stores are listed as having 
owners while, on the other hand, their collectives, strictly 
speaking, act as hired labor. Naturally, such "owners" do not 
take the risk of investing funds in sales expansion and 
development of their physical plant. Their interest lies in 
pumping profits into their own wages as quickly as possible. 
  Regulatory documents permit only two types of sales--at 
auction and through "rigid" competition in the form of tender by 
invitation. However, other more efficient techniques are known 
in world practice, for example, directed sales to those who will 
offer better conditions for the operation of a trade outlet 
rather than to the one who pays more. As we see it, it is 
feasible to incorporate a new notion into the state 
privatization program: public bidding with fixed conditions. 
This would become a formidable obstacle to those fond of 
behind-the-scenes deals. We can say that at present the most 
effective forms of sale fall outside the domain of our 
operations. 
  Incidentally, it is worthwhile to mention that in the 
relatively well-to-do East Germany plants were frequently sold 
at the conventional price of... 1 mark, against an investment 
commitment. The federal government spent tens of billions of 
marks to upgrade enterprises to be sold instead of lapsing into 
rosy dreams about some kind of fabulous profits from the sale of 
its own losses. 
  Analysis of the data on the progress of privatization 
indicates convincingly that enterprises of the former state 
trade sector are increasingly becoming the collectively shared 
property of the labor collectives. Such enterprises include the 
largest department stores, restaurants, shopping centers, 
self-service stores, and wholesale warehouses. Despite the short 
duration of operation after privatization, many of them have 
proven that, having become owners, they operate successfully and 
compete against private operators and commercial structures, 
retain the specialization of enterprises, boost sales volumes, 
and enhance the level of social guarantees for employees. 
  Statistics that reflect the choice of a particular mode of 
privatization also merit some thinking. Auctions have not become 
very widespread, despite support for them from an unceasing 
propaganda campaign. To this day the practice of buying out 
leased property is favored, especially in the sphere of retail 
trade. On one hand, this is a concession to the interests of 
labor collectives. On the other, this is a statement of fact: 
Real competition in the market of trade-sector property is 
absent. It turns out that actually it is not all that easy to 
find other owners who are prepared to invest their money in 
primitive counters and dilapidated buildings with an engineering 
"filling" that has long since become obsolete. We cannot fail to 
notice a sad fact--a sharp slowdown in the development of the 
material and technical facilities of the sector. 
  Auctions are the most common form of sale, but not the only 
one. An opportunity to conduct competitive sales is envisioned. 
The advantages of holding a competition are obvious. At issue 
are primarily the interests of the population. One owner will 
open a disco bar instead of a bakery, while another would also 
open a bakery at the Bread store. Besides, retention of 
specialization (commodity mix, level of sales, services) for 
three years is a compulsory condition for competitions. These 
commitments must be included in the contract during the 
subsequent resale of the facility if such occurs before the end 
of the three-year term. 
  Unfortunately, "minor" privatization has its own problems, 
too. Profits received by trade enterprises do not ensure their 
financial stability. According to various calculations, the 
amounts of withholdings reduce eventual profits by one-half. 
Subsequent payments to the budget and the payment of numerous 
taxes and fees reduce the remaining one-half by that much again. 
The residual, which, as is known, is not necessarily "sweet," is 
very small: It is not even enough to buy merchandise. The 
federal budget does not envision funds for the existence of 
trade enterprises. Local organs of power are their only hope. 
The need for investment is vast in the trade sector. As it is, 
the spontaneous winding down of its material and technical 
facilities is underway. For example, in 1992 the number of 
stores fell by almost one-fourth. 
  Support from the state is vital in the course of a 
transition 
to market relations, especially at the initial stage. For 
example, the upstart traders in foodstuffs are exempt from the 
turnover tax and the profit tax for two years, and those selling 
manufactures--for one year. 
  Let us sum up what has been said. Privatization of the trade 
sector in Russia, including that in Moscow, is without precedent 
as to scale and not comparable to the experience of any other 
country of the world, even if we look at the enormous technical 
difficulties with its forms, the voucher system, and the 
appraisal of facilities to be privatized and their assets. The 
privatization program approved by the Supreme Soviet of Russia 
accords unjustifiably great preferences to labor collectives. 
Obviously, it hardly makes sense to change the rules of 
privatization while it is in progress at the risk of triggering 
major social conflicts. Apparently the current stage of 
privatization must be completed and the rules should be 
perfected gradually by mutual accord rather than by way of 
someone's dictate. 
  The main difficulty is found in the fact that property has 
already been distributed, but active control over it by the new 
owners is absent. In this instance the role of both the 
management and the labor collectives is overstated. Therefore, 
the task is to create effective owners, and to devise rules and 
procedures for the redistribution of property, a system 
counteracting all attempts at squandering property. It is 
important to accomplish a transition from a system of handing 
out property almost free of charge to the sale of property, from 
unconditional privatization to privatization predicated on 
additional investment and conditions that protect consumer 
interests and rights. 
  It is now equally significant to reinforce the 
accountability 
of those who buy privatized enterprises. The conditions of the 
purchase-and-sale contracts must be strictly complied with in 
this instance. To this end, contracts should envision all the 
necessary conditions for exemplary services to the population, 
and effective forms of monitoring compliance with them and harsh 
sanctions for violating such conditions should be envisioned on 
our part. 
  The trade sector is called upon not just to sell goods. 
Serving customers in an exemplary manner is an equally important 
task. The lofty mission of the trade sector is to serve the 
people. This is what the meaning of privatization in the trade 
sector is all about. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68586 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   22 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Yakovlev, Chubays on Privatization, Current Affairs </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Yakovlev, Chubays on Privatization, Current Affairs </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0757A Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian 22 Apr 94 p 8 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0757A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Anatoliy Chubays by Yegor Yakovlev; place </F>
and date not given: "The Deputy Prime Minister of Whom There Is 
a Continual Desire To Be Rid"] 
  [Text] 
  [Yakovlev] We have not seen one another for several months. 
Let us for a start determine where we are in time. The first 
stage of privatization is ending, the second is beginning. What 
does this mean? 
  [Chubays] To explain it altogether briefly, one was 
privatization for checks. At the second stage, for money. If we 
are speaking about the reasons for the change of stages, 
however, it should be mentioned that privatization is a 
contradictory phenomenon. It requires of the authors of the 
program and those implementing it a combination of the 
uncombinable: On the one hand we need to ensure that ordinary 
people (although I do not like this term) take part in 
privatization, on the other, it is essential that privatization 
secure financial sources for the enterprises, which are 
necessary for their development. This is why we will say in the 
second phase: That is it, privatization without charge is over, 
now only for money. And in exactly the same way that we are 
being violently criticized today--no one needs checks!--the same 
people will as of 1 July be declaring just as bitterly that the 
ordinary people have been cut off from privatization--it is all 
for the rich people. 
  [Yakovlev] I will not assert that Chubays is privatization. 
Nonetheless, for me, as for the readers also, there is no 
privatization without Chubays. You have, most likely, merited 
the title of gravedigger of public property. 
  [Chubays] I would prefer something different: creator of 
private property. 
  [Yakovlev] Very well. And if we go by the fact that 
revolution means a change in the form of property, has a 
revolution occurred? In the name of what was it accomplished? 
  [Chubays] I will merely repeat what I said before: I believe 
that there has been a revolution. And it was bloodless. We 
cannot, it is true, speak of bloodlessness after October. 
Nonetheless, transformations in the forms of property have, the 
Lord be praised, been managed without civil war. 
  [Yakovlev] What kind of society are you serving? For what 
kind of lifestyle are you working? 
  [Chubays] I do not believe for one moment that a picture of 
the market economy of the United States should be the 
determining features of this society. But I am absolutely 
convinced here that there is no third way in the form in which 
it is being presented by some of our so-called socialists, in 
reality, converted communists. We will build a normal market 
economy. A capitalist economy--I have no desire to avoid this 
term. That it will assume its own, highly significant Russian 
distinctiveness is another matter. 
  [Yakovlev] Do you have a chance to influence the formation 
of 
this society? You stated plainly in one interview that there 
would be a rapid redistribution of property at the 
check-privatization stage even. Even today there are people who 
have become fabulously wealthy on vouchers. A process that is 
beyond your control is under way. 
  [Chubays] In order to get rich on vouchers, they have to be 
purchased. And for this money is needed. There is, therefore, no 
"enrichment" here--there is the investment of funds accumulated 
earlier. As far as a process beyond my control is concerned, 
this is good. Were it dependent on me, I would, consequently, be 
in some way separating some people from others: Some people, 
according to my ideas, are good, I shall let them get rich here, 
others are bad, I will prevent this. 
  [Yakovlev] I had hitherto believed that the state and its 
representatives were not engaged in the division into good or 
bad but were resolving problems of social regulation, curbing 
the enrichment of some and preventing the ruin of the majority. 
  [Chubays] The state, making use of the known mechanisms, 
should influence the extreme categories both from above and from 
below. From above, by providing for a mechanism of 
redistribution, from below, with a support mechanism. But under 
no circumstances should it operate within these categories, 
helping some social groups. 
  [Yakovlev] Thanks for the explanations, but they are 
unrelated to the current practice of official decisions. You 
have carried out privatization, but there is no social 
regulation in the country. This is why I believe that your 
influence ends at the moment of denationalization. 
  [Chubays] I have to agree that the present crime situation 
and the social inequality are glaring. Nor would I take issue 
with the fact that the present scale of social inequality is 
connected to a considerable extent with the reform itself. I 
would, however, take issue on other grounds. Many people think: 
Abandon the reforms or implement them gradually, and all will be 
well, not like now, in any event. Absolute rubbish! Yes, 
mistakes were made in the course of the reforms. And not only 
those connected with the opposition of the Supreme Soviet but 
with our miscalculations also--this is true. But it cannot be 
forgotten here that the state had to a considerable extent lost 
control of the conversion of property before the start of 
privatization even. The embezzlement of public property on a 
particularly large scale had been developing since the end of 
the 1980's: Funds were being pumped elsewhere, and public 
property was being moved into the small-scale enterprises that 
were being created everywhere. And by January 1992 it was not a 
question of whether to undertake privatization rapidly or 
slowly. The alternative was either to place some legal 
foundation beneath this process or have the plunder continue. In 
short, there was the privatization act, which I did not like all 
that much. Had I remained a scientific associate, I could have 
written another--far better. But Petr Filippov was able to get 
this act through the Supreme Soviet. And a monument should be 
put up to him for this. 
  [Yakovlev] If you don't mind, don't make a Karl Marx out of 
Filippov.... 
  [Chubays] There was no time to argue about a good law, we 
had 
to implement the one there was. If, however, you wish to see in 
practice what a slowdown of privatization leads to, let us take 
our favorite example--Ukraine. With the decelerated 
privatization the mass theft of public property, which no one 
wants and which is totally uncontrolled, is taking place here. 
  [Yakovlev] You are, perhaps, the sole person in the 
government today who, having started something right at the 
beginning, is continuing it. And the gossip passes you by, 
although it is swirling around the present cabinet. You do not 
even figure in "Version 1." Nor do you rank on the endless list 
of candidates for the office of president. Perhaps this is the 
reason for the opinion: Privatization will end, and with it, 
Chubays also. How do you view this? 
  [Chubays] With composure. In each phase of privatization, 
and 
there have already been many, there has hovered in certain 
circles: Chubays has to be removed. I can even reveal a 
political secret. Negotiations were conducted in the fall of 
1992 with the very spiteful "Change. New Policy" faction. It was 
necessary somehow to ward off a vote in parliament on the 
government's resignation. Agreement had been reached on 
everything, only Chubays was a hindrance. And then our side 
said: Very well, but let him issue the checks, he will come to 
grief here immediately, and then we will remove him. 
  I frankly confess, it would have been very annoying were I 
to 
have found myself out of the government in the middle of the 
privatization process. I am prepared and want to bear full 
responsibility for privatization in Russia, within, naturally, 
the framework in which I find myself. If my activity ends at the 
first stage of privatization, I will leave with a clear 
conscience. I have something to show. For some people this is an 
ugly decrepit thing, for others, the reverse. There is something 
for me to look back on, at least. And there are certainly things 
to do. 
  [Yakovlev] And how do you combine your beliefs with the 
position of your cabinet colleagues--you could hardly call them 
your fellow thinkers. 
  [Chubays] I can argue with my colleagues on the point at 
issue to my heart's content. I express to them my opinion. But I 
do so within the government. I consider it impermissible for 
myself to judge it from the sidelines, as it were. Various 
forces are assembled in the government. There are also 
representatives of parties with which I categorically disagree. 
I have to say absolutely sincerely that the government remains 
integral thanks to the prime minister. 
  [Yakovlev] But you are here a leader of the Russia's Choice 
faction, which recently distributed a document on the excesses 
in government supply, on the Mercedes in which the deputy prime 
ministers ride around. 
  [Chubays] A painful instance. Did they really write 
something 
about Mercedes? I do not have one. And in point of substance 
Russia's Choice is not in opposition to the government but in 
constructive dialogue with it. 
  [Yakovlev] An activist of your bloc, Poltoranin, treats the 
government as a Carthage which has to be destroyed. 
  [Chubays] Russia's Choice and Poltoranin are not one and the 
same thing. His speeches have evoked the sharply negative 
evaluation of the bloc itself. 
  [Yakovlev] You are among those who are in the front ranks of 
the new party. What is inducing you to participate so actively 
in party building? 
  [Chubays] I have to confess that I came to government not as 
a politician but as a professional economist. But in doing my 
work I became increasingly convinced that it is essential for 
its realization to become involved in politics. At the present 
stage, the creation of a party.... I was recently watching a 
television program in which you were taking part and in which 
you said that you did not want to be continually choosing the 
lesser of two evils. This is a matter of principle. Choosing 
between two evils is a nasty business, of course. And you are 
deciding to step aside. But those who will be forced to choose 
the lesser of two evils will remain. You retain the comfortable 
position of an appraiser, who points out all the drawbacks. 
  [Yakovlev] You are wrong about the comfortable nature of 
such 
a position: It causes irritation on both sides. As far as the 
reluctance to choose the lesser of two evils is concerned, it 
should not be absolutized. I am sure, for example, that the 
demand that a choice be made between the Supreme Soviet and the 
president merely exacerbated the confrontation. As a result the 
president signed Edict No. 1400, not having had a chance to 
assess its consequences, and, in my opinion, a national 
tragedy--the shooting up of the White House--occurred. 
  [Chubays] This is where the divide runs. I consider this 
edict correct. It should have been made even more stringent, 
with more detailed reflection on all the measures of its 
realization. I say this inasmuch as I know very well about the 
blood that would have been spilled had this edict not appeared. 
This is the sort of country we have, it is always necessary to 
choose the lesser of two evils here. Had we not chosen, Yegor 
Yakovlev, like many others also, would today be discussing 
nothing. 
  [Yakovlev] Everyone has a right to his opinion. You consider 
it right that in the anticipation of greater bloodshed society 
was deprived of the lives of at least 150 persons. And what is 
the result? It was you who said recently that a coup should be 
expected by fall. 
  [Chubays] It was not I who said this but Zhirinovskiy. I was 
simply repeating what he said inasmuch as I know his friends: As 
distinct from Zhirinovskiy, these are very serious people, with 
great experience of professional work. They cannot be captured 
by intellectual arguments. 
  [Yakovlev] But how can it be a question of accord if we are 
under the threat of a coup? 
  [Chubays] It depends what is meant by accord. If a common 
political platform, this is absolutely hopeless. But the 
president's message is invested with an entirely different 
thought: accord based on respect for the current constitution 
and the impermissibility of the use of unconstitutional methods. 
If this procedure is realized, it will separate those who accept 
such rules from those who are against them. 
  [Yakovlev] Had an accord on no violation of the constitution 
been reached in the times of Rutskoy and Khasbulatov, do you 
believe that Yeltsin would not have signed Edict No. 1400? 
  [Chubays] I believe he would have. [end Chubays] 
  I could argue with Chubays as much as you like, until I 
am hoarse. But on our path since 1985 he has been and remains 
for me one of the decisive figures who has ensured that there 
will be no return of the monopoly of developed socialism. We may 
respect Anatoliy Borisovich for this. We may hate him. But this 
is a matter of our beliefs. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68587 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94029" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Academician Shmelev Pessimistic on Economic Recovery </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Academician Shmelev Pessimistic on Economic Recovery </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0774A Moscow KURANTY in Russian 12 Apr 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0774A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KURANTY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report on statements made by Nikolay Petrovich Shmelev, </F>
corresponding member of the Russian Academy of Sciences, by 
Viktor Mironov: "Russia Is at a Dead End. And For a Long time"] 
  [Text] Frankly speaking, I had planned at first to 
interview Nikolay Petrovich Shmelev. But after listening to the 
first "chords" of his impassioned and emotional speech and 
seeing how he painstakingly wiped the drops of perspiration from 
his forehead with a handkerchief, I changed my mind. Let the 
corresponding member of the Russian Academy of Sciences express 
his views on the painful problems of our society. But I have 
assumed responsibility for systematizing the opinions of the 
noted Russian economist and presenting them for your attention. 
Now then! 
  No Illusions. As strange as it seems, I now hold a 
cautiously optimistic view of the situation in Russia. I think 
we reached the bottom of our national political crisis last 
fall. The threat of a total catastrophe now is less real than it 
was before, it seems to me. Nevertheless, our leaders and 
society as a whole have to become used to the idea that the 
current crisis in Russia will continue not for years or even 
decades, but for two or three generations. That is, we are 
doomed to live under conditions of permanent crisis for the 
present. 
  What is most tragic is that we are beginning to realize the 
uselessness and inviability of a substantial part of the vast 
economic potential which we accumulated over the past seven 
decades. According to various assessments, from one-third to 
two-thirds of this potential should be either dismantled or 
drastically modernized. This will require a lot of time, a 
tremendous amount of patience, and a pile of money, but it 
cannot be helped. As regrettable as it seems, for example, 
Vorkuta, which has 85 percent of its expenses covered by the 
budget, should be shut down. This same fate awaits the Moscow 
Coal Basin and the lion's share of our ferrous metallurgy and 
defense industry. The most favorable predictions indicate that 
in agriculture, a minimum of 75 percent of the kolkhozes and 
sovkhozes are doomed to a slow death. 
  For this reason, I support those allegedly conservative 
circles of economists who are repeatedly mentioning the vital 
necessity of a well-thought-out industrial policy. Simply 
stated, someone in our country should decide whom to support for 
a year, whom to support for 5 years, and someone must be helped 
to die tomorrow. 
  Between the Hammer and the Anvil. No government 
today, no matter whether it is headed by Chernomyrdin, Zyuganov, 
Zhirinovskiy, or Gaydar, will be able to provide for the 
classic, normal choice between inflation and unemployment. After 
all, no one knows where this acceptable level of inflation is. 
It is clear that the less inflation the better, but we cannot 
get along without it now; otherwise, it is impossible to 
maintain the vast unprofitable sector of our economy. Unless we 
begin the process of bankruptcy, of shutting down entire sectors 
of industry and even cities, there can be no discussion about 
any normalization of the Russian economy. But such measures will 
lead to an avalanche of unemployment. A paradox! 
  I have only sympathy for Chernomyrdin. He stated that this 
dilemma should be resolved. However, this is tantamount to 
walking on a razor blade. A step to the left means 
hyperinflation, and a step to the right means a social explosion 
because of unacceptable unemployment. It is at the level of 5 to 
6 percent at present, but it should climb at least to 12 
percent. How will the public react to this increase? 
  For this reason, in my view, the question is as follows: 
what 
level of unemployment can the Russian society withstand, and 
what level of inflation can it forgive the government for? 
  "Veneer." Our monetary system must be normalized 
without delay. No economy can function normally with a sick 
currency. Gaydar managed to cure the financial system somewhat 
at the price of "eating up" all the public's savings, but this 
was obviously inadequate. 
  First of all, we have to restore incentives to save our 
Russian rubles so that they are competitive and constantly in 
circulation. I was in a group of economists which at one time 
suggested that we repeat the successful experiment of the 1920's 
and issue hard convertible currency at the same time. Over a 
period of 1.5 to 2 years, it would completely force the 
compromised "veneer" out of the market. Then we would be able to 
normalize the monetary system naturally. 
  And one more problem associated with this--the universal 
dollarization of the Russian economy. Such a thing can only be 
imagined in an insane asylum, when a foreign currency is used in 
practically all trade and economic operations. Dollars make up 
more than half of what is now in circulation. They make up over 
50 percent of all the cash in the country. Crazy! 
  Where Are the Property Owners? I am very skeptical 
about the current privatization strategy. Vouchers have played 
their role, that is, they brought down the social tension, but 
only that. They simply palmed off some illusion on the people in 
the form of the notorious voucher. 
  A more difficult problem is linked with our industrial 
monsters. As an example, in order to privatize 10 large 
companies, M. Thatcher needed 10 years. But what is to be done 
with our industrial facilities, which are probably a little 
tougher than the English ones? Will 10 decades be needed? 
  But many of my colleagues and I are worried about something 
else. In the sphere of classic business and private initiative, 
nothing has actually changed. Where are the private industrial 
enterprises in the cities, and where are the large farms in 
rural areas? Opening a small candle works today is just as hard 
as it was 60 years ago. The government of democrats, with their 
loud declarations about liberalism, the market, and free 
enterprise, have done nothing to alleviate the situation. They 
have simply driven private initiative to trade on the corners 
and in Luzhniki. 
  So they are pushing private capital out of industry and they 
are not giving it any space or any protection from the criminal 
and state rackets. Plus the taxation in the stratosphere. Well, 
think of it: a law-abiding private entrepreneur must give the 
state up to 90 percent of all his income. With such an 
apportionment in the world, no one will ever work. 
  One Blanket for a Pair. I have not believed in 
Tatar separatism or Sverdlovsk or Yakutsk separatism for a 
single day. The passions surrounding the division are nothing 
but political games based on a simple question: how do we divide 
the money (taxes) between the center and subjects of the 
federation? Moscow has traditionally taken 85 to 90 percent of 
the taxes, leaving crumbs for the localities. For this reason, 
we are also doomed to resolve this problem in a civilized 
manner, as in other normal countries, roughly in this manner: 40 
percent to Moscow and the rest to the regions. But this has not 
been constituted yet and it paves the way for various local 
conflicts, from which separatism springs up. I assure you that 
when the question of taxes is settled sensibly, we will forget 
all our fears about the Far Eastern, Urals, and Yakutsk 
republics. 
  Back in the USSR. Economic reintegration and 
restoration of the former Soviet Union in the sense of an 
economic alliance is a matter of time, and very little time, I 
fear. Experience has shown that without the subsidies which the 
former Soviet republics received regularly for decades from 
Russia, they simply would not be able to survive. These 
subsidies were roughly equivalent to an average $50 billion 
annually . Kazakhstan received 11 billion of the "green," 
Ukraine 7 billion, and Lithuania $3.5 billion. And there is no 
kind uncle who will pay the deficit in their balance of payments 
to Russia. Even the Armenians are having no success in this 
direction, although they have the largest and most sympathetic 
diaspora in the world. For this reason, the CIS countries are 
doomed to establish a common economic space similar to the 
Common Market in Europe. 
  But does Russia need this? Are Russians in a position to 
bear 
the return of this burden of subsidies? Even our radical leaders 
are not prepared now for restoration of the previous integrated 
system. 
  Protectionism Or Competition. 
  We have proclaimed the opening of the Russian economy. But 
this gesture showed that we are not standing up to world 
competition in the market. At the same time, only foreign 
competition will be able to force the wheels of our economy to 
turn. We can understand those who demand protection from it and 
those who categorically speak out on its behalf. For example, 
our electronics industry has already been stifled by Japanese 
products, and there are innumerable cases such as this. In this 
connection, it is very important to find the golden mean which 
applies to the Russian economy. 
  In our time, no one dares to shut down our economic system 
completely, and a degree of protectionism is part of the 
political boldness of our leaders and political groups for this 
reason. 
  [Mironov] This was the "cheerful" conversation with Nikolay 
Shmelev. Our life was depicted in such pessimistic shades that I 
could not help but ask: 
  "Nikolay Petrovich, there is still hope for us to overcome 
this crisis faster, all the same. Perhaps some strong 
personality is in a position to do this? After all, don't we 
have obvious examples in Chile, Turkey, and South Korea?" 
  [Shmelev] Well, some general with his sword drawn will come 
along on his white horse. They will begin chopping off heads and 
military tribunals and all kinds of punitive actions will begin. 
Well, what good will he be able to do for the country? Except to 
crush organized crime, and that is possible. But he will not be 
able to solve those problems which we have been talking about. 
No, we do not need this... 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68588 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94030" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   30 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Writer Wary Over Politicians' Optimistic Views of Economy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Writer Wary Over Politicians' Optimistic Views of Economy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0776A Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA in Russian 30 Apr 94 pp 
1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0776A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aleksandr Krotkov: "Goodbye Hyperinflation! </F>
Hello Hypercrisis?"] 
  [Text] For the first time in a long period monthly 
inflation rates have dropped to 10 and even 8 percent. Russia's 
President Yeltsin is also optimistic. In his recent interview 
with the journal SPIEGEL he announced that this year would 
become a year of stabilization for the country's economy. 
  However, experience suggests that to trust the optimism of 
politicians, especially those at the helm, is a risky thing. How 
stable can the emerging process of decline in the level of 
inflation be considered? This is the question. 
  On the one hand, if for some time the government succeeds in 
holding back the rates of rise in prices and even in lowering 
them a tiny bit, this will signify the fulfillment of our 
obligations to the world financial community. Consequently, we 
will have the right to expect new 1.5 billion dollars from the 
International Monetary Fund and a reduction in the rate [of 
interest] on international credits. Both "gifts," if we get 
them, will be most timely for Russia. 
  However, first, how many times has the International 
Monetary 
Fund already failed to live up to our expectations, putting off 
again and again under various formal pretexts the presentation 
of expensive "gifts"? Second, I am afraid that we ourselves can 
give it such a serious reason for the next delay that it will 
need no formalities. 
  The crisis in industry is growing. Instead of the expected 
10 
to 12 percent of reduction in the general industrial level of 
production, during the first quarter the real decline made up 25 
percent of the level during the first quarter of last year. 
Whereas in January it made up 23 percent, in March, already 27 
percent. 
  With due regard for inflation the annual volume of sectors' 
profit decreased to one-third! Only the fact that for now the 
authorities have not brought themselves to turn on the 
bankruptcy mechanism in the country to the extent to which it is 
stipulated by corresponding legislation saves sectors from the 
inevitable collapse. However, will Staraya Ploshchad be so 
undecided for long? Last week Russia's president sent a letter 
to the premier, in which he recommended that the bankruptcy 
procedure be used more actively for the solution of the 
nonpayment problem. If the cabinet of ministers heeds the 
supreme counsel, one can say with confidence that in the textile 
industry alone one-fourth of the enterprises will be auctioned 
off. 
  The situation in other sectors is not much better. Hundreds 
and hundreds of enterprises all over the country are being 
closed for the May--more accurately, Easter--"vacation," which 
promises to extend over several weeks. 
  The curtailment of production, inevitably, will be followed 
by a new price jump: Goods will appear on counters, but demand 
will remain at the previous level. This will provoke the next 
inflationary wave. This is price stabilization for you... 
  "We must get used to living in a state of constant crisis. 
This process of convulsions in the economy will last more than 
one decade"--such is the opinion of the famous Russian economist 
Nikolay Shmelev. To be sure, this is a gloomy forecast. 
  Only massive, including foreign, investments in industry are 
capable of reviving production. In our country during all of 
last year they totaled a little more than 1 billion dollars. For 
comparison: In China they exceeded 150 billion dollars and even 
in Hungary, so tiny as compared with Russia, they reached 5 
billion. 
  There is nothing surprising here: Few people who want to 
invest a great deal of money in enterprises, which will collapse 
any day now, will be found. 
  As it seems to me, the following conclusion suggests itself: 
Of the two evils--inflation and production decline--inflation, 
of course, on a moderate scale, should still be picked. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68589 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94031" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   22 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Soskovets on Taxation System Reform </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Soskovets on Taxation System Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0770A Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 22 Apr 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0770A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Natalya Varnavskaya: "Tax Payment Should Become </F>
a Pleasant Necessity"] 
  [Text] Reforms await Russia's tax system this summer. 
As Oleg Soskovets declared at the congress of the Association of 
Russian Banks yesterday, changes in the tax system will be 
promulgated as early as June. For now government plans have the 
stamp of secrecy. However, there is information that fundamental 
reform of the existing tax system, which pursues primarily the 
aim of budget replenishment, can take place during the 
forthcoming summer. 
  The possibility of such a development of events is confirmed 
by statements by several high-ranking government 
representatives. Thus, at a government meeting yesterday 
Yevgeniy Yasin, director of the administration's analytical 
center, announced the need to increase taxation on citizens' 
"superincome," as well as to shift the center of gravity to 
taxation on the property of natural persons. For example, it was 
proposed that one-half of all citizens' income over 300 million 
rubles be withdrawn into the state treasury (the maximum income 
tax rate now makes up 30 percent of the amount of more than 30 
million rubles). At present virtually any tax changes are made 
only in the interests of the budget. The most important figures 
in tax policy also admit this. Thus, according to Deputy Finance 
Minister Sergey Aleksashenko, "any taxes pursue fiscal aims 
exclusively and all the rest is based on unnecessary 
complications." The reason for such an approach by the 
authorities is quite understandable: This is the only acceptable 
way out under present political conditions. 
  The parliament and the government work out the principles of 
tax policy. However, their realization is placed on the 
shoulders of the State Tax Service. The anger of taxpayers, who 
have lost any hope of understanding anything in the tax policy 
of the state, spills over at its representatives. The course of 
their thoughts is quite understandable. It is more difficult to 
understand the logic of representatives of the highest echelon 
of Russian leadership, among whom the negative evaluation of the 
work of the State Tax Service has become almost a ritual. Boris 
Yeltsin's message to the Federal Assembly, more accurately, the 
phrase that under the existing tax regime "it is impossible to 
live; it is only possible to die," gave the reason for the 
especially sharp criticism of the State Tax Service. Since that 
day almost every high-ranking government representative has 
managed to express dissatisfaction with the work of the tax 
service. It is most interesting that parliament members, who 
thus far have not examined a single matter concerning the making 
of changes in the existing tax system at their meetings, also 
express dissatisfaction. 
  Nevertheless, there is also a more valid accusation--of 
unjustified rigidity--brought against the tax service by 
representatives of entrepreneurial circles, in particular, in 
connection with the excessively rigid interpretation of some 
legislative acts; for example, of the law on the use of the word 
Russia and of word combinations formed on their basis in names 
of enterprises. Although the decision on the introduction of 
this tax was adopted by the parliament, it was the State Tax 
Service that gave a broad interpretation of this law, in 
accordance with which this tax is imposed on all joint ventures. 
  In the opinion of KOMMERSANT-DAILY experts, there are two 
most probable reasons for such behavior by tax service workers. 
First of all, the Ministry of Finance, of course, prompts the 
State Tax Service to more rigidly interpret tax legislation. At 
the same time, it would be strange to accuse the ministry of a 
desire to increase the revenue part of the budget. In any 
country throughout the world the Ministry of Finance primarily 
guards the interests of the state treasury. 
  The fear of accusations on the part of structures checking 
the activity of tax service workers, the most known of which is 
the procuracy, is also reflected in the fact that these workers 
make rigid decisions. For now it does not express 
dissatisfaction with the work of the State Tax Service, which 
was stated by the procuracy representative at the hearings of 
the State Duma last Tuesday. Nevertheless, law enforcement 
bodies usually interpret any granting of tax privileges to 
taxpayers as the manifestation of corruption. Probably, the most 
rigid interpretation of legislative norms by the State Tax 
Service is due to fears to be subjected to such accusations. 
  The adoption of a political decision on serious amendments 
to 
the existing tax system by the parliament and the government in 
the very near future can be the most acceptable way out of the 
existing situation. However, in the opinion of KOMMERSANT-DAILY 
experts, this should not fundamentally change the existing tax 
system, because any global reforms will now lead to a legal 
chaos. At the same time, it is necessary to simplify tax 
legislation, to eliminate most (and perhaps even all) existing 
privileges, and to unify the periods of tax payment, while 
toughening control over the payment itself. Aleksandr Ivaneyev, 
director of the Department of Tax Reforms, also agrees with such 
an approach. 
  In brief, it should be simple and joyful, as far as 
possible, 
to pay taxes. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68590 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94032" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   29 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Trade, Industry Chamber on Taxation System Reform </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Trade, Industry Chamber on Taxation System Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0795A Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 29 Apr 94 pp 1, 
3 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0795A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by Natalya Varnavskaya: "Business Circles Urge </F>
Reform of the Taxation System"] 
  [Text] The concept of basic reform of the current 
taxation system was supported at the session of the Trade and 
Industry Chamber (TPP) Board held yesterday. The State Duma is 
supporting the position of the most influential organization of 
Russian business circles and is resolutely speaking out for tax 
reform. The position is also shared by an absolute majority of 
entrepreneurs in Russia, who are demanding that the tax pressure 
be relaxed. Nevertheless, KOMMERSANT-DAILY experts have the 
courage to maintain that realization of these tax innovations is 
unlikely at the present time. And this is why. 
  The fact is that representatives of the federal executive 
authority--the government, the Ministry of Finance, and the 
State Tax Service--object to possible tax reforms. This is a 
decisive factor under the current political regime. However, let 
us report everything in order. 
  The TPP Board was preceded by a 3-day discussion of tax 
problems within the framework of a roundtable in which 
representatives of Russian business, government, and legislative 
authority met face to face with each other. Participants in the 
conference examined several directions for possible changes in 
the existing taxation system--the government tax program 
prepared by the Ministry of Finance and two "alternative" 
concepts--by Academician Dmitriy Lvov, deputy director of the 
TsEMI [Central Economics and Mathematics Institute], and 
Professor Vladimir Frolov, president of the "Nalogi Rossii" 
[Taxes of Russia] Association. The fact that Sergey Glazyev, 
chairman of the State Duma Committee on Economic Policy, and 
Aleksandr Ivaneyev, head of the Tax Reform Department of the 
Ministry of Finance, took part in the roundtable shows that the 
Russian authorities are concerned about the subject under 
discussion. Most of the alternative taxation proposals were 
worked out several years ago, although they were brought to 
light only now. What do they consist of? 
<H5>  The Tax Program of Dmitriy Lvov </H5>
  Dmitriy Lvov's concept provides for fundamental reform of 
the 
tax system, for the academician believes it is "fundamentally 
faulty": those sectors of the economy where profit is not being 
created, only redistributed, are being taxed (meaning secondary 
taxation of the incomes of the fuel and energy complex). The 
essence of Academician Lvov's proposals comes down to increasing 
the taxation of "Russia's natural wealth." In particular, it is 
planned to introduce rent payments for oil and gas (they should 
make up over two-thirds of all budget receipts). According to 
the academician's calculations, the state will be able to 
receive $30 billion to $32 billion, or 55 to 60 trillion rubles 
([R] through the rent, which is comparable with the federal 
budget deficit planned this year (about R63 billion). 
  According to Dmitriy Lvov, when the rent payments are 
introduced, all other taxes could be practically removed and 
"tax holidays" could be arranged--at least for the priority 
sectors of industry. This would make it possible to reduce 
enterprises' costs by an average 42 percent. 
  Of course, introduction of rent on gas and oil will require 
that important political decisions be made--in particular, on 
recognition of natural wealth as state property. Otherwise, 
republics and regions will be able to claim exclusive right to 
use the funds received from profit on the minerals they have. 
  In the opinion of many specialists, joined by Academician 
Leonid Abalkin, Lvov's program "deserves attention as a 
logically well-proportioned scientific concept," but its 
realization at present has been made difficult because of 
political instability. 
  According to estimates by KOMMERSANT-DAILY experts, the 
actual budget receipts after the introduction of rent payments 
are unlikely to exceed $12 billion. And the sum of rent from oil 
may not be taken into consideration because it is extremely 
insignificant (the average production cost of oil is $50 per 
metric ton, without taking into account transportation and the 
customs duty--with an export price of about $80). In the 
situation that has taken shape, practically all rent payments 
will come from the profit on gas, which comes to $10 to $15 for 
1,000 cubic meters with an average export price of $80. 
  At the same time, it is also necessary to work out a correct 
system for collecting the rent, inasmuch as an increase in 
domestic prices to the world price level will lead not so much 
to an increase in tax payments as to a new inflationary spiral 
and production recession. A better outcome in this case would be 
to maintain the prices for gas and oil for domestic consumers 
and introduce world prices for the exports. In this case, the 
overall total of rent would be no more than $4.5 billion. 
<H5>  Tax Program of the "Nalogi Rossii" Association </H5>
  Unlike Dmitriy Lvov's program, the concept of Mr. Frolov 
does 
not assume that the existing taxation system is completely 
abolished, but undergoes serious structural restructuring. In 
particular, it provides for an increase in the proportion of 
receipts from resource and land payments and a tax on 
enterprises' property of up to 60 to 70 percent. In this case, 
the inflationary value-added tax must be reduced to 13 percent 
and the tax on profit should be abolished. Inasmuch as the tax 
on profit, together with high bank interest rates, is the basic 
regulator in the struggle against overproduction--that is, 
against what is not seen in Russia at present. All the same, the 
"Nalogi Rossii" program proposes that the NDS [value-added tax] 
be retained, inasmuch as this tax is the hardest to evade. 
  Instead of an income tax on citizens and a tax on profit, 
the 
program provides for introduction of a completely new levy--a 
tax on consumption. In other words, when there is complete 
exemption from the tax on funds for investment, it is planned to 
tax all types of payments to physical persons in physical and 
monetary forms, including loans and representative expenses. The 
funds received from this tax should be spent mainly to pay 
employees in the budgetary financing field. 
  The idea of taxing the consumption fund set forth in the 
"Nalogi Rossii" program is not new--receipts from this levy make 
up about two-thirds of the income part of the budget in most 
economically developed countries. The rate of this tax in Russia 
may reach roughly 40 percent. 
  The association opposes a large number of taxes, although it 
also rejects a one- or two-tax system, inasmuch as it is 
extremely difficult in practice to create a faultless mechanism 
for imposing a single tax which cannot be evaded. 
  In this case, it would be advisable to adopt a tax code--a 
legal document of direct action, for which no interpretations 
and normative documents are required. According to Vladimir 
Frolov, his associates would require no more than 2 to 3 months 
to draft such a document (roughly 500 pages), inasmuch as the 
association already has practical experience now. The 
association president said the cost of his work would be 
moderate. In his words, the association would prepare a draft 
for his country for just R50 million. 
  The Lvov and Frolov concepts are now being considered by the 
Council of the Federation and the State Duma. According to 
information obtained by KOMMERSANT-DAILY, the Duma plans to 
entrust the "Nalogi Rossii" Association and Dmitriy Lvov's group 
with the drafting of two alternative tax codes. This information 
was confirmed by Oleg Grigoryev, an associate of Sergey Glazyev. 
KOMMERSANT-DAILY has learned that the question of financing 
these efforts is now being decided, since the budget funds for 
fundamental studies are obviously inadequate. 
  The actual possibility that either program will be adopted 
will depend on the ability of those drafting the alternative 
plans to find supporters for their ideas among members of the 
government and the president's administration, inasmuch 
as--KOMMERSANT-DAILY reiterates this once again--the opinion of 
the executive authority is decisive on practically any matter 
under the political regime existing in the country. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Model Structure of Budget Incomes in 1993 Prices (in Percent of GNP)         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source of Income         |Existing Version         |"Nalogi Rossii" Version  | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Value-added tax          |10.4                     |7.4                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tax on profit            |7.4                      |--                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tax on funds used for co-|--                       |8.8                      | 
|nsumption                |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Excise tax (wiuthout tax |1.5                      |1.5                      | 
|on raw material)         |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tax on right to extract  |1.2                      |3.7                      | 
|minerals                 |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tax on property          |0.3                      |1.5                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Income tax on physical p-|1.6                      |--                       | 
|ersons                   |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Other budget incomes     |10.2                     |8.2                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Altogether               |32.6                     |31.1                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Proposed Budget Incomes in 1994 (in Trillions of Rubles)                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Type of Tax              |State Duma Version       |Lvov Group's Version     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Value-added tax          |40                       |--                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Excise taxes             |16 (13.2 percent of tota-|9.5 (5.2 percent)        | 
|                         |l receipts)              |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Rent payments            |3.5 (2.8 percent)        |124.6                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Other receipts           |60.5                     |46.9                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Altogether               |120                      |181                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68591 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94033" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   20 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Minister of Labor on Socioeconomic Conditions in Russia </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Minister of Labor on Socioeconomic Conditions in Russia </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0748A Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 20 Apr 94 
First Edition pp 1, 3 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0748A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Discussion with Gennadiy Melikyan, Russian Federation </F>
minister of labor, by the ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA editorial 
collective, under the rubric "In the First Person"; place and 
date not given: "Gennadiy Melikyan: `The Duty of the State Is To 
Provide a Job and a Wage'"] 
  [Text] Starting today we are beginning the 
publication of items under the new rubric, "In the First 
Person," in which statesmen, public figures, and politicians 
will make statements. 
  The first item is devoted to a meeting between the 
editorial collective and Russian Federation Minister of Labor 
Gennadiy Melikyan. 
  [Melikyan] Things social and economic are dualistic. One 
cannot be separated from the other. This is why I would like to 
begin with this interdependence right away. The trouble is that 
under the current circumstances enterprises, if they have funds, 
are striving to allocate them for current consumption, primarily 
wages. This is why the average wage at "rich" enterprises, 
especially in the fuel and energy complex, has already exceeded 
1 million. The relatively "poor" enterprises behave in virtually 
the same manner, it is just that their potential is smaller. 
This situation is a direct consequence of unsettled ownership 
arrangements. Enterprises are free, which includes having the 
freedom to use available funds. However, there is no "effective" 
owner who is interested in accumulating funds rather than eating 
away at them. The state has withdrawn from monitoring the 
effectiveness of the use of its "state" grace. The shares of 
joint-stock companies, at least those of many of them, are 
dispersed among thousands of shareholders; frequently the 
controlling bloc of shares is held by the labor collective, 
whose members currently perceive themselves as hired labor 
rather than owners. Therefore their main interest is to increase 
current income rather than accumulate capital. 
  Indeed, we have suppressed inflation somewhat. We have 
suppressed it, to a degree, artificially, and then by quite 
uncivilized methods in a number of cases--by not paying grants, 
by depriving the budget-financed sphere of funding, by not 
paying for products ordered by the state, and so on. 
  Indeed, we have succeeded in financial stabilization. For 
the 
third month running inflation has been at the level of 9 
percent. This had not been the case for a long time. 
  In general, there are positive and negative aspects to each 
of the processes currently underway. We have suppressed 
inflation, but what has this led to in production? The volume of 
production is in a free fall--down 25 percent in the first 
quarter. 
  What is the result of the fall? The taxable base is 
shrinking. Budget revenues are diminishing accordingly. 
Ultimately we either have to agree to a greater budget deficit, 
which will trigger inflation, or will be forced to cut back 
expenditures yet again. You suppress inflation, and incomes 
fall. This is classic! 
  To an even greater degree we are worried about what may 
happen to production itself, especially employment. After all, 
things such as nonpayments and employment are very strongly 
connected. Previously we had nonpayments of a greater size than 
we have now--that is, of course, if they are adjusted for the 
price index. However, nonpayments are different at present. 
Enterprises used to have the ability to wiggle their way out of 
it somehow. Nonpayments are actually afflicting production 
directly. 
  In 1992 and 1993 our enterprises stopped, too, though not as 
many as have stopped now. This was primarily associated with a 
shortage of raw materials and subcontracted parts; the severance 
of economic relations was a factor. 
  What are production stoppages associated with at present? 
Effective demand is absent, it is impossible to sell products. 
This pattern follows: Production facilities shut down because of 
lack of funds, and mass unemployment sets in. Enterprises will 
shut down anyway, even if our drawn-out bankruptcy arrangement 
is not fully used. 
  In the process, some enterprises objectively face the 
impossibility of operating normally because of sharp changes in 
price ratios. If we look at the two years and three months since 
the beginning of price liberalization, prices for various goods 
have increased very differently during this period. The rise has 
been meteoric in the case of energy resources and 
transportation. The rate of growth in the food industry and a 
number of other industries has been much smaller. All of this 
has brought about a segment of the economy being inefficient. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] However, might this have been foreseen, 
perhaps? 
  [Melikyan] It might have. After all, the structure of the 
economy of the Union evolved in a certain price 
environment--with energy, transportation, etc., being cheap. If 
we proceed rapidly along the path of liberalization and the 
price ratios change, this means that the question of what to do 
about certain parts of the economy, for example, transportation, 
should be answered. Director of the Institute of Projections 
Yuriy Yeremenko demonstrated the possible consequences of a 
rapid liberalization of prices as early as the late 1980's. One 
of his conclusions was precisely that this would unavoidably 
bring about either the collapse of a part of the economy or the 
need to artificially support some enterprises by way of grants. 
  This is why many people suggested at the time: Let us change 
the structure of the economy in stages, using centralized 
methods, bringing this structure closer to the one that should 
be evolving in the environment of a market economy and 
unrestricted prices. Prices should be extensively liberalized at 
a later stage. However, it was impossible to implement these 
proposals in the period in which they were made. The political 
power and influence of the military-industrial complex would 
have actually made it impossible to carry out broad-scale 
restructuring in the economy. That is to say, this was a typical 
example of how the economy was tied to the political structure 
of our society. 
  Later, the right time was missed. I am profoundly convinced 
that after the August events of 1991 it was no longer possible 
to prevent the collapse of the economy without liberalizing 
prices. It is just that there was no adequate administrative 
power for it, and in the absence of such, for example, price 
controls cannot be imposed. That is to say, stage-by-stage 
liberalization in the economy had already become impossible. 
  And it is so at present. We say: From the point of view of 
economics it ought to be that way. Indeed, it ought to. 
Meanwhile, social constraints operate in their own way. Recently 
we debated the miners. What we are proceeding to do actually 
runs counter to all economic logic in every sense of the word. 
What are we doing? We are allocating tremendous grants. The coal 
industry has now been allocated grants for the year coming to 
almost 8 trillion rubles [R]. How will they be distributed? All 
enterprises of the industry have been segregated into groups. 
Those that are more efficient and operate under good mining and 
geological conditions, those whose producer cost is low--these 
enterprises will not get anything! Who will get the bulk of the 
grants? Those whose conditions are bad, whose coal is hard to 
mine, and whose producer costs are high. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] That is to say, we traditionally 
support 
the weak. Of course, there is a need for that. However, from the 
economic standpoint it is pernicious not to offer incentives to 
the strong, is it not? 
  [Melikyan] Naturally. After all, tremendous resources are 
channeled in the process to the sphere that produces no return. 
Therefore the overall effectiveness of the economy declines. 
However, do we have an alternative? Perhaps only that of closing 
down the weak enterprises. However, in this case I will go back 
to what I have said: What are we to do about the people? Are we 
to promote unemployment and crime? 
<H8>  * * * </H8>
  Being mistrustful of everyone, we did our own calculations. 
Of course, it turned out that the standard of living has fallen 
quite perceptibly, especially in 1992--by about 30 percent. In 
1993 a slow correction began. However, we are still far from the 
prereform period. 
  In the latest period we have succeeded in solving just one 
problem. People who lived below the subsistence minimum have 
begun to live somewhat better--this is according to surveys 
received in February. However, the improvement is temporary. 
Prior to February (it happened in December), we made 
special-purpose payments, and they "zeroed in" precisely on the 
least affluent. Three avenues were involved. First, a system of 
allowances for children was modified, and the allowances were 
increased. The allowances ended up in low-income families. 
Second, wages in the budget-financed sector were raised in 
December. However, the bulk of additional payments fell on the 
beginning of the year, and this produced results. Compensations 
for retirees were also increased. The situation changed a little 
bit right away. It may still linger. However, a few months from 
now everything will come back to the way it was unless new 
measures are taken. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] Gennadiy Georgiyevich, our editorial 
office has an ITAR-TASS report quoting your ministry which says 
that 40 percent of our population live below the poverty line in 
our country.... 
  [Melikyan] It is not so. During all of 1993 there were 
fluctuations between 27 and 35 percent. In February a sharp 
decrease occurred: According to surveys, 16.7 to 17 percent 
lived below the subsistence minimum. In March the minimum came 
to R60,000. This is the average. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] Many people predicted an explosion of 
strikes and mass discontent in the spring. Do you believe that 
this is realistic? 
  [Melikyan] Perhaps better than any other ministry, ours 
feels 
how, when, and where social tensions build. For example, last 
year we predicted the situation several months in advance with 
the greatest accuracy. This was not difficult because all of our 
interrelationships with the trade unions indicated that 
preparations for conflicts in the fall were underway. They began 
to form strike committees in the regions, facilitation 
committees, and committees for the struggle to improve the 
living conditions of the working people. We determined right 
away when the "explosion" was going to happen. This time there 
were preparations, too, and they thought that the "explosion" 
would occur in April. 
  To be sure, the "explosions" of discontent among the miners 
and their arrivals here were organized by the corps of directors 
rather than the trade unions. The struggle for grants is on. The 
Ministry of Finance proposed subsidies exceeding R5 trillion. 
The coal industry people demanded first R14 trillion, and then 
R11 trillion. The struggle began. The directors were ostensibly 
on the sidelines. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] However, are our trade unions and the 
corps of directors actually united? 
  [Melikyan] Yes; I asked myself with what funds had almost 
550 
people traveled here. How much does maintaining one person at a 
Moscow hotel cost at present? They took offense. However, in 
this case I will stick to my conviction. 
  Frankly I am apprehensive about the fall. Much depends on 
how 
we are going to behave. Why did I begin with the general 
situation and with the fact that we have contained inflation? I 
am afraid that the Romanian scenario might occur. Let us recall 
the period before they toppled Ceausescu. They also squeezed 
incomes for a certain, limited period of time, came close to 
repaying the foreign debt, and solved many other financial 
problems. However, ultimately the spring snapped. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] What is your attitude toward the 
president's edict on the responsibility of managers for failure 
to pay wages? As far as you know, has there been a surge of 
directorial indignation? 
  [Melikyan] The issues of nonpayments are always fundamental. 
At present they are one of the main reasons for social tensions. 
All of you remember the 1992 nonpayments when prices were 
decontrolled. They were associated with a lack of cash. The 
absence of cash now accounts for 0.4 percent of unpaid wages. 
Gerashchenko assures us that in cases in which they refer to a 
shortage of money it is just a lack of dispatch on the part of 
local banks, and this is indeed so. However, at present no 
payments are being made because enterprises do not have funds. 
<H8>  * * * </H8>
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] Apparently in this instance we should 
take into account who the employees sign labor contracts with. 
  [Melikyan] Correct. They sign the contracts with the 
management of enterprises. Under the law the management should 
pay the grant at the established times. In general, the 
management should take the first blow if the collective is 
dissatisfied. 
  There are wordings in the Code of Labor Law, the Code on 
Statutory Violations, and the Criminal Code according to which 
charges may be filed against the management of an enterprise for 
failing to pay wages, but on the condition that some kind of 
premeditation is detected. 
  Premeditation does occur--for example, an attempt to provoke 
a strike. Incidentally, this was how preparations were made for 
October of this year [as published]. Specific preparations were 
made so that funds would not be credited to the accounts of 
enterprises but rather be put to use elsewhere. Meanwhile, their 
own employees were told that there was no money. 
  For example, I am aware of an enterprise that is not paying 
wages but has foreign exchange, and a lot of it. So, sell it! No 
way. Another enterprise holds shares, for example, in the 
Avtobank. Their conversion [into cash] is elementary. Sell them! 
They will not. In many cases the managers do not wish to do so, 
and dig in their heels. 
  However, I am far from thinking that the government is 
absolutely without blame in this instance. If the nonpayment of 
wages afflicted 8 or even 12 percent of the enterprises here, I 
could say that this is the directors' concern. As it is, you 
have worked poorly and have failed to ensure the regular 
organization of production, and now you answer to the 
collective. However, when this process involves 30-40 percent of 
enterprises we are looking at a general economic dislocation. 
This means that something in the system is wrong. 
  Recently an acquaintance of mine, the director of a 
metallurgical combine, visited. I told him that I knew who he 
was not paying. Miners had shipped coal, he had received it and 
was sitting tight. I shamed him, but he laughed: Stop picking on 
me with those moral principles of yours, he said. We supposedly 
no longer have them in our economy. So, he said, I will withhold 
payment for as long as I can. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] However, this actually amounts to 
interest-free credit. He does not pay the mine, the mine cannot 
pay the workers. Others do not pay one another in the same way. 
What can a system of economic sanctions be in this instance? 
What steps should the state take? 
  [Melikyan] Previously we had many mechanisms. There was a 
calendar sequence of payments out of the funds taken in by 
enterprises. In addition there was a blockage rule with regard 
to wages. If payday was drawing nearer, a certain amount of 
wages had to be retained in the account and not remitted 
anywhere. This was later abandoned. the sequence of payments is 
now such as the enterprise itself resolves to have, plus there 
are priority payments, for example, to the budget. 
  Have you noticed that a proportion of wages are being paid 
in 
kettles, pots, and irons? Why is this happening? Because the 
director does not want this money to be credited to the account 
since it will be drained away by taxes right away. 
  We have now proposed to again block some of the funds for 
wages in enterprise accounts. Of course, not all the funds, but 
at least six times the minimum wage, or four times the minimum 
wage in the extreme. Following a protracted debate with the 
Ministry of Finance we agreed that such blocking can amount to 
no more than one-half of the funds that should be remitted to 
the federal budget. After all, the budget should be replenished, 
too. If the budget lacks funds organizations that are financed 
by the state, for example, schools, hospitals, and so on will 
experience problems. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] Was the Ministry of Finance naturally 
afraid of "doing in the budget-financed sphere" if the monies 
were claimed by wages? 
  [Melikyan] Precisely. This is why we reached this 
compromise, 
and I still hope that this system will be implemented. However, 
it will not save the day completely but will merely improve the 
situation. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] This is certainly a coercive 
administrative decision. 
  [Melikyan] Of course, this problem should have been resolved 
radically in a different manner, for example, by "shaking loose" 
the nonpayments. However, given that 27 percent of our 
enterprises have a negative balance at present, even a mutual 
offsetting will indicate that many will still be left with a 
negative value. What is to be done about them? Are they to be 
closed down? 
  Some will have to be closed down, although I believe that 
the 
closure is not the main point--this threat should hang over the 
enterprise and its management and prompt them to hustle and look 
for reserves and work opportunities.... 
  Unfortunately, at present a considerable proportion of the 
effort does not go into that but rather into an attempt to cover 
high costs by raising prices. This was the case before for the 
most part. At present, in the environment of limited effective 
demand, opportunities to greatly overstate prices have 
diminished for many enterprises, especially non-monopolies. 
Opportunities for increasing nonpayments (a variety of 
interest-free commercial credit) are likewise limited. This is 
why the pressure on the government, including demands for easy 
credit, grants, and various relief, has clearly increased. I 
think that we will have to proceed to support a number of 
enterprises. Of course, this will bring about a certain growth 
of inflation. Let it be 12-14 percent a month rather than 8-9 
percent, and let restructuring advance more slowly, but may 
there not be a mass stoppage of enterprises and cataclysmic 
unemployment. That is to say, we will continue to transform our 
economy more smoothly and at a lower sociopolitical cost. Any 
attempt to do everything in one fell swoop endangers all reforms 
altogether. 
  Of course, my economist colleagues might accuse me of 
deviating from economic expediency. However, the wisdom of 
practical policy is found precisely in taking into account the 
entire spectrum of relations rather than only the narrowly 
economic segment, no matter how superior its significance is. 
  However, I am categorically opposed to turning this country 
into a universal "welfare department." This would be harmful to 
us all. 
  Some time ago we surveyed 140 enterprises. Surprising things 
came out. For example, everyone is talking about a sharp 
increase in the cost of energy resources. However, enterprises 
at which any special systems of incentives for saving energy 
resources and expensive materials are in effect are few and far 
between. Here is the answer to many questions for you. 
  This is why I will say once again: We should help, but in 
the 
process at least two conditions should obtain. First, an appeal 
for help should automatically call into question the competence 
of the enterprise management for the positions they hold. This 
is not to say that the director should be dismissed immediately, 
or that the meeting of shareholders should be required to take 
this step. There are objective reasons, and they should be 
considered. However, each manager should feel personally 
responsible for the financial standing of his enterprise. 
  Second, assistance should be provided solely in conjunction 
with specific programs for the development of the enterprise. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] Support for enterprises through the 
implementation of specific programs is one of the directions for 
an overall recovery in the economy. However, there are such 
avenues in the social sphere, too, are there not? 
  [Melikyan] I am profoundly convinced that we have failed in 
ensuring that, for example, housing become one of the engines of 
the economy. If we act as we are now--either providing housing 
free of charge or selling it at full cost--things will not get 
moving. A very narrow circle is able to purchase housing at full 
cost in our country, even on an installment plan. This is why 
there must be some kind of state support. It will pay for 
itself. We will prompt people to make money because many are 
prepared to apply themselves for the sake of housing, and apply 
themselves all the way. We should take advantage of that. 
  I am profoundly convinced that we have allowed an entire 
sequence of mistakes to occur at the initial stage of the 
reform. We have allowed mistakes to occur, and we should 
acknowledge them. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] Which mistake do you consider to have 
been the main one? 
  [Melikyan] It was the notion that the invisible hand of the 
market would do everything all by itself, and that everything 
could be done in one fell swoop. 
  I also believe the anticipatory increase in incomes at the 
end of 1991, prior to the liberalization of prices, to have been 
a serious mistake. There is a lot in the Shatalin-Yavlinskiy 
program, "500 Days," and other programs from this period that we 
might disagree with. However, all of them emphasized "tying up" 
the money prior to the liberalization of prices. For our part, 
we did the opposite in the last months of 1991. We not only 
failed to tie up monetary savings and income but said that there 
would be a price increase, and therefore anticipate yet another 
increase in wages, retirement benefits, and so on. Do you 
remember what we got as a result in November and December 1991? 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] However, prices also took off in 
anticipation of wage increases.... 
  [Melikyan] At that time we also adopted the thesis that 
incomes do not have to be regulated. We had leveling all the 
time, it was said, and now we would decontrol incomes. They 
would be whatever they ended up being. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] Are you of the opinion that prices, 
incomes, and the economy in general should be regulated? 
  [Melikyan] Of course. There are no countries without such 
regulation. The degree and the methods are at issue--for 
example, through the taxation of the individual income of 
citizens. However, the present-day mechanism for individual 
taxation of citizens is not working. We are not a Switzerland, 
not even an America. We need a lengthy period of time for people 
to learn to fill out returns, to be law-abiding, and to indicate 
all their income. So the mechanism is not working. 
  Look at how the mechanism is structured. Let us assume that 
I 
make R500,000, and you make R50,000. The same 12 percent is 
withheld from us all the time until my R500,000 salary adds up 
to R5 million. It will reach this level as late as November, and 
the difference in the collection of taxes will begin as late as 
November. They will withhold 20 percent from me as late as 
November, and then only from the November wage. My wage for the 
10 months will remain taxed at 12 percent. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] Should we expect this mechanism to be 
revised many times yet? 
  [Melikyan] Undoubtedly. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] What is the "import" of this from the 
point of view of social policy? 
  [Melikyan] Money cannot be wasted right and left. It was 
stupid to proclaim the thesis that we will pursue a nonmonetary 
policy instead of a monetary policy. All this is far-fetched. It 
cannot be pursued instead, it can only be pursued as an addition. 
  Of course, it is necessary to take social factors into 
account. We cannot ignore them. 
  At present, we cannot influence enterprises in the sphere 
not 
financed from the budget as far as wages are concerned. We have 
adopted a pay scale for the budget-financed sphere, whether it 
is good or bad. However, there are no particular mechanisms for 
the sphere not financed from the budget. To be sure, there is a 
certain impact through the pay scale agreement which is 
technical in part because we still do not have owners. Given 
that representatives of both the employer and the trade unions 
demand from us that wages be increased, a conclusion may be 
drawn from this as to what the real employer is in our country. 
Actually, he is a hired employee, and all of them are now 
demanding: Give it to us, and that's it! 
<H8>  * * * </H8>
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] You have touched on the topic of mutual 
relations among trade unions, employers, and the state, the 
problem of the trilateral commission. 
  [Melikyan] It died down during a certain period. It was dead 
right after the putsch. Later we decided to bring back this 
trilateral commission after all. We cannot do without 
negotiations, without a search for accord and compromises. 
Conflicts, dictates, and tension are the alternatives. However, 
a problem developed in putting together the trade union side. We 
now have about 70 various trade unions. They just could not 
agree. This dragged on for several months. However, the 
commission began to operate recently. A new coordinator, Deputy 
Prime Minister Yuriy Yarov, was confirmed by an edict of the 
president. We succeeded in signing the General Agreement between 
trade unions, employers, and the government. There were many 
problems, and there still are. We are trying to solve them 
gradually. 
  The trade unions did not ultimately come to an agreement 
within the new representation, either. Some of them withdrew. In 
principle, we have yet to sort things out with many trade unions. 
  We sometimes try to make use of a ready-made mechanism such 
as it exists in the West. However, employers are absolutely 
different there. Their employers are the owners or 
representatives of the owners. They know that if they raise your 
wages it will be done out of their profits or their wallets. 
This is why they fight you. 
  In our country it so happens that the employers and the 
trade 
unions are on one side, and the government is on the other. 
Logically the government should not be taking part in this 
debate. Its role is sort of that of a justice of the peace, a 
guarantor who sees to it that the rules of the game are complied 
with in a regular manner, so that they do not devour each other. 
However, at present the government cannot stand aside. If it 
remains on the sidelines, the wage situation in some industries, 
especially monopolistic ones, will be even worse than now. Take 
power generation. They (both the trade union and the employer) 
would set such pay rates for themselves that they would seem 
sky-high to us. The same would happen in other industries 
because there is no objective confrontation here. There should 
be such between the employers and the trade unions. Besides, the 
trade unions themselves are, pardon me, not entirely normal. You 
will agree that both the employee and the director should not 
happen to be members of the same trade union. 
  Incidentally, I am trying to preach an idea which many of my 
colleagues do not like: the idea of strong trade unions. 
<H8>  * * * </H8>
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] Gennadiy Georgiyevich, do you have a 
program for extinguishing social conflicts? 
  [Melikyan] We are organizing a service for settling 
collective labor disputes. So far it is very small, but 
territorial subdivisions are already being established. 
Incidentally, the heads of administration of virtually all the 
regions are asking us to organize something of this nature in 
their areas, too. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] Does this look like a trade union? 
  [Melikyan] No, it is precisely a mediation service. It can 
subsequently become a neutral panel of labor arbitration, a 
court. We are now raising the issue of creating a legal 
inspectorate. Labor legislation is being violated by and large. 
The procuracy provides general oversight, but the labor 
inspectorate should specifically verify compliance with labor 
norms. Incidentally, such inspectorates exist everywhere in one 
form or another. If there were a formidable inspectorate, the 
situation with both occupational safety and the payment of wages 
would be somewhat different. The trade union legal and technical 
inspectorates have begun to retrogress little by little, 
especially after the social insurance fund was taken away from 
them. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] Is this to say that the legal 
inspectorate will be your subdivision? 
  [Melikyan] We are "in favor," but at present the dispute is 
on. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] What about the occupational safety 
inspectorates? They have also collapsed, after all.... 
  [Melikyan] We were entrusted with this business on a 
temporary basis. Recently I was confirmed as the chairman of the 
appropriate interdepartmental commission. I think that this 
function will be assigned to us altogether. What does everything 
hinge on? There are two documents standing in the way. First, 
there is Basic Legislation on Occupational Safety. It was put 
together in a very unfortunate manner; it calls for the 
establishment of yet another new structure which would provide 
control and supervision over occupational safety. 
  I believe this to be absolutely superfluous. The Ministry of 
Labor or another existing organ may be entrusted with relevant 
functions. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] Is the function of the "blue helmets" 
which you have assumed temporary? 
  [Melikyan] Do you mean the service for settling collective 
labor disputes? Hardly so. Experience indicates that even 
well-off countries have similar services. It is just that at 
some stage they have been transformed into something akin to 
labor arbitration. Moreover, the Americans, for example, now 
have labor arbitration within the organization of the Department 
of Labor. 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] Is this why you also intend to take 
over 
the employment service? 
  [Melikyan] I believe that a mistake was allowed to occur 
when 
the Ministry of Labor was split into three independent 
structures. Is it the business of the employment service to 
develop a labor market policy? No. This is the business of 
general economic policy. For its part, the employment service 
should organize registration of the unemployed, payment of 
benefits, retraining, and job placement. The Ministry of Labor 
will thus be assembled "under one roof." 
  [ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA] When the struggle for changes in our 
society began we very much wanted to escape from the dictate of 
the state and transfer many functions to society. We wanted the 
public not to be deprived of its rights to the degree it used to 
be. It is now coming out that many services have been taken away 
from the public, and we are transferring them to the state. 
  [Melikyan] Let us recall this: When too many gifts were 
bestowed upon the trade unions, they actually became a state 
structure. I believe that state-public structures can and should 
exist. Moreover, some functions can be performed by public 
organizations in their entirety. However, I think that this will 
not be done today or tomorrow. 
  I think that the role of the state should be significant for 
now and in the future. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68592 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94034" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Novolipetsk Combine Director on Nonpayment Problems </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Novolipetsk Combine Director on Nonpayment Problems </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0796A Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA in Russian 6 May 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0796A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ivan Frantsenyuk, general director of the </F>
Novolipetsk Metallurgical Combine: "We Are Surrounded on All 
Sides"] 
  [Text] The combine considers it extremely necessary to take 
steps to end the production recession. The plan we outlined for 
this year has indicators which are higher than in 1992--for 
agglomerates, coke, cast iron, and steel. But today, like 
everyone else, we are in a difficult financial position--we are 
insolvent. We owe 6 billion rubles [R] for the mineral raw 
material, R3 billion to the coal miners, and R4.5 billion to the 
power engineers. Our total debt for bank loans is R4 billion. 
Altogether, we owe R32.4 billion, and we are owed R26 billion. 
Our debtors include a number of pipe plants--the Volga, 
Almetyevsk, Chelyabinsk, Seversk, Moscow, and Leningrad plants. 
The pipe manufacturers alone owe us over R17 billion. 
  We cannot be insolvent: the power engineers have already 
told 
us the transmission of power to the combine is being cut back by 
40 percent. We will be leaving those customers who do not pay, 
and the combine has already worked out a combination of steps in 
this direction. 
  We have asked the Committee on Metallurgy to resolve a 
number 
of problems which could improve our financial position through 
government organs. 
  They include matters related to foreign economic activity. 
How do we take part in this activity if we are handcuffed and 
our legs are shackled? We are paying a 25-percent duty to import 
equipment intended for renovation, we are paying taxes on 
exports, 10 percent for Russia's stabilization fund and other 
funds and local organs. What is left for enterprises from their 
foreign trade activity? There are also additional requisitions 
in the form of a tax on profit obtained from exports. Last year 
we paid R64 billion for this tax alone. 
  The State Customs Committee is hampering work in foreign 
trade operations as well. We are even prepared to transfer part 
of the wage fund to the Voronezh Customhouse: let them develop 
and increase their work force. They work on one shift, but we 
work on three: our production is continuous, and the combine 
ships its output for export day and night. As a result, hundreds 
of railcars with products destined for export. But the customs 
people do not have the time and people to inspect them. When 
imported equipment arrives, the customhouse does not authorize 
it to be unloaded. 
  We must not be exasperated by the railroad tariffs 
introduced 
recently, which make the shipment of materials cost more than 
the materials themselves. 
  It is time to turn our attention to the entire taxation 
system--this is a system which is killing the producer! By 
paying the taxes, we are essentially providing credit to 
everyone without interest. But why, if there is no ability to 
pay, don't they give us interest-free credit for even 3 or 4 
months? If the combine does not pay in time, then fine it or tax 
it whatever you think necessary. But in principle, why are we 
worse than any other enterprise in other countries? Why do we 
receive credit at 210 percent, while it is 8 to 12 percent there? 
  In December, the combine began a plant to turn out 1 million 
refrigerators--a reliable, modern enterprise. Why not remove the 
tax on the profit which we are counting on for the foreign loans 
of $276 million, at least for the first 3 years? We still owe 
$176 million of this sum, but we have to pay the state the tax 
on profit. What kind of concern for consumer goods production is 
the state showing here? Despite the tremendous difficulty, we 
have also organized the production of trailers (10,000 units 
annually), motor vehicle spare parts, tape recorders, television 
sets, and other video equipment, but now we have to pay taxes on 
all the production facilities, in which a tremendous amount of 
money has been invested. This is why there is no development of 
consumer goods industry in the country: you have your knuckles 
rapped if you decide to organize it. 
  One more question. Previously they left a 5-percent fund for 
enterprises in the event that it was necessary to deal with an 
accident, prevent a production stoppage, or the like. But the 
Ministry of Finance abolished the "first aid." We are asking 
that the government raise the question of setting limits for 
enterprises' urgent needs. 
  By the end of the year, all the money will be swept out for 
the budget--the federal and oblast budgets--and there won't be a 
ruble left for the enterprises! All the funds are confiscated 
automatically before the first of February as tax payments. How 
are we to pay our employees? We ask the government to reserve 10 
percent of the enterprises' production cost of the metal 
products turned out to pay for wages. At the same time, it 
should be kept in mind that in countries with developed 
metallurgical production, a minimum of 30 percent of the 
production cost of output goes for employee wages. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68593 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94035" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   4 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kuzbass Experiments With Creation of Industrial Corporations </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Kuzbass Experiments With Creation of Industrial Corporations </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0792A Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA in Russian 4 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0792A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yuriy Sosin, director of the Scientific Research </F>
Center for Problems of Economics and Management (Kemerovo), 
under the heading "Economic Restructuring": "They Cannot Be 
Harnessed to the Same Cart: Lessons From the Creation of 
Industrial Corporations in the Kuzbass"] 
  [Text] The Kemerovo Oblast Administration possesses an 
amazing gift: it constantly presents the people of the Kuzbass 
[Kuznetsk Basin] with various "miracles" which will supposedly 
help overcome whatever their latest problem is. The latest such 
"miracle" was the "Free Economic Zone." Everyone knows what 
became of that. Recently, belief in a new "miracle" has emerged, 
this time the financial-industrial groups (FPG 
[finansovo-promyshlennyye gruppy]), based on a regional 
financial-industrial group called the Kuznetsk Company. 
Supposedly we can pull ourselves out of this crisis by our own 
bootstraps, right here at home. 
  In a recent address to his fellow citizens M. Kislyuk, 
governor of the Kuzbass and also administration chief of mining 
towns and head of a number of coal-producing enterprises in the 
oblast, stated that "information received from Moscow indicates 
an unwillingness and inability to establish order, not in basic 
industries such as the coal industry, much less in the entire 
country." That statement preceded a rather curious conclusion: 
since B. I. Yeltsin and V. S. Chernomyrdin are not capable of 
establishing proper order in the country, we are going to help 
see to it that they are replaced and wait for "our own people" 
from Russia's Choice to take office. Is that really the issue? 
  Is it up to the drowning to save themselves? Can we break 
this crisis right here where we live and create an economic 
oasis? Laudable! But is it possible at this point in the game? 
Can the planned Kuznetsk Company actually function effectively? 
I assert that it cannot. Why am I so certain? Because such a 
decision is not economically justified or well reasoned. It is 
proposed that this faulty concept be used to create a new 
hybrid, something like Sovrynkhoz -- a market-oriented sovkhoz. 
Judge for yourself. The Kuznetsk Company FPG is supposed to 
combine in a single entity 278 major industrial enterprises in 
the coal, metals and energy industries and rail transportation. 
Or, to put it another way, 30.7 percent of all large enterprises 
in our oblast. But that is not all. There are plans to lock up 
R18 billion [rubles] in fixed capital in the Kuznetsk Company 
FPG at 1984 prices, which is equivalent to 73 percent of all 
fixed production capital in the oblast economy. Would that not 
constitute a supermonopoly? 
  If such a decision were actually approved even for a short 
period of time, then we would definitively lump all of our 
problems together and witness a repetition of the failed company 
that was supposed to create a free economic zone. Once again the 
mountain would produce a mouse. 
  Addressing an expanded session of the Russian Federation 
government, B. Yeltsin said that the creation of an FPG "is a 
means of concentrating resources in growth areas and supporting 
investment activity and competitiveness. The government must 
find the proper course in order not to slow down or hamper this 
process, but rather to monitor it and head off adverse effects." 
To what was the President referring when he mentioned "adverse 
effects"? Possible the very "ideas" that are leading to 
establishment of a "Sovrynkhoz" and others like them. It seems 
to me that the Kuzbass administration, in order to avoid falling 
into another quagmire, should carefully study both our own 
Russian experience with the establishment of corporations 
(FPGs), i.e., KamAZ, ZIL, NGMK, Lukoyl, etc., as well as the 
tremendous amount of time-tested experience accumulated in the 
United States, England, Germany and Japan. 
  A question naturally presents itself: on what financial 
basis 
are they attempting to establish the Kuznetsk Company FPG? 
According to a statement by A. Lavrov, chairman of the oblast 
Committee for State Property Management, it will include not 
only gigantic regional complexes in specific industries -- coal, 
metals, energy and rail transportation -- but also the committee 
itself, the Kuzbassinvestugol Corporation, etc. 
  As for the committee, it is obvious that this is an effort 
to 
save it from collapsing altogether. But why at the expense of 
coal and steel producers? That is not just a financial question, 
it is a moral one. An artificial hybrid will not produce 
positive results. On the one hand, it sharply restricts 
organizational and scientific-technical maneuvering room, and on 
the other it restricts and thoroughly obstructs the field 
available for economic maneuvering. As a poet once said, a horse 
and a skittish deer cannot be harnessed to the same cart. 
  Our preliminary analysis indicates that for the sake of the 
oblast economy it would be appropriate to establish in the 
Kuzbass, first of all, three major corporations (FPGs): Ugol 
Kuzbassa [Kuzbass Coal], Metall Kuzbassa and Sibkhimiya 
[Siberian Chemical]. As for rail transportation and electric 
power production, they, as key elements in the federal 
manufacturing infrastructure, should be independent components 
of the economic process. 
  Now a few comments regarding the actual composition of the 
proposed FPGs. This should be dictated solely by economic 
expediency. For example, the Ugol Kuzbassa FPG should be 
comprised of coal mining and processing enterprises, specialized 
machine building plants which manufacture mining equipment, 
internal production-related infrastructure, a mine rescue unit, 
research and design organizations, investment companies along 
the lines of Kuzbassinvestugol, and so on. 
  Even by world standards this would be a very large 
corporation. Judge for yourself: it would have fixed capital of 
R12 billion in 1984 prices. Currently more than 241,000 people 
are employed in coal mining alone, with more than 400,000 
working in the coal industry as a whole. 
  In my opinion, what we need here is not an artificial 
patchwork of an FPG, but instead an integrated economic fabric 
and an integral connection between everyone that becomes part of 
the corporation. Particular emphasis should be placed on 
creating systems of specialized trading companies in coal sale 
centers. 
  In our opinion, all the enterprises and organizations that 
comprise an FPG should be financially independent. They would be 
required to operate within the framework of a single economic, 
scientific-technical and investment policy and strategy, but 
that would be the extent of it. 
  The coal industry is, I repeat, subsidized. One should not 
expect any substantial foreign or private investment in the near 
future. Consequently, we will have to carry out this 
restructuring using federal budget funds only. Therefore I feel 
that it would be very appropriate to develop a special program 
for coal industry restructuring in the 1995-2010 period, with a 
breakdown of investment by year. 
  The planned Metall Kuzbassa corporation would include, in 
addition to anything else, 35 of the largest enterprises in the 
ferrous and non-ferrous metals industries, with R5.8 billion in 
fixed capital at 1984 prices. This would be a huge system, and 
it should be set up according to the same principle as the Ugol 
Kuzbassa FPG. However, if possible it should also consider 
broader cooperation within Siberia and Russia and be oriented 
toward multinational corporations. 
  Corporations are, on the one hand, the most highly developed 
form of enterprise and production organization, and there are 
things that can be learned from them. On the other hand, being 
part of one makes it possible to attract needed investment 
funds, technology and access to the world metals market so that 
we can sell our products at normal world prices, not at 
discounted or unprofitable prices. Under the right conditions 
such a corporation could within five to seven years develop 
successfully on the basis of self-financing, loans and private 
investment. 
  Particular attention should be paid to the formation of a 
corporation (FPG) to unite enterprises in the chemical industry. 
Creating one within the Kuzbass exclusively would be to create 
nothing. 
  The problem is that the Azot AO [Joint-Stock Company], the 
Khimvolokno AO and other enterprises in the Kuzbass chemical 
industry are economically and technologically very closely 
linked to oil producing and refining enterprises in Western 
Siberia and with tire plants in the Altay region and Eastern 
Siberia. Therefore this corporation should be created first on 
an interregional and then on a multinational basis, because the 
chemical industry, like the oil industry, is economically 
efficient and could under certain conditions compete in world 
markets. 
  There is not a single reasonable person who doubts or would 
dispute that it is essential to create corporations in the 
economy of Russia in general and that of the Kuzbass in 
particular. To a certain extent we have already attempted to 
take that route, as the establishment of production associations 
in the USSR was an attempt to utilize a form of incorporation, 
but without its principal aspect, i.e. a market orientation. 
  In order to make up for lost time we must, as A. Sakharov 
said, "travel their path," i.e., follow a trail that has already 
been blazed abroad. Since we now lag behind, we must catch up. 
And we may yet surpass them. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68594 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94036" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sergey Glazyev Assesses Draft Agreement on Civic Accord </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Sergey Glazyev Assesses Draft Agreement on Civic Accord </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0764A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 21 Apr 94 pp 
1, 4 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0764A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Sergey Glazyev, chairman of the Committee on </F>
Economic Policy of the State Duma: "Formula of Accord Under 
Crisis Conditions"] 
  [Text] The movement toward national accord, which began 
with the adoption by the State Duma of the Memorandum on Accord 
and with the president's initiative for the preparation of an 
Agreement on the Achievement of Civic Accord in Russia, which 
was later supported by leaders of the constructive opposition, 
in the last few weeks has become stuck in bureaucratic measures, 
has been emasculated in numerous assessments by unscrupulous 
interpreters, and, as a result, has been drowning in waves of 
mutual distrust. The draft agreement on the achievement of civic 
peace proposed by the working group for discussion does not have 
a concrete content in the economic part and threatens to 
transform the most important process of achievement of public 
accord on the key direction in the domestic and foreign policy 
of the state into a regular formal measure capable only of 
discrediting the idea of the establishment of civic peace in 
Russia achieved by society through suffering. 
  Unfortunately, the proposals by the plenipotentiary 
delegation of the State Duma to conduct negotiations on the 
concretization of the draft agreement were ignored. Serious work 
was replaced by the initiative of several enthusiasts, who did 
not possess the necessary powers to organize the coordination of 
the positions of the parties on key directions in socioeconomic 
policy. As a result, the text of the agreement could not be 
filled with a concrete content. Yet extracting the country from 
the growing socioeconomic disaster is the central element in 
public accord, for the sake of which the parties agree to 
combine efforts, curbing their own ambitions and claims. 
  The document submitted for public discussion differs in this 
fundamentally from the Moncloa Pact widely used as a historical 
guideline, which resembles much more a program for concrete 
anticrisis actions than a political declaration. It is worth 
quoting here the first lines of the preliminary agreements 
adopted on 9 October 1977, with which the package of documents 
known to us as the Moncloa Pact opens: 
  "1. In the Moncloa Palace on 8 and 9 October representatives 
of various parties, which have their deputies in the parliament, 
conducted a meeting with the president and government members 
for the purpose of examining the first point on the agenda: the 
program for improving and reforming the economy. There was a 
wide discussion of the aims, means, and measures envisaged by 
this program. At the same time, representatives of political 
parties set forth both the differences existing among them and 
points of contact. 
  "2. The assessment of the economic situation, which those 
present defined as difficult owing to the time coincidence of 
various crises, became the first matter, where mutual 
understanding was achieved. In the opinion of the participants 
in the conference, the unanimity of views on this matter should 
serve as the basis for the adoption of measures, which under 
conditions of the market economy are needed to improve and 
reform economic activity for the purpose of overcoming the 
crisis and lending a new impetus to the economy. 
  "3. Another matter, on which accord was achieved, consisted 
in the need to uniformly distribute the burden of the crisis 
among various social groups, as well as in the demand for 
efficient democratization of the political and economic system 
as the condition necessary for the acceptance of reform by all 
of society. 
  "4. All the political parties that participated in the 
conference expressed their agreement with the government about 
the need to adopt a number of primarily short-term measures in 
the area of monetary circulation, finances, and employment, 
which would make it possible to stabilize Spain's economy in 
basic indicators within 2 years..." 
  In Russia's present situation it is also possible to 
coordinate the aims of socioeconomic policy and to develop a 
program of measures for their realization, which would receive 
the support of the most influential political forces--if there 
were a desire. There is already the first serious result--basic 
directions in domestic and foreign policy proposed by the 
president in the message to the Federal Assembly received the 
support of the State Duma. Of course, their concretization in 
the program of measures requires serious and difficult work. 
Therefore, the question is: Who will perform this work? 
  Two months ago in the recommendations of parliamentary 
hearings "On the Economic Situation in the Country and 
Legislative Support for Anticrisis Policy and Economic Reform" 
it was proposed that within a 3-week period the government 
develop a plan of measures to overcome the economic crisis. A 
month ago the president's message "On Strengthening the Russian 
State" was approved by the decree of the State Duma, which 
suggested that in the shortest period the government develop a 
plan of measures to overcome the socioeconomic crisis in the 
country. Several events, which simplified this task, occurred 
simultaneously: the adoption by the State Duma of the Memorandum 
on Accord and the president's initiative in the signing of the 
Agreement on the Achievement of Civic Accord. The work of "round 
tables" on the concretization of basic directions in domestic 
and foreign policy began. 
  However, the program for anticrisis measures did not and 
does 
not exist. Moreover, the draft of the federal budget was drawn 
up as though there were neither elections on 12 December nor the 
president's message setting a new course in economic policy. In 
particular, in the priorities of structural policy indicated in 
the president's message the draft of the 1994 federal budget 
provides financing for only two ones--the fuel and energy 
complex (which accounts for more than one-half of the 
expenditures provided in the budget and in extrabudgetary funds 
for the financing of the national economy and attraction of 
foreign credits) and, to a much lesser degree, the 
agro-industrial complex. State support is hardly provided for 
the conversion of the defense industry, which is needed not only 
for the retention of work places and production capacities in 
science-intensive industry, but is also the condition necessary 
for a successful modernization of the country's entire 
production apparatus and for the renewal of economic growth. 
Budget appropriations are not allocated in a sufficient volume 
for the realization of federal goal-oriented programs, which 
should ensure the initiation of progressive structural changes 
in the economy. Science and education, which determine our 
development in the future, are doomed to further degradation. 
  On the basis of an analysis of draft budget indicators and 
according to the results of parliamentary hearings "On 
Structural and Scientific-Technical Policy in 1994-1995 and 
Until the Year 2000" the Committee on Economic Policy of the 
State Duma drew a conclusion on noncorrespondence of the 
structure of planned budget expenditures to the priorities of 
structural policy formulated in the president's message to the 
Federal Assembly. 
  The same also concerns another key point of the president's 
message--inadmissibility of a decline in basic social 
indicators. Basic social guarantees are not ensured materially 
or organizationally. The draft budget envisages neither an 
active policy of assistance for the unemployed, nor an efficient 
protection of mother and child, nor the maintenance of an 
acceptable level of education and public health services. 
  For the third year we are moving in the vicious circle of 
declining reproduction. The process of destruction of the 
country's production potential expanding around the 
interconnection--reduction in production--decline in budget 
revenues--reduction in budget expenditures, primarily for 
purposes of development--further decline in production--and so 
forth has gained strength. The policy--pursued at the same 
time--of passive adaptation to the economic slump oriented 
toward the balancing of the budget deficit and the 
accomplishment of the ideological task of destroying the state 
sector of the economy only aggravates the situation. 
  In order to get out of the formed vicious circle of 
declining 
reproduction and policy of passive adaptation, it is necessary 
to change over to active purposeful actions according to 
sufficiently obvious directions in overcoming the crisis. 
  1. Introduction of order in the system of state 
finances. It is impossible to implement any intelligent 
policy under conditions when the state is the biggest nonpayer 
and unreliable economic partner. The practice of an arbitrary 
sequestration of state expenditures, which provokes the 
deepening of the nonpayment crisis, strengthening of the chaos 
in the economy, and destruction of the social sphere, must be 
eliminated. Of course, this will demand a sharp rise in the 
responsibility and quality of work by the staff of appropriate 
state departments and its personnel reinforcement. Measures to 
improve the reliability of the revenue part of the budget must 
be adopted simultaneously. These measures include not only the 
strengthening of tax discipline and the abolition of illegal 
privileges concerning taxation and foreign economic activity, 
but also an increase in the reliability of the planning of 
budget expenditures, improvement in the efficiency of budget 
expenditures, regulation of the money and credit sphere, and 
activation of nontax sources of state revenues. 
  Among the latter the most significant reserves are contained 
in the use of rent payments from the exploitation of natural 
resources, in the attraction of revenues from the use and 
privatization of state property, and in the regulation of credit 
emission. Revenues from the servicing of credits previously 
issued by the state and their repayment are highly substantial 
and at present uncontrolled. The vast profit from the 1992-1993 
credit emission is spread between privileged bank and trade 
structures and stimulates production activity only to a 
negligible degree. 
  2. The introduction of order in the system of 
management of state property. The uncontrolled use of state 
property, while the state experiences an acute shortage of funds 
and is forced to lower expenditures on the financing of urgent 
social needs, is a paradoxical fact. Nevertheless, the profit 
from an efficient use of state property is not even included in 
the sources of federal budget revenues and revenues from the 
privatization of state property form a negligibly small amount, 
which is hundreds of times smaller than the value of privatized 
property. 
  The need to establish a system of management of state 
property, which is generally accepted in all countries with a 
market economy, a system providing for responsibility for its 
efficient use, can hardly evoke doubts in any sensible person, 
irrespective of his political orientation. The mismanagement of 
state property and the lack of clear responsibility on the part 
of officials managing it are some of the basic sources of 
corruption and chaos in the economy. Nevertheless, the extremely 
ideologized and absurd policy of a spontaneous, almost free, 
distribution of state property continues. It gives rise to 
numerous offenses and does not promote an increase in production 
efficiency. 
  3. The most rapid transition from the present 
ideologized model of privatization to a pragmatic one. 
Privatization should lead to an increase in production 
efficiency and bring income to the treasury. For this state 
property should be sold to those that are capable of giving the 
highest price and are able to ensure an inflow of capital, 
long-term profitable development of enterprises, and 
preservation and increase of work places. Appropriate methods of 
privatization are well known in world practice and are used in 
all countries except ours. 
  4. Combination of bank capital with industrial 
one. As a result of the insufficiently considered price 
liberalization, chaotic reorganization of the banking system, 
and "voucher" privatization, a serious barrier arose between 
financial and production sectors of the economy. A paradoxical 
situation was created, where with the most acute shortage of 
financing of production enterprises and catastrophical reduction 
in investments in the economy there is a vast amount of free 
money taken abroad, circulating in speculative operations, and 
even reserved in the Central Bank. 
  In order to overcome this barrier, it is necessary to pursue 
an active policy of integration of banking and production 
capital in the form of various financial and industrial groups 
and of stimulation of production investments--both through tax 
privileges and through direct state participation in the form of 
share crediting and the granting of guarantees for private 
investments in priority directions. 
  5. Reforming of the tax system, which must become 
simpler, more reliable, and more efficient. The statement 
about the need to lower the tax burden and to exempt income 
assigned for purposes of production development from taxation 
has become a platitude. The possibility of doing this, 
compensating for the reduction in budget revenues by an increase 
in proceeds from rent payments and the use of state property, is 
also obvious. In reality, however, everything occurs the other 
way round--rent income and income from the use of state property 
are appropriated by privileged commercial structures and the 
relentlessly decreasing tax proceeds are compensated by the 
introduction of new quasi-tax payments and intensification of 
the tax burden. 
  6. Active structural, industrial, and scientific and 
technical policy of stimulation of the growth of promising 
industries and of modernization and reorganization of 
enterprises with worn-out and obsolete equipment. Under our 
conditions of deep-seated structural disproportions, which are 
caused by the technological multistructural nature of the 
economy and the orientation of its science-intensive sector 
toward the production of military equipment, the adaptation of 
enterprises to the requirements of the market economy and 
consumer demand is impossible without the attraction of serious 
investments and the development of a long-term strategy. Neither 
occurs by itself as a result of the action of forces of market 
self-organization. Without an appropriate state policy of 
support for the adaptation of science-intensive sectors of 
industry to the demands of the market economy its rapid 
destruction and deindustrialization of the national economy are 
inevitable. In fact, this process is already gaining strength--a 
sharp reduction in state and consumer demand in the absence of 
an active investment policy today has led to a rapid increase in 
costs and to a reduction in the competitiveness of 
science-intensive industries. The repeated reduction in state 
purchases is aggravated by the decline in the production of 
civilian products, which, in turn, causes an even bigger rise in 
the costs of products and a further intensification of the 
decline in production. 
  Today the decline in production in science-intensive sectors 
of industry greatly exceeds 50 percent and continues to grow, 
passing into the phase of an irreversible destruction of the 
country's scientific and industrial potential. If existing 
tendencies remain, by the end of the year it is possible to 
expect an irrevocable loss of hundreds of promising, new 
technologies, break-up of labor collectives, and physical 
destruction of many advanced technologies and production 
capacities. 
  7. Concentration of social expenditures on direct 
support for very needy population groups and investments in 
"human capital"--training and education of the rising 
generation, retraining of dismissed personnel, and settlement of 
migrants with a simultaneous reforming of the system of pension 
and medical security on the basis of individual and collective 
insurance. 
  The presently implemented economic policy evolves in the 
opposite direction: Ever fewer funds are being invested in 
"human capital" with a rise in the relative share of 
unproductive expenditures on the financing of the current 
consumption of the nonworking population. The continuation of 
such a policy under conditions of the decreasing revenue base of 
the budget and increase in the share of the unemployed 
population will signify an increase in taxation on labor 
expenditures with the lowering of the quality and productivity 
of labor and, ultimately, the most rapid further reduction in 
the competitiveness of the domestic economy. 
  8. Debureaucratization of the state regulation of the 
economy. It must be ensured through strict observance of 
stable legislation setting the rules of economic relations and 
access to resources, not by administrative-distributive methods. 
Bureaucratic obstacles to the access of new firms to the market 
must be eliminated maximally and favorable conditions for the 
establishment and development of new enterprises in various 
fields of activity must be created. These conditions must 
include an access to sources of capital, to free production 
capacities, to sales markets, to the transport and information 
infrastructure, and to the necessary natural resources. For now 
all this fully depends on the will of state bodies of executive 
power, which are more engaged in extortion and the planting of 
administrative arbitrariness than in the creation of conditions 
for the development of entrepreneurship and competition. 
  9. Subordination of the regulation of foreign economic 
activity to the interests of development of domestic 
production. The set of tools is well known here--currency 
control, stimulation of the domestic export of goods of a high 
degree of processing, protection of the domestic market against 
the threats of unscrupulous foreign competition by means of 
measures of tariff and nontariff regulation, stimulation of 
advanced structures by means of a corresponding differentiation 
of customs tariff, and so forth. 
  Today the steps taken in this area are obviously 
insufficient 
and not thought through. To this day currency control has not 
begun to operate, customs tariff is formulated under the strong 
effect of political market factors, and the interests of the 
national industry are not reflected in the foreign economic 
policy being implemented. 
  Only some directions in economic policy, the obvious need 
for 
which does not evoke doubts among the overwhelming part of 
political forces, are enumerated above. The purposeful 
implementation of these directions can ensure a rapid positive 
breakthrough in the development of the economic situation and 
receive extensive political support. A corresponding program of 
measures could fill the socioeconomic section of the agreement 
on the achievement of civil accord in Russia with a concrete 
content, also forming the basic subject of the agreement, for 
the sake of which the contracting parties would agree to a 
voluntary limitation of political activity. 
  Unfortunately, hardly any active steps in any of the 
directions enumerated above are being taken. The economic policy 
being realized proceeds from the thesis that the crisis will be 
overcome by itself, as soon as inflation is brought down to a 
sufficiently low level. In order to bring inflation down, it is 
considered sufficient to minimize the budget deficit and credit 
emission. And then, perhaps, something will turn up. 
  The hopelessness of such a policy is clearly demonstrated by 
the practical experience of the last 2 years. In fact, it serves 
as a justification for the inactivity of the government, which 
prefers passive adaptation to the political situation instead of 
an active anticrisis policy, finding activities connected with 
the endless division of the dwindling budget pie, allocation of 
credit emission, and distribution of state property quite 
comforting and attractive. 
  In fact, helplessness, inactivity, and embezzlement of state 
property hide behind the pseudoliberal rhetoric. Today it is 
quite evident that, without the strengthening of state 
responsibility for all directions in economic policy, it will 
not be possible to overcome the decline in production or the 
galloping inflation. The suppression of the latter is possible 
only as a result of the implementation of the directions in 
economic policy enumerated above with the observance of obvious 
limitations on the growth of credit emission and the amount of 
the budget deficit. Conversely, as experience shows, keeping the 
latter within acceptable limits is impossible without an active 
economic policy in the many directions partially enumerated 
above. The suppression of inflation and macroeconomic 
stabilization can become only the result of an active 
structural, institutional, investment, social, and other 
components of economic policy, not the prerequisite, as 
advocates of the theory "everything is formed by itself" believe. 
  Today as never before during the postwar history the country 
needs a responsible and competent government capable of pursuing 
an active and purposeful policy in national interests and 
leaning on the wide support of the public. The coincidence of 
the basic directions in domestic and foreign policy with program 
propositions of the constructive opposition proclaimed by the 
president makes it possible to form a wide coalition of 
political forces in the support of a sound economic policy and 
of the government realizing it. It is vitally important to 
realize this possibility, filling the agreement on civil accord 
in Russia, which is being prepared, with a concrete economic 
content. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68595 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94037" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   29 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Government Budget Change To Affect Chernobyl's Victims </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Government Budget Change To Affect Chernobyl's Victims </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0781A Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian No 17, 29 Apr 
94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0781A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Nikolay Troitskiy: "It Was Decided To Save on </F>
`Enemies of the People'"] 
  [Text] Having persuaded the Duma to approve the 
annual budget "in the main," the government brought itself to 
familiarize deputies with some details, which they did not 
surmise. 
  A few days ago the head of the cabinet appealed to the Duma 
to urgently adopt the law "On Changing, Suspending, and 
Nullifying Some Legislative Acts." It is proposed that the 
operation of a number of articles of 14 laws and 5 decrees 
adopted by the Supreme Soviet, which establish numerous 
privileges and monetary compensations for various categories of 
individuals, that is, tax police workers, judges, procurators, 
donors, athletes, servicemen, Chernobyl residents, victims of 
illegal repressions, and so forth, be abolished "for the period 
until the deficit level reaches 5 percent." For the purpose of 
saving budget funds, the government proposes that those that 
suffered from the Chernobyl accident be squeezed "with respect 
to the receipt of an interest-free loan" and the pardoned 
"enemies of the people" be deprived of the "right to free 
passage on railroad and city transport and the right to a 
50-percent reduction in the amounts of payment for living space 
and municipal services." 
  According to the prime minister's estimates, by abolishing 
the indicated privileges and compensations, the state will save 
90 trillion rubles, which will greatly improve the financial 
situation. Warding off possible suspicions of a negative 
attitude toward the acts of the former parliament, the cabinet 
of ministers also abolishes 37 of its own decrees, denying tax 
indulgences and subsidies to a number of sectors, subjects of 
the Federation, and mass information media. Moreover, the 
government proposed that 12 presidential edicts, in which the 
head of the state promised much to various citizens, sectors, 
and regions, be abolished. 
  Although the prime minister did not spare the pride of both 
branches of power, his proposals irritated many Duma members. 
Vladimir Isakov announced that "responsibility for the 
nonfulfillment of Yeltsin's high-sounding promises made on the 
eve of the elections and the referendum on the Constitution is 
shifted to the Duma." Fractions of communists and agrarians 
became indignant and decided not to support such an 
"anti-popular" budget. Nikolay Petrakov, a Yabloko member, 
called all this a "farce." Most of all, parliament members were 
offended by the fact that, apparently, the government had 
already excluded from the draft budget all the expenditures 
specified by documents, which were still to be abolished. The 
Duma, discussing and approving the budget "in the main," 
naturally, did not know the above. 
  The Explanatory Note on Expenditures on the Maintenance of 
Bodies of Power also surprised deputies. In all, a little over 7 
trillion rubles are to be spent on this matter. Out of this sum 
154.6 billion are allocated to the Federal Assembly. The 
parliament values itself slightly more, in connection with which 
the government note states: "According to the data of the 
Administration of Affairs of the Russian Federation President, 
the implementation of the Law on the Status of a Deputy will 
additionally require 172.8 billion rubles," a sum which the 
government did not take into account in the draft budget, 
because appropriate calculations were late. This explanation did 
not comfort deputies at all. Moreover, they noted with malicious 
pleasure that the president's Administration of Affairs managed 
to assign all 400 billion rubles for its own needs. Individual 
Duma members assume that expenditures on one department of the 
president's administration cannot exceed twofold expenditures on 
both chambers of the federal parliament. 
  Be that as it may, new circumstances, which have become 
known 
after the official introduction of the draft budget in the Duma, 
threaten to complicate the procedure of its approval. The 
process can drag out until the summer, or maybe until the fall. 
Next the rejection of the budget by the Federation Council and 
even a presidential "veto" are possible, if deputies do not take 
all government wishes into account. However, this will only be 
good for executive power: All these months the government will 
live according to a budget, which it "approved" for itself. At 
the end of the year it is too late and pointless to rectify or 
refine anything. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-68596 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr051___94038" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-051 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Russian Business Elite Detailed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Russian Business Elite Detailed </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    List of Most Influential Entrepreneurs </H4>

<F P=102> 944E0766A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 26 Apr 94 pp 
1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0766A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by Vitaliy Tretyakov: "The Elite of Russian </F>
Business: The Money and Power of the Country's 50 Most 
Influential Entrepreneurs: Financial Magnates Predominate"] 
  [Text] The success of the monthly survey by NG-VP 
[NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA-"Vox Populi"] of "the 100 leading 
politicians in Russia" which has been held for the past year and 
a half and has become not only a fact of political science, but 
a factor in Russian politics itself, has moved NEZAVISIMAYA 
GAZETA to extend the survey program to the country's elite 
groups. Unquestionably the next ones after politicians should be 
the entrepreneurs, businessmen, and owners of the largest 
fortunes. Especially as some of them who are not politicians in 
the true sense of this word have started to "infiltrate" the 
"100 politicians" listing (incidentally, the problem for the 
sociologists with whom NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA is working is how to 
take them out of this listing now without altering the validity 
of the survey). 
  At the beginning of 1994, we decided to compile a list of 
the 
50 most powerful--and hence most influential--figures in Russian 
business. 
  As with the "100 politicians" listing, the new survey was 
conducted in accordance with NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA's idea and 
order and with its firsthand participation. At the same time, 
taking into account the specific nature of this survey, the 
Economic News Agency (AEN) headed by Sergey Turanov was added to 
our traditional partner, the Service for Studying Public Opinion 
of Professor Boris Grushin, "Voz Populi." 
  Inasmuch as the dynamics of personnel changes in business 
are 
much more significant than in politics, the new survey will be 
conducted once every 3 months (with the results for the year 
summed up later on). 
  Of course, there is a very clear-cut synthetic indicator of 
the economic power, and consequently influence (including 
political influence) of one entrepreneur or another--the amount 
of money or property which he owns, has at his disposal, or 
controls. Today no one can determine these figures precisely, 
although attempts are being undertaken. For this reason, it was 
decided to make our new survey one by experts, as with the "100 
politicians" rating. During the first stages of the survey, 
incidentally, the list of experts will be changed and refined so 
that we can limit the subjectivism of assessments associated 
primarily with the absence of experts with accurate information 
and those who are influenced by the advertised "propaganda" in 
which numerous entrepreneurs are actively engaged. 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Number            |Name              |Firm              |Average Rating    | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1.                |Gusinskiy, V.A.   |"Most" Financial  |7.48              | 
|                  |                  |Group             |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|2.                |Vinogradov, V.V.  |Inkombank         |7.34              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|3.                |Khodorkovskiy, M.-|"Menatep"         |6.96              | 
|                  |B.                |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|4.                |Smolenskiy, A.I.  |"Stolichnyy" Bank |6.94              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|5.                |Neverov, V.I.     |"Germes"          |6.92              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|6.                |Yakovlev, V.Ye.   |"Kommersant" AO [-|6.62              | 
|                  |                  |Joint-Stock Compa-|                  | 
|                  |                  |ny]               |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|7-8.              |Agapov, Yu.V.     |Kredobank         |6.60              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|7-8.              |Boyko, O.V.       |"Olbi"            |6.60              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|9.                |Fedorov, S.N.     |"Mikrokhirurgiya  |6.30              | 
|                  |                  |Glaza" MNTK [Inte-|                  | 
|                  |                  |rbranch Scientifi-|                  | 
|                  |                  |c-Technical Compl-|                  | 
|                  |                  |ex]               |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|10.               |Bekh, N.I.        |KamAZ [Kama Aotom-|6.26              | 
|                  |                  |otive Plant]      |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|11.               |Kadannikov, V.V.  |AvtoVAZ [Volga Au-|6.06              | 
|                  |                  |tomotive Plant]   |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|12.               |Yakunin, V.K.     |Tokobank          |5.80              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|13.               |Nevzlin, L.V.     |"Menatep"         |5.58              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|14.               |Masarskiy, M.V.   |"Rossiyskoye Zolo-|5.52              | 
|                  |                  |to" AO            |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|15.               |Bukato, V.I.      |Mosbiznesbank     |5.42              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|16.               |Malkin, V.V.      |"Rossiyskiy Kredi-|5.38              | 
|                  |                  |t" Bank           |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|17.               |Borovoy, K.N.     |Russian Commoditi-|5.34              | 
|                  |                  |es and Raw Materi-|                  | 
|                  |                  |al Exchange       |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|18-19.            |Zakharov, A.V.    |Moscow Interbank  |5.32              | 
|                  |                  |Currency Exchange |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|18-19             |Milyukov, Yu.A.   |Moscow Commoditie-|5.32              | 
|                  |                  |s Exchange        |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|20.               |Nakhmanovich, I.A.|AvtoVAZbank       |5.30              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|21.               |Dubenetskiy, Ya.N.|Promstroybank [In-|5.22              | 
|                  |                  |dustrial Construc-|                  | 
|                  |                  |tion Bank]        |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|22.               |Duvanov, G.V.     |ASKO              |5.06              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|23.               |Kivelidi, I.Kh.   |Vneshekonomkooper-|5.02              | 
|                  |                  |atsiya            |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|24-25.            |Antonov, I.V.     |Unikombank        |4.98              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|24-25.            |Rappoport, A.N.   |Alfa-Bank         |4.98              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|26-27.            |Vlasov, A.F.      |Russian Commoditi-|4.72              | 
|                  |                  |es and Raw Materi-|                  | 
|                  |                  |al Exchange       |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|26-27.            |Tosunyan, G.A.    |Tekhnobank        |4.72              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|28.               |Chanov, A.K.      |"Krosna"          |4.62              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|29.               |Salamandra, V.L.  |"National Credit" |4.56              | 
|                  |                  |Bank              |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|30-31.            |Bendukidze, K.A.  |NIPEK             |4.50              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|30-31.            |Soldatov, V.V.    |All-Russian Excha-|4.50              | 
|                  |                  |nge Bank          |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|32.               |Tumanov, V.I.     |Tumanov and "K"   |4.44              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|33.               |Sudakov, V.V.     |Moscow Internatio-|4.34              | 
|                  |                  |nal Bank          |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|34.               |Okhlopkov, V.     |"Delovaya Rossiya"|4.18              | 
|                  |                  | Bank             |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|35.               |Kashirskiy, A.V.  |Mytishchi Commerc-|4.10              | 
|                  |                  |ial Bank          |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|36.               |Soldatov, A.V.    |RELKOM            |4.08              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|37.               |Kantor, O.I.      |"Yugorskiy" Bank  |4.06              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|38.               |Korotkov, P.A.    |Russian National  |4.04              | 
|                  |                  |Commercial Bank   |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|39.               |Kadyrov, R.F.     |"Vostok" Bank     |3.90              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|40.               |Baskin, I.M.      |"Garant"          |3.86              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|41,               |Surkov, V.Yu.     |"Menatep"         |3.80              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|42.               |Lyubashevskiy, Yu.|"Dyagilev-Tsentr" |3.70              | 
|                  |Ya.               |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|43.               |Safaryan, I.A.    |Brokinvestservis  |3.68              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|44-45.            |Zhuk, G.V.        |Neftekhimbank     |3.66              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|44-45.            |Fegisov, A.A.     |First Checking In-|3.66              | 
|                  |                  |vestment Fund     |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|46-47.            |Vulfov, A.V.      |"S.I. Realty"     |3.62              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|46-47.            |Keselman, V.G.    |"Germes"          |3.62              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|48.               |Guchnik, V.K.     |Orgbank           |3.56              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|49-50.            |Zakharov, A.N.    |Moscow Internatio-|3.54              | 
|                  |                  |nal Stock Exchange|                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|49-50.            |Pankin, V.V.      |Moscow Central St-|3.54              | 
|                  |                  |ock Exchange      |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>
